Bill Koefoed, Chris Liddell
Friday, October 23, 2009
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks everyone for joining us this morning.
As you know, yesterday was a significant day at Microsoft with the launch of Windows 7 and Windows Server 2008 R2.
We hope that you were able to see and participate in some of the exciting launch activities held around the globe.
As usual, here with me are Chris Liddell, Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer; Frank Brod, Corporate Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer; and John Seethoff, Deputy General Counsel.
Today, Chris will start with takeaways from the first quarter of our 2010 fiscal year.
Then, I'll get into the details of the quarter, before handing it back to Chris who will discuss our business outlook.
After that, we'll take your questions.
We filed our Form 10-Q this morning.
In addition, we posted our quarterly financial summary slide deck, which is intended to follow the flow of our prepared remarks, as well as provide a reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
You can find these documents at the Investor Relations Web site at Microsoft.com/msft.
Today's call will be Web cast live, and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, any future use of the recording, and in the transcript which will be posted on our Web site.
You can replay the call and view the transcript at the Microsoft Investor Relations Web site until October 23rd, 2010.
This call is protected by copyright law and international treaties.
Unauthorized reproduction or distribution of this report, or any portion of it, without the express permission of Microsoft may result in civil and criminal penalties.
We will be making statements during this call that are forward-looking.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could differ materially because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Form 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
I want to point out one last thing before I turn the call over to Chris.
With the recent move of Windows Live, we changed the name of the Client Division to the Windows and Windows Live Division.
During the call, we will refer to this business as the Windows Division.
Okay, Chris, the call is yours.
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Thanks, Bill.
And good afternoon, everyone.
The results of the first quarter were strong, particularly on an adjusted earnings per share basis primarily as a result of two main factors, consumer demand for our Windows and Xbox products combined with excellent cost controls.
This result was achieved despite relative weakness in business spending, which has yet to see a broad-based recovery.
Having said that, it is showing signs of stabilization at lower levels.
And while it is too early to tell, the fourth quarter of Fiscal 2009 might well have been the bottom of the economic reset.
Looking at the broader picture, at our Financial Analyst Meeting in July I articulated our approach to what we described as the New Normal around five major shareholder value strategies:  maximizing cash flow, streamlining our cost structure, driving operational excellence, capturing market share, and investing in innovation.
I'm very happy with our progress at each of those five strategies during the quarter.
For example, operating cash flow was $6.1 billion in the quarter, which is a terrific result given the economic conditions are still challenging.
We resumed our share buyback program with 1.4 billion of shares repurchased in the quarter, retained our 13 cents per share dividend, and built our net cash and investment balance to over $33 billion.
During the quarter, we also continued to focus on our long-term cost structure.
We realized a 10 percent decrease in operating expenses over the prior year due to a lower number of people employed, a lower cost per person, lower vendor spend, and lower marketing costs.
Our headcount at the end of the quarter was 4 percent lower than the same time last year, the first time that a reduction of that significance has been achieved in the company's history.
Over the last three months, we've continued to show great operational excellence with not only the successful launch of Windows 7, but also the Windows Server 2008 R2 global launch yesterday, and the release to manufacturing of Exchange 2010.
In market share, while it's very early days, we're very happy with the progress of our search engine Bing.
Other notable accomplishments during the quarter include the continued gains in Windows Server, System Center Management Tools, and Xbox Live.
Despite the focus on costs, we've continued to invest in innovation, and this year, to name a few, we will release Windows Azure, SharePoint 2010, SQL Server 2008 R2, Office 2010, and continue to deliver innovations in Bing.
So, in summary, I'm very happy with both the short-term quarterly financial results, and our progress on the factors that we believe will drive long-term success.
So, with that, I'll provide more color on our outlook after Bill gives you some additional details on the quarter.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Chris.
I'll start with the company overview, and then go through revenue performance for each of our business units.
All of my comments are adjusted for the $1.5 billion of revenue deferred this quarter from both the Windows 7 Upgrade program, and Windows 7 licenses sold in advance of general availability.
Keep in mind that this is a non-GAAP view, and all GAAP/non-GAAP reconciliations can be found in our slide deck.
All growth comparisons relate to the corresponding quarter of last year, unless I specify otherwise.
Overall, revenue was down 4 percent because of continued weakness in global demand, especially in the business segment.
This was a positive result considering the macroeconomic environment.
And, as Chris noted earlier, we were pleased with the strength of consumer demand particularly for our Windows and Xbox products.
Foreign exchange headwinds had a $233 million or about a 2 percentage point impact in the first quarter.
This quarter, our products billing mix was roughly 35 percent annuity, 30 percent OEM, and 25 percent license only, with the balance coming from our other businesses.
Enterprise agreement renewals were in line with our expectations, and our multi-year annuity revenue grew low single digits in line with our outlook last quarter.
In terms of geographic mix, revenue in the U.S., driven primarily by consumer demand, was relatively strong compared with other regions.
Unearned revenue, again adjusted for Windows 7 was $13 billion, down slightly from last year.
Our contracted-not-billed balance was over $13 billion, in line with last year.
Now let's move on to our thoughts on the PC market.
PC hardware demand improved significantly.
On a sequential basis, we estimate the PC market was up mid-teens.
Year on year we estimate the market grew 0 to 2 percent.
We estimate consumer PCs grew mid single digits from last year primarily due to growth in netbooks.
This quarter, netbooks represented about 12 percent of the total PC market, similar to the mix last quarter, and represented significant growth over the prior year.
Business PCs declined high single digits year on year, but were up sequentially.
Now, with that backdrop, let's move on to the revenue and business drivers by segment beginning with the Windows Division.
Overall, OEM unit sales increased 6 percent from last year, several points over the PC market due to higher attach and some inventory builds in advance of the Windows 7 launch.
At our Financial Analyst Meeting in July, Steve shared with you a slide that bridged the change in the PC market to OEM revenue growth.
We have included the first quarter bridge in our slide deck.
To start, OEM revenue decreased 6 percent from last year.
Changes in segment mix represented a 7 percent decline in OEM revenue from the prior year.
This was due to the PC market dynamics I discussed earlier, including continued growth in netbooks, and the overall higher mix of consumer PCs versus business PCs.
Windows attach and inventory represented a 4 percent increase.
Attach rates increased year-over-year due to strong attach gains on netbooks, and a continued shift to multinational OEMs, which reduced piracy.
Other items represented a 3 percent decrease, due to the shift toward multi-national OEMs and the wind down of the Windows XP revenue deferral.
The commercial, retail and online portion of the Windows division was up 2 percent, primarily driven by pre-sales of Windows 7.
Now, let me touch on some sequential trends.
On a sequential basis OEM units increased 19 percent, or about 3 percentage points faster than the overall PC market.
OEM revenue, meanwhile, increased 20 percent sequentially, and as you can see exceeded OEM unit growth.
To put the quarter results in perspective, Q1 represented the highest number of Windows licenses sold in one quarter ever.
And September was the highest single month of Windows unit sales ever.
In summary, it was a very solid quarter for the Windows division, and with Windows 7 we have a great product for the recovering PC market.
Now, let's move to Server and Tools.
In general the conditions from the fourth quarter remain unchanged.
We had a strong attach of Windows Server, SQL Server, and System Center.
As a result, our license-only and OEM business declined less than the 20 percent drop estimated for the underlying X-86 server hardware market.
Annuity revenue was up single digits, in line with the outlook we gave last quarter.
FX rate changes were a 2 percentage point headwind to revenue.
As I mentioned earlier, we launched Windows Server 2008 R2 to the market yesterday.
We believe the virtualization and management capabilities offered are currently the best value in the marketplace, and we are excited by the enterprise enthusiasm for this product.
Moving on to the Online Services Division.
Online advertising revenue was down 3 percent, but included a 3-point FX headwind.
While we experienced continued growth in page views, display revenue was weighed down by industry-wide, year-over-year declines in advertising rates.
On a sequential basis, however, rates seem to be stabilizing.
In the U.S., search revenue was up mid-single digits, despite industry-wide monetization declines in the quarter.
We continue to make search share gains with Bing, with share in the U.S.
up every month since the June release.
In July we signed a commercial agreement with Yahoo! to further gain scale and momentum in the search business.
We are working through the regulatory review process and continue to be hopeful the deal will be approved early in calendar 2010.
In addition earlier this week we announced strategic partnerships with Facebook and Twitter.
These partnerships demonstrate our continued search innovation and specifically with social media, and real time content.
Moving on, Microsoft Business Division revenue was down 11 percent, due to declines in both business and consumer spending.
FX rate changes were a 2 percentage point headwind to revenue.
Business revenue was down 4 percent, reflecting weak business PC sales.
Within that, annuity revenue was up low single digits, in line with the outlook we provided last quarter, while license-only sales declined over 20 percent.
Consumer revenue, which includes the OEM and retail portions of this business declined 34 percent, driven by tough inventory comps over last year, due to prior year pricing promotions, and lower attach from the continuing shift to lower priced PCs I discussed in my Windows division commentary.
Within MBD we continue to see double-digit growth in our SharePoint, Office Communications Server, and CRM products.
In the Entertainment and Devices Division, while console revenue was impacted by price cuts and volume decline, overall gaming revenue was up almost $100 million.
Halo 3 ODST was the number one selling console title in the U.S.
last month, along with five other Xbox 360 games in the top 10.
With a worldwide install base of almost 34 million consoles, Xbox 360 continues to lead the industry with an 8.7 software title attach rate.
Xbox Live also contributed strongly to the quarter's performance, with revenue growth in excess of 50 percent.
We believe consumers will be excited by the richer multimedia enhancements, and integration with social networks that we are delivering this fall.
Now for the rest of the income statement:  Cost of revenue was flat at $2.8 billion, driven by increased search distribution and online costs, which were offset by lower Xbox 360 console costs, and Service and Support costs.
Operating expenses decreased 10 percent to $5.6 billion, driven by reductions in headcount, headcount related expenses and vendor costs.
Diluted shares outstanding were about 9 billion, down 2 percent from the prior year.
This quarter we repurchased $1.4 billion worth of shares, and paid $1.2 billion of dividends.
Adjusted earnings per share was 52 cents, an 8 percent increase from the prior year.
Cash flow from operations was $6.1 billion.
So, to wrap up, while business spending and the macroeconomic environment remained challenging, the consumer segment performed better than expected, Windows 7 is off to a great start, and we feel terrific about our execution this quarter.
With that, I'll hand it back to Chris, who is going to discuss our business outlook.
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Okay.
Thanks, Bill.
The remainder of this call I'll discuss our expectations for the second quarter, and the remainder of Fiscal 2010, starting with our assumptions for the industry.
Overall the corporate IT spending trends we discussed in July remain intact.
In our conversations with CIOs, many remain cautious about existing budgets, and spending through the end of this calendar year.
However, we believe calendar 2010 has the potential for improvement.
Given the industry backdrop we're extremely well positioned due to the strongest product cycle in our company's history, and also continue to believe that we will exit the economic reset a much stronger, more focused, and cost efficient company.
Turning to segment expectations, in the second quarter we expect Windows Division revenue, excluding the impact of the Windows 7 upgrade program, to be in line with overall PC market growth.
With the launch of Windows 7, we expect inventory to rebuild in the channel, and an increase in retail sales.
This should offset the three hardware trends we've seen in recent quarters, which are netbooks growing faster than non-netbook PCs, consumer PCs growing faster than business PCs, and emerging markets growing faster than developed markets.
In the second quarter we expect to recognize virtually all of the $1.7 billion of Windows 7 Upgrade revenue deferrals from the last two quarters.
For the balance of the fiscal year we expect Windows Division revenue to remain in line with, or slightly ahead of the overall PC market growth, with the main variable being the pace of business PC improvement.
We see the potential for a corporate PC refresh cycle beginning in calendar year 2010, although it could be gradual and occur over a couple of years.
We also expect the netbook mix to stabilize over the course of the year.
In the second quarter we expect Microsoft Business Division dynamics and revenue trends to be largely the same as they were in the first quarter, with growth lagging PC shipments, due to the factors Bill mentioned in his commentary.
For the full year, the consumer and business non-annuity revenue, approximately 40 percent of the total, should face the same trends as in the second quarter, with increasing pressure in advance of the next product cycle, and as such could continue to lag PC shipments.
We continue to expect annuity revenue, representing 60 percent of the total revenue, to be broadly flat for the full year.
As I called out last quarter, MBD results should improve when we start to see business spending recover, combined with the impact of Office 2010.
The Server and Tool Business is most closely aligned to enterprise spend.
We expect the server shipment trend to gradually start to improve towards the end of our fiscal year.
We expect non-annuity revenue, which is approximately 35 percent of the total, to move generally in line with server shipments for the quarter and the year, and annuity revenue will be mid-single digits, while Services should be flat for the year.
In the Entertainment and Devices Division, although we realized upside from our first party games in the first quarter, remember we released two significant titles in the second quarter of last year, which should cause difficult year-over-year comparisons.
We, therefore, expect E&D revenue to decline several points in the second quarter, but we expect the full-year revenue to be roughly flat, as price cuts taken in August are offset by attach revenue and a larger console install base.
Turning to cost of goods sold, driving cost out of our operations, plus a more favorable revenue mix, resulted in a better performance there.
And we now expect COGS as a percentage of revenue to increase only one point this year.
With operating expenses, we also continue to make excellent progress.
We're lowering our guidance for the full year to a range of $26.2 to $26.5 billion down from what we said in July.
This decrease has also absorbed an additional $100 to $200 million of Yahoo! integration costs should the deal pass regulatory review.
We will continue to look for additional cost savings opportunities both in cost of goods sold and in operating expenses through the rest of the fiscal year.
We expect CAPEX to be at most $2 billion for the year, and the tax rate to be 25 percent.
So, in summary, I feel great about how we're executing, given the economic reset.
We're driving excellent cash flow, product innovation, and continued cost discipline.
More importantly, our strategies will position us to take advantage of a recovering economy, which we hope to begin in the next calendar year.
The ensuing revenue growth combined with continuing cost discipline will set us up for long-term earnings per share growth, and a significant return of shareholder value.
With that, let me take your questions, and I'll hand it back to Bill.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Chris.
We want to get to as many questions as possible from you.
So, please stick to one question, and avoid long, or multi-part questions.
Operator, please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
(Operator Direction.)
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  Good morning.
And congratulations on the quarter.
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Thanks, Adam.
ADAM HOLT:  My question is about average selling prices for Windows.
You actually saw a premium increase sequentially.
I was wondering, where do you think premium mix can go as you get deeper into the Win 7 cycle?  And when would you expect average selling prices to actually start to be additive to the Windows revenue story?
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Yes.
In terms of the premium mix, clearly that's going to change with the SKU structure that we have in Windows 7.
And I think we'll start to see a better in terms of that statistic, a better number going forward simply because we won't have Home Basic in the developed markets.
So, we're going to see a much better Home Premium mix.
In terms of sort of how that feeds through to financials, which I think is the main point, we start to see it improve better when we get a better business PC mix.
And to date, we're clearly seeing headwinds in that, and hopefully next year as we start to see a business PC refresh cycle, we'll start to see a better mix there.
But that average selling price, which in the last year has been probably a negative, I would expect to turn neutral, or even slightly positive as we go through the year, Adam.
ADAM HOLT:  Terrific.
Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
JOHN DIFUCCI, JP Morgan:  Thank you.
Chris, it looks like you saw some benefit from channel inventory build this quarter after three quarters of sort of I think it was a net negative contribution in the last three.
You mentioned, you expect inventory to build in the channel, I think, going forward here.
I'm just curious, how much more is there before we start to get to what you might consider to be sort of "normal" inventory if there is such a thing?  Is it do we have another quarter, or another couple of quarters, or is this something that can be a net positive for the next few quarters?
CHRIS LIDDELL:  I think it will be a net positive throughout the year simply because channel inventory builds, and then even if it just stays at that level it will be positive relative to a low level that was throughout last year.
So, we don't need to see any additional build from what we saw for it to be a year on year mathematical benefit.
So, I think it's going to be a benefit right through the year, whether it continues to get even better again, we'll see.
And that's going to depend clearly on the demands that OEMs see through the Christmas period.
What we saw, and you're certainly right, it was last year as the economy contracted, and people clearly reduced the amount of inventory heads, so we not only had lower demand, we had lower inventory holdings.
We saw that reversed in the first quarter, but we've only gotten back to what I've described as normal levels.
We haven't gotten an excess of inventory in the channels.
That's clearly dependent upon demand.
So, we've gotten back to a normal level.
If we stick at that, it will be a year on year benefit.
If we get good sales, and good sell-through of Windows 7-based PCs, which we're expecting, we can see some additional channel build as well.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
SARAH FRIAR, Goldman Sachs:  Good morning.
And good quarter.
Just to switch gears a little, over on to Online Services.
You talked a little bit about the timing of the Yahoo! transaction, and the expectation of the cost in the cost guidance you've given.
Can you give us any color, Chris, on what you're expecting on the top line add for Yahoo!, and then any other kind of one-off costing?  I know that Steve had mentioned a few way back on the Yahoo! call.
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Sure.
The $100 to $200 million that I mentioned in my commentary is the cost, and that includes all of what I've described as one-off costs, the setup costs in anticipation of migrating over.
So, that would be the total.
And that will clearly depend on when we get the regulatory review, assuming that we do, and how quickly we can implement.
So, there is a range there.
On the revenue side, there will be virtually no revenue contribution this fiscal year.
So, all of those costs will be, if you like, one-off startup costs that we will incur this year in anticipation of our revenue contribution in Fiscal Year '11.
SARAH FRIAR:  And Fiscal Year '11, I know you're not guiding for it.
But just to put some boundaries around it, what sort of size are you thinking about for Yahoo! right now?  We see it about a $360 million type contribution based on what they've been doing.
Do you have any thoughts?
CHRIS LIDDELL:  It will be hundreds of millions, but it's not going to be more than that or less than that - you're in the right order of magnitude.
I can't give you anything more specific than that on this call.
SARAH FRIAR:  Okay.
I appreciate it.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRAD REBACK, Oppenheimer:  Hey, guys, how are you?
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Hi.
Good, thank you.
BRAD REBACK:  Chris, on the last call, on the COGS side of the equation, you talked about undertaking an internal program to focus on driving down costs.
Obviously some of that is showing up here in the guidance going forward.
Can you give us a sense of how far through you are with that program, and if there are meaningful gains to be had from this point forward?
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Well, certainly in the cost of goods sold area, I see that really as a journey that never ends.
So, that's something that we're going to focus on year after year after year now, and certainly in good manufacturing discipline a lot of it is manufacturing hardware COGS, that's the sort of approach you should take.
So, certainly we've embarked on a project which has made some significant difference in the short-term, and you're right, we're starting to see some benefit of that bleeding through this fiscal year.
So, I'm really happy with the progress that we've made.
But that's not going to be a one-off where we just do it this year, and then we stop.
That's going to be something that we will look to continue the disciplines that we've brought in place in the last six to nine months.
So, definitely getting some short-term benefit.
Definitely, you'll get some this year.
I wouldn't promise a lot more than we're starting to guide to, because I think we're fairly accurate on what we're likely to achieve this year.
But I would like to think that's a program that we can perpetuate next year, and the year after, and really in perpetuity there-afterwards.
BRAD REBACK:  Great.
Thanks a lot.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
PHIL WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi, guys.
Just a question on the Server and Tools Division.
Clearly there's a tie to server shipments, but as you look out over the next couple of quarters, and looking at your commentary on just general enterprise spending, when do you think we could actually start to see the inflection point in that line item?  And how should we think about the services component of that division, too, relative to the license as well?  Thanks.
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Yes, sure.
I'll stick to external forecasts on the underlying server demand.
Most of the external forecasts are seeing it improve from sort of around now through to next year.
So, we would expect, and we subscribe to that, we would expect it to get less negative as the year goes on, and start to improve through next calendar year.
The benefit we're seeing there is mainly like in market share.
So, we've got great attach relative to the server market.
So, as it starts to improve, we'd see the non-annuity component of our revenue start to improve as well.
So, that should be an evolving trend through the rest of this fiscal year going into the next calendar year.
How quickly that will happen?  We'll see.
I think we're all waiting to see how well the economy rebounds when it does.
We're still, as I was at the July Financial Analyst Meeting, still on the relatively conservative side.
We're not seeing a large rebound.
But we'd like to think, certainly as we go into next calendar year, we'll start to see businesses spending again.
And we'll be raised with that with good attach.
On the services side, it's going to be pretty flat.
I wouldn't expect that to bounce back quickly.
So, a flattish expectation on the services side certainly through the rest of this fiscal year, and going into the next one would be my starting point.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks.
Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  Hi, thank you very much.
Chris and the rest of the team.
I was just wondering, what are you hearing from corporates?  We've been spending some time talking to large corporates that are deploying Windows 7.
It looks like the deployment plans are coming in a little bit earlier than expectations, at least from their standpoint, hearing of the business benefits of deploying Windows 7.
I'm just curious, what are you hearing about the upgrade cycle for Windows 7 in the corporate, because I would imagine that's got a pretty significant implication for your business premium mix going into next year, because all of the lift you're getting in the near term seems to be from the consumer side.
And also, secondarily, I'm wondering if you can comment on the shrink-wrap business, preorders from the consumer channel for Windows 7?  That's it, thanks.
CHRIS LIDDELL:  On the business side, you're right.
Anecdotal feedback is certainly good at this stage from corporates, in terms of their reaction to Windows 7 and the benefits it brings.
We're still staying reasonably cautious about the upgrade cycle, certainly we expect it to begin next year, but we talk about it spreading over maybe a couple of years.
So, I would like to think that we will start to see much better business PC numbers year-over-year next calendar year, and I think we've been consistent on that on the last couple of calls, and we're still there.
All of the feedback that we've got so far is positive.
And so that supports a view that we'll start to see that.
How quickly that will happen, we're not going to speculate quite yet.
But, certainly all the early signs are good at this stage.
On the shrink-wrap, or FPP side, again, we only launched yesterday, so it's a little hard to tell, because people are buying in anticipation of demand, as opposed to actual demand.
But, again, the   
KASH RANGAN:  You had preorder, you were taking preorders on the consumer side way back when, right?
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Sure, that's been very good.
But, that's small.
That's small, but that's been extremely good.
I would say that's been right at the top end of our expectations, a modest financial impact, but extremely good sort of reaction.
So, that has been extremely good, and the sales in retail we are expecting through the next three months to be very good.
KASH RANGAN:  Great, thanks a lot.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, ISI Group:  Hi.
Thanks, guys, and good morning.
Chris, you guys have done a phenomenal job on the cost side, surpassing everybody's expectations.
I was wondering if you could give us your view on whether or not it makes sense to think OPEX in Fiscal '11 might grow at the rate of inflation, just as a general proxy, especially given that the big bear story is that Microsoft will start accelerating its investments and OPEX will start ramping again once top line starts to improve?  Thank you.
CHRIS LIDDELL:  This is the earliest ever for Fiscal Year '11 guidance, I think.
Okay.
I really don't want to give a specific number, but I don't see any internal force that is going to significantly increase OPEX in Fiscal Year '11 at this stage.
I think the disciplines that we put in place are going to continue at least for that period of time.
And while we'll clearly be looking to fund some projects - I'm not going to say it's flat - I don't see it ramping back to anything like what you might have seen before the economic reset in terms of growth.
And that's in particular because at this stage we're still relatively cautious about the economic rebound.
So, I think this fiscal discipline that you have seen will continue certainly for the next, let's say, 12 to 18 months.
Now, I caution you with the obvious comment, we're just about to go into our strategic planning round, which then goes into our budgeting round, so that's a directional comment, that's not a specific guidance at this stage.
HEATHER BELLINI:  Great, thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
TODD RAKER, Deutsche Bank:  Hey, guys.
Nice quarter.
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Could you dig into the ASP impact a little bit more in-depth on the netbook side, as you see the OEMs moving from an XP SKU to a Win 7 Starter Edition, what does that do to the economics of the low end of the business, and how do you think that trends out over the next 12 to 18 months.
CHRIS LIDDELL:  I'll start with the consumer reaction, because that's the sort of leading indicator.
And how do we feel about the consumer reaction to firstly having Windows on a netbook, obviously that's been phenomenal going from zero attach to in the mid-'90s.
So, people are clearly willing to pay for having Windows on their netbook.
So, that's the sort of first and most important fundamental.
Then, in terms of Windows 7 reaction, clearly yet to see, but early indications in terms of the OEM builds that we're having and the mix that they're putting in terms of Windows 7 is encouraging.
Now, it's very early days, but encouraging at this stage in terms of their expectations for the number of people who are going to want to see a Windows 7 on their netbook as opposed to an XP.
In terms of the ASP impact, clearly it's higher on Windows 7 than what it would be on XP, so a significant premium off a modest base.
So, it's going to be beneficial, but I think it's more important symbolically from our point of view that people see value in Windows 7 and are willing to pay for it.
Netbooks, even though they've grown fast are still a relatively small component of the overall demand.
So, it's not going to have a massive financial impact.
It will certainly help, in terms of ASP comparisons year-over-year, if we get the sort of good attach of Windows 7 that we're starting to see early days of.
TODD RAKER:  Great, thanks.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
SANDEEP AGGARWAL, Colin Stewart:  Thanks for taking my question.
Chris, the last two or three quarters Microsoft is under-performing in its display advertising business versus the overall industry.
Is display advertising getting ignored, because of the increasing focus on search.
And then how much of online business weakness is coming due to the Bing Cashback and search distribution deals?  Thank you.
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Sure.
On the display side I'd say we're actually relatively in line, certainly with Yahoo! when we saw their numbers.
So, volume and monetization was sort of broadly in line, I would say, with the market.
So, I'm not entirely sure about your under-performance comment.
But, it is nevertheless difficult, and in particular on the monetization side.
We've had good volume on the display side - we've continued to see that right through the economic reset.
It's been growing in double digits on the volume side.
The difficulty has been on monetization.
So, in terms of volume I'd say there's no lack of focus, because we're continuing to see good user engagement and demand.
On the monetization side it's been tough, and that's clearly because of what's been happening in the overall economy, and I think to the extent people have had budgets, they might have pushed more in the search side than the display side.
We should start to see that improve going forward as we see the economy recover.
So, I think you'll see display start to get better.
The other thing in display which might be hurting our numbers is just FX.
We have a reasonably strong international component, so FX was a headwind in the first quarter, but no lack of focus there.
Certainly a lot of focus in search, but there's plenty of people still working on the display side.
What was the second part of your question, sir?
SANDEEP AGGARWAL:  It was about Bing Cashback and search distribution deals, are they causing any weakness in your online business?
CHRIS LIDDELL:  No, they're helping it a little bit with volume.
They're not helping significantly with the financial side, because of the nature of it.
But, certainly in terms of the market share growth in the quarter, that was negligible from Cashback, that was really all the underlying search engine, and clearly the marketing and user engagement we got from that, so not much of an impact from that at all in the quarter.
SANDEEP AGGARWAL:  Thank you very much.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
ROBERT BREZA, RPC Capital Markets:  Hi.
Nice quarter, Chris.
Just a quick question around PC unit growth, we've seen everything from third party research, everything from 8 to 10 percent, as high as 12 percent.
And I guess, obviously the Windows 7 launch plays a big part in that growth.
Any color you can kind of give us about what you think maybe achieved, a lower end of that range, or maybe at the higher end of that range, just independent of Microsoft?
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Sure, it's rebounding very quickly, and I think in the quarter you saw, relative to where we were three months ago, PC demand rebounded very quickly relative to everyone's expectations.
So, it's very hard, because of all of the underpinnings of what's going to happen in the overall economy.
What I think we're seeing is the robustness of the concept of a PC, even though we have an economic reset, it's something that people want to spend money on.
I think that gives us confidence in the sort of long-term trend, and the long-term ability to have good, potentially double-digit growth in PC demand, and that's clearly helped by the fact that we've got new form factors.
Windows 7 helps clearly.
You're just seeing a general positive trend on a long-term basis that was resilient to the reset.
What that's going to mean for the rest of the fiscal year, I think you're going to see good consumer demand.
Clearly that was helping last quarter.
I think that will continue.
You're going to see good emerging market demand.
That's really continued right through the last year.
So, there's been double-digit growth in most of the emerging markets right through the last year.
I think the consumer and developed markets will start to gradually continue to improve.
The big variable in my mind is business PCs.
That's been a significant negative.
That's decreased double-digits over most of the last few quarters, and it's dragged down the numbers.
That can't continue forever.
Eventually those PCs wear out and have to be replaced.
So, the big variable in terms of rebound is going to be the strength and speed of the business PC refresh cycle.
We hope and expect that to be next year.
As I said in one of the earlier calls, we're probably still relatively cautious.
But, when you start to see a rebound in that area, plus what you're seeing on the consumer side, we feel pretty good about what PC demand is going to look like for next calendar year.
ROBERT BREZA:  Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks.
Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
KATHERINE EGBERT, Jefferies:  Hi, good morning.
Chris, in your prepared comments you talked about the U.S.
consumer demand being strong, and then you just gave some color on good emerging markets demand.
Can you talk about what you're seeing there, both on the corporate and the consumer side?  Thanks.
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Yes.
Europe is relatively weak.
So, that would probably be the weakest area on a relative basis.
So, I would start with emerging markets, in particular China, and all the major ones, were very strong.
The U.S.
is recovering a bit.
Europe is relatively weak.
So, that would be at the low end of all the numbers that I'm seeing.
KATHERINE EGBERT:  When can you expect recovery, do you think, there?
CHRIS LIDDELL:  I guess when you see an economic recovery.
So, it depends a little on how you feel about that.
Again, I think what we have said, and I'll stick with it (even though it was a better than expected quarter, this quarter), this calendar year as transitioning to next calendar year, I feel very good about the dynamics, or potential dynamics for the next calendar year, as we start to see economies improve.
You're seeing economic forecasters expecting economic growth next year, globally and in Europe.
You're starting to see forecast for business spending turning, from people like Gartner, again, on a global basis.
So, that's going to underpin spending overall.
The European consumer, when they will start to get more aggressive, I really don't know.
But, I don't expect a lot for the rest of this calendar year.
I'd start to see it improve next calendar year.
KATHERINE EGBERT:  Okay, thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENDAN BARNICLE, Pacific Crest Securities:  Thanks so much.
Chris, can you remind us again of when you recognize revenue on Windows in the PC cycle, in the PC supply chain cycle, and what type of lag there potentially is between the PC build and your revenue recognition?  Thanks.
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Yes, when we sell it to the OEMs is when we recognize it.
Now, they buy licenses in anticipation of selling PCs, obviously.
That can vary in terms of their supply chain as to how far in advance of when they actually make a sale they buy the license.
It can vary, but it's on average, say, a couple of months, around eight weeks.
So, people last quarter were buying licenses in anticipation of sales that they're making this quarter.
And they'll be buying licenses now in anticipation of Christmas, for example.
So, it varies, as I say, depending on the supply chain of the entity, but on average around eight weeks.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
TIM KLASELL, Thomas Weisel Partners:  Yes.
Sort of a follow-up to the prior question.
In your OEM revenue bridge, you show 4 percent from Windows attach on inventory.
I wonder if you can give us a little bit of color of how much of that 4 percent is attach, i.e., maybe sort of longer-term sustainable versus inventory which can be pretty volatile?
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Yes.
It's about half and half.
It's about half what we describe as inventory impact, about half attach.
And on the attach side, there's two impacts there.
One is the continuing growth in netbooks, which have a very, very high attach rate.
So, as they grow slightly faster than non-netbook PCs, you see attach benefit.
And also, in the larger OEMs, we certainly see them gaining market share, and they tend to have a higher attach rate than the system builder channel as well.
So, we're starting to see some attach benefit from that.
So, those two attach benefits add up to about half of what we show on that line.
The other half I would put down to sort of inventory replenishment in the channel.
TIM KLASELL:  Okay, great.
Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
GREG MOSKOWITZ, Auriga:  Okay, thank you.
And good morning.
Chris, as you had pointed out earlier, business spending remains subdued, but the license-only billing mix was higher than I expected.
And I know you had the benefit of a couple extra field days relative to the June quarter.
But even adjusted for that, it showed pretty healthy sequential growth.
I was just wondering if there was anything you would point to on the business side that perhaps helped transactional billings in the quarter?
CHRIS LIDDELL:  No, there's nothing specific that I would point to there.
As you said, there were a couple of days of billing that we held out of the last quarter, but then also we lost a day or two into the next quarter, so there wasn't a significant impact from that.
I would just say generally speaking, we're seeing good adoption of our products.
We've got a good product suite out there.
So, I would just point to that.
But there's no underlying trends that I would say were particularly positive.
As I pointed out in my commentary, really the business cycle was very much as we expected in the quarter.
And you have to remember that what we're seeing now is just people playing out their budgets on the corporate side that were set, let's say, in December last year, where most people were expecting the world to be very difficult through this year.
So people are just simply spending their budgets that are set to a large extent.
And it's unlikely that we're going to see a rebound even in this quarter coming up.
It's only going to be next year when people reset their budgets for next year in the next few months, and perhaps start to take a slightly more optimistic view, that we'll start to see business spending start to pick up.
So, no particularly positive trends that I would point to other than overall reaction to our product suite.
It was fairly much as we anticipated, which was subdued during the quarter.
GREG MOSKOWITZ:  Great.
Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay.
Operator, we have time for just one more question.
(Operator Direction.)
RICHARD WILLIAMS, Cross Research:  Thanks, guys.
Most of my questions have been answered.
I wonder if you could give us some sense of the Windows Live growth rates that you expect over the next couple of quarters?  Thank you.
CHRIS LIDDELL:  Yes.
Windows Live is really going to be driven by, in particular, how we see that monetization come through, and that comes back to the strength of the overall economic recovery.
I would like to think you're going to see display rates go up, as we start to see the economy recover, and I think you've started to see that from us and other people.
Certainly, it's stopped getting worse.
I, again, would probably stick with the same basic line we've had on most things, that we'll start to see some economic improvement on that side as the economy starts to improve, and that's going to be next calendar year more than this calendar year, and it's probably going to be gradual.
That continues to be our base case pretty much across the board for all the things that sort of drive in particular the business side.
RICHARD WILLIAMS:  Thank you very much.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay, everybody.
So that will wrap up our Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
Remember that you can access this call on the Microsoft Investor Relations Web site at www.Microsoft.com/msft.
Also, please keep in mind that we're holding the Professional Developers Conference in Los Angeles, and as part of that we will be hosting an Analyst Briefing on November 18th with Ray Ozzie and Doug Hauger.
Please contact us if you need additional details.
We hope to see you there.
Thanks again for joining us today.
END
MSFT Earnings Conference Call
Bill Koefoed, Peter Klein
Thursday, January 28, 2010
BILL KOEFOED:  Thank you, Barb.
And thanks everyone for joining us this afternoon.
Let me begin by welcoming Peter Klein to his first Earnings Call as Microsoft's Chief Financial Officer.
Also joining us today are Frank Brod, Chief Accounting Officer, and John Seethoff, Deputy General Counsel.
Today, Peter will start with takeaways from the second quarter and our 2010 fiscal year.
Then, I'll get into the details of the quarter, before handing it back to Peter, who will discuss our business outlook.
After that, we'll take your questions.
We filed our Form 10-Q this afternoon.
In addition, we posted our quarterly financial summary slide deck, which is intended to follow the flow of our prepared remarks, as well as provide a reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
You can find these documents at the Investor Relations Web site at Microsoft.com/msft.
Today's call will be Web cast live, and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, any future use of the recording, and in the transcript which will be posted on our Web site.
You can replay the call and view the transcript at the Microsoft Investor Relations Web site until January 28, 2011.
This conference call is protected by copyright law and international treaties.
Unauthorized reproduction or distribution of this call, or any portion of it, without the express permission of Microsoft may result in civil and criminal penalties.
We will be making statements during this call that are forward-looking.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Form 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
Okay, Peter, it's all yours.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Bill.
And good afternoon, everyone.
It's a pleasure to be joining you for my first earnings call.
I've met with many of you over the last two months, and during my prior roles at Microsoft.
And I look forward to spending time with many more of you in the months ahead.
Over the course of my career, both inside and outside of Microsoft, in good economies and bad, I've learned that there are a few constants that persistently translate to success, working with great people and relentlessly focusing on creating value for customers, employees, and shareholders.
I'm delighted to have the opportunity to do that in my new role, building on our current momentum, and driving future growth.
Now let me share some thoughts on our second quarter results.
We reported record revenues and record profit.
These results were driven in large part by strong consumer demand for Windows 7 in PCs.
While consumer demand remains healthy, we have not seen the return of enterprise spending growth.
Meanwhile, our ongoing work managing expenses and aligning our cost structure to the highest priorities has enabled us to drive earnings growth ahead of revenue growth.
We also returned $4.8 billion of cash to investors through dividends and stock repurchases.
As we have previously discussed, we are just starting our strongest product cycle ever.
This quarter was highlighted by the successful launches of Windows 7, Windows Server 2008 R2, and Exchange 2010.
We released Office 2010 to beta, and introduced more Bing innovations this quarter.
Bing has now gained market share each month since it's launch.
We also announced upcoming releases of two very important and compelling offerings that will drive growth into the future, Windows Azure and Natal.
Azure is our cloud platform which is providing developers, partners, and our customers with smooth transitions to the cloud with tools and processes they already know.
Natal, which is based on our natural user interface work, will energize this generation's gaming and entertainment experience starting this coming holiday season.
So, in summary, I'm very pleased with our progress this quarter.
We have momentum with products in market.
We have an exciting pipeline of new products.
And we delivered strong financial results.
I'll now hand the call back to Bill to give you some additional details on the quarter, and then come back and provide some thoughts on our outlook.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Peter.
I'll start with the company overview, and then go through revenue performance for each of our business units.
I will then review the rest of the income statement.
Please keep in mind that all growth comparisons relate to the corresponding quarter of last year unless I specify otherwise.
As Peter mentioned, we had an exceptional quarter with record revenue and profit.
Overall, revenue grew 14 percent to just over $19 billion, primarily driven by strong Windows 7 consumer demand.
Net income and earnings per share were $6.7 billion, and 74 cents respectively.
Excluding the $1.7 billion of revenue recognized from the Windows 7 Upgrade Program, and Windows 7 licenses sold in advance of general availability, revenue grew 4 percent.
Foreign exchange did not have a significant impact on revenue during the quarter.
Our product billing mix in the second quarter was roughly the same as last year with 30 percent annuity, 30 percent OEM, and 25 percent license only with the balance coming from our other businesses.
Now let me dive deeper into the overall revenue mix.
Geographically, emerging markets grew mid-teens, while mature markets grew single-digits.
In terms of segments, consumer demand continues to be the driver of growth.
While we saw stabilization in the business segment, as Peter mentioned, we have not seen a return of enterprise spending growth to date.
Enterprise agreement sales cycles have lengthened, and multi-year annuity revenue was flat year-over-year.
Unearned revenue was $12.5 billion, down slightly from last year.
On a sequential basis, unearned revenue was down primarily due to this quarter's recognition of the $1.7 billion of Windows 7 revenue that I referred to earlier.
Our contracted not billed balance was approximately $13 billion, down slightly from last year.
Now for the PC market.
PC hardware shipments grew substantially during the quarter, fueled by demand for Windows 7, and innovation from our OEM partners.
The combination of Windows 7, and the unprecedented variety of hardware choices, form factors, and price points, makes it a terrific time for customers to get exactly the PC they want.
Year over year, we estimate the PC market grew 15 to 17 percent.
More specifically, we estimate consumer PCs grew more than 20 percent, while business PCs were roughly flat.
This quarter netbooks represented about 11 percent of the total PC market, roughly flat compared with last year and last quarter.
Now, with that backdrop, let's move on to revenue and business drivers by segment, beginning with the Windows and Windows Live Division, which I will refer to as the Windows Division.
All of my comments related to the Windows Division are adjusted to exclude the $1.7 billion of Windows 7 revenue I referred to earlier.
Keep in mind that this is a non-GAAP view, and all GAAP/non-GAAP reconciliation s can be found in our slide deck, which is posted on our Web site.
Overall, the Windows Division had a phenomenal quarter with record quarterly revenue of $5.2 billion, growing 28 percent year-over-year.
This growth was mainly driven by increased OEMs unit sales of 22 percent.
OEM revenue increased 21 percent and grew faster than PC shipments for the first time in eight quarters.
As in the prior quarter, we have included a slide that bridges the difference between the PC market growth and OEM revenue growth.
Changes in segment mix represented a 9 percentage-point headwind to OEM revenue.
This was caused by two factors, a higher mix of consumer PCs than business PCs, and emerging markets outpacing mature markets.
Windows attach and inventory drove 10 percentage points of OEM revenue growth.
Attach accounted for about half the increase.
Year-to-date, we saw solid attach gains across all regions, channels, and form factors.
Inventory, accounting for the other half of the increase, was a result of OEMs rebuilding inventory to exit the quarter at normal levels as we discussed in last quarter's call.
Windows 7 up-sell and channel dynamics drove 6 percentage points of OEM revenue growth reflecting consumer demand for Windows 7 home premium, and demand for Windows 7 on netbooks.
The commercial, retail, and online portion of the Windows division great 55 percent, primarily driven by the retail launch sales of Windows 7.
Now, let me give you some additional Windows data points.
Through the end of the second quarter we sold more than 60 million Windows 7 licenses, making it the fastest-selling operating system in history.
Windows is attached to more than 90 percent of netbooks, with Windows 7 accounting for well over half of that.
Windows consumer licenses grew more than 35 percent year-over-year.
And finally, Q2 was another record quarter representing the highest number of Windows licenses sold in one quarter ever.
In fact, Q2 beat the previous record set last quarter by 20 percent.
In summary, it was an exceptional quarter for the Windows division.
With Windows 7 we have terrific consumer momentum, and a great product for the business PC market when it recovers.
Now, let's move to Server and Tools.
The server hardware market was stronger than expected for the quarter, although still down slightly year-over-year.
Our OEM and license-only revenue continued to out-perform underlying X86 server hardware market shipments, while annuity revenue grew low single-digits.
This quarter we released Windows Server 2008 R2.
Customer adoption for this, and our virtualization and management offerings continue to build momentum.Revenue from our virtualization offering, such as Premium Editions of Windows Server and System Center grew double-digits.
At PDC we provided an update on Windows Azure, including the anticipated commercial availability next month.
In addition, we recently announced a three-year agreement with Hewlett-Packard.
This partnership offers customers comprehensive solutions, whether for data centers, or public cloud.
We are also very excited about the upcoming May release of SQL Server 2008 R2, which will further expand our capabilities in business intelligence, and data warehousing.
Now for the Online Services Division, while search revenue grew, display revenue was hampered primarily by international rate decline.
We continue to be pleased with Bing's momentum to date, including seven consecutive months of share gains in the U.S.
Regarding our Yahoo! partnership we are still working through the regulatory review process and continue to be hopeful the deal will be approved early this year.
Now, onto the Microsoft Business Division.
In general the conditions from last quarter remain unchanged.
Revenue was down 3 percent as enterprise spending remained soft.
Business revenue was down 6 percent, due to weak business PC sales.
The non-annuity component of business revenue was pressured in advance of the next product cycle.
Annuity revenue was roughly flat, as expected.
Consumer revenue, which includes the OEM and retail portions of this business, increased 12 percent.
This growth was primarily due to better than expected consumer PC shipments, although it still lagged the overall PC market.
Within MBD we continue to see double-digit growth of our SharePoint, Office Communications Server, and Dynamics CRM products.
During the quarter we released a beta of Office 2010, which has been downloaded over 2 million times.
In the Entertainment and Devices Division revenue was down 11 percent.
During the quarter we sold 5.2 million consoles, a year-over-year decline of 13 percent.
Due to the favorable mix shift to elite and special edition consoles, console ASPs were down only slightly following the Q1 price cuts.
While our software attach rates continue to grow and lead the industry at 8.8, attach revenue declined as we faced difficult comps with the prior year.
Xbox Live continued to contribute to the quarter's performance, and now has 23 million members, over 35 percent growth from a year ago.
We also continue to make progress in the mobile space, and you will hear more about that at Mobile World Congress in February.
Now, for the rest of the income statement.
Cost of Goods Sold decreased 7 percent to $3.6 billion, driven primarily by lower Xbox 360 volume and console costs.
These savings were partially offset by increased traffic acquisition and online costs.
Operating expenses increased 1 percent to $6.9 billion, and included approximately $290 million of legal expenses.
We continued to execute on our resource management plan, and during the quarter eliminated an additional 800 positions.
Year-over-year headcount declined 8 percent.
This quarter cash flow from operations was $5 billion, and we repurchased $3.6 billion of shares, and paid $1.2 billion of dividends.
So, to wrap up, while we have yet to see a return of business spending growth, the consumer segment performed better than expected, and we couldn't be more pleased with the reception of Windows 7 by our partners, developers, and most importantly, our customers.
We continue to be excited by our momentum, and believe we are well-positioned for the future.
And with that, I'll hand it back to Peter who is going to discuss our business outlook.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Bill.
Now I'll discuss our expectations for calendar 2010.
From a macro-perspective IT spending should improve from the recessionary levels of 2009.
Taking into account second quarter results, we are incrementally positive towards the PC and server hardware market.
As we've been saying, we expect the business hardware refresh cycle to begin this calendar year occurring gradually over a couple of years.
When thinking about the remainder of Fiscal 2010 keep in mind that our third quarter tends to be seasonally weaker than our second and fourth quarters.
Now addressing each of the divisions individually.
In the third quarter we expect Windows Division revenues to be roughly in line with the overall PC market growth.
Attach gains and inventory rebuild, relative to the prior year should offset macro trends of consumer PCs growing faster than business PCs, and emerging markets growing faster than mature markets.
When thinking of sequential trends in the third quarter, keep in mind Q2 included a large retail launch impact.
For the full year, we expect the Windows Division revenue to grow inline with the overall PC market growth.
The Microsoft Business Divisions revenue in the third quarter should largely demonstrate the same dynamic as in the first half.
Consumer and business non-annuity revenue, approximately 40 percent of the total, will face ongoing pressure in advance of the next product cycle and as such should lag overall PC shipments until Office 2010 becomes generally available in June.
We expect annuity revenue representing 60 percent of total revenue to be broadly flat for the full year.
The release of the Office 2010 beta this quarter was an important milestone.
We received terrific feedback from early adopters about the flexibility and powerful new ways to stay productive across the PC, browser, and phone.
As you think of the fourth quarter financial impact of the Office 2010 release, keep in mind the timing of the launch,is late in the quarter, and the financial impact should be seen starting in FY '11.
The Server and Tools business is most closely aligned to server hardware shipments and business IT spending.
We expect server shipments to show year-over-year growth in Q3 and Q4 for the first time in several quarters.
We expect non-annuity revenue, which is approximately 30 percent of the total to move generally in line with this.Annuity revenue should grow mid-single digits, while Services should be roughly flat for the year.
For the Online Services Division the outlook for online advertising appears to be improving.
Excluding the impact of our legacy access business, we expect revenues to be roughly in line with the market for the third quarter and full year.
In the Entertainment and Devices Division revenue should directionally track with the overall gaming market, and we maintain our view that full-year revenue should be roughly flat.
The past two quarters we have made good progress containing our Cost of Goods Sold, despite the upward pressures of increased traffic acquisition costs in our search business and growth of our online services.
As a result of our operational initiative, improved Xbox 360 console costs and an increasingly favorable revenue mix towards Windows, we now expect Cost of Goods Sold as a percentage of revenue to be roughly flat for this fiscal year.
With regard to operating expenses, we remain focused on diligently managing our cost structure and aligning resources.
This full year we reconfirm our guidance of $26.2 to $26.5 billion.
This takes into account our second quarter performance, the impact of one-time costs, including the Yahoo! partnership integration expenses, and higher revenue-driven selling expenses.
We also reconfirm that our capital spending for the year will be no more than $2 billion, and our effective tax rate should be approximately 25 percent.
We continue to generate strong, free cash flow and will return capital to shareholders through dividends and stock repurchases over the long run.
So, in summary, we delivered very good financial results and are well positioned for future growth.
We have great momentum in the market with Windows 7, and the upcoming launches of Office 2010 and Natal.
Heading into 2010 we are encouraged by the possibility of improving market conditions, converging with the strongest wave of products in our company's history.
Although the timing is uncertain, we are well positioned to capitalize on the business spending recovery when it occurs.
With that, I'll turn the call over to Bill and answer some of your questions.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Peter.
We want to get to questions from as many of you as possible.
So, please stick to one question, and avoid long, or multi-part questions.
Barb, can you please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
(Operator Direction.)
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  Good afternoon.
Peter,welcome to the call and congratulations for the spot.
PETER KLEIN:  Thank you very much, Adam.
ADAM HOLT:  My question is around average selling prices.
If you look at the average selling prices in the quarter they improved sequentially, and obviously you're seeing both mix help that on the consumer side, but as we get a little bit deeper into the corporate upgrade cycle you're going to see a lot higher dollar value.
How should we be thinking about average selling prices?  Should we see steady sequential improvement there, or are some of the puts and takes around where you're seeing growth in the PC market going to offset that?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, thanks, Adam.
Obviously, the biggest driver of the ASPs will be the business PC refresh and the growth in that.
And the timing of that remains uncertain.
We maintain our general view, which we've had, that it will start to occur this year and occur gradually over the next couple of years.
So, as that does that obviously has an impact on our average selling prices.
What we saw this quarter on the consumer side was a great adoption of Home Premium, as well as Windows 7 on netbooks, which is driving that up-sell that Bill talked about.
So, those two things combined will be the drivers and it just really depends on the macro.
ADAM HOLT:  And do you think you saw a one-time spike there, or do you think that premium mix can remain at that high level?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, we think, as wesaid in the guidance, revenue is going to be in line with PCs.
There's some headwind from emerging markets and consumers.
So, we'll have to offset that with ASPs and other things, and attach.
ADAM HOLT:  Terrific.
Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, can we move to the next question?
(Operator Direction.)
SARAH FRIAR, Goldman Sachs:  Terrific, thanks so much.
I echo Adam's congratulations, Peter.
Can I ask a question on the cost side.
So, there still seems to be some debate on the street as to how tight a rein you'll keep on costs, even though you guys have done a phenomenal job thus far.
So, I know you're not guiding for Fiscal '11 on this call, but can you maybe just philosophically talk a little bit about the growth rates.
I think you've messaged a low single-digit inflation type rate.
And then just on the COGS side, flat for this year is a great outcome, but for next year as Azure and so on kicks in I'm assuming we should assume gross margin continues to come down.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
Obviously, it's too early to talk about FY '11.
We're working through that planning process right now, and as soon as we get through that, I'll certainly get out and talk to everybody about that.
Let me get the operating costs.
We are executing against our plan very effectively, something I've been focused on even before taking this role, working with Chris and the leadership team on that, and feel great that we've got a thoughtful plan that we've come up with, and we're doing what we said, and executing against that.
A big part of that is prioritization, and making sure the resources are allocated to the high return areas, and that will be the approach that we take when we build our FY '11 plan, absolutely, so that approach stays the same.
SARAH FRIAR:  And on the COGS side, an assumption that Azure will continue to drive that down?
PETER KLEIN:  I think there are multiple dynamics on the COGS side, and it's too early to get into that for FY '11.
You know, there's puts and takes in the online services, traffic acquisition costs, offset by improvements we make across the board, whether that's Xbox 360 consoles, and some of our operations as well.
So, we'll just have to get through the planning process on that.
SARAH FRIAR:  I appreciate it.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Sara.
BILL KOEFOED:  Barb, can we move to the next question?
(Operator Direction.)
BRENT THIEL, UBS:  Thanks.
On the enterprise agreements, I think Bill you mentioned the sales cycles lengthened, and you were flat year over year.
Peter, can you just elaborate in terms of what you expect for the second half of the fiscal year on enterprise agreements, and I would think, considering the robustness of the product cycle, that that would start to trend back up?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
That is the hope.
Certainly on the enterprise agreement renewals, it is starting to take longer.
We're getting them done.
The sales cycles have been elongating.
The good news is, we're getting them done, maybe not in the quarter that they expire, but when we get them done, we're not dropping products off of them.
And in most cases, we're actually adding new product onto the EA.
And so we feel great about the trajectory there.
I tend to agree with you that as the enterprise spend does pick up, given our product pipeline, we feel very well positioned from an enterprise agreement perspective.
BRENT THIEL:  Thanks.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, ISI Group:  Hi.
Thanks, guys.
I was wondering if you could help us think about the trends in deferred revenue.
Obviously, that's going to be a big driver of your Fiscal '11 growth.
And in particular last year was obviously a challenging year for enterprise spending, and you're saying that enterprise spending isn't coming back.
So would it be fair for us to think about your sequential deferred trends for the remainder of Fiscal '10 being more in line with what you had in the back half of your Fiscal Year '09, just so we can help shape our models for the upcoming season?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, you know, it's hard to say.
A lot of that is going to depend on the shape of enterprise spend, and business spend.
HEATHER BELLINI:  Well, based on how you think spend is going to come out, based on your views about enterprise spending not coming back anytime soon?
PETER KLEIN:  You know, the thing that I can say is, we have a great product pipeline.
We don't have visibility into exactly what business spend will be, so we're just going to have work through that over the next couple of quarters.
The only thing we can control, as we've been saying, is the products.
We feel like we're executing against those, and we'll keep working the enterprise agreements as we can.
HEATHER BELLINI:  So, would that mean it would be unreasonable to assumeI mean last year, I would imagine, was a difficult closing environment as well, so as a measure of conservatism would kind of seasonal growth rates like you had last year in deferred be prudent in your view versus expecting an up-tick?
PETER KLEIN:  I would just encourage anybody to think through their view, there are differing views of what enterprise spend is going to be.
You'll just have to apply your view of that.
BILL KOEFOED:  I don't think we're going to give guidance on that, Heather.
Can we move to the next question?
(Operator Direction.)
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  Hi.
Thank you very much.
Peter, just wondering, there's a lot that's been written about how you could deploy Windows 7 on the consumer side or on the business side on existing hardware without having to upgrade.
I'm just curious, on the consumer side, and on the business side, what are you hearing?  Can you give us some anecdotal data of revenue that you're seeing from so-called shrink-wrapped purchases on the consumer side, and maybe on the business side as well.
The threshold, you don't need to buy a brand new PC, but I guess you could deploy Windows 7 on existing hardware.
What are you seeing on the business and consumer markets in regard to that?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
Thanks, Kash.
Good question.
On the consumer side, we had a very good retail quarter, about $500 million, which is a little bit more than we expected.
So, that dynamic that you highlighted is actually happening.
People are going to retail and buying shrink-wrapped Windows to put on their PCs.
On the business side, anecdotally, a lot of interest.
Businesses are incredibly enthusiastic about deploying, and so we'll hope to see that flow through over the coming year.
So in both cases, a lot of positive momentum, as you indicate.
KASH RANGAN:  I guess Steve Ballmer has to take his words back, because he said 200 to 300 is the max we should expect to see.
You're off to a great start on the retail shrink-wrapped, congrats.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Kash.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Kash.
Operator, next question.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENDAN BARNICLE, Pacific Crest Securities:  Thank so much.
Following up on the consumer question, a year ago netbooks were a huge concern.
It sounds like on the year over year basis they didn't really change as a percentage, and maybe there were some pricing changes on Windows 7.
Has the dilutive impact of netbooks stabilized, or started to change in any way?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
I would definitely say it's stabilized.
The mix has stayed stable.
Our attach is very high, over 90 percent.
And, as Bill said, over 50 percent of that is Windows 7.
And so what we're finding is, people want Windows 7 on all devices, and all form factors.
And that's really what's been driving the quarter, and the success of Windows 7.
We've worked closely with all of our OEM partners to deliver the broadest range of devices, PCs, notebooks, whatever you have.
And whether it's a netbook, or a laptop, or notebook, or a desktop, Windows 7 is on them.
So that's very positive for us.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRAD REBACK, Oppenheimer:  Hey guys, thanks.
So real quickly, Peter, a couple of weeks ago you guys announced a bit of a reorg in the E&D segment.
Could you maybe help us understand how some of those moves can help you close the gap in those businesses, especially on the mobile side, and some of the devices going forward?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
They don't change the strategy that we have in both those businesses.
In E&D, you do need to separate mobile from the entertainment side, or the Xbox side.
The Xbox is in a very good position right now.
We've got a great install base of engaged users.
We've got the Xbox Live asset.
We've got Natal coming out.
We're working through the profitability on the console costs.
So a ton of momentum and a really exciting year coming up.
On the mobile side, our strategy remains the same.
As we've been saying from a product perspective, we're working very hard on the next version of Windows Mobile.
As Bill indicated, we'll be talking more about that in Barcelona in a few weeks.
But I wouldn't think of the organization changes as fundamentally changing the strategy.
It just put us in a better position to continue to execute against what we're doing.
BRAD REBACK:  Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, can we move to the next question.
(Operator Direction.)
PHIL WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi guys.
Just wanted to echo, great quarter.
Just on the operating expense side, if I back into sort of just the midpoint of your guidance, it basically implies a year over year increase in OPEX in the second half of about 10.9 percent, give or take, versus obviously the decline in the first half.
Now, I understand that we're starting to anniversary some of the headcount reductions.
But I just want to get a sense for what's driving that increase, sort of what line items or initiatives.
Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
So the biggest ones are the ones I talked about.
There's the Yahoo! integration expenses, which is a one time new expense that we didn't have last year.
And then, given the increase in revenue that we'll see over the recessionary levels that we saw last time, there's just some variable sales costs that go along with that.
So those drive year over year increases.
And those are the two biggest things.
Obviously, we've been aware of those, it's been included in our plan, and our guidance that we've had for the last several quarters.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, can we move to the next question.
(Operator Direction.)
JOHN DIFUCCI, J.P.
Morgan:  Thank you.
Peter, it looks like the OEM license unit growth on the OS is about 5 to 7 percent greater than the PC unit growth.
And with the launch of Vista that delta was like 8 to 10 percent.
I'm just curious because Vista, there were some decent reviews on Vista when it came out, but there really were some questions at that point, and in the end it really looks like Windows 7 is going to be a much greater success for you.
I'm just curious if you think you can see some more, I guess, I know there are a lot of things that affect that, but inventory build in the launch of a new OS seems to have a big effect.
And where the inventories are today, do you think you can see even more benefit in the following quarter?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, I'll say two things.
Inventories are about at normal levels.
So, we feel pretty good on all the checks we've done on sell through, inventory is at normal levels.
In terms of the comparison to Vista, it's a different world now, right.
We have some headwinds that we may not have had then in terms of the mix, the sort of segment mix that Bill talked about in terms of consumer and emerging market, which is really some headwind, and so if you break it out that granularly and you look at the attach and inventory gains of 10 percent, half of that being attach, that's a good result.
And as I mentioned before, for us to continue to grow in line with the PC market, given those headwinds of the segment mix, we're going to continue to have to do better on attach and inventory and some of the up-sell, as well.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Thanks, Peter.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thank you.
Operator, next question, please?
(Operator Direction.)
SANDEEP AGGARWAL, Collins Stewart:  Thanks for taking my question.
Peter, by when can we expect market share gain by Bing also translating into revenue growth acceleration, and any update on the timing of regulatory approval for the Microsoft Yahoo! deal?
PETER KLEIN:  No updates.
We're still waiting for regulatory approval, and we're still hopeful we will close that deal early this year.
It's a long-term process.
We're continuing to work to get the Yahoo! deal done, get that integrated and get the benefits of scale.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
TODD RAKER, Deutsche Bank:  Thanks, guys.
Just turning to the enterprise adoption cycle around Win 7, can you give us any sense in terms of what you're seeing when you talk to corporate out there.
I know you guys don't want to pre-announce service pack 1, but any kind of visibility in terms of how you think the adoption cycle might play out over the course of this year would be useful.
Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, it's hard to say exactly how it would play out.
I will tell you that the activity and the conversation, there's nothing about waiting for service packs for sure.
Everybody is really, really super-excited about Windows 7 right now.
So, there's a ton of activity.
How that will play out in deployment cycles, remains to be seen and people are working through that.
But, I would say there's way more business activity now than in previous launches.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
KATHERINE EGBERT, Jefferies:  Hi, good afternoon.
It looked like you bought back almost $4 billion in stock this quarter, is that right?  And then, Peter, can you just tell us what your philosophy is going forward on repurchases and dividends?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, it was about $3.6.
My philosophy with the launch is going to be very consistent with what we've been doing.
We have a target amount of cash, appropriate cash that we think we need to have, and then the operating cash flow after capital and acquisitions will be over the long-term distributed back to shareholders in the form of dividends and share repurchases.
So, exactly the same consistent philosophy we've had over the last several years.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, we have time for one last question.
(Operator Direction.)
TIM KLASELL, Thomas Weisel Partners:  Yes, good afternoon, everybody.
Nice quarter.
The guidance on the entertainment and devices division is roughly flat.
Can you walk us through some of the puts and takes particularly as we get into later stages of the product cycle and the macro out there?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, so the puts and takes areas you think about the sort of whole generation of gaming, we've got Natal coming out this year.
We should think of it beyond sort of the rest of this fiscal year, and then how we go up and down depends on timing of software titles.
You know, we have industry leading attach, but there's a big difference on timing when we have first party titles versus third party titles.
So, I would consider what we're doing excellent growth and it gets sort of reenergized with Natal as we head to holiday next year.
TIM KLASELL:  So, maybe roughly flat for the calendar year, or roughly flat for the fiscal year?
PETER KLEIN:  The fiscal year we haven't talked about FY '11 yet.
TIM KLASELL:  Okay.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Tim.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Tim.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay.
So, that will wrap up the Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
Remember that you can access this call on the Microsoft Investor Relations Web site at Microsoft.com/msft.
Please keep in mind that we will be at a number of conferences in the next couple of months, including Mobile World Congress in February.
In addition, Bob Muglia, President of Server and Tools will present at the Goldman Sachs conference in February, and Peter will deliver a keynote speech at the Morgan Stanley Conference in March.
Please contact us if you need additional details.
We hope to see you there.
Thanks again for joining us today.
END
MSFT Earnings Conference Call
Bill Koefoed, Peter Klein
Thursday, April 22, 2010
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks everyone for joining us this afternoon.
With me today are Peter Klein, Chief Financial Officer; Frank Brod, Chief Accounting Officer; and John Seethoff, Deputy General Counsel.
Today, Peter will start with overall takeaways from the quarter.
Then, I'll give the details of our performance, before handing it back to Peter, who will discuss our business outlook.
After that, we'll take your questions.
Please note, we filed our Form 10-Q this afternoon.
In addition, we posted our quarterly financial summary slide deck, which is intended to follow the flow of our remarks, as well as provide a reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
You can find these documents at the Microsoft Investor Relations Web site at Microsoft.com/msft.
Today's call will be Web cast live, and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, any future use of the recording, and in the transcript which will be posted on our Web site.
You can replay the call and view the transcript at the Microsoft Investor Relations Web site until April 22, 2011.
This conference call is protected by copyright law and international treaties.
Unauthorized reproduction or distribution of this call, or any portion of it, without the express written permission of Microsoft may result in civil and criminal penalties.
We will be making statements during this call that are forward-looking.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Form 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
Okay, Peter, it's all yours.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Bill.
Good afternoon, everyone.
Our third quarter results reflect our strong product momentum, continued focus on controlling costs, and the beginning stages of a return in business hardware spending.
This quarter we generated record third quarter revenue, and operating cash flow.
In addition, as a result of revenue growth, and our ongoing focus on cost management, when adjusting for the impact of the Tech Guarantee programs this year, we had our third consecutive quarter of year over year margin expansion.
Strong demand for Windows 7 was a primary contributor to our performance.
As evidence of that strong demand, both internal and external checks show that over 10 percent of all PCs worldwide are already running Windows 7.
While reaching this level of penetration in six months qualifies Windows 7 as our fastest selling operating system ever, it also illustrates how much opportunity still remains.
As I have met with investors, I've commented on the tremendous product momentum we have, which was evident this quarter across all our businesses.
Bing achieved 10 consecutive months of market share growth since its launch.
And both the U.S.
Department of Justice and the European Commission cleared our search agreement with Yahoo.
Azure, our cloud development platform, became commercially available in 41 countries.
In the mobile space, we announced Windows Phone 7 and Kin.
And last Friday, we released Office 2010 to manufacturing, and are looking forward to its launch in June.
All of this was achieved while continuing to focus on managing costs, and prioritizing our investments.
As a result, we delivered operating income and earnings per share growth ahead of revenue growth, with earnings per share up 36 percent over last year.
We also returned $3.1 billion of cash to investors through dividends and stock repurchases.
So, in summary, I am pleased with our continuing performance this quarter.
We have great momentum with the current products in the market.
We have a very exciting pipeline of new products to come, and we continue to deliver strong financial results.
I'll now hand the call back to Bill to give you some additional details on the quarter, and then come back and provide some thoughts on our outlook for our fourth quarter, and the next fiscal year.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Peter.
As I review this quarter's performance, keep in mind that all growth comparisons relate to the corresponding quarter of last year unless I specify otherwise.
As Peter said, we had another strong quarter.
Overall, GAAP revenue grew 6 percent to $14.5 billion.
During the quarter, we deferred $305 million of revenue related to the Microsoft Office 2010 Technology Guarantee Program.
Adjusting for this amount, revenue would have been $14.8 billion, 8 percent growth over the prior year period.
GAAP operating income grew 17 percent year over year, while EPS grew 36 percent.
Operating cash flow this quarter was $7.4 billion, an all-time record for the company.
Foreign exchange had a positive impact to revenue of about $200 million this quarter.
In terms of overall revenue mix, geographically, emerging markets grew more than 20 percent while mature markets grew mid single digits.
While consumer demand continued to be strong, we saw renewed strength from small and mid-market customers with year over year growth of more than 15 percent.
Within the enterprise customer segment, we saw the beginning of a recovery in IT hardware spend.
But as we've discussed on past calls, we continue to see lengthened sales cycles.
Enterprise agreement renewal rates, taking into consideration the extended sales cycles, are within our historical range.
Unearned revenue was $12.3 billion, down sequentially, as is typical, but better than last year's seasonal trend, and roughly flat year over year.
Our unearned revenue balance would have been up more than $100 million, or 1 percent year over year, when considering the recognition of undelivered elements, primarily associated with our prior Windows XP sales, and the revenue deferral from our Office 2010 Technology Guarantee Program.
Multi-year annuity billings were up mid-single digits year over year.
This quarter's growth from volume licensing is beginning to offset the unearned revenue declines we've seen over the past several quarters as we rebuild our unearned balance.
Now for the PC market.
Windows 7 and innovations from our OEM partners continued to fuel demand for PCs.
We estimate the PC market grew roughly 25 percent year over year.
Within that, we estimate consumer PCs grew almost 30 percent, while business PCs grew 14 percent.
This quarter, netbooks represented approximately 10 percent of the total PC market.
Let's move on to this quarter's performance by business group, beginning with the Windows and Windows Live division, which had another exceptional quarter.
We continued to see very strong consumer demand for Windows, with consumer license growth of 35 percent.
We also saw a return in demand for business PCs with licenses up more than 15 percent, leading us to believe the business PC refresh cycle has begun.
OEM units increased 30 percent year-over-year, and outpaced PC shipments.
OEM revenue increased 29 percent for the second quarter in a row, and also outpaced the PC market.
As with prior quarters we have included the slide that bridges the difference between the PC market growth and OEM revenue growth.
We experienced a 9 percentage point headwind primarily caused by emerging markets outpacing mature markets, and consumer outpacing business.
Windows attach and inventory drove 8 percentage points of OEM revenue growth.
Conditions from the prior quarter remain largely unchanged with inventory exiting the quarter at normal levels.
Windows 7 up-sell and channel dynamics drove 5 percentage points of OEM revenue growth, reflecting adoption of Windows 7 on netbooks, and adoption of premium versions of Windows 7 on business and consumer PCs.
The commercial retail and online portion of the Windows division grew 26 percent primarily driven by retail sales of Windows 7.
Now, let's move to server and tools.
We estimate server hardware shipments strengthened considerably with year-over-year growth in the high teens.
The OEM and license-only revenue, which represents 30 percent of the business, grew high single digits, an improvement from prior quarters.
Within that, Windows Server revenue grew mid-teens, while SQL Server and developer tools experienced slower growth in front of new product launches.
Annuity revenue, which is approximately 50 percent of the business, was roughly flat.
Enterprise services grew 5 percent.
Our virtualization solutions continue to be strong.
System Center Server revenue grew over 20 percent, and Windows Server Premium mix remains over 20 percent this year.
Additionally our share of new X-86 virtualization licenses, which includes Hyper-V and Virtual Server, is now 25 percent, up three points year-over-year in the December quarter according to IDC.
We released to manufacturing Visual Studio 2010, announced a new partnership with Citrix that furthers our desktop virtualization offerings, and yesterday we released to manufacturing SQL Server 2008 R2.
Clearly, there is a very strong product pipeline in Server & Tools.
Now for the Online Services Division, online advertising revenue grew 19 percent, primarily driven by search, which outperformed the market.
We continue to be enthused with Bing's momentum, which includes 10 consecutive months of share gains in the U.S.
We ended the quarter with U.S.
query share of 11.7 percent, according to comScore, 340 basis points higher than when we launched Bing last may.
The Yahoo! search partnership implementation is underway and we are working toward U.S.
completion by the end of this calendar year, and global completion by early calendar year 2012.
Moving on to the Microsoft business division.
In general the conditions from last quarter remain unchanged.
Revenue was down 6 percent, but when adjusted for the Office 2010 Technology Guarantee deferral of $305 million, revenue was up 1 percent.
Within MBD, business revenue was down 1 percent.
As we've discussed previously the non-annuity component of business revenue has been pressured in advance of the next product cycle, while annuity revenue was roughly flat.
Consumer revenue, which includes the OEM and retail portions of this business, increased 11 percent when adjusting for the technology guarantee, and was primarily due to strong PC shipments.
Last Friday we released to manufacturing Office 2010 and SharePoint 2010.
We expect commercial availability in May with general availability in June.
With respect to the $305 million tech guarantee deferral, it's important to note that due to varying international availability and fulfillment dates there will be puts and takes to the unearned revenue balance throughout Q4.
However, the tech guarantee deferral balance is expected to remain roughly unchanged at the end of Q4.
We expect that substantially all of the tech guarantee unearned revenue balance will be recognized in the second quarter of fiscal year 2011.
During the quarter we made terrific progress in our cloud offerings.
Customers such as Starbucks, McDonalds, GlaxoSmithKline, Coca-Cola Enterprises, Aviva, and Swedish Red Cross are all going to the cloud with Microsoft.
We now have 40 million paid seats of our commercial online services, clearly companies are choosing Microsoft for their cloud productivity solutions and we intend to build on this momentum.
Now, let's move onto the Entertainment and Devices Division.
Gaming revenue declined 4 percent as we sold 1.5 million consoles, a unit decline of 12 percent, which was roughly in line with the overall market.
While, our software attach rate continued to lead the industry at 8.8, first party software revenue declined based on difficult comparisons to the prior year's launch of Halo Wars.
This was substantially offset by the continuing strong revenue and membership growth of Xbox Live.
Non-gaming revenue was up 14 percent, reflecting growth in the PC hardware market, and increased Windows Embedded revenue.
As Peter mentioned, we continue to have good momentum on the product side for mobile.
During the quarter we announced Windows Phone 7, and last week we announced Kin, which will be available in the U.S.
in May.
Now, for the rest of the income statement.
Cost of goods sold decreased 2 percent to $2.8 billion, driven primarily by lower Xbox 360 volumes and console costs.
These savings were partially offset by increased traffic acquisition and online costs.
Operating expenses were $6.6 billion as we continued to manage our expenses and prioritize our investments.
Headcount declined both year-over-year and sequentially.
G&A expenses grew due to contractual costs associated with our Yahoo! search partnership, and legal expenses.
We repurchased $2 billion worth of shares and paid $1.1 billion of dividends.
So, to wrap up, the consumer segments continues to drive great results.
In addition, we saw the beginning of the business PC refresh.
This combined with our strong product pipeline and our continued focus on execution, and cost management, means we are well positioned for the future.
With that I'll hand it back to Peter who is going to discuss our business outlook.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Bill.
Now, I'll discuss our expectations for our fourth quarter and the next fiscal year.
From a macro perspective, we expect the next quarter to be similar to the third quarter, with continued strength in hardware shipments.
We are encouraged by the recent up-tick in business PC growth, and expect that this business refresh cycle will continue over a couple of years.
Before I get into my commentary by division, remember that the June quarter is the close of our fiscal year.
As such, it is historically a seasonal high for our enterprise sales, and we are entering it with a strong sales pipeline.
While we've noted early signs of improvement, the business spending environment and associated sales cycles remain challenging.
We will be very focused on closing deals during the quarter, and we expect that unearned revenue will likely return to normal seasonal patterns.
Beginning with the Windows division, we expect revenue to grow slightly faster than the overall PC market in the fourth quarter.
Attach, inventory, and premium mix gains should more than offset macro-trends, particularly that of emerging markets growing faster than mature markets.
Turning to the Microsoft Business Division, we are very excited about the launch of Office 2010 this June, as it will provide the best productivity experience across the PC, phone, and browser.
The combination of Office 2010, SharePoint 2010, Exchange 2010, and Office Communications Server will be the practical platform for IT, delivering anywhere access to your documents, and unmatched collaboration.
For the fourth quarter, consumer and business non-annuity revenue, approximately 40 percent of the total, should track towards PC shipment growth, while we expect annuity revenue to be up low-single digits.
The Server and Tools Business generally aligns to server hardware shipments and business IT spending.
Similar to many observers, we expect server shipments to show healthy year-over-year growth.
In the fourth quarter, we expect that non-annuity revenue should move generally in-line with hardware shipments.
Annuity revenue should grow mid-single digits, while enterprise services revenue should grow low single digits.
For the Online Services Division, the outlook for online advertising appears to be improving, and we expect the trends from the third quarter to continue.
Excluding the impact of our legacy access business, revenue should be in-line with or better than the market for the fourth quarter.
In the Entertainment and Devices Division, we maintain our view expressed at the last earnings call that full year revenue should be roughly flat relative to the prior year.
This translates into a fairly robust growth rate for the fourth quarter, driven by the uplift from the strong PC market, increased gaming attach revenue, and momentum in Windows Embedded.
Switching to costs, we continue to make good progress containing our cost of goods sold, despite the upward pressures of increased traffic acquisition costs in our search business, and growth of our online services.
As a result of our operational initiatives, improved Xbox 360 console costs, and a continuing favorable revenue mix, we now expect full year gross margin to expand 1 percent compared to the prior year.
With regard to operating expenses, we remain focused on diligently managing our cost structure, and aligning resources to key priorities.
For the full year, we are lowering our operating expense guidance, now expected to be between $26.1 billion, and $26.3 billion.
We estimate that our capital spending for the year will be no more than $2 billion, and our effective tax rate should be approximately 25 percent for both the quarter, and the year.
We will continue to generate strong free cash flow, and we will return capital to shareholders through dividends and stock repurchases over the long run, but the amount of repurchases may vary from quarter to quarter.
Now, I would like to spend a few minutes looking ahead to fiscal year 2011, with more details to follow at our Financial Analyst Meeting in July.
From a macro perspective, we expect the business refresh cycle, that I referenced earlier, will continue through Fiscal Year 2011.
This combined with strong momentum from Windows 7, and the launches of Office 2010, SharePoint 2010, and SQL Server 2008 R2 will be significant revenue drivers for our core businesses.
Switching to Online, we expect the online advertising market to be better in Fiscal Year 2010.
Our business should continue to grow faster than the market, excluding our legacy access business, which will be less of a headwind, as it becomes a smaller portion of the mix.
We expect our partnership with Yahoo! will begin to contribute to our revenue in the second half of the fiscal year.
Lastly, the Entertainment and Devices Division will be introducing an unprecedented wave of innovation in the first half of the year, including Natal and its launch titles, as well as Halo: Reach, Fable III, and Windows Phone 7.
Now, moving to cost of goods sold.
It's important to consider the shift of revenue mix across software, services, and hardware.
While there are a number of factors to weigh for next year, the single largest variable driving cost of goods sold will be hardware demand in the Xbox business.
Additionally, we will continue to pursue operational efficiency as we have throughout this year.
Switching to operating expenses, we are currently working through our budgeting process, and maintain our outlook of $27.0 billion to $27.5 billion.
All of this will allow us to continue to generate exceptional operating cash flow, which we will continue to return to shareholders through dividends and stock repurchases.
So, in summary, we delivered very good financial results for the quarter, with strong demand for Windows 7 driving revenue growth, and solid cost management enabling operating income and earnings per share to grow even faster.
As we look forward, we are encouraged by improving market conditions taking shape, as we continue to launch our strongest wave of products in the company's history.
With that, I'll turn the call over to Bill, and answer some of your questions.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Peter.
We want to get to questions from as many of you as possible, so please stick to one question, and avoid long or multi-part questions.
Barb, can you please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
(Operator Direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, ISI:  Hi.
Good afternoon, guys.
I was wondering if you could talk about your comment about a return to normal seasonality in unearned revenue.
I guess what I'm wondering is, we had the Tech Guarantee benefit Q3 deferred.
So when we're looking, if normal seasonality were to happen in Q4, are we taking the Q3 ending balance and thinking about it that way, or should we be thinking about adjustments for the Tech Guarantee?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, take it as it is.
HEATHER BELLINI:  Great.
Thank you very much.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Heather.
(Operator Direction.)
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citigroup:  Hi, could you guys talk about on the server side, it looks like non-annuity revenue grew a little bit slower than server units.
And, I guess you're seeing an uplift in version mix there, which should be helping the situation.
I'm just curious to get some more detail on that, as well as what you think we should see looking forward into June, and beyond?
PETER KLEIN:  You'll have to break it down into its components.
There's actually two pieces of the non-annuity business, of the transactional business, the Windows Server piece, and then the other pieces of the business.
The Windows Server non-annuity piece actually grew mid-teens, so tracked towards the hardware market.
The other products, things like SQL Server, and Visual Studio grew slower than that in anticipation of a product release that's coming up.
So, it tends to be less sort of correlated, particularly in quarters where there's a significant growth year-over-year.
So that was the issue there.
In terms of looking forward, I think we gave the guidance on what we expect for the transactional business, particularly as we launch Visual Studio and SQL Server, tracking more towards the server hardware market.
WALTER PRITCHARD:  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yep.
BILL KOEFOED:  Barb, can you ask your next question.
(Operator Direction.)
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  Terrific, thank you.
My question is about Office.
As we near the release, I was hoping you could talk to us about how you're thinking about what the impact should be, what you think about with respect to the average selling price opportunity around Office, and in particular also you mentioned transactional revenue for the next quarter.
Should we assume that transactional revenue continues to accelerate as we get deeper into the Office cycle?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
I'm going to take your last question first.
Certainly, as we've said, we expect the largest part of the impact from the launch actually to happen in Fiscal Year '11.
And so typically what you see, since, we're launching it in the May/June timeframe, typically what you see is several quarters after that the impact of that.
So, you should see that in the first half of Fiscal Year '11.
You know, in terms of average selling price, it's a little hard to talk about that now.
It's going to be a function of, obviously, mix, but I would just think about it the way Office 2007 launch was.
The one thing I would add to that, where you will see it is in the platform side of the business.
So, the enterprise CALs, and how we monetize the enterprise versions of the productivity infrastructure for SharePoint and Exchange is where you'll see opportunities for overall revenue growth from an ASP perspective, for MBD all up.
ADAM HOLT:  Terrific.
Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Adam.
(Operator Direction.)
SARAH FRIAR, Goldman Sachs:  Great.
Thanks for taking my question.
Peter, on the cost side, you highlighted this great expansion that you've seen as you've reaped the benefits of those cost controls that you took about a year ago.
As you look out to Q4, your guidance would suggest actually a sequential decline in the operating margin, and yet you should be hitting pretty strong product cycles still in Windows, and Office beginning to come into the mix.
Why wouldn't we get more margin expansion in Q4?  And then as you look at Fiscal '11 costs, what are the puts and takes of why costs go up versus what other measures you can do to keep them down?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, the biggest thing driving the Q4 expenses is revenue-driven expenses that are associated with primarily our enterprise annuity business, which are going to be up a fair amount both sequentially and year-over-year.
So, that's the biggest thing you'll see in Q4.
The other thing you'll see in Q4 is, as I talked about, the wave of product launches that we've got coming, including Office 2010 and SQL Server.
So, just what's happening this quarter is sort of not unique, but those are the things that are really driving what you're seeing in Q4.
And, of course, those have been embedded in our guidance all year long, and the fact of the matter is, we've been trying to manage our costs as thoughtfully as possible, and bring it down whenever we can, which we did this quarter.
The dynamics in FY '11, as you know, there's a lot of puts and takes, and we're always prioritizing and aligning our investments.
But all up, you should think the things that are driving it are similar.
There is some revenue-driven, as we continue to grow revenue, and there's also some sales and marketing associated with some key launches that we'll have particularly in the first half of the year, related to the consumer businesses like Natal and phone.
And I would say, keep in mind that it is a pretty measured increase of only 3 to 5 percent for the full year.
SARAH FRIAR:  Okay, great.
Thanks for the color.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, thanks, Sarah.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Thanks.
Peter, considering the strength of the product cycle, and the up-tick we're seeing in corporate spend, it's still surprising to hear about lengthening sales cycles, and I think the unearned was below the street estimates.
What are customers citing as the reasons why they're not re-signing up, are they just waiting for all these products to be launched before they're renewing?  We're just trying to get our hands around what you're hearing from the customer base.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, there are a couple of things.
One, that is true, particularly when there are so many products that are launching, so there's a bunch of revenue that's going to come through on the non-annuity side that people are waiting for launches for, and I do think that hardware, if you think about sort of what's happened over the last year, the first thing that got hit and decreased earliest and fastest was hardware, and that's what's coming back first.
And I think over time, as we've been saying, and I think most other people are saying, over the course of calendar 2010, and certainly into 2011, you'll start to see the growth in the overall IT spend.
For us in particular, from a sales cycle perspective, Q4 is just seasonally our biggest quarter, and so when you combine sort of the sales cycle, and the product cycle kind of converging on Q4 and beyond, as well as sort of where we are, I think, in the stage of what businesses are doing in terms of first refreshing their hardware, that kind of converges over the next two or three quarters, probably.
BRENT THILL:  Thanks.
BILL KOEFOED:  Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
JOHN DIFUCCI, JP Morgan:  Thank you.
Peter, I have a question on the Windows business.
It looks like on slide 11 you've got about 8 percent benefit from the Windows attach and inventory.
And I'm assuming that's from less piracy, and then inventory-build in the channel.
You also got, I think, it was 10 percent last quarter.
Now, this is the second quarter into a new launch of Windows 7.
I'm just curious, how sustainable is that?  I would assume that piracy is going to be less during a launch, even pirates have to buy legitimate copies, at least for a while.
And then also the inventory-build in the OEM channel, I assume that would start to wane.
If that happens, would you expect that benefit to start to wane here, and if it does, should we be thinking that the segment mix line up above that with a corporate refresh cycle that sounds like it's going to happen in the second half, that you would start to see less of the negative hit in that line, or how should we be thinking about this?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, it's a great question, John.
You're thinking about all the right components of it.
And certainly attach and piracy are always going to sort of cycle up and down depending on where you are.
We're working through this year sort of a work down of the inventory from last year, and we're still working on that.
We're at sort of normal inventory levels.
That's been a good year-over-year thing for us.
And attach, correct, part of that is piracy related to the launch of Windows 7.
All of those things, we've given you sort of specific color for Q4, and what to expect for the OEM business relative to the PC business.
BILL KOEFOED:  If I could just add one thing.
The other thing is, just there's an overall, I think we've talked about it on prior calls, an overall secular change, which is the multinational OEMs are becoming a more significant portion of the total PC market, and that says good things for our attach, relative to the prior mix of our revenue from different PC manufacturers.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  And, I'm sorry, does that mean that you're seeing a little less piracy, and you expect to see that in some international markets?
BILL KOEFOED:  We are seeing that globally.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Okay, great.
Thanks.
(Operator Direction.)
PHIL WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi, guys.
Good quarter.
Peter, you guys have talked about the last two quarters seeing a pretty significant uplift in Windows revenue from the retail channel, essentially consumers going out to the store to upgrade to Windows 7.
Would you compare what you believe sort of the corporate upgrade opportunity to be to what you've seen in the past couple of quarters to consumer, which one is the larger of the two, and when would you expect to see the corporate side begin?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  You know, just in sheer numbers in terms of PC shipments, the consumer is a lot bigger than the business segment.
Now, the impact that you get from the business segment obviously is some ASP uplift.
We're starting to, and you get the corporate refresh in two ways.
You can get sort of volume licensing upgrades, or you can get it at OEM when they buy the PCs, which is the largest piece of the revenue.
And that is what we started to see happen, and you saw some of that impact this quarter with business PC shipments up 14 percent.
That's sort of the shape of the opportunity going forward, as that continues, and you can see that has an uplift on our OEM revenue, relative to the overall PC market.
BILL KOEFOED:  Next question?
(Operator Direction.)
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  Thank you very much.
I just wanted you to talk a little bit more about the deferred revenue trajectory going into Q4.
It looks like this year compared to the start of the year, deferred revenue long-term to short-term is down a lot more than what it has been the past three fiscal years.
So, that would argue for a bigger than seasonal catch up in Q4.
So, maybe you could talk about what is embedded in your expectations and what do you expect on the ELA side.
And also, I think you talked about the book, but not billed portion of your bookings.
So, if you can just give us some color on how that's shaping up that would be great.
Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, just in terms of the numbers, sort of the guidance that we set, we're looking for a sequential increase in Q4 in a similar range that you've seen over the last three, four, or five years of sequential growth.
We're starting to rebuild the balance.
You started to see that happen a little bit in Q3 with our multi-year annuity billing having positive growth.
But, I think that's sort of the essence of what we're expecting, and what we're guiding to.
What was your second question?
KASH RANGAN:  The booked but not billed portion, you would talk about that in your presentations in prior times, but just notice that we've not been talking about that in recent times.
I was just wondering if you have an update there?
PETER KLEIN:  I think that's actually a good thing that we'll talk about in July on the Q4 call, just because it's such a bigger issue.
The seasonality, in terms of our bookings in Q4 is so much more material than in Q3.
I think that's when we'll talk about that.
BILL KOEFOED: Barb, next question.
(Operator Direction.)
BRAD REBACK, Oppenheimer:  Hey, guys.
How are you?
PETER KLEIN:  Good, how are you?
BRAD REBACK:  Good.
So, Peter, just switching gears back to Server and Tools, as I look back on my notes from last quarter I think you guys talked about the annuity business being up mid-single digits.
I think it came in flat this quarter.
Given my understanding that most of that's coming off the balance sheet, what would have caused that delta in that three month period?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, thanks.
The comment was for H2, not for Q3, up mid-single digits.
And so if you look at our guidance, again, with the seasonality of our sales cycle, most of that comes from Q4, which was in our guidance that we gave today.
BRAD REBACK:  Okay.
Great.
Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Brad.
BILL KOEFOED:  Barb, next question.
(Operator Direction.)
KATHERINE EGBERT, Jefferies and Company:  Hi, thanks.
Speaking of guidance, I mean, there's a lot of moving parts right now, multiple product cycles, revenue deferrals, and economic recovery, what are you looking for to become comfortable with providing more specific guidance?  What are the triggers?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, I'm not sure there are specific triggersI actually think having a driver-based framework and having a really good qualitative discussion about all the factors that drive it, is actually a great way to talk about the outlook, and the environment, and what we're seeing for our businesses.
So, I think there's no specific triggers that are going to change that.
I think the dialogue that we're having around these drivers and this framework is great.
KATHERINE EGBERT:  Okay.
Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENDAN BARNICLE, Pacific Crest Securities:  Thanks.
Peter, you talked about next year gross margins obviously having an impact from the hardware cycle, and in the past at times you talked about as you change to more cloud computing that's taking a hit, as well.
Can you give us any range, I mean, can we see as much as two percentage points and change there next year?
PETER KLEIN:  We're not giving a range on that now.
We'll definitely talk about that at the Financial Analyst Meeting in July.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator next question.
(Operator Direction.)
ROB BREZA, RBC Capital Markets:  Hi, thanks for taking my questions.
Peter, this maybe is a follow up to Brendan's question.
You called out in your prepared remarks to 40 million paid seats for the cloud initiative.
I was wondering if you could talk about where you're seeing the strength there, and how we might expect that to be 12 months from now?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, we're seeing strength across a variety of areas.
You heard Bill talk about all the great customers we have, our commercial online services like SharePoint online, and Exchange online.
That's obviously a big growth area for us.
The 40 million comes from things like Live Meeting, and Exchange Hosted Services, and CRM Online.
And so what you're seeing is really part of our strategy.
So, the broadest array of commercial services for businesses of all sizes.
Some of these are really aimed more at mid-market customers.
Some are aimed more at big enterprise customers.
And we're getting growth from both.
And then the last thing that we sort of touched on, but didn't talk about in great detail was Azure, which is now available in 41 countries, and what that will do really over the next couple of years.
BILL KOEFOED:  Barb, we've got time for just one more question.
(Operator Direction.)
TIM KLASSELL, Thomas Weisel Partners:  Yes, good afternoon everybody.
A question about the Windows 7 upgrade cycle.
It appears to us that a lot of customers are going to attach a Windows 7 upgrade with maybe a Windows Server 2008 R2 upgrade.
Are you sensing that and could that maybe delay the Windows 7 upgrade cycle a little bit more than we normally would, but have the positive impact of pulling along some server sales, as well?
PETER KLEIN:  You know, we really haven't seen that at all.
As a matter of fact, when we talk to our enterprise customers there's a high degree of intent to deploy Windows 7 as soon as possible.
There's many, manya high percentage of our customers are already either in pilot, or pre-launch mode for deploying Windows 7.
So, I think we haven't seen that as a phenomenon at all, people waiting for Windows 7.
In fact, we see the opposite that people are deploying it rather quickly.
TIM KLASSELL:  Okay, great.
Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay.
So, that will wrap up our Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
Remember that you can access this call on the Microsoft Investor Relations Web site at Microsoft.com/msft.
Please keep in mind that we will be at a number of conferences in the next couple of months.
We'll be at the JP Morgan conference in May, the Bank of America/Merrill Lynch conference, the Cowen Conference, the RBC and UBS conferences in June.
In addition we will be previewing Natal at E3 in L.A.
in June.
Please contact Microsoft Investor Relations if you need additional details.
We hope to see you there.
Thanks again for joining us, and have a great day.
END
Microsoft Fourth Quarter 2010 Earnings Conference Call Transcript
This presentation contains statements that are forward-looking.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties which may cause actual results to differ materially because of factors in this presentation or discussed in todays press release, in the managements discussion and analysis section of the companys most recent Form 10-K, Forms 10-Q or in other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We undertake no duty to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a results of new information, future events, or otherwise.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Im very pleased to share with all of you our strong financial results - we achieved record revenue, operating income, and earnings-per-share for both the fourth quarter and the full year.
This quarter, our strong revenue performance was both broad and deep, with every business achieving double-digit growth.
Strong sales execution closed the year with fourth quarter bookings increasing 27%.
For the year, both the Windows Division and Server and Tools Business achieved record revenue.
We are equally enthusiastic about the customer and product momentum weve achieved this year across the breadth of our portfolio.
Of course, I have to start by noting Windows 7, which has received tremendous market response.
With 175 million licenses sold to date, it is the fastest selling operating system ever and now runs on over 15% of all PCs worldwide.
Capitalizing on the recovery of the server hardware market, Windows Server 2008 R2 has enjoyed strong demand and increased Windows Server market share.
With the launches of Exchange 2010 and, most recently, SharePoint 2010 and Office 2010, we delivered key innovations in our productivity portfolio.
Equally as important for our long term growth, we made significant strides in our cloud initiatives by bringing Windows Azure to market and by increasing customer traction with our commercial online services.
Throughout the year, we continued to update and enhance Bing, which has now achieved thirteen consecutive months of market share growth.
And finally, we focused on consumers with our new Xbox 360 consoles and the announcements of Kinect and Windows Phone 7, coming to market this holiday season.
Meanwhile, as a result of our ongoing commitment to managing costs, we held annual operating expenses roughly flat.
Our continued revenue strength and cost discipline drove yet another consecutive quarter of margin expansion and record annual profits in the Windows Division, Server and Tools Business, and Entertainment and Devices Division, as well as the company in total.
We grew full-year operating income by almost $4 billion and generated operating cash flow of $24 billion.
Of this amount, we returned about two-thirds, or almost $16 billion, to shareholders in the form of stock repurchases and dividends.
Finally, Im particularly pleased by our growth in earnings-per-share of 50% for the fourth quarter and 30% for the full year.
So, its been a great fiscal year and an outstanding fourth quarter.
With those remarks, Ill now turn the call over to Bill to provide more details on the quarter.
BILL KOEFOED, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
As I review this quarters performance, keep in mind all growth comparisons relate to the corresponding period of last year unless I specify otherwise.
As Peter noted in his opening remarks, we finished the year with terrific financial results.
Total revenue for the quarter grew 22% to over $16 billion, a record fourth quarter result.
Windows, Online Services, Entertainment & Devices, Server & Tools, the Business Division each of our operating segments grew revenue double digits this quarter, reflecting broad-based strength across all of our businesses.
Fourth quarter GAAP operating income grew 49% while EPS grew 50%.
Looking at the full year and adjusting for the tech guarantees, we had four consecutive quarters of margin expansion with EPS growing faster than revenue every quarter.
Operating cash flow was up 46% to a fourth-quarter record $5.6 billion.
And for the year, operating cash flow surpassed $24 billion as Peter noted, also a record.
Customer demand was strong across the breadth of the Microsoft portfolio this quarter, as we saw total bookings growth accelerate to 27%.
In the enterprise, businesses continue to invest in and commit to the Microsoft platform.
Sales execution and enterprise agreement renewal rates have improved as unearned revenue at the end of the quarter was $14.8 billion, up a very healthy 21% sequentially.
The contracted not billed balance ended the year over a record $15 billion.
The small and mid-market customer segment continued to experience robust growth and was up approximately 20%.
Finally, continuing a trend this year, consumer demand was fantastic with growth in Windows, Office, Search, and Xbox.
Geographically, we saw strength across all regions led by emerging markets.
Growth in the US improved this quarter while demand in Europe remained healthy.
The PC market continues to thrive and we estimate the market grew between 22 and 24%, with both consumer and business growing in the same range.
From a geographic perspective, emerging markets remain a significant driver of the PC market with almost twice the growth of mature markets.
With that PC backdrop, Ill move on to the Windows and Windows Live Division.
Windows revenue grew over a billion dollars or 32% this quarter when adjusted for the Windows tech guarantee last year.
Total OEM license growth was 26% and outpaced the PC market for the third quarter in a row.
Consumer and business licenses both grew approximately 26%.
The business PC refresh cycle has accelerated and we recorded the second straight quarter of double-digit business license growth.
As in past quarters, to help you bridge PC growth to OEM revenue growth, we have provided a reconciliation slide in our earnings deck.
At 31% growth, adjusted Windows OEM revenue outgrew PC shipments by 7 percentage points this quarter.
The hardware segment mix was a 3 point headwind to revenue growth.
As I mentioned earlier, emerging markets continue to outpace mature markets.
Windows attach and inventory drove 6 percentage points of growth.
We exited the quarter with normal inventory levels and continue to benefit from solid attach gains in both business and consumer.
Finally, upsell and channel dynamics drove 7 percentage points of growth reflecting a higher Windows 7 offering mix.
Enterprise adoption of Windows 7 accelerated and the non-OEM portion of the Windows Division grew 36%, driven by an increase in volume licensing to businesses and retail sales of Windows 7.
Clearly the Windows franchise is thriving.
Importantly, customer satisfaction for Windows 7 is incredibly high at 94% and businesses are deploying Window 7 in the enterprise.
In the browser, IE 8 is now the fastest growing and most popular web-browser in the market, with IE 9 coming soon.
Now lets move to Server and Tools which posted 14% revenue growth in the fourth quarter and had a record year with $14.9 billion of revenue.
We estimate the underlying server hardware market grew 25 to 28%.
Non-annuity revenue grew approximately 20%.
Windows Server grew with the market, while SQL Server 2008 R2 and Visual Studio developer tools also contributed to the growth.
Annuity revenue, which is approximately 50% of the business, grew about 15% with improved enterprise demand.
From a product perspective, Windows Server, SQL Server, and System Center all experienced double-digit growth.
Enterprise Services, about 20% of revenue, grew 3%.
Windows Server continues to gain share as businesses replace and procure new hardware in the datacenter.
We estimate Windows Server grew its market share over 1 percentage point while at the same time increasing premium mix to about 25%.
Our virtualization suites almost doubled this quarter.
In addition to the share gains in the traditional server market, Microsoft is leading the way to the cloud with our Windows Azure services platform.
Just last week at the Worldwide Partner Conference, we unveiled a number of new cloud innovations and partnerships, further increasing the alignment between our on-premise Windows Server, SQL Server, and System Center products with the Azure platform.
Next Ill move on the Online Services Division, which grew 13%.
The Online advertising component of the division grew 19%, primarily driven by our search business, which again outperformed the market.
We continue to be encouraged by Bings ongoing share gains, due to the pace of exciting innovation and differentiation it brings to market.
June marked the 13th consecutive month of share gains in the US which is now up over 4 points since launch.
Turning to the Microsoft Business Division, revenue grew 15% and Office 2010 is off to a great start.
Consumer revenue, which includes OEM and retail, grew 51% following the launch of Office 2010 heading into the back to school season.
The business portion of MBD grew 8%.
Non-annuity license sales jumped 15% trending towards PC shipment growth as expected.
The annuity licensing portion of the business grew 6% driven by an increase in enterprise demand.
Office and the integration with SharePoint, Office Communications Server, and Dynamics CRM has had strong demand and each of these products grew double digits this quarter.
The cloud enhances these productivity scenarios, and our customers are purchasing suites of our online services at an increasing pace.
70% of our Business Productivity Online seats represent new business to Microsoft.
Lets move on to the Entertainment & Devices Division which grew 27%.
Gaming revenue grew 30% as we sold 1.5 million consoles, a unit increase of 26%, taking share as we grew faster than the overall market.
Xbox Live continues to be a tremendous asset with over 25 million members.
This year marked the first time that Xbox Live Digital Marketplace revenue exceeded subscription revenue, illustrating the services increasing level of customer engagement and monetization.
Non-gaming revenue was up 23%, driven by growth in Windows Embedded and sales of PC accessories that generally align to PC market growth.
This quarter at E3, we unveiled Kinect, the Xbox 360 motion sensor which will enable you to play games, and control your music and movies with just your voice or the wave of your hand  no controller required.
Earlier this week we announced product and pricing for the all new Kinect experience.
The Kinect experience, with more than 15 games available this holiday, begins in North America on November 4.
Now let me cover the remainder of the income statement.
Foreign exchange had a 2% positive impact to revenue this quarter.
We experienced a headwind from the Euro as one would expect, but this was more than offset by our hedging program and the dollar weakening in other currencies.
Cost of goods sold increased 23% to $3.2 billion, driven primarily by increased online costs, royalties, and other charges.
Operating expenses were $6.9 billion in the quarter, under our guidance range, and we were very pleased with Q4 execution and financial discipline.
Headcount decreased 4% year over year.
We repurchased $3.8 billion of shares and paid $1.1 billion of dividends.
So, to wrap up, our product cycle momentum continues with the release of Office 2010 and the breadth of our portfolio which drove record results.
Our cost discipline remains strong.
In the cloud, we have great momentum and are seeing businesses invest in the Microsoft platform.
And with that, Ill hand it back to Peter, whos going to discuss our business outlook.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Thanks Bill.
Id like to now share our thoughts on the first quarter and total fiscal year 2011.
We are entering the year with great momentum.
We are encouraged by the resurgence in business PC shipments and expect the business PC refresh cycle to continue through fiscal year 2011.
The recent refresh of our enterprise products has positioned us well to meet customers needs as they return to investing in information technology.
Turning to our outlook by business, we expect Windows Division revenue to grow roughly in line with PC shipments for the first quarter and full year, excluding the $700 million revenue impact from the Windows 7 retail launch and $276 million from the technology guarantee revenue carried-over from fiscal year 2009.
For the Microsoft Business Division, consumer and business non-annuity revenue, approximately 40% of the total, should continue to track with their PC shipment growth rates for the first quarter and full year.
Annuity revenue for the first quarter and full year should grow low to mid-single digits.
Moving to the Server & Tools Business, for the first quarter, we expect non-annuity revenue to be up mid-to-high single digits as first quarter bookings are sales-cycle driven and tend to be the softest seasonal quarter, irrespective of hardware shipments.
For the full year, we expect non-annuity revenue to generally track with the hardware market.
We expect annuity revenue to grow roughly high-single digits for the first quarter and full year.
Enterprise services revenue should grow mid-single digits.
For the Online Services Division, our online advertising business should outperform the overall online advertising market.
Regarding our search partnership with Yahoo, we are working closely with them to migrate both algorithmic and paid traffic in North America for this holiday season.
And finally, Ill cover the Entertainment and Devices Division.
Based upon the compelling wave of consumer offerings coming to market, we expect revenue will grow in the mid-teens for the first quarter and full year - following its normal seasonal skew to the first half of the year.
Moving to costs of goods sold, gross margins will be impacted by product mix, and particularly by the increase in hardware sales that will drive growth in the Entertainment and Devices Division.
We remain focused on diligently managing our cost structure and are lowering our full year operating expense guidance to between $26.9 and $27.3 billion, which includes our estimate of Yahoo search integration expenses.
We expect our effective tax rate to remain approximately 25%.
Switching to the balance sheet, we expect that the first quarter unearned revenue balance will track to normal historical patterns on a sequential basis, after adjusting for the impact of tech guarantees in the prior year.
Capital expenditures for fiscal year 2011 will be about $2.5 billion.
This will be the second year in a row in which capex spending will be lower than depreciation expense.
We will continue to generate strong free cash flow and remain committed to returning capital to shareholders through dividends and stock repurchases.
So in summary, Im very pleased by our outstanding financial results for the quarter and the full year.
We have great product momentum in the market with strong business and consumer demand for our most recent wave of products.
With the exciting pipeline of consumer products arriving to market this holiday season, we are well positioned to continue this momentum this coming year.
On that note, I'm looking forward to seeing all of you at our financial analyst meeting next week, and I'll now return the call to Bill so that we can begin taking your questions.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Peter.
We want to get questions from as many of you as possible.
So, please stick to one question and avoid long or multi-part questions.
Barb, can you please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
WALTER PRICHARD, Citi:  Hi, I was wondering if you could elucidate a little bit on the PC side your assumptions for Fiscal '11, and just talk about tablets and how you're thinking about that market.
Are you talking about growing in line with traditional PCs, and what impact do you think tablets will have on the market, and what may be your share in that area, and how does that affect your growth rate?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, we're very excited about the market.
The PC market is the PC market, excluding tablets.
But, obviously, we're super-happy with both the state of the PC market and the customer traction for Windows 7.
We think tablets are very interesting and remind us that there are always new scenarios and new opportunities, and we're constantly working with our partners and our OEM partners.
In fact, I think one of the things that's driven the PC market and Windows growth this year has been the work we've done with our OEM partners on multiple scenarios and form factors, and price points to hit all those.
Tablets I think are interesting and great, because I think they sort of enlarge the overall opportunity.
I think they're additive to the opportunity.
And, again, it reminds us that there are lots of interesting new scenarios that we are continuing to work on, and so we're excited by that.
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi:  Great, thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Walter.
BILL KOEFOED:  Next question, Barb.
(Operator Direction.)
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  Great, thank you.
It looks like a really good start to Office, 8 percent business growth was the highest number I think you've seen in two years.
Do you think business revenue growth can get to the same levels you saw with the previous Office cycle, where it reached north of 20 percent?  And why wouldn't the annuity business for Office grow faster than low-single digits in the heart of the cycle next year?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Adam.
I'm not going to give guidance, other than the driver frameworks that we gave.
In terms of the annuity business, obviously, in terms of the deferred revenue, we've had the last year or year-and-a-half has been slow.
And so we're kind of digging out of that hole of the recognitions that we have from the deferred revenue balance.
And so, in the course of this year, we'll be building that back up.
And, as I said, we expect Q1 unearned revenue to also return to normal, historical, sequential pattern.
So, we feel good about the opportunity to continue to drive bookings with Office, but in terms of the annuity revenue recognized growth, that's impacted by sort of the billings that we saw over the course of the last year.
But, having said that, we're certainly very optimistic about business uptake of Office 2010.
ADAM HOLT:  Terrific.
Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Barb, can you move to the next question?
(Operator Direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, ISI:  Hi.
Yes, good afternoon.
I was wondering if you guys could talk about the decline in the consumer premium mix, and what percentage of the decline is related to emerging markets, and what are the other reasons if that doesn't explain all of it?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Heather.
All of it, it's all related to the growth in emerging markets.
HEATHER BELLINI:  That was easy, then.
Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Barb, the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
PHILIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi, guys.
Great quarter.
I just wanted to have one question back on the Windows Division.
If you look at that commercial and retail license line, it still remains very strong year over year and even sequentially.
Obviously, in the first part of the fiscal year that was driven by consumers upgrading to Windows 7.
Just what are you seeing there?
And then, also, as we start to think about Fiscal '11, obviously that doesn't include commercial licenses, too.
What would you expect for the impact of potentially enterprises upgrading to Windows 7, and sort of on top of the PC replacement cycle?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, no.
It's great.
We're very optimistic about that opportunity.
But, remember, it's a small part of the business.
It's about 20 percent of the business.
So, while there's great intent to deploy and we're already seeing great deployment, that is a little bit of a tailwind, but it's not by any stretch of the imagination a material mover of the business, but it is a nice additive.
BILL KOEFOED:  Barb, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
SARAH FRIAR, Goldman Sachs:  Great.
Thanks for taking my question, guys.
Two questions.
First, on the overall environment, you sound incredibly upbeat.
You've clearly had a very strong quarter.
Was there any shift as you got towards the end of the quarter, because clearly other street earnings have started to note more weakness in Europe, for example, or government spending.
We'd just love to get your perspective.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, we didn't really see any differences throughout the quarter, and we are encouraged.
We had strong demand, and strong sales execution, and obviously did slightly better than we had hoped and talked about last quarter for our product set.
So, we're thrilled with customers adopting our products.
And there was really no difference throughout the quarter.
SARAH FRIAR:  So, it sounds like with the product cycles, your kind of expectation is you can kick through even some slight decline on the macro side?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, we certainly feel really good about the tracking of our product sets, no doubt.
SARAH FRIAR:  Great.
Thanks a lot, Peter.
BILL KOEFOED:  Barb, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Peter, you're continuing your strong expense discipline in the quarter, and I'm just curious if you could talk about Fiscal '11, and what really changes as we go into next year to continue that discipline.
You did take your expense guidance down a little relative to your past guidance, and if you could just explain what drove that?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
It's the same thing.
This is an ongoing process, something we think about every day.
And so, continually, as we go through, we're always scrubbing.
We're always looking at our plans.
We're always looking to make the most effective use of the money.
And as we've done that, and we've made progress, then we can lower our guidance, and that's just what we did.
We did better in Q4 than we expected, and we're continuing to take that into next year, and we'll just focus on it continuously.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Brent.
Operator, next question.
(Operator Direction.)
KATHERINE EGBERT, Jefferies:  Hi.
Good afternoon.
Your contracted but not billed balance was up $1.5 billion this quarter.
Can you tell us about that?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
As we said, it was a strong bookings quarter all up, if you look at the revenue, and the unearned, and the CNB.
Our bookings growth was 27 percent, and so it's reflective of the sales execution and the enterprise demand for our products.
And it's interesting, Bill has kind of touched on this, it was very broad-based across geographies, and across products, and across customer segments and size.
So, that's what is really driving that.
KATHERINE EGBERT:  Will that continue to increase?
PETER KLEIN:  You know, we haven't given guidance on that.
We did give expectations on the unearned, so I would take that as sort of a proxy for how things are going.
KATHERINE EGBERT:  Okay.
Thanks, Peter.
PETER KLEIN:  Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Next question, Barb.
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  Hi.
Thank you very much.
Looking at the unearned balance for Server and Tools, and MBD, it looks like it's back up to multi-quarter highs.
And, also, your unearned metric which you reported is well above what it has been, the highest it's been in eight quarters.
Yet, at the same time, the guidance for the annuity growth rate, it still sounds like we're in a recession, listening to your guidance on what seems to be low to mid-single digit.
Can you help us understand the disconnect here?
It seems to me that you're being a little bit conservative with your annuity guidance for what seems to be two big product lines given the improvements in bookings off balance sheet, and on balance sheet.
It occurs to me that as the deferred revenues start to build up, in your words, in the normal seasonality, that you should take your guidance up in the next few quarters.
So, comments or reactions, explanation would be appreciated.
Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
What you're seeing, Kash, is the recognitions next year are a function of the deferreds that we've had.
And as you mentioned, this is the first quarter where we've really bumped it up.
So, the recognitions and the annuity revenue that you're seeing next year in the reported number is a function of sort of the challenges we've had on our deferred balance.
And so, as we build that up over time, you'll start to see the annuity business do better.
So, that's what you'll see as you get towards the latter part of next year, because this is the first quarter where we really saw that unearned balance take off.
KASH RANGAN:  So, if the deferreds continue to build up normal seasonality, we should expect you to take your guidance up for the annuity growth rate in your two main businesses, right?
PETER KLEIN:  You know, it's too early to tell.
You should just take the guidance that we gave.
It's our guidance for FY '11.
KASH RANGAN:  Okay, great.
Thanks.
BILL KOEFOED:  Barb, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRAD REBACK, Oppenheimer:  Hey, guys.
How are you?
PETER KLEIN:  Good.
BRAD REBACK:  So, Peter, in the slides on 18 it talks about COGS being sort of negatively impacted next year.
Based on the expectation of mid-teen growth in E&D, can you give us any sense of what the headwind is on the COGS side?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, you know what I tried to do is give you the drivers, and I think you should go through your model, think about what assumptions you're going to make, and clearly the assumptions, the biggest one that we like to call out that we think is most material, by far, is the growth in E&D, and the headwind from the hardware sales, which is obviously a great thing for the long-term, but in the short-term will provide a headwind to COGS.
And so, the reason we like to give you the drivers is to allow you the flexibility to kind of work that through your model as you come up with your product mix.
BRAD REBACK:  I understand.
Not to pick here, but you did put the mid-teen guidance out there.
So, based on that, there's no way to give us any sense of what type of headwind that generates, so we're all on the same page here?
BILL KOEFOED:  I would just say, Brad, do the math.
And I think it will come out whatever your assumptions are for the driver framework.
So, let's move on to the next question.
(Operator Direction.)
SANDEEP AGGARWAL, Caris & Company:  Thanks for taking my question.
Peter, we are in the middle of an enterprise refresh, and premium mix for business edition has gone up from 28 to 29 percent, but if I look at the historical trends, during the mid of enterprise refresh, actually you have been in mid to late 30s in terms of the business premium mix.
Why has it only seen 100 basis points improvement, or is there a time maybe in the next few quarters, where we can see it reaching to the historical levels?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
I would say, one, it is early in the refresh cycle, so we should watch it.
I think that really is the answer.
BILL KOEFOED:  Next question, please, Barb.
(Operator Direction.)
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Yes, good afternoon.
Last quarter you provided some metrics around your online services subscriptions.
Could you provide some at least directional indications and help us understand, as well, some of the traction around Azure and how that may be impacting some of the traditional server revenues?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, as we talked about on the commercial productivity online services, as Bill talked about, 70 percent of those wins have been competitive wins, which has just been really good.
So, we're really accelerating the traction there.
On the Azure side, it's early.
We just launched that this year.
The productivity online services are farther along from the customer perspective.
But, we've really accelerated the developers and the users we have on the Azure platform.
It's not material to the financials now, but we're really sort of establishing a leadership position in that of users, and we've had someon the productivity side, we've had some great wins.
We had the State of Kentucky, which was 700,000 users.
So, acceleration and continued progress and leadership in that.
BILL KOEFOED:  Next question, please, Barb.
(Operator Direction.)
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowen:  Thank you.
Good afternoon, guys.
Just to follow up on Office 2010.
Qualitatively, Peter, how are you thinking about consumer and enterprise adoption rates in the first 12 months or so, post release, as compared with a similar period, with regard to Office 2007?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, you should just take the guidance that we gave you, and on the non-annuity side you should expect it to track to the PC shipments, which is a pretty strong result, especially given the mix of PCs to emerging markets where we have slightly lower attach.
So, we'llthis quarter will be a big quarter.
We'll look at the back to school and see how we're doing.
But, other than that we're very excited, off to a great start as you saw the 51 percent number.
That is a very strong number for early on.
BILL KOEFOED:  Barb, let's move on.
Let's make this the last question.
(Operator Direction.)
ROBERT BREZA, RBC Capital Markets:  Hi, thanks for sneaking me in.
Just quickly, maybe as a follow up to Gregg's question, as you look at the PC shipments, your expectations for Q1 are helpful.
As we look at the trend kind of in the second half of the year, would it be natural to assume after back to school and holiday season that we see a slight tail-off?  Can you just give us kind of maybe a front-half, kind of second half thought?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  You know, we're not giving color on sort of half-by-half.
The one thing I would say that will continue all year is that emerging markets will continue to grow faster than developed markets and that has an impact on our business.
ROBERT BREZA:  Great.
Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Rob.
BILL KOEFOED, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
So, that will wrap up the Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
We look forward to seeing many of you at the Financial Analyst Meeting next week, where we will provide more details about our long-term strategies and provide you with a hands-on opportunity to experience our technology and engage in great discussions with our management team.
For those of you unable to attend in person, you will be able to follow the day from our investor relations website at Microsoft.com/msft.
Please contact us if you need additional details.
We hope to see you there.
Microsoft First Quarter 2011 Prepared Remarks
This presentation contains statements that are forward-looking.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties which may cause actual results to differ materially because of factors in this presentation or discussed in todays press release, in the managements discussion and analysis section of the companys most recent Form 10-K, Forms 10-Q or in other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We undertake no duty to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a results of new information, future events, or otherwise.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Im pleased to be able to share with you our excellent results for the first quarter, which reflect the ongoing strength and breadth of our product portfolio.
Demand from both businesses and consumers drove healthy revenue growth.
We delivered record first quarter revenue, operating income and earnings per share.
We continued to control costs while prioritizing our investments into the highest growth opportunities, resulting in another quarter of margin expansion.
As we discussed at our analyst meeting in July, we have eight core focus areas that we feel have the greatest opportunity to drive shareholder value.
This quarter, we had exceptional momentum across these focus areas, and I want to start todays call by giving you some important highlights.
First, the Microsoft business desktop is thriving with enterprises and small and medium-sized businesses investing in our products and services.
Not only are companies adopting Windows 7 and Office 2010 at historically high rates, they are also investing in our Office productivity platform including SharePoint, Exchange, Dynamics CRM, and Lync, the newly re-branded Office Communications Server, all of which grew double-digits this quarter.
The server and database businesses had strong momentum as our datacenter and cloud offerings remain a top priority for our customers as they continue to adopt the Microsoft platform.
In addition, Windows Azure had strong subscription growth, and we announced a number of platform enhancements this morning at our Professional Developers Conference.
As I mentioned at the beginning of this call, consumer demand for our products continued to drive terrific results this quarter.
In terms of our core focus areas:  Xbox momentum continued with our console outselling every competing console in the US for the fourth consecutive month; Bing use hit an all-time high with almost double the number of queries since it launched last year; and consumers continued to show their strong preference for Windows 7 and Office 2010.
Customer satisfaction across our products remains at record high levels.
We also made exciting progress in the mobile space with the recent launch of Windows Phone 7 in Europe and Asia, and the upcoming November 8th launch in the US.
So in summary, Im very pleased with our performance this quarter.
We executed well in all of our core focus areas, and were off to a good start for the year.
With that, I will hand it back to Bill to provide more details on the quarters results.
BILL KOEFOED, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
Ill start today by noting that all of my comments are adjusted for the $1.5 billion of revenue which was deferred in the first quarter of last year.
As you probably recall, this deferral was related to the Windows 7 Upgrade program and Windows 7 licenses sold in advance of general availability in the first quarter of last year.
Weve reconciled this non-GAAP view to GAAP results in our earnings slide deck.
All growth comparisons I make on the call today will relate to the corresponding period of last year unless I specify otherwise.
Ok, now to our results.
We started the fiscal year with great financial performance.
Total revenue for the company was up 13% to $16.2B.
Operating income and EPS grew 20% and 19% respectively, again outpacing revenue growth.
Bookings for the company were up an outstanding 24% this quarter.
Bookings growth over the last three quarters was the highest in the last three years.
Operating cash flow passed $8B for the first time ever and was up 34%.
A number of the demand patterns and trends we saw in the second half of our fiscal year 2010 were sustained through the first quarter of 2011.
In the first quarter, consumer demand for Office 2010 and Xbox were outstanding, and were pleased with the continued adoption and growth of Windows 7 and Bing.
Sales to small and medium businesses were exceptionally strong with revenue up over 30%.
This growth was partially due to a greater level of partner engagement as we had an increase of over 15% in the number of partners selling Microsoft products around the world.
We also saw strengthening trends in the enterprise segment, despite what is typically a seasonally weak quarter.
Our compelling product portfolio across Windows, Server & Tools and the Microsoft Business Division is driving increased enterprise agreement renewals.
Unearned revenue at the end of the quarter was $13.9 billion, due to the strength in enterprise agreements.
The contracted not billed balance ended the quarter over $16 billion, significantly above pre-recession levels.
Geographically, emerging markets continue to significantly outperform the rest of the world.
Growth in the US and Europe remained stable and healthy.
We see customers of all sizes embracing cloud services from Microsoft.
Organizations are leveraging our commercial and educational online services to run their businesses and institutions while consumers are increasingly using services like Xbox Live, Windows Live, and Office Web Apps.
Microsoft has significant cloud momentum and we are leading the industry through this transformation.
Turning to the PC market, we estimate PCs grew between 9 and 11% in the first quarter.
Consumer PCs grew single digits while business PCs grew mid-teens, as the business hardware refresh remained strong.
From a geographic perspective, we estimate emerging market PCs grew over three times the rate of mature markets.
Regarding netbook trends, we have seen consumers shift from buying netbooks to low-end notebooks and we have not seen a material shift away from low-end PCs due to tablets in the market.
Instead, weve predominantly seen consumers increase their number of devices and their usage scenarios.
Going forward, we see a strong pipeline of innovation from our partners for new Windows form factors.
With that PC backdrop, Ill move on to the results for the Windows and Windows Live Division which grew 10%.
Windows 7 drove the fourth consecutive quarter of double-digit revenue growth for the division.
In the first quarter, Windows OEM revenue which represents approximately 75% of the Windows and Windows Live Division was up 11%.
In our earnings slide deck we provided the usual revenue bridge to market, but in summary, the overall dynamics of the market were as expected, with strength in business PCs and emerging markets.
Now lets move to Server and Tools which posted a great quarter with 12% revenue growth.
We estimate the underlying server hardware market grew mid-teens.
Non-annuity revenue grew approximately 15% with Windows Server growing in line with the hardware market.
Multi-year licensing revenue growth was roughly 10% and Enterprise Services grew 9%.
At the financial analyst meeting in July, we discussed the assets and momentum of our Server & Tools portfolio.
Let me provide some additional context to the underlying momentum and adoption this quarter.
As Peter mentioned, our datacenter and cloud offerings are a top priority for businesses.
We estimate Windows Server usage share grew 1.5 points while at the same time Windows Server premium mix grew 4 points.
System Center revenue grew over 20%, and within that, revenue from server virtualization suites grew over 50%.
Our virtualization share continues to grow as IDC reports Hyper-Vs share of newly virtualized hosts doubled over the past year to 16.5%.
Windows Azure is also gaining traction and has grown subscriptions 40% sequentially.
This morning at PDC we announced a number of platform enhancements as Peter mentioned.
These enhancements will help customers build new applications and migrate existing applications to the cloud and allow developers and ISVs to build unique applications with the richest data sets possible.
Next Ill move on to the Online Services Division, which grew 8%.
The Online advertising component of the division grew 13%, primarily driven by our search business, which again outperformed the market leader.
Yesterday, Bing reached a significant milestone with the Yahoo! partnership.
Through diligent efforts on behalf of both companies, Bing is now powering Yahoo!s algorithmic and paid search results in the US and Canada.
Turning to the Microsoft Business Division, revenue grew 14%.
In the fourth quarter, I commented that the markets reception to Office 2010 has been phenomenal, and the first quarter was no different.
Consumer revenue grew 26% from continued launch momentum.
Office 2010s unit sales are 20% ahead of Office 2007 over the same time period.
In addition, our free Office Web Apps now have more than 20 million users since our June launch.
The business portion of MBD grew 11% with the non-annuity sales of Office 2010 up almost 50%.
Weve seen strong demand from small and medium customers and PC attach has rebounded from the year-ago levels.
The multi-year licensing portion of the business grew about 5%.
Weve spoken with you about the Office productivity platform strategy which includes Office, SharePoint, Exchange, Dynamics CRM, and Lync, and weve seen strong momentum and renewal rates with our 2010 offerings.
Let me give you some of the underlying product momentum in MBD.
Lync grew 25% and the new version is expected to be available in our second fiscal quarter.
Dynamics CRM, which just released a new beta this quarter, grew healthy double-digits.
Sales of Exchange and SharePoint, which are each billion dollar plus businesses, also grew healthy double-digits.
Enterprises are adopting the entire business productivity infrastructure.
They now have unparalleled choice when deploying their applications in their own datacenter or in the cloud.
During the quarter, we announced a number of significant cloud wins, including the City of New York last week.
The number of business customers licensing our cloud services has more than tripled in the last year.
In education, we now have over 10,000 schools and 11 million students signed up for our live@edu service.
On October 19th, we announced the next generation of our cloud productivity service, Office 365.
Office 365 brings together Lync, SharePoint, Exchange, and Office Professional Plus desktop software in an always-up-to-date cloud service, and is designed to meet the needs of organizations of all types and sizes.
From a business model perspective, Office 365 creates new profit growth opportunities for us and our partners and enables new scenarios that werent viable in the past.
With Office 365, we can reach more people, we will sell more to each customer, and we will increase customer satisfaction.
Office 365 will be available worldwide in calendar 2011.
Lets move on to the Entertainment & Devices Division which grew 27% reflecting higher Xbox 360 platform revenue.
We sold 2.8 million consoles this quarter, a unit increase of 38%.
In the US, the new Xbox 360 console has outsold all other platforms since its introduction, resulting in record first quarter shipments.
Halo Reach also had a solid launch this quarter reaching approximately $350M in revenue.
The Halo effect extended to Xbox Live with continued strong membership growth this quarter.
Windows Phone 7 launched last week in Europe and Asia, and we eagerly anticipate the introduction in the US on November 8th.
Now let me cover the remainder of the income statement.
Cost of goods sold increased 10% to $3.1 billion, driven primarily by increased Xbox hardware volume and online costs.
Operating expenses were $5.9 billion in the quarter, an increase of 6%.
In the first quarter we repurchased $4 billion of shares, returned $1.4 billion through dividends, and increased our dividend rate 23%.
So, in summary, were off to a great financial start for the year with 24% bookings growth; weve seen strong business spending across Windows, Server & Tools and the Microsoft Business Division in both traditional and cloud offerings; and our consumer momentum continued.
And with that, Ill hand it back to Peter, whos going to discuss our business outlook .
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Great, thanks Bill.
For the remainder of the call, Ill discuss our expectations for the second quarter and remainder of fiscal 2011.
According to many recent surveys, enterprise IT spend should continue to grow for the remainder of the fiscal year.
With the depth and breadth of our offerings, we are well positioned to grow our share of the IT spending market.
We expect business PC and server hardware purchasing to remain a high priority for most businesses.
The business PC refresh cycle should continue through at least the remainder of this fiscal year.
As was the case this quarter, we expect business PC growth to outpace consumer PC growth, and emerging market growth to outpace developed market growth.
We are confident that tablets will expand the PC market and were enthusiastic about our opportunity, along with our partners, to bring Windows to additional form factors and new usage scenarios.
Windows will continue to provide the choice and value that customers want across devices.
With that backdrop, Ill now turn to segment expectations.
Windows Division revenue should grow roughly in line with the PC market for the second quarter and the full year when excluding the impact of the prior year tech guarantee and revenue attributed to the launch spike.
For the second quarter of fiscal year 2010, you should exclude $1.7 billion of revenue related to the tech guarantee and $600 million of revenue related to the launch spike.
For the full year, you should exclude $300 million and $700 million, respectively, related to these events.
Moving on to Server and Tools.
For Q2 and the full year, we expect non-annuity revenue, approximately 30% of the total, to generally track with the hardware market.
Multi-year licensing revenue, approximately 50% of the total, should grow high-single digits for the second quarter and low double-digits for the full fiscal year.
Services, which is the remaining 20%, should grow mid-single digits for both the second quarter and the full fiscal year.
Turning to expectations for the Microsoft Business Division.
Consumer and business non-annuity revenue, approximately 40% of the divisions total revenue, should continue to track to PC shipment growth rates for the second quarter and the fiscal year.
We also expect revenue associated with multi-year agreements, representing 60% of total revenue, to grow mid-to-high single-digits for the second quarter and the fiscal year as we slowly start to recognize the higher growth billings going onto the balance sheet.
When updating your models, you should remember that next quarter, in addition to the framework I just provided, we will also recognize approximately $220 million of deferred revenue related to tech guarantees.
For Q2 and the full fiscal year, we expect Online Services Division revenue to outperform the online advertising market, reflecting continued organic revenue growth, as well as new revenue associated with our Yahoo partnership.
The majority of Yahoo-related revenue will be recognized net of traffic acquisition costs.
We expect the benefits of the integration to occur gradually over the next several quarters.
And finally, in the Entertainment and Devices Division, were very excited about the launch of Windows Phone 7 and we anticipate that Kinect will be THE gift this holiday season.
Considering the momentum and high level of consumer interest in our offerings, we expect this divisions revenue to grow roughly 30% for the second quarter and in the mid-twenties for the full fiscal year.
Switching to cost of goods sold expectations for the company.
The biggest factor impacting COGS next quarter will be the expected and significant increase in  hardware sales due to the upcoming launch of Kinect.
Obviously Xbox consoles and Kinect have a higher COGS profile relative to revenue than the rest of our business and you should consider this impact in your models.
Turning to operating expenses, we continue to prioritize our investments and remain diligent on cost controls.
We are reconfirming our guidance of $26.9 to $27.3 billion for the full fiscal year.
We expect the low interest rate environment we experienced in the first quarter to continue through the second quarter and the fiscal year, and for investment income to be fairly consistent with the first quarter level.
We continue to expect capital expenditures for fiscal year 2011 to be about $2.5 billion.
We expect our effective tax rate to be 23 to 24% for the second quarter and the remainder of the fiscal year.
Turning to the balance sheet, at the end of the second quarter, we expect unearned revenue to roughly follow historic seasonal patterns, excluding the $220 million impact of the tech guarantees.
So with that color for Q2 and the rest of our fiscal year, I want to close by saying that we are extremely pleased with the results we delivered this quarter.
We executed well in all of our core focus areas.
The products and services weve brought to market over the past year are being embraced by our customers and as a result, our product portfolio is as strong as it has ever been.
This, combined with our continued prioritization of investments into the highest growth opportunities, will help us drive long-term revenue and earnings per share growth.
With that, lets take some questions.
Bill?
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Peter.
We want to get questions from as many of you as possible, so please stick to one question, and avoid long or multi-part questions.
Barb, can you please go ahead and repeat your instructions?
(Operator Direction.)
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  Thank you.
And congratulations on a really good start to the year.
My question is about Office.
Obviously, also, a very good start for 2010.
As you look back at 2007, business growth exceeded 20 percent for a number of quarters.
As you think about the internals in terms of penetration and duration for this cycle, what are your early thoughts about how it could compare, and where are you seeing evidence on the success around some of the bundling that you talked about?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
Thanks, Adam.
At a high level, certainly I would point you to the guidance framework that we just talked about, and what we expect relative to the business PC market.
And obviously, business hardware refresh is a great underlying driver for that business, as well as excitement around the product.
And in terms of Office, I think the thing that's most encouraging for me is the breadth of the strength around it across all customer segments, whether that was small and medium-sized businesses and enterprises.
In terms of the integration story, Bill touched on the strong growth across all of those businesses.
And I think they're really starting to see that resonate very well with customers.
And, in fact, as we had anticipated when we were talking about anticipating 2010, Office 2010, that was going to be a key part of the story, and I think we're starting to see that play out, early days, which I think can sustain for a while.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, ISI Group:  Hi, thank you.
Peter, I was wondering.
You mentioned that the Windows 7 enterprise upgrade cycle would last at least through the end of Fiscal '11.
And I guess I'm just wondering if you could share with us how the upgrade cycle itself is tracking versus your expectations from a few quarters ago?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  I would say two things.
One, just in terms of enterprises desire to upgrade very strong, at sort of the high levels.
I think what we're seeing are people actually doing their deployment a little bit faster than I think we expected, and we've seen in the past.
In terms of the overall business, obviously we're seeing enterprises and businesses refresh their hardware, which is obviously a great thing in terms of the Windows 7 business.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi:  Hi.
Bill, and Peter, I'm wondering if you can talk a bit about just enterprise agreements in general.
And we're certainly not back to a normal economic environment, but your performance there, especially the improvements over the last several quarters here, seem to suggest that maybe you are getting back to kind of normal behavior from customers despite headcount being pressured.
I'm just wondering if you could talk to us about what you're seeing as the drivers of growth in that part of the business more generally?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
Thanks, Walter.
I think you're seeing the confluence of several things.
Obviously one is just macroeconomics, and businesses investing in IT again.
And I think the other is our product portfolio, and sort of the combination of those two things has gotten enterprise really wanting to invest both in their IT infrastructure, and in our portfolio of products.
And so, as we had hoped over the course of the last year, we thought those two things might come together.
The last thing I'll say is the accelerated interest in the cloud.
And so when you add on top of it where we've come in terms of our cloud offerings, and what that means for enterprises as they think about investing for the long-term, they want to invest with somebody who can make the transition from their on premise infrastructure to the cloud as soon as it's possible, and I think you're seeing that as well.
And so the conversations that we're having always include our new product portfolio as well as our cloud offerings.
And I think that, taking into account the better macroeconomic environment, has all come together to really drive a better environment.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
SARAH FRIAR, Goldman Sachs:  Great, thanks for taking my question, guys.
Peter, on the cost side you had tremendous operating margins this quarter.
As you look forward you maintained the cost goals for the full year.
Is that in anticipation of what's coming around the Windows Phone Launch and Kinect, or are there ways to continue to see you be a lot more efficient on the cost side over the next couple of quarters.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Sarah.
As you know, we're always looking at ways to be as efficient as we can on the cost and right now we're executing against the plan we feel very good about our plan that we've been talking about over the last couple of quarters.
So, first quarter was good, and we continue execute against that plan.
Obviously in Q2 we do have some launches coming out and that was always in our plan and those starting off are going very well.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Thanks, Peter.
If you could drill one level deeper into the corporate demand and maybe give us a sense of what inning you think we're in, in terms of the corporate upgrade.
PETER KLEIN:  First baseball reference.
Thanks, Brent.
I won't say go Giants.
BRENT THILL:  You can say it.
BILL KOEFOED:  He doesn't want to, but I do.
PETER KLEIN:  You know, in our guidance we talked about the rest of this year.
I think we have to see how that plays out.
That's sort of where we have visibility and what we're talking about.
But, certainly over the last couple of quarters looking forward over the next couple of quarters, and in talking to customers and what they're looking to invest in, clearly a priority is investing in refreshing their hardware and the related Microsoft products that come along with that.
Operator, next question.
(Operator Direction.)
PHILIP WINSLOW, CREDIT SUISSE:  Hi, guys.
Great quarter.
I just wanted to focus in on the Server and Tools Division for a minute.
Peter, what are your OEM partners telling you about just where we stand in the server refresh cycle and how much do you see this high growth rates that we're seeing in server shipments either continuing or not continuing in the next year.
Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Phil.
Similar to PCs, I think it's a similar dynamic.
The businesses are investing broadly in their infrastructure whether that's PCs or servers.
In our outlook we talked about how we expect that to continue for the rest of this fiscal year.
So, it's very similar to what we just talked about in terms of the PC refresh.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
KATHERINE EGBERT, Jeffries:  Hi, good afternoon.
If I do some math I come up with about 40 percent of your revenue coming from all consumer sources and about 60 percent business.
It looks like the consumer revenue is about flat, and you're in the business revenues growing high teens, is that accurate?
BILL KOEFOED:  Well, if you look at it that way...
PETER KLEIN:  It's hard to answer that question if I don't know exactly your math.
I will point out a couple of key highlights on the consumer side.
If you look at the entertainment and devices, the Xbox growth of 27 percent, that's something that we feel really good about and it gives us great momentum heading into the holiday with Kinect, and the same thing with our search revenue outgrowing the market.
So, those are sort of the key highlights.
BILL KOEFOED:  Consumer in Office was up 26.
PETER KLEIN:  Correct, so we actually feel really good about the consumer growth.
It's hard to answer the specific question without
BILL KOEFOED:  And we feel good about the business growth.
So, it was a good quarter for both.
KATHERINE EGBERT:  Okay.
Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks.
Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  Hi, thank you very much.
It's good to see the cash flow and the operating margins, and also you bought back a ton of stock in the quarter.
My question is about growth.
I just want to answer this from a qualitative standpoint.
Incrementally, relative to the last two quarters what's your confidence level in your growth rate?  I just noticed some of the forward-looking indicators.
Your business tends to lack broader spending, because you have this annuity model for the most part.
Look at the unbilled portion that set a record high.
Your EA renewals are, you characterized, better than before.
The deferrals also came in nicely.
What is your incremental confidence with respect to our revenue growth rate, considering how you have your expenses tied up, I would assume that there's a lot of operating leverage for the incremental revenue upside.
Talk to us about your confidence in your revenue growth outlook.
Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Great, yes.
Honestly, we feel pretty good.
We had such a strong performance on the business side.
And that flows through if you look at our outlook on the annuity side to your point, we've slightly increased our annuity revenue outlook in MBD and STB, which reflects the strength in the billings that we've seen.
As you pointed out, it takes time for that to flow through the income statement, and it will throughout the rest of the year.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
JOHN DIFUCCI, JP Morgan Chase:  Thank you.
Peter, my question has to do with PC market, PC sales, unit sales.
You and your Windows OEM revenue bridge, which is always very helpful, you start off with PC market of 10 percent growth.
But, industry analysts are coming out and I know you're not doing their work, but it's actually quite different from what we've seen out there from industry analysts by about 2-1/2 percent in this quarter, which is a bigger range than we usually see.
I'm just wondering, can you just help us out a little bit with that, because those things come out throughout the quarter and we take a look at those and we realize that a lot of yourwell, at least the Windows business, and also MBD with Office is driven by that, or at least significantly driven by that.
Any comments on that the difference?
BILL KOEFOED:  Actually, John, I'll take that.
So, IDC came out and said 10 percent and Gartner said 8.
So, our range of 9 to 11 was slightly higher than Gartner's and IDCs was in the mid range.
So, we feel like our analysis of the PC market, obviously we look at those data points, as well as others, was completely in line.
So, I'm happy to talk to you about it after the call, one-on-one, if you want.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Okay.
Thanks.
(Operator Direction.)
JASON MAYNARD, Wells Fargo:  Hey guys.
I just had a question on Windows 7.
The premium mix shift was pretty good this quarter, I'm just curious in light of your commentary about the enterprise adoption cycle, is it fair to say you anticipate sort of similar levels playing out there in terms of how that percentage mix plays out for the rest of the year.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, generally speaking the biggest factor in premium mix is going to be the business mix.
As we talked about we expected those dynamics to continue for the rest of this year.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRAD REBACK, Oppenheimer:  Hey, guys.
How are you?
PETER KLEIN:  Good.
BRAD REBACK:  So, Bill, I think you had highlighted earlier in the call the big win with the Office 365 product in New York.
It was a fairly competitive bid, it looks like.
Could you guys maybe talk to what the economics of that look like to you from a profitability standpoint over the life of that contract.
Clearly a lot of concern as people move to the cloud that that could negatively impact the P&L.
So, maybe you could talk to a real-world example.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
No, happy to do that.
And it's a great question.
Bill touched a little bit on the business model.
We talked about this a little bit at our analyst meeting.
These cloud wins, and these cloud deals, it provides totally new economic opportunity for us.
These are scenarios that we're not in today.
In many cases, they're customers we don't have as customers today.
In some cases, it's revenue that we may have that leads us to customers that we're not getting.
The City of New York is a perfect example.
We have others, like Starbucks, and others, where we're addressing totally new scenarios.
Edu is a great example of that, it increases our penetration in that market.
Similarly we've talked about how in the mid-market, we can really increase our penetration with services like this.
So, that's sort of the business model of how it creates economic profit for us.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
EDWARD MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Yes.
Good afternoon.
Looking at the double-digit growth in your business division products, could you talk about what's driving that, and how closely that growth may be linked to the Windows 7 activity?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
It's not really tied to the Windows 7 activity.
It's more a function of the product cycle with Office 2010 and all the related products that go with it like SharePoint, and Exchange, and Lync.
And, as we've touched on briefly before, the confluence of the macroeconomic environment picking up, and enterprises investing in their infrastructure, they're seeing the value that you get, the increased productivity, and the cost savings that you get, and that's what's really driving the interest in those products, and the new versions of those products just introduce capabilities that enterprises really want.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Ed.
Operator, we'll take one more question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowen & Company:  Thanks very much.
Good afternoon, guys.
Peter, you mentioned that the Windows Server premium mix was up 4 points, so I think you're now at 29 percent.
And I believe at least a few quarters back Microsoft had suggested that it would be difficult to get this above 30 percent.
Is that still kind of the ceiling we should be thinking about, or do you think given this momentum that you could drive the premium mix higher than that?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, the first thing I would say is, the premium mix is over 20 percent.
We haven't given an exact number on that.
It's probablyI think it's best to continue to track it and not put a set feeling or an expectation for it.
GREGG MOSKOWITZ:  Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay.
So that will wrap up our Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
As many of you know, today is a busy day for us here in Redmond, as we also have PDC going on here.
I would encourage you, if you haven't, to listen to the replays of the keynotes that we've done at PDC.
We also look forward to seeing many of you at a number of fall conferences we'll be participating in this quarter.
For those of you who are unable to attend in person, you'll be able to follow our comments at Microsoft.com/investor.
Please contact us if you need any additional details.
Thanks again for joining us today.
And take care.
END
Microsoft Second Quarter 2011 Prepared Remarks
This presentation contains statements that are forward-looking.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties which may cause actual results to differ materially because of factors in this presentation or discussed in todays press release, in the managements discussion and analysis section of the companys most recent Form 10-K, Forms 10-Q or in other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We undertake no duty to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a results of new information, future events, or otherwise.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
I am extremely pleased with our performance this quarter  we delivered excellent top-line and bottom-line results.
Business and consumer response to our latest wave of innovation, including Office 2010 and Kinect, helped drive yet another quarter of healthy revenue growth, resulting in revenue of nearly $20 billion.
Our solid revenue performance, combined with cost controls and continued prioritization of investments into the highest growth opportunities, enabled us to deliver record earnings per share, and our sixth consecutive quarter of operating margin expansion.
On our last earnings call, I commented that we were looking forward to an exciting holiday quarter, especially from consumers.
Kinect, in particular, exceeded our expectations.
The controller-free entertainment experience is revolutionizing the living room.
Kinect is the fastest selling consumer electronics device in history.
We couldnt be more proud of what the team has accomplished.
But importantly, its just our first step in delivering on the opportunity to fundamentally change the way people interact with technology.
The Microsoft Business Division also had a terrific quarter.
Office 2010 is the most successful consumer version we have ever shipped and the product is also performing extremely well in the business segment.
Companies are purchasing Office 2010 as well as our entire productivity platform, including SharePoint, Exchange, and Lync.
Businesses are also deploying Windows 7.
According to IDC, nearly 90% of enterprise companies worldwide have already started their formal migrations to Windows 7.
In addition to healthy enterprise deployment of our business desktop products, we saw strong momentum for our business infrastructure offerings.
Windows Server and SQL Server premium revenues grew double-digits.
And, this quarter marks the one year anniversary of Windows Server 2008 R2.
Since its launch, we have grown our share of the overall server market every quarter.
During the quarter, we continued our product launch momentum.
In November, we delivered Microsoft Lync 2010, the next generation communications platform that incorporates instant messaging, presence, audio, video, web-conferencing and voice into one interface that integrates with the applications businesses are already using today including Microsoft Office, SharePoint, and Exchange.
For the consumer, I already mentioned Kinect.
Also during the quarter, we launched Windows Phone 7 which is now on 9 devices with 60 operators in 30 markets.
Weve said all along that our first priority was to make a phone people love and to that end, were pleased with the initial response.
Customer satisfaction data indicates 93% of customers worldwide are happy with the product and were also seeing strong developer engagement.
While we are encouraged by the early progress, we realize we still have a lot of work ahead of us, and we remain focused and committed to the long-term success of Windows Phone 7.
We continue to deliver sustained innovation and releases for Bing.
In addition to transitioning Yahoos paid search in the US and Canada during the quarter, we also entered into a strategic partnership with Facebook.
Bing now provides much more personalized experiences by allowing users to bring their Facebook friends into their search experiences.
So in summary, our record performance this quarter rounded out a very successful calendar year for Microsoft.
We delivered strong financial results and invigorated the market with our product innovation.
With that, I will hand it back to Bill to provide more details on this quarters results.
BILL KOEFOED, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
Ill start today by noting that all of my comments are adjusted for the $1.7 billion of deferred revenue which was recognized in the second quarter of last year.
The deferral was related to the Windows 7 Upgrade program and Windows 7 licenses sold in advance of general availability.
Weve reconciled the difference between GAAP and non-GAAP results in our earnings slide deck.
All growth comparisons I make on the call today will relate to the corresponding period of last year unless I specify otherwise.
This quarters performance continued the momentum weve seen over the past year.
Total revenue for the company was up 15% to nearly $20 billion.
Operating income grew 20%, and earnings per share grew 28%.
Bookings grew 21% which marks the fourth consecutive quarter of strong double-digit bookings growth.
We continue to see strong momentum with Windows 7.
As Peter mentioned, nearly 90% of enterprise companies worldwide have started their formal migrations to Windows 7 and many have already recognized material savings as a result.
Office 2010 is the fastest-selling consumer version of Office in history, with license sales over 50% ahead of Office 2007 for the equivalent period following launch.
Office clearly remains the worlds most popular productivity platform for both home and work.
Weve experienced an incredible consumer response to our latest products.
Kinect in particular, was the hottest gift this holiday season and has been mentioned by a number of publications as the most innovative product of 2010.
Businesses of all sizes continued to commit to Microsofts platforms.
This quarter we saw a better-than-expected increase in transactional licensing, and enterprise agreements renewed in the historical range.
Our unearned revenue balance grew 7% year-over-year to $13.4 billion.
On a sequential basis, after adjusting for the $224 million of Office tech guarantee recognition, our unearned revenue balance declined $278 million.
Our contracted-not-billed balance grew to over $16.5 billion, a $700 million increase from the prior quarter.
This growth in our customers multiyear commitments, combined with our strong transactional sales resulted in a solid 21% growth in year-over-year bookings.
Geographically, emerging markets continued to outperform mature markets.
Now, turning to the PC market, we estimate close to 90 million PCs were sold globally, the biggest quarter ever, representing growth of 2 to 4%.
Business PCs grew faster than consumer PCs as companies continued to refresh hardware and adopt Windows 7.
Within consumer PCs, netbooks declined from their peak last year while notebook growth remained healthy.
With that PC backdrop, Ill move on to the results for the Windows and Windows Live Division.
Last quarter, we noted there would be a $600 million headwind to Windows comparables for the second quarter due to the Windows 7 launch spike.
Adjusting for this dynamic and the prior year tech guarantee recognition, Windows and Windows Live revenue growth was in-line with the PC market.
As usual, youll find an OEM revenue bridge in our earnings slide deck.
The revenue per license benefit from a higher business mix was offset by emerging markets growing faster than developed markets.
This quarter marked the one year anniversary of Windows 7.
Today we are announcing that we have sold over 300 million Windows 7 licenses to date, continuing its momentum as the fastest selling operating system in history.
Looking ahead, we are excited about the partner innovation underway in the PC and Windows 7 ecosystem as seen at CES.
The PC hardware dynamics are incredibly strong, with innovation in new ultra-portables, all-in-ones, and other form factors, including tablets, slates and convertibles.
The new Intel Sandy Bridge and AMD Fusion chip architectures substantially improve performance, graphics and battery life.
In addition, we announced at CES that the next version of Windows will support system-on-a-chip architectures, including ARM-based systems from partners NVIDIA, Qualcomm and Texas Instruments and x86-based systems from partners Intel and AMD.
Windows on system-on-a-chip architectures will fuel significant innovation across a spectrum of devices.
We are enthusiastic about the future of device innovation and the role Windows is playing.
Now lets move to Server and Tools which posted 10% revenue growth.
Non-annuity revenue grew roughly in-line with the underlying server hardware market, which we estimate grew high single digits.
Multi-year license revenue growth was roughly 11%, and enterprise services revenue grew 9%.
In the datacenter, we continue to be pleased with our progress in virtualization and systems management.
The virtualization trend is driving double-digit System Center and Windows Server premium revenue growth while significantly lowering our customers costs.
In the database, premium offerings are also a core focus of our strategy and this quarter we saw double-digit growth in SQL server premium revenue.
Among other customer wins this quarter, Dollar Thrifty Auto Group migrated their mission-critical pricing system from Oracle to a Microsoft data management solution, a strategic move that supports the companys goal to standardize on high-value, cost-effective technologies.
We are excited about SQL Server and our opportunity to drive tier-one customer wins.
In the cloud, we continued to see developer interest and application development on the Windows Azure platform.
Earlier in the quarter at PDC, we unveiled a number of additional platform enhancements and showed how leading companies, like Pixar Animation studios and ADP with NVoicePay, were able to develop innovative solutions with Azure.
Next Ill move to the Online Services Division, which grew 19%.
Online advertising revenue, including both search and display, grew 23%, and now includes revenue driven by our search partnership with Yahoo! which was implemented in the US and Canada during the quarter.
We continue to make progress on the partnership and earlier this month, we transitioned algorithmic search traffic in Mexico, Brazil, and Australia.
Bings US market share continued to grow, ending the quarter at 12%; and our search revenue growth rate again outperformed the market leader.
During the quarter, we announced a significant expansion of our partnership with Facebook where Bing will provide more personalized experiences by allowing users to search Facebook profiles and incorporate their friends likes into search results.
We believe the addition of these new social features is another way to deliver innovation and valuable enhancements to the Bing experience.
Next, Ill move to the Microsoft Business Division which continues to show solid launch momentum with revenue growing 24%.
This includes $224 million of recognized revenue pertaining to the Office tech guarantee.
Weve seen enthusiastic consumer response to Office 2010, and business demand has also been strong with the transactional component of MBD sales up over 40%.
The multi-year licensing portion of the business grew 9%.
CIOs are investing in the new productivity scenarios enabled by SharePoint, Exchange, Lync and Dynamics CRM, which are enhanced when deployed with Office 2010.
Lync grew over 20% this quarter, while SharePoint 2010 and Dynamics CRM both continued to grow double-digits.
This quarter we reported a number of cloud productivity wins including the State University of New York, the US Department of Agriculture, DuPont, and the State of California, among others.
We have seen an immediate customer and partner response to the Office 365 announcement with the beta over-subscribed within its first day.
Just two weeks ago we launched Dynamics CRM Online in 40 markets.
Were already seeing customers switching from Salesforce.com to Dynamics CRM Online --  it saves money, its more flexible and its easy to use with the familiar Microsoft Office experience for increased productivity.
Lets move on to the Entertainment & Devices Division where revenue grew 55% and operating income has now surpassed $1 billion year-to-date, which is a major milestone for this division.
Kinect exceeded all expectations with 8 million stand-alone and bundled sensors sold in just 60 days.
And since we updated the consoles in June, Xbox 360 has had tremendous momentum.
We sold a record 6.3 million consoles this quarter, a unit increase of 21%.
This helped drive Xbox Live membership up 30% to 30 million active members.
In addition, at CES, we announced a number of upcoming feature enhancements, including Kinect support for Netflix, Hulu Plus and Avatar Kinect, which will advance how people communicate and enjoy their television experiences.
Windows Phone 7 is off to a solid start as handset manufacturers purchased over 2 million licenses in the quarter.
Windows Phone 7 is making progress in these early days as user satisfaction is extremely high and developer momentum has continued to build to now over 24,000 registered developers.
As we announced at CES, we are looking forward to adding more features, including support for CDMA.
Now let me cover the remainder of the income statement.
Cost of goods sold increased 33% to $4.8 billion, driven primarily by increased Xbox hardware volume and online costs.
Operating expenses were $7 billion in the quarter, an increase of 1%.
Our effective tax rate for the quarter was 22%, below our guidance of 23 to 24%, due primarily to the one-time benefit of the retroactive extension of the R&D tax credit from January 1, 2010.
In the second quarter we repurchased $5 billion of shares and declared $1.3 billion of dividends, continuing to deliver on our commitment to return cash to shareholders.
In summary, it was a strong quarter both for our product momentum as well as for our financial results.
And with that, Ill hand it back to Peter, whos going to discuss our business outlook for the remainder of this fiscal year.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
For the remainder of the call, Ill discuss our expectations for the third quarter and remainder of fiscal 2011.
According to various surveys, enterprise IT spend is forecast to grow in 2011, and Windows 7 and Office 2010 remain among the highest priorities for CIOs.
We remain confident in our ability to continue to grow our share of the IT spending market.
We expect the business PC refresh cycle to continue.
In terms of PC growth, we expect business to outpace consumer, and emerging markets to outpace developed markets.
With that backdrop, let me turn to segment expectations.
Windows Division revenue should grow roughly in line with the PC market for the third quarter and the full year when excluding the revenue attributable to the prior year launch spike and tech guarantee.
As we said previously, when looking at year over year growth, you should exclude $100 million from Q3 of fiscal 2010 for the launch spike.
And for full fiscal year 2010, you should exclude $700 million of revenue for the launch and $300 million for the tech guarantee.
Moving on to Server and Tools.
For Q3 and the full year, we expect non-annuity revenue, approximately 30% of the total, to generally track with the hardware market.
Multi-year licensing revenue which is about 50% of the total, and enterprise services, the remaining 20%, should grow high-single digits for the third quarter and low double-digits for the full fiscal year.
Turning to expectations for the Microsoft Business Division, consumer and business non-annuity revenue, approximately 40% of the divisions total revenue, will continue to exceed PC shipment growth rates for the third quarter and the fiscal year due to the Office 2010 launch.
We expect revenue associated with multi-year agreements, representing approximately 60% of total revenue, to grow mid-to-high single digits for the third quarter and the fiscal year.
When updating your models, remember that in Q3 of fiscal 2010, we deferred approximately $300 million related to the Office tech guarantee.
Moving on to our Online Services Division.
While we feel great about the progress we have made with the partnership, we recognize that there has been some marketplace disruption.
We are working diligently to address any issues, and we expect the benefits of the integration to occur gradually over the next several quarters.
We expect online advertising revenue, including organic revenue and new revenue associated with our Yahoo partnership, to outperform the overall online advertising market in Q3 and for the full fiscal year.
When updating your models, keep in mind that roughly 75% of Yahoo-related revenue will be recognized net of traffic acquisition costs.
Moving on to the Entertainment and Devices Division.
Considering the enthusiastic response to the Xbox 360 platform, including the Kinect sensor, we now expect this divisions revenue to grow roughly 50% for the third quarter, and roughly 40% for the full fiscal year.
Switching to cost of goods sold.
As was the case this quarter, the biggest factor impacting COGS going forward will be the growth of the Entertainment and Devices Division.
Xbox consoles and Kinect sensors have higher COGS than the rest of our products, and due to our growth expectations for these products, we remind you to consider this impact in your models.
Turning to operating expenses, we are reconfirming our guidance of $26.9 to $27.3 billion for the full fiscal year.
We continue to expect capital expenditures for fiscal year 2011 to be about $2.5 billion and our effective tax rate to be 23 to 24% for the third quarter and the remainder of the fiscal year.
Finally, at the end of the third quarter, we expect unearned revenue to roughly follow historic seasonal patterns.
In summary, we are extremely pleased with the strong financial performance and continued product innovation we delivered this quarter.
Heading into calendar year 2011, our product portfolio has never been stronger, and this, combined with our continued prioritization of investments into the highest growth opportunities, will help us drive long-term revenue and earnings per share growth.
With that, Ill turn the call over to Bill and we will take some questions.
BILL KOEFOED:  Great.
We want to get to questions from as many of you as possible.
So, please stick to just one question and avoid long, or multi-part questions.
Holly, can you please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
(Operator Direction.)
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  Hi.
Thank you, and congrats on a real nice quarter.
My question is about the corporate upgrade cycle, and the impacts on where you are on Windows 7.
Would you expect to see the business premium mix increase from the 30 percent level as you get a little bit deeper into the cycle?  And can you update us on where you think you are in terms of any improvements around software assurance attach?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
In general, as we talked about seeing the business refresh, and the sort of intent to deploy that enterprises have, obviously to the extent there is strength in the business PC market that would be helpful for the mix that you indicated.
So, given our outlook that that will continue to outpace consumer market, that's a good thing.
To your point on SA, if you think about the commercial side of the business, the volume licensing part of the business, that has been strong reflecting those numbers that we talked about.
So, as we've talked about, that's a relatively smaller portion than the OEM portion, but it's having a favorable impact on the overall growth of the division.
BILL KOEFOED:  Great.
Holly, can you go to the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi:  Hi, thanks.
Bill, and Peter, I'm wondering if you can talk about, in MBD you saw really strong transitional business.
I think up 40 percent or so.
And I think you sort of told us to expect that to grow more in line with PCs.
And I'm just wondering if you saw any of the business that maybe would have been annuity in nature that showed up in the quarter in transactional, and that explained part of that strength?
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Walter.
No, not really.
We're seeing strength both in the annuity side, and in the transactional side, so it's really incremental, which led to their high growth.
It's probably helpful to frame that so you can understand the complete picture.
We talk a little bit about the strong growth in contracted not billed, which is really the funnel where that multi-year licensing revenue really comes into Microsoft, and ultimately that will flow through to the balance sheet and the income statement.
And so, we saw strong contracted not billed.
A lot of that was Office, and obviously Server and Tools.
And so what we're seeing is strong contracted not billed, strong transactional, with led to the bookings growth that Bill talked about.
So, really what we're seeing is better than expected uptake particularly in small and mid-size companies who typically buy transactional licenses, not enterprises who typically buy the multi-year agreement.
So, it really is increased strength in the Office business.
WALTER PRITCHARD:  Great.
Thanks a lot.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, can you go to the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, ISI Group:  Hi.
Thank you.
I just had a follow-up to Walter's question about the strength in MBD.
You made the comment that non-annuity revenue will exceed PC growth, and obviously you did a phenomenal job of that this quarter.
But, this is a much wider gap than what we've seen in the past.
So, I guess what I'm trying to ask is, do you expect the gap that you've normally been outpacing PC shipments to kind ofthe gap to widen similar to what we saw this quarter versus what historicals might tell us?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, the only thing I can say, Heather, is the outlook that we gave is the outlook that we gave.
We continue to be certainly very pleased with the customer response to Office 2010.
We thought we had a great product coming into the cycle.
And that's proving to be true from the customer response, not only for the suite of applications themselves, but how they integrate with SharePoint, and Exchange, and Lync.
So, I would just lead you to the outlook that we gave, and we remain incredibly pleased with the customer reaction to the product.
BILL KOEFOED:  Holly, can you move to the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Good afternoon.
Peter, just on the multi-year licensing pick up that you're seeing, can you just give us a typical term length in terms of what those contracts are renewing at?  And the contracts that are coming back, are they now renewing above the original contract values, is that a trend that you're seeing as things are improving?
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Brent.
They're typically three-year contracts.
They sort of vary in length but that's most common length of our multi-year agreements.
In many cases, we are adding new products and services to our multi-year agreements.
We talked about some of the products that are showing growth that are some of the newer enterprise products, like Lync, like SQL Server Premium Editions.
We're starting to get those migrations from Oracle Tier 1 applications over to SQL.
And so, as we continue to do those things, and people invest in our platform, I think you'll see some opportunity there.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
PHIL WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi, guys.
Just a question on the Windows division, obviously PC shipments globally slowed pretty significantly this quarter.
Just looking at your KPIs, Windows license shipments were actually down 5 percent year-over-year.
I'm just wondering if you can give us a sense of how much you think, since obviously the PC data is on sell-in, this relates to sort of the launch of Oak Trail, Sandy Bridge, and so forth, in Q1 affecting inventory levels both in sort of the channel, but also Windows license inventories inside of OEMs, and how that should maybe change when you think about calendar Q1.
PETER KLEIN:  Looking at the OEM license growth, keep in mind that there was a spike from the launch last year in Q2, which exacerbates that issue as people bulked up, and there was some inventory there.
But, in general, I wouldn't characterize what we saw in this fiscal quarter as sort of having anything to do with the Q1 and some of the new chipsets.
And I think we saw some macro things on the consumer side, but business remains very strong.
And I don't think that's played a big part in it.
BILL KOEFOED:  Yes.
I would say we just see the opportunity for Sandy Bridge, and Fusion as an opportunity for businesses to improve their refresh outlook as you start to get into 2011.
I would say we're super bullish on the chipsets from both those manufacturers.
Next question, please, Operator.
(Operator Direction.)
KATHERINE EGBERT, Jefferies:  Hi, good afternoon.
You always say that the emerging PC market is growing faster than the mature market.
Can you give us some color on that, and then also talk about PC pricing especially in consumer, and then finally any comment on tablets and cannibalization?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Sure.
Emerging markets are growing faster than developed markets, probably 2X is not a bad sort of qual mark for how to think through that.
Obviously, China plays a big part in that, and that's an important issue to think through, and it's certainly an opportunity for us going forward.
KATHERINE EGBERT:  Pricing.
PETER KLEIN:  Pricing on
BILL KOEFOED:  Emerging markets versus developed markets.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
We've always said that there is about half of what you see in developed markets.
KATHERINE EGBERT:  Okay, but there's been some reports that pricing has bottomed.
Have you seen that?
BILL KOEFOED:  We really haven't changed our prices much at all.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
KATHERINE EGBERT:  Okay, and then finally just tablets and cannibalization?
PETER KLEIN:  You know, I think that Bill talked a little bit in his comments about netbooks, and how netbooks sort of hit their peak sort of last year in Q2, and I think what we've seen is over the course of this year in the consumer space, some of that volume being replaced with newer devices, like ultra portables and tablets, and largely these are second devices, not primary devices.
And that's caused a little bit of a drag on the consumer side.
BILL KOEFOED:  Holly, next question.
(Operator Direction.)
BRAD REBACK, Oppenheimer:  Hey, guys.
How are you?
Just a quick question, Peter, you had talked about the SQL Server premium business being up double digits in the quarter.
I know earlier this week I think it was you announced some appliances with HP.
Do you think that type of relationship can further accelerate that growth?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
I mean, I think partnerships with some of our key partners are very important for helping us to continue to grow in that part of the market, and HP is a perfect example of somebody who is a very important partner when it comes to some of the infrastructure and database platforms, and even more broadly in the cloud for taking it to market.
So, yes, I think that can be a real benefit.
BILL KOEFOED:  Holly, next question.
(Operator Direction.)
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  Hi, thank you very much.
It looks like you're talking about the business PC versus consumer PC, and also implicitly the premium mix should also go up, and yet you're talking about client revenues more or less in line with PC unit growth rate for the fiscal year.
I'm trying to reconcile the contradiction there, because it would seem like your client revenue should grow faster than PC units given what we're talking about, especially coupled with Windows 7 enterprise upgrade cycle.
Any comments?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Kash.
It's the emerging markets growing faster than developed markets.
So, we have offsetting dynamics going on, business PCs growing faster than consumer is good for attach, and good for pricing, and emerging markets growing faster than developed markets has the opposite effect.
And so what you are seeing is largely those two things offsetting each other.
BILL KOEFOED:  Holly, let's go to the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
COLIN GILLIS, BGC Financial:  Hey, guys.
Just real briefly, search is now basically a duopoly, and a lot of the search marketers are looking pretty favorably at Bing.
Is now the time to increase the outreach of marketing efforts?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, we're extremely focused on doing what we need to do to be successful in that business, and we've been laser beam focused on what that is.
One is growing our search share, and the other is growing our revenue per search.
And we continue to grow our share every quarter.
We're going to continue to focus on that.
We're going to do a lot of the same things that we're doing for that.
Bill talked about some of the product enhancements.
I think that's probably the most important thing we can do to really differentiate the product experience, because I think that's really what drives usage and share in search.
And then, of course, on the revenue per search side, the Yahoo! integration is a key component of that, and we're excited to move forward in that.
But, really, on the share side, we will do interesting marketing things like we have been doing, but I think what I really get excited about is the product enhancements, and some of the partnerships we've got there.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowen:  Thanks very much, and good afternoon.
I'm wondering if you could update us on where things stand with regard to Kinect supply, and how we should be thinking about units in the Q3?  And, relatedly, the E&D operating margin of 18 percent was up 3 points year-over-year, and a little better than I would have expected given the marketing launch around Kinect.
If you could talk about the prospects for margin expansion over the next couple of years?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, to your first question on supply, I think you should just go to the outlook framework that we gave you to have a good sense of what we expect for the Xbox business, and E&D over the next coming quarters.
In terms of margin, the long-term story is a good one.
The business model for that business is build an installed base of really-engaged users that then you attach lots of software and services to.
That's been part of the strength of the Xbox Live service, and of course as we build the installed base of Kinect, we have a whole new generation and evolution of games that we can sell into our installed base.
So, all of those things are very positive long-term for that business.
In the short-term for this quarter, we obviously prioritized and allocated our resources very carefully against the launch of that, and so we were able to have a successful launch, and still improve the profitability profile of the business.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
JOHN DIFUCCI, JP Morgan:  Thank you.
Peter, I think you said that IDC said that 90 percent of enterprise companies had started their formal migration to Windows 7.
Can you tell us how penetrated you think, even roughly, corporations are at this point?  And when I say corporations, exclude the small business, we're really talking mid-market to enterprise.
PETER KLEIN:  You know, I don't know exactly.
It's very early.
I could give you some anecdotal feedback on certainly conversations I've had with our sales folks, and directly with customers, the majority of the people I talk to are either in the middle of doing it, or at the last stages of evaluating it, and have a specific plan to do it.
In fact, most of them have said we want to go faster.
Once they get started, they realize the productivity benefits, and the cost savings are really compelling.
But it is early in terms of getting those migrations done.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
ROBERT BREZA, RBC Capital Markets:  Hi, thanks for taking my questions.
Peter, I was wondering if you could talk to us about really the cloud momentum.
I saw the slide in the slide deck, but really if you look at Office 365 launching from a beta perspective it's over-subscribed.
Can you maybe just walk us through how you see cloud revenue at 12-24 months out?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, I'm really excited about the roadmap and the opportunity.
We obviously haven't given any guidance on the revenue of that and how fast it's going to ramp.
I'm certainly excited both about the customer wins that we talked about for our existing product and then the conversations we're having about the roadmap to Office 365 are really exciting.
So, in addition to just the beta being over-subscribed, it's now part of the conversations we're having with all of our customers.
And it's one of those things where it's going to happen and the exact sort of speed of the ramp is uncertain.
I do believe that once it starts to accelerate it's going to accelerate pretty fast.
ROBERT BREZA, RBC Capital Markets:  Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay.
Operator, this will be our last question.
(Operator Direction.)
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Yes, good afternoon.
I wanted to just follow up on Rob's question around the online services and Azure.
Could you talk about some of the conversations that you're having and the criteria as customers are deciding whether to stay on premise or adopt a software-as- a -service solution, what that means in terms of their economics and ultimately what it may mean for you in the business model as it becomes a bigger part of the business?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, there's really two dimensions to the conversation.
One is about economics, and one is about capabilities.
Let me talk about sort of the applications, or the Office 365 types of services.
People are very interested in that for two reasons, one ultimately the economics are very good for them once they migrate over.
But, probably even the stronger driver, especially now in the conversation, is the ability to more quickly take advantage of the latest capabilities that we have.
So, it's a very easy way to deploy the latest versions of our software, and increasingly that's really the biggest piece of the dialogue.
So, that's on the Office 365 side.
On the Azure side, the conversation is really about moving up from thinking about infrastructure-as-a-service to platform-as-a-service, and what they get with Azure in terms of management and security, and sort of the developer ecosystem.
So, that's really what excites them in talking about the platform as a service, or Azure, if you will.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay.
So, that will wrap up our Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
We look forward to seeing many of you at the numerous conferences in which we'll be participating in this quarter.
For those of you who are unable to attend in person we will be able toyou will be able to follow our comments at Microsoft.com/investor.
Please contact us if you need additional details.
Thanks again for joining us today and have a good day.
END
Microsoft Third Quarter 2011 Prepared Remarks
This presentation contains statements that are forward-looking.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties which may cause actual results to differ materially because of factors in this presentation or discussed in todays press release, in the managements discussion and analysis section of the companys most recent Form 10-K, Forms 10-Q or in other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We undertake no duty to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a results of new information, future events, or otherwise.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
This quarter, we again delivered solid financial results reflecting strong business and consumer demand for our products and services.
Despite a mixed PC environment, the breadth and depth of our portfolio drove another quarter of double-digit revenue and earnings per share growth.
On the commercial side, we saw strong multi-year licensing commitments by enterprises, and robust transactional sales, particularly to small and medium businesses.
Let me give more color on these.
On the business desktop, customers continue to embrace our offerings.
Not only is Office 2010 the fastest selling version of Office in our companys history, but businesses are purchasing our entire productivity platform, including Sharepoint, Exchange, Dynamics, and Lync.
And with the recently released public beta of Office 365, the next generation of our cloud productivity service, we are enabling new scenarios that werent viable in the past, especially for small and mid-size businesses.
Office 365 eases deployment for our customers while lowering their upfront costs and provides significantly better returns on investment.
Enterprises are investing in our business infrastructure offerings with a growing preference for our premium products.
Windows Server, SQL Server, and our management tools are enabling our customers to transform their datacenters to be more efficient.
Companies are reaping the benefits that Windows 7 brings, including enhanced productivity, efficiency, security and manageability.
Enterprise deployments of Windows 7 have more than doubled over the past six months.
While business PC shipments showed strength this quarter consumer PCs declined.
Within both segments, emerging markets continue to be an area of strong growth.
As demonstrated by Bings continued market share gains since its launch, we have made great strides in relevancy and design, and continue to transform search beyond just queries to task completion and decision making. 
While we are pleased with the progress we have made with Bing, there is significant work ahead to improve the monetization of the combined Yahoo! and Bing marketplace. Advertisers are seeing strong ROI, but revenue per search is below our expectations. We have our best search technical leadership on this issue, and we are partnering closely with Yahoo! to improve monetization as quickly and efficiently as possible.
Turning to our Entertainment and Devices Division.
In November, we took the first step in creating a new mobile ecosystem by launching Windows Phone 7.
And this quarter, we took the next step by entering into a broad strategic alliance with Nokia.
Together, Nokia and Microsoft will innovate with greater speed, and provide enhanced opportunities for users and partners to share in the success of the new ecosystem.
Consumers are delighted with Kinect, as well as our entire Xbox 360 platform, for the revolutionary experience it brings to their living room.
Kinect continues to lead the way forward in gaming and is opening the door for new scenarios that take advantage of natural user interface.
So, in summary, the breadth and depth of our product portfolio, combined with prioritization of investments and our continued focus on operating expense management, allowed us to deliver another quarter of strong financial results.
With that, Im going to hand it back to Bill to provide more details on this quarters results, and then Ill come back and provide some thoughts on our outlook for our fourth quarter, and the next fiscal year.
BILL KOEFOED, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
Revenue for the quarter was $16.4 billion, 13% growth year over year, and earnings per share was $0.61, up 36%.
Adjusting for tech guarantee programs, this was our fourth consecutive quarter of double-digit revenue growth, and our sixth consecutive quarter of double-digit EPS growth.
Operating cash flow for the third quarter was a record $8.7 billion or growth of 17%.
Operating cash flow year to date has surpassed $21 billion, an increase of $2.6 billion.
Many of the demand trends in the third quarter were similar to the first half of the year.
Specifically, Office 2010, Xbox & Xbox Live, and Kinect continue to enjoy exceptional consumer momentum.
On the commercial side, enterprise demand for our products remains strong.
Businesses are deploying Microsoft platforms and applications including Windows, Windows Server, Office, Dynamics, and management tools.
The business demand is translating into healthy increases in transactional licensing and strong enterprise agreement renewals.
Our unearned revenue balance grew 6% to $13 billion, reflecting continued strength in our customers multiyear commitments.
Our contracted not billed balance is now over $17 billion, growing approximately 20%.
Bookings for the company were up 8%.
Now, let me turn to the PC market.
There are three trends we are observing:  First, business PC growth was 9% this quarter.
The business PC refresh cycle continues and is still in the early stages.
Second, emerging markets continue to play a larger role in total PC shipment volume and now represent nearly half of all worldwide PC shipments.
Finally, the consumer PC market declined 8% as there are several dynamics at work including a 40% decline in netbooks, broader consumer macroeconomics, increased competition for consumer spending, and the strength of Windows 7 consumer PCs in the prior year.
In total, we estimate the PC market declined 1 to 3% in the third quarter.
With that PC backdrop, Ill move on to the results for the Windows and Windows Live Division.
Last quarter, we noted there would be a $100 million headwind to Windows comparables for the third quarter due to the prior year Windows 7 launch.
Adjusting for this dynamic, Windows revenue was in-line with the PC market as we guided.
As usual, youll find an OEM revenue bridge in our earnings slide deck.
To summarize, the PC industry dynamics of continuing strength from emerging markets offset the benefits of a higher business mix and improved attach.
Since the launch of Window 7, customer satisfaction and market reception have been terrific, and we have more opportunities ahead.
While Windows 7 has now sold over 350 million units since launch, an estimated 75% of the PC installed base is still running older operating systems.
The number of PCs running Windows 7 in the enterprise has more than doubled over the past six months, and volume licensing has strengthened.
As I mentioned earlier, we expect the business PC refresh to continue.
Looking ahead, we are excited about the partner innovation underway in the PC market with Windows 7.
There is innovation occurring in new ultra-portables, all-in-ones, and other form factors, including slates and convertibles which are starting to hit the market now.
This quarter we also released Windows Intune, a cloud based subscription service that will help businesses manage and secure Windows PCs.
Windows Intune provides significant new opportunities for Microsoft and our partners to further expand our reach, grow our revenue and delight customers.
With Windows Intune, we have an opportunity to bring even more customers to the cloud.
During the quarter, we launched the latest version of Internet Explorer.
Internet Explorer 9 utilizes the power and performance of the whole PC to provide users with a faster, more immersive Web experience.
With new features such as hardware-accelerated graphics, support for HTML 5, and integrated Windows 7 navigation, websites act more like applications on IE9.
And just a few weeks after releasing IE9, we released the platform preview of IE10, which will deliver innovation for the next generation of web experiences powered by Windows.
Now, Ill move to the Microsoft Business Division which, excluding the prior year Office tech guarantee deferral, grew 13%.
We continue to see a terrific response to the release from both consumers and businesses.
Adjusted for the prior year deferral, consumer revenue grew 26% with increased Office attach to PCs.
The business transactional portion grew 28% also driven by improved attach rates post launch and higher business PC shipments.
The multi-year licensing portion of the business grew 5%.
Businesses are deploying Office 2010 along with Windows 7 on the corporate desktop.
The Office 2010 deployment rate is five times faster than the deployment of Office 2007.
Importantly, businesses are also attaching the Office server applications  SharePoint, Exchange, and Lync which all grew double-digits this quarter.
Lync grew 30% and we are seeing tremendous reception to the product.
As we have discussed previously, unified communications is a huge growth opportunity and Lync offers an immediate return on investment to CIOs.
Last Monday we released the public beta of Office 365, and we continue to see momentum in Business Online Services.
The number of customers using our services has quadrupled since last year.
Over 50% of our customers are small businesses, but were also seeing large enterprises, governmental and educational institutions moving to the cloud.
This quarter we announced large customer wins including Shell Oil, Tampa General Hospital, Advocate Healthcare, and Manpower, among others.
Our Dynamics business grew 10% with both Dynamics ERP and Dynamics CRM increasing account penetration.
In the third quarter, we launched Dynamics CRM 2011 and were seeing great traction with 40k businesses already in product trial, a significant pipeline to our current 27k customer base.
We also recently announced the next release of Dynamics ERP will be cloud enabled.
We are delivering world-class business applications on-premises and in the cloud that are simple, agile and deliver more value than competitive offerings.
Now lets move to Server and Tools which posted 11% revenue growth.
Server & Tools had strong performance across the entire product portfolio.
Transactional revenue grew faster than the underlying server hardware market, which we estimate grew mid-single digits.
Multi-year license revenue grew 11%, and enterprise services revenue grew 12%.
In the datacenter, we continue to increase the penetration and monetization of Windows Server and System Center.
We saw strong enterprise agreement renewals of Windows Server this quarter and premium revenue was up double-digits.
System Center, our management offering, grew double digits for the tenth consecutive quarter.
Hyper-V continues to win new business and establish new performance benchmarks on key workloads.
This quarter we showcased a large customer win with Target Corporation.
Target is running businesscritical workloads for all 1,700 retail stores using Microsoft virtualization and management technologies.
In the database, SQL server unit volumes and ASPs were up, with a shift toward our premium editions.
SQL premium revenue has now grown double digits for four consecutive quarters as customers adopt higher level capabilities such as business intelligence.
Our cloud computing platform, Windows Azure, continues to have strong momentum and developer interest.
This quarter we announced a strategic partnership with Toyota, who will be using Windows Azure, for its enterprise-grade, scalable platform, to provide advance telematics services.
Next Ill move to the Online Services Division, which grew 14%.
Online advertising revenue, including both search and display, grew 17%.
Bings US market share continued to grow, ending the quarter at 13.9%, up 190 basis points from the second quarter, and almost 600 basis points since launch.
We feel great about the pace of our innovation and customer satisfaction with our differentiated approach to search.
However, the expected monetization of the combined Yahoo! and Bing search marketplace in the US and Canada is taking longer than planned and revenue per search remains below our expectations.
We have delayed our international integration efforts to focus on improvements in the US and Canada.
Now let me move to the Entertainment & Devices Division where revenue grew an impressive 60%.
Xbox has been setting the pace in the gaming industry this fiscal year.
With Kinect recognized as the fastest selling consumer electronics product ever, we sold an additional 2.4 million sensors this post-holiday quarter.
We also shipped 2.7 million Xbox 360 consoles  a new third quarter record that surpasses the previous high by 1 million units.
Xbox Live also continues to increase its contribution to our customer experience and E&Ds financial performance.
We again saw healthy increases in transactional revenue, which continues to exceed subscription revenue.
Turning to Windows Phone.
Product reviews are good, customer satisfaction is high  well above 90%  and we have shown a clear strategy for enabling a vibrant ecosystem around Windows Phone.
This quarter, we took the next step and entered into a broad strategic alliance with Nokia.
While we have enjoyed strong developer support to date with more than 13,000 apps, weve noted even greater developer interest subsequent to the Nokia alliance announcement.
Now, let me cover the remainder of the income statement.
Cost of goods sold increased 41% this quarter due to three primary factors.
One, volume driven costs are up due to the success of Xbox 360 consoles and Kinect sensors.
Third-party content royalties are also up reflecting strong sales on Xbox Live.
Two, as I mentioned in the Server & Tools performance, our Enterprise Services business is growing rapidly.
Costs in this business are largely volume driven.
And three, Online Services costs are up from increased traffic acquisition costs and increased costs related to the Yahoo alliance.
Operating expenses were $6.8 billion, an increase of 4%.
Our effective tax rate for the quarter was below our guidance, due primarily to the $461 million one-time benefit related to an agreement with the U.S.
Internal Revenue Service to settle a portion of their audit of tax years 2004 to 2006.
In the third quarter we repurchased $827 million of stock and declared $1.3 billion of dividends.
Year to date weve returned $13.9 billion of cash to shareholders through buybacks and dividends, 33% more than the previous year.
In summary, it was a very solid quarter with strong financial results.
And with that, Ill hand it back to Peter, whos going to discuss our business outlook.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
For the remainder of the call, Ill discuss our expectations for the fourth quarter and some high level themes as we begin to think about fiscal 2012.
From a macro perspective, we expect the next quarter will be similar to the third quarter.
Within the PC market, we expect growth in emerging markets to outpace developed markets, and growth in business PCs to outpace consumer PCs.
As a result, we expect Windows Division revenue to grow roughly in line with the PC market for the fourth quarter.
Turning to the Microsoft Business Division, transactional revenue, approximately 40% of the divisions total, will continue to exceed PC shipment growth rates, but at a moderating rate as we approach the Office 2010 launch anniversary.
Revenue associated with multi-year licensing agreements, representing approximately 60% of the divisions total, should grow mid-to-high single digits.
Turning to Server and Tools.
Approximately 30% of the divisions revenue comes from transactional licensing, 50% from multi-year licensing, and 20% from enterprise services.
Within this division, we expect transactional revenue to generally track with the hardware market and multi-year licensing revenue and enterprise services revenue to both grow low double-digits.
Within OSD, we expect online advertising revenue to perform roughly in line with the overall online advertising market.
Moving on to the Entertainment and Devices Division.
Considering the enthusiastic response to the Xbox 360 platform, we now expect this divisions revenue to grow roughly 25% for the fourth quarter.
Switching to cost of goods sold.
As was the case this quarter, the biggest factor impacting COGS going forward will be the growth of Entertainment and Devices, enterprise services, and integration and traffic acquisition costs associated with our search business.
Turning to operating expenses, we are reconfirming our guidance of $26.9 to $27.3 billion for fiscal year 2011.
We expect our effective tax rate to be 22 to 23% for the fourth quarter and we continue to expect capital expenditures for the full fiscal year to be about $2.5 billion.
Unearned revenue will follow historical sequential growth patterns.
Now, I would like to spend a few minutes looking ahead to our next fiscal year.
From a macro perspective, we expect the business PC refresh cycle to continue through fiscal 2012.
The PC market dynamics I discussed for Q4 - emerging markets outpacing developed markets and business outpacing consumer - should also continue through the next fiscal year.
While we expect ongoing healthy demand for Office 2010, we expect more difficult year over year comparables for the Microsoft Business Division.
For Server and Tools, we expect to continue to outpace the server market due to our premium offerings and product portfolio.
Within our search business, we expect to see revenue per search improvements over the course of the calendar year.
Lastly, we expect momentum within our Entertainment and Devices Division to continue.
Moving onto cost of goods sold.
As was the case in fiscal 2011, the most important factor to consider will be the shift of revenue mix across hardware, software, enterprise services, and online services.
We expect fiscal year 2012 operating expenses to grow 3 - 5% from the midpoint of our fiscal 2011 guidance as we continue to prioritize our spending and manage our expenses.
Based on this growth range, we expect fiscal 2012 operating expenses to be $28.0 - $28.6 billion.
We expect capital expenditures to be about $2.5 billion for fiscal year 2012.
In summary, Im pleased with our healthy financial results for the quarter.
As we look forward into the next fiscal year, our robust product portfolio and ongoing focus on cost management, will enable us to continue to deliver shareholder value.
And with that, Ill turn the call over to Bill and well take some questions.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks Peter.
We want to get questions from as many of you as possible, so please stick to just one question and avoid long or multi-part questions.
Bobby, please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
Q&A
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  My question is on expenses.
In the quarter, the gross margin was a little bit lower than I had modeled.
I was wondering if you could go through the puts and takes of what hit gross margin this quarter? And then, looking into Fiscal '12 in general, would you expect revenue to outpace your operating expense growth?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  On gross margins, it's really the three things that Bill described.
Sort of the biggest thing is the fantastic growth in the Xbox business.
That was the single biggest driver of COGS growth in the quarter.
Secondly, enterprise services, which is volume driven, and they are having nice growth.
So, that shows up in COGS.
And then, finally, it's the online services, some costs associated with the Yahoo! Alliance.
As you know, some of that revenue that we get from that alliance from that Yahoo! property gets tacked out in COGS, and other traffic acquisition costs.
Those were the three big drivers of the COGS growth, all volume driven.
BILL KOEFOED:  With respect to the second part of your question, Adam, as you know, we don't give specific revenue guidance, and we give you operating expense guidance, and you can model it from there.
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citigroup:   Could you help us understand, just on the COGS, I guess, following onto Adam's question here, as we look into next year with some of the integration costs around Yahoo!, and I guess I'm also wondering around kind of mix within EDD, how much we should expect, would sort of what we've seen over the course of this year be indicative of where gross margins are in the future, or do we think we're on sort of a new kind of trajectory in those individual businesses?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, it depends what you model in for the volume.
So, these COGS are volume driven.
So, depending on how you think about each of those individual businesses really is the driver of COGS.
And we try to get that framework so it's easier to understand that.
And certainly on the online services business, our key focus, given that COGS are volume driven, the most important thing there is to get that revenue per search up, because that really has the biggest impact on the gross margins.
HEATHER BELLINI, ISI Group:  Peter, I was just wondering if you could talk a little bit about buybacks.
I know that Bill said, you know, the return of capital to shareholders was up a third versus last year, but just wondering if you could talk about the level of buyback, and kind of how we should think about our appetite for buybacks going forward.
PETER KLEIN:  I think we have a pretty consistent track record over the last several years in terms of distributing cash back to shareholders in terms of dividends and buybacks.
And so those numbers that Bill cited were sort of indicative of that.
We've had a pretty consistent track record on that.
And that's been our philosophy.
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Peter, can you just reconcile on the PC market, Intel and AMD are saying one thing, you're saying it's worse.
And I'm just trying to understand, you know, is this because of piracy, or lower ASPs, what's accounting for that, and what's your view in terms of the snapback for the PC market in the second half of the year?
PETER KLEIN:  There are some unique things going on with Intel's results that you can sort of reconcile back to what we're saying that make a lot of sense.
First, if you try to reconcile their revenue growth, certainly they have an ASP uplift, which is actually the single biggest part of driving the growth.
There are a few other things, in terms of an extra week in the quarter, they've also excluded netbooks from the PC NPU numbers, and I think there was some appropriate inventory buildup.
So, if you look at our numbers, it ties pretty closely from a unit perspective to what they're seeing, and obviously we're in line with the big third party analysts as well.
PHIL WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  I'm just looking for a little bit more color on the Microsoft Business Division side.
Obviously, we're coming on sort of the tail end of the uplift of Office 2010.
Obviously, you're talking about tougher comps, but what is sort of the right long-term growth rate for the business over the next couple years? And then, also, just in terms of G&A, we saw a big step up quarter-to-quarter this quarter.
Was there anything one time in there, like you guys had in the December and March quarters of Fiscal '10.
PETER KLEIN:  So, obviously we're not guiding the specific growth rates for MBD.
But I would highlight a few things.
Obviously, we're incredibly excited about the customer reactions to Office 2010, but even beyond that, you know, you heard us talk about how customers are adopting a whole sort of suite of products, not just the Office applications but SharePoint, and Exchange, Dynamics, and Lync, and that really provides long-term sustainable growth for the MBD business all up.
Even in a year that's sort of not a launch year.
So, that's I think a way to think about what's going on in MBD.
In addition to that, we've got Office 365 over the course of the next coming year.
We've had great growth.
We talked about quadrupled the number of sort of business online services customers we have.
With the introduction of Office 365, we sort of take that to the next level.
So, as you think about the next year or two for the MBD business, those are some of the factors that I think really drives their growth.
COLLIN GILLIS, BGC Financial:  Can you just talk to the new leadership in servers, what Satya brings to the group?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, Satya is just a wonderful business leader.
He comes from a background of both business applications and cloud services, so he's really the ideal guy to take that business to the next level.
I personally had an opportunity to work with Satya closely in the past.
And he's a great leader.
BRAD REBACK, Oppenheimer:  So, Peter, there's been a lot of confusion, or a lot of talk around the Nokia partnership, what the economics are.
Could you maybe help straighten out the record on that, and probably more importantly give us any sense that there's going to be an impact to 2012 COGS, as relates to this deal?
PETER KLEIN:  I will talk about the Nokia deal.
The great thing about the Nokia deal is this is an incredibly perfect opportunity for both of us to build really compelling, vibrant, third ecosystem, if you think about the complementary set of assets that we all bring to it.
And in terms of the hardware design, hardware manufacturing, the global relationships with operators, certainly with our platform that has great developer momentum, and the kinds of services of Xbox Live and Office.
Clearly, this is a broad, strategic alliance, a long-term strategic alliance, and we're going to be working closely together and we are each making investments together along those lines, and I think the important thing to think about is, as we sort of build that out, and its success, it's going to be a great thing for both companies and for customers, and for other partners in the ecosystem.
ROBERT BREZA, RBC Capital Markets:  Just quickly, can you talk about the delay that you're doing internationally and how long do you think that will take before you can get it up and running?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, we're going to work on the North America, the U.S.
and Canada, and when we feel like we've got that straightened out, we'll move onto the other international market.
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowen:  Thank you.
Peter, you're tracking to lose a few more cents in the online division in Fiscal '11 versus Fiscal '10, obviously RPS improvements going forward would help, but you'll also be rolling out the integrated platform to additional markets.
So, I'm wondering if you could perhaps offer anything else about the EPS prospects for OSD next year, relative to Fiscal '11?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, certainly we're not going to give specific outlooks, more than what we've given, but you've hit on the key issue, which is the revenue per search.
We've been clear on the opportunity and the strategy there is to continue to grow share and to increase our revenue per search, so obviously we're laser focused right now on getting that revenue per search up, and that has high leverage, and margins for the company going forward.
SANDEEP AGGARWAL, Caris & Company:  Peter, can you provide us any color in terms of how is your new architecture effort on the tablet side progressing, in terms of system on a chip?  
PETER KLEIN:  No, I've got nothing else to talk about that, other than what we've already said.
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  You discussed healthy activity in multi-year commitments, and could you address how you and your customers are mixing business online services and looking at Office 365, how ultimately that may affect your model, in terms of COGS?
PETER KLEIN:  No, it's a great question.
Actually, one of the interesting things about business online services, and the pending Office 365 is it's enabling really great conversions, and actually it's been a driver of the increase in multi-year licensing commitments, because people have a lot of questions about the cloud and the transition to the cloud, having a clear story, having a partner that can help them transition in the pace that they want to, has actually been the driver of the conversations we're having with enterprises.
In going forward, the economics of that are, it's an increased revenue and total profit opportunity for us, the subscription services do have higher COGS, and so a lower gross margin in terms of percentage.
But, over time that's a growth in absolute margin dollars for us.
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  When I look at this quarter we've already gotten past the four quarters of product cycle, helped revenue growth.
It looks like this quarter if I make adjustments for Office, you're still looking at high single digit, 8-10 percent type growth rate, against normal comparisons.
Any reasons to think that if IT spending and economy continue to stay the way they are, to think that this growth rate should, in fact, decelerate as you go into Fiscal '12, or if you can argue the other side, that it should stay, this growth rate is sustainable.
Both sides of the argument are appreciated, thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, without giving sort of specific guidance on growth rates, I will say we feel great about how enterprises are investing in IT, and in particular how they are very interested in our product suite.
I think we've got a very broad, compelling set of products for the enterprise.
And if you look at any number of CIO surveys, most of them say a high priority focus area for CIOs is our suite of products.
And so directionally I would say we feel great about sort of the IT market, and certainly our position in that, in our product set.
TIM KLASELL, Stifel Nicolaus:  Maybe you can just give us your thoughts about the timing of a launch of the next generation Xbox console, and if the decision hasn't been made you guys internally have a time point of when you think you have to make that decision.
PETER KLEIN:  No, we're really not talking about that.
Right now we're incredibly excited about what's going on with the Xbox 360 console, and certainly Kinect, which is relatively new in market.
So, we're very focused on that.
BILL KOEFOED: Okay.
So, that will wrap up the Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
A few weeks ago we announced our plans for Microsoft 2011 Financial Analyst Meeting, which will be on the afternoon of September 14th, 2011, in Anaheim, California.
FAM will be held in conjunction with our developer conference, which will kick off on September 13th at the Anaheim Convention Center.
This year's FAM will feature presentations by key executives about the company's strategic direction, and will supplement the developer conference presentations, which offer people the opportunity to learn directly about our product strategies, and roadmaps.
In the meantime we look forward to seeing many of you at the numerous conferences, which we'll be participating in this quarter.
For those of you unable to attend any of our events in person, you will always be able to follow our comments at Microsoft.com/investor.
Please contact us if you need any additional details.
Thank you, again, and have a great day.
Microsoft Fourth Quarter 2011 Prepared Remarks
This presentation contains statements that are forward-looking.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties which may cause actual results to differ materially because of factors in this presentation or discussed in todays press release, in the managements discussion and analysis section of the companys most recent Form 10-K, Form 10-Qs or in other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We undertake no duty to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a results of new information, future events, or otherwise.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Im pleased to share with you our financial results for the fourth quarter, which rounded out a solid fiscal year.
We closed the year with terrific sales execution as enterprises furthered their commitment to our Windows, Office, and server products.
Customers continue to invest in our business desktop offerings including Windows 7, where enterprise deployments have increased almost 50% since March.
Our overall multi-year licensing business was especially strong driven by attach of additional seats and additional products.
As a result, fourth quarter bookings were up 17%.
As I look back on fiscal year 11, we delivered strong financial results and products while making strategic investments and alliances that will allow us to capitalize on long-term growth opportunities.
We grew fiscal year 11 revenue double digits, and we delivered another year of operating margin expansion.
We also grew earnings per share by more than 20% for the second year in a row.
Our financial results reflect Office 2010s outstanding market reception.
Deployment remains five times faster than the previous version.
Customers are also adding our business productivity applications including Exchange, SharePoint, Lync, and Dynamics to their multi-year agreements.
These four products collectively drove approximately 30% of the Business Divisions growth this year.
We made great progress on our cloud initiatives this year.
We continue to lead the industry through this transformation by enabling our customers to transition to the cloud in a flexible, customized way.
Last month, we launched Office 365, the latest generation of our cloud productivity service.
With Office 365, weve created new profit growth opportunities for us and our partners, while enabling scenarios that werent viable in the past.
In the enterprise, Office 365 enables us to increase revenue and profit per seat, while strengthening customer commitment through increased product satisfaction and high return on investment.
It gives us new opportunities to address the workforce that doesnt regularly use a PC in the workplace.
For small and mid-size businesses, we now offer a productivity solution with simple deployment and low upfront costs.
And with 80% of small businesses having never purchased a business productivity application aside from Office, the opportunity for Microsoft and our partners is significant.
During the year, we made important platform enhancements to Windows Azure, driving increased developer interest and momentum, and enabling new scenarios.
Companies such as Pixar, Toyota, and Boeing have leveraged Azure to develop innovative solutions and enhanced experiences for their customers.
At the same time, building private cloud infrastructure remains a top priority for many of our customers, and Windows Server, System Center, and SQL Server are scaling with the increased workloads in datacenters.
In search, Bing continues to gain market share, and this quarter we further differentiated our platform by deepening our relationship with Facebook.
During the quarter, we partnered closely with Yahoo to uncover and address several platform gaps and inefficiencies.
We still face monetization challenges and will continue to work closely with Yahoo.
We remain confident in the long-term potential of the combined search marketplace.
During the year, we reinvigorated our Xbox franchise with a refreshed console and with Kinect which revolutionized home entertainment and natural user interface technology.
We also had great momentum with Xbox Live which now has approximately 35 million members.
Together, these products and services drove record fiscal year revenue and operating income in the Entertainment and Devices Division.
In May, we announced our agreement to acquire Skype which will extend Skypes world-class brand and global reach of its networked platform, while at the same time enhancing Microsofts existing portfolio of products and services.
With Skype, we will increase the accessibility of real-time video and voice communications to both consumers and enterprises, thereby generating new business and revenue opportunities for Microsoft.
In summary, we are pleased with the terrific market response to our products and our great sales execution, both of which helped drive our solid financial results for the quarter and full fiscal year.
We also continue to be excited by our strategic investments and alliances which will allow us to capitalize on long-term growth opportunities.
With that, Im going to hand it back to Bill to provide more details on our results, and then Ill come back to provide some thoughts on our outlook for the first quarter and full fiscal year 2012.
BILL KOEFOED, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
Thanks Peter.
First I am going to review our overall results and then move on to the details by business segment.
Revenue for the quarter was $17.4 billion, up 8% year over year, while bookings were up 17%.
For the year, revenue was $69.9 billion, growth of 12%.
Operating income was $6.2 billion for the quarter and for the year, a record $27.2 billion, up over $3 billion from prior year.
For the quarter, earnings per share was $0.69.
For the year, earnings per share was $2.69, up 28%, the second consecutive year of EPS growth over 20%.
This quarter, enterprise demand for our products remained strong and multi-year commitments drove our unearned revenue balance to $17.1 billion.
Our contracted not billed balance is now over $18.5 billion.
The PC market dynamics were similar to the third quarter.
First, the business PC refresh cycle continued and drove estimated business PC growth of 8%.
Second, PC sales to emerging markets continued to grow at a rapid pace as a record number of people around the world are using Windows PCs.
We estimate that this quarter, over 40 million PCs, representing half of all global PC shipments, were shipped to emerging markets.
We estimate the worldwide consumer PC market declined 2% primarily driven by weakness in developed markets.
In total, we estimate the PC market increased 1 to 3% in the fourth quarter.
Now, Ill move on to the results for the Windows and Windows Live Division, where revenue was down 1% reflecting the PC market dynamics I just described.
As usual, youll find the OEM revenue bridge in our earnings slide deck.
Last week at our Worldwide Partner Conference, we announced that we have sold over 400 million units of Windows 7.
Twenty-five percent of enterprise desktops have already deployed Windows 7, and as we have stated before, over 90% of enterprises have committed to a deployment plan.
During the quarter, we also provided an update of Windows 8.
We demonstrated how we have reimagined Windows for a new generation of touch-centric hardware.
Youll hear more at our BUILD developer conference this September.
Now, Ill move on to the Microsoft Business Division which grew 7%.
Consumer revenue declined 8%.
The weak consumer PC dynamics in developed markets were partially offset by strong attach rates.
The business transactional portion grew 27% driven primarily by business PC growth and continued launch cycle momentum.
The multi-year licensing portion of the business grew 6%.
We launched Office 2010 one year ago and for the year the Business Divisions revenue increased to over $22 billion, an increase of 16%.
Lync, SharePoint and Dynamics all continued to grow double digits this quarter.
Within our Dynamics business, which grew 19%, we saw strong growth and share gains across products.
We added 300,000 new seats on Dynamics CRM and now 2 million users leverage Dynamics CRM every day.
Now lets move on to the Server and Tools business which posted 12% revenue growth.
Transactional revenue grew faster than the underlying server hardware market, which we estimate grew mid-single digits.
Multi-year license revenue grew 12%, and enterprise services revenue grew 14%.
Our premium Windows Server and Systems Center revenues were both up over 20%.
Customers are using Microsoft technology to virtualize their datacenter and build out private cloud environments.
System Center revenue has also grown double-digits ten consecutive quarters.
We are seeing customers continue to adopt SQL Server as they deploy mission critical applications and implement cost effective business intelligence capabilities.
As a result, SQL Server premium revenue grew almost 20%.
Last week we previewed Windows Server 8 and the next version of System Center.
These products will further enhance customers private cloud deployments while bridging their investment to the public cloud.
Well also share more details on these at BUILD in September.
Our cloud computing platform, Windows Azure, continues to have strong customer momentum while revenue growth accelerates.
During the quarter, we showcased innovative Azure implementations with Boeing and General Mills, demonstrating the power and flexibility of the platform.
Next Ill move to the Online Services Division, where revenue grew 17%.
Online advertising revenue grew 20% driven primarily by search.
Bings US organic market share ended the quarter at 14.4%, up 340 basis points from last year.
During the quarter, we launched new features based on Facebooks social graph to help people make better, smarter decisions.
As Peter mentioned, we continue to experience challenges with RPS, and we are partnering closely with Yahoo to resolve these as quickly as possible.
Now let me move to the Entertainment & Devices Division where revenue grew 30%.
During the quarter, we sold over 1.7 million consoles, an increase of 18%.
Xbox 360 was the number one selling console in the US for the year.
At E3 in June, we announced the upcoming releases of Gears of War 3, Forza 4, Kinect StarWars, Kinect Disneyland Adventures, DanceCentral 2, Kinect Sports Season 2, and many more games.
Xbox Live also continues to grow rapidly, and consumer online engagement with the service remains a core part of our Xbox value proposition.
Xbox Live has entertainment content from partners such as ESPN, Hulu, Netflix and BSkyB, and this fall we will make it even easier to find and access content via integration between Kinect and Bing.
We believe the combination of these core features will help drive even broader engagement within the Xbox Live ecosystem.
In May we previewed Mango, which is our fall release of Windows Phone.
Mango, will deliver deeper social experiences, multitasking, Office 365 integration, and will feature Internet Explorer 9 to optimize the browsing experience.
During the quarter, we also signed the Nokia alliance, added several new OEM partners, launched on Verizon and Sprint, and saw the number of applications in the marketplace increase 60% sequentially.
Now, let me cover the remainder of the income statement.
In the quarter, cost of goods sold increased 17% and had similar drivers as last quarter.
Hardware costs are up due to the success of Xbox 360 consoles and Kinect sensors.
Third-party content royalties are also up reflecting strong sales on Xbox Live.
Enterprise Services in our Server and Tools business continues to grow rapidly.
And online services costs are also up reflecting increased traffic acquisition costs including costs related to the Yahoo alliance.
Operating expenses were $7.5 billion, an increase of 8%, primarily due to recently legislated Puerto Rican excise taxes and an increase in selling-related costs.
During the quarter we made the following adjustments to our full year tax rate, which impacted our effective tax rate for the fourth quarter:
First, we made adjustments to reflect our actual mix of foreign and U.S.
taxable income for the year.
And second, we completed our tax filings which resulted in adjustments reducing our tax provision.
To think about the full year tax rate, our effective rate was 19.2% after adjusting for the one-time benefit in the third quarter related to the IRS settlement.
Operating cash flow for the fourth quarter was $5.9 billion, growth of 6% while operating cash flow for the full year was a record $27 billion, an increase of 12%.
In the fourth quarter we repurchased $1.6 billion of stock and declared $1.3 billion of dividends.
For the full year, we returned $16.9 billion of cash, an increase of 10% year over year, continuing our long term commitment to return cash to shareholders.
In the past five years, we have returned over $90B and reduced our outstanding share count by 1.7 billion shares, or 17%.
In summary, we had a very solid quarter and year both from a product perspective, and also with regard to delivering strong financial results and returning cash to shareholders.
And with that, Ill hand it back to Peter, whos going to discuss our business outlook.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
For the remainder of the call, Ill discuss our expectations for the upcoming quarter and full year.
As we enter fiscal year 2012, we are excited by the advancing trends in technology and the resulting opportunities for us to evolve our businesses.
We expect increased diversity of hardware and services designed to satisfy users growing demands for a unified, consistent experience across multiple devices.
We also expect businesses and developers to continue their transition to the cloud given the compelling economics and flexibility.
We believe that with our current portfolio and investments, we are well positioned to capitalize on these trends.	
Now, turning to our outlook by business.
For the Windows and Windows Live Division, we expect revenue to continue to be impacted by market dynamics similar to what we experienced in the fourth quarter with emerging market growth significantly outpacing developed market growth.
While emerging markets are an important opportunity for us to increase Windows penetration, they impact revenue growth percentages as they generate lower average selling prices and have higher piracy rates.
We also expect business PC growth to outpace consumer PC growth, with the business PC refresh cycle continuing throughout the fiscal year.
Turning to the Microsoft Business Division.
Transactional revenue, approximately 40% of the divisions total, will likely lag the overall PC market for both the first quarter and full fiscal year reflecting a higher mix of PC shipments to emerging markets, and the launch of Office 2010 a year ago.
Multi-year licensing revenue, approximately 60% of the divisions total, should grow mid-to-high single digits for the first quarter and low double-digits for the full fiscal year.
Moving to Server and Tools.
Approximately 30% of the divisions revenue comes from transactional licensing, 50% from multi-year licensing, and 20% from enterprise services.
We expect transactional revenue to generally track with the hardware market for the first quarter and full fiscal year.
We expect multi-year licensing revenue and enterprise services revenue to grow low double-digits for the first quarter and full fiscal year.
Turning to the Online Services Division, we expect online advertising revenue to perform roughly in line with the overall online advertising market for the first quarter and full fiscal year.
Within the Entertainment and Devices Division, we expect revenue to grow high single digits for the first quarter and mid-teens for the full fiscal year.
Keep in mind that first quarter revenue will include a higher mix of hardware reflecting last Septembers Halo Reach launch and will result in gross margins similar to full fiscal year 11 margins.
Switching to overall cost of goods sold for the company.
The biggest factor impacting COGS going forward will be the shift of revenue mix across hardware, software, enterprise services, and online services.
In fiscal year 12, we will continue to prioritize our spending and manage our costs.
We are reconfirming our guidance of 3  5% growth, and expect operating expenses to be $28.0 to $28.6 billion for the full fiscal year.
We expect our effective tax rate to be 19 to 21% for the first quarter and full fiscal year, and we still expect capital expenditures for the full fiscal year to be about $2.5 billion.
Moving to unearned revenue.
Given our strong sales execution and our record unearned balance at the end of the fiscal year, unearned revenue in the first quarter will likely lag historical sequential growth patterns by a few points.
We expect unearned revenue at the end of fiscal year 12 to grow low double-digits over this fiscal year.
In summary, we delivered solid financial results for the fourth quarter and full fiscal year.
As we look towards fiscal year 12, we have good product momentum in the market, and are excited by the opportunity to help our customers take advantage of the advancing trends in technology.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks Peter.
We want to get to questions from as many of you as possible, so please stick to just one question, and avoid long or multipart questions.
Carol, can you please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
WALTER PRITCHARD, CITI:  Hi, thanks.
You mentioned in the slide deck there that 20 percent of the Fortune 500 have started to adopt the Office 365 Online Services, and I'm assuming it's pretty early there, but I'm wondering if you could help us understand how quickly you expect that to progress throughout Fiscal '12, and sort of what impact we should see on the financial statements as that starts to happen in Fiscal '12, or maybe beyond?
PETER KLEIN:  You see it hit the financial statements in two ways, actually, Walter.
One is, it will be in the actual Office 365 revenue, but also as we continue to have the conversations about the migration to the cloud, you see that show up in our multiyear licensing revenue.
And you saw some of that this quarter with our really strong multiyear licensing revenue across the board.
The market response so far has been great.
I'm really excited about it.
We expect that to accelerate over time.
But, again, I think you'll see it in both ways.
You'll see it in our multiyear licensing revenue, and in our Office 365 revenue.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay, operator, next question please.
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  Hi, thank you, and congrats on a good finish to the year.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Adam.
ADAM HOLT:  My question is about the E&D commentary for next year, which was I think a surprise relative to certainly the consensus expectations in that it's a lot higher than where consensus was for next year.
Can you talk a little bit about some of the detail behind the assumptions there?  Specifically, what are you expecting, or what is embedded around the Nokia relationship, and what are you expecting and what is in the numbers around any kind of gains following Mango?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, the single biggest driver in the E&D Division is going to be Xbox, right.
So, we've got great momentum in the marketplace with the console, which we refreshed a year ago.
We have Kinect, which just came to market last holiday with a bunch of new content titles that Bill talked about in terms of games, as well as broader entertainment content.
So, as we look to continue the momentum that we have with our share position in the marketplace, you see the strategy really coming together in that business, selling the install base of the consoles, and then having the social connectivity with Xbox Live in the broader entertainment portfolio.
And so a lot of that strength relates to the Xbox business.
BILL KOEFOED:  I think it's fair to say that our division thinks that we've just scratched the surface of the possibilities with both the Xbox console and Kinect.
And, obviously, as I talked about with the games that we have coming out at Christmas, people are super excited about the possibilities there.
Next question, please
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Hi.
Thank you, Bill and Peter.
I just had a quick question.
There has been a lot of talk about patent and money that you guys could be receiving for patent violations.
How do we think about modeling those, if there's any tips you could give us, and how do we think about those, where they would show up, and kind of what segment they get embedded in?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Heather.
I think the most important thing to think about stepping back is sort of our overall approach.
We have a firm culture and belief in innovation, and intellectual property, and protecting our rights in intellectual property.
And we've done that consistently with an industry-wide licensing program related to Android, specifically, broadly, too, but Android, which infringes on some of our patents.
I think we haven't talked a lot about what to expect from a modeling perspective on there, so you should just look to what we do on our licensing program going forward.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi, guys.
Great quarter.
Just going back to deferred revenue, obviously that was well ahead of consensus, and I think it's the strongest year-over-year growth you've had in MBD since '06, and Server and Tools since '08.
What really changed this quarter, the second half of the fiscal year that drove that up so much from what we've been seeing over the past couple of years?  And just anything specific to those two divisions as well?  Thanks?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
Thanks.
No, there are several things.
One, the business refresh has continued as companies have come out of the economic downturn of a few years ago.
They really are investing in technology.
They're seeing the opportunities for technology to really enhance their value proposition.
And, they are seeing the benefit of our technology.
They're really making a long-term commitment to our product set.
MBD is really about the intentional strategy we had really over the last three to five years to sort of broaden the view of what productivity means, and how we integrate not only the great new Office applications, but also with e-mail with Exchange, collaboration with SharePoint, and more recently communications with Lync, and customers are really seeing the benefit of that.
We're really just starting to scratch at the surface on that.
As I said on the call, you know, a lot of our revenue was driven by growth in those businesses.
If you add to that what we're doing with Dynamics, taking share in both ERP and CRM, it really is driving a lot of growth.
And that really is sustainable.
At the same time, in Server and Tools, we've really scaled our products across the board, whether that's with the premium versions of Windows Server and System Center, and also SQL Server.
And so as we've done that, and customers are investing in their data centers, and the private cloud implementations on the way to the public cloud, we're really taking advantage of that, and getting good double-digit growth there.
So, the combination of really strong environment for businesses investing in the value of IT, and our product set sort of across the board from infrastructure to applications has been great.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Phil.
Next question please, Operator.
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Thanks.
Peter, just on enterprise demand, is there any change in terms of what you're seeing in the U.S.
versus European demand profile?
PETER KLEIN:  You know, this quarter we actually saw broad-based demand across all the geographies.
Obviously emerging markets remain very strong, but this quarter we saw demand and great sales execution really across Europe and the U.S.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Brent.
Next question, please.
JOHN DIFUCCI, JP Morgan:  Thank you.
Bill, when you said that 25 percent of enterprise desktops are already deployed with Windows 7, and 90 percent of enterprises have committed to a deployment plan, I'm just curious, is it fair to say that about that 25 percent, should we be thinking of those as largely on the lower end in the SMB that sort of act more like consumers?  And does the committed, your word there, committed, does that mean that they've already contracted for, or they've started to contract at a lower level, and you expect that to continue going forward?
PETER KLEIN:  That's a great question.
On the enterprise side, clearly companies like JP Morgan have started looking at Windows 7, are working on the deployment plan.
When we think about the term "committed" it means that either a Microsoft sales rep or a partner actually have plans in place where they're looking at a rollout schedule.
So, it's a very deliberate plan.
They're engaged in testing.
In many cases, I think we talked about that last quarter, but not so much this quarter.
They're also rolling out Office 2010 at the same time that they're rolling out the Windows 7 desktop.
So, we're excited, obviously, about the speed of the deployment process that's been underway, but we also think there's a lot of opportunity for the future.
And I think to your point, probably, enterprises are a little bit further along just due to the macro- economic environment.
We've seen more deliberate execution there than maybe in some of the other areas.
That's a great question.
BILL KOEFOED:  Next question please, operator.
ROBERT BREZA, RBC Capital Markets:  Hi, Peter.
I was wondering if you would talk to, I think, your comment.
You said that you believed unearned revenue could grow low double digits.
I'm assuming most of that is going to be coming on the enterprise side.
And you specifically called out in your commentary some of the drivers to the growth.
Could you maybe just help us clarify that in terms of the unearned revenue?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, you are correct.
Most of that growth will come from the enterprise, and it goes back to the strength we're seeing in selling multiyear licensing agreements, and the demand we're seeing for the product set across portfolio of the Business Division, and the Server and Tools Business.
So the dynamics that we saw this past quarter we see playing out again next year, and that will drive the unearned growth with a full year.
I would add, and I talked about this a little earlier, but I will go back to it again, the conversations increasingly that we're having with the cloud, whether that's Office 365, or Windows Azure, or Windows Intune, or Dynamics CRM Online, really play into that as well, because we find increasingly customers wanting to make long-term commitments when they see that migration pass to the cloud as well.
And that you'll see coming into, I think, even more play this year.
BILL KOEFOED:  I think communicating our roadmap to our customers has been a big advantage and they like our roadmap, they're committed to our roadmap, and that's been a really good thing.
Operator, next question please.
BRAD REBACK, Oppenheimer:  Great, guys.
Thanks a lot.
Peter, on the revenue per search aspect with Yahoo!, can you give us any sense how far along the road you are there?  Do you think you're 50 percent of the way to getting a problem solved?
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Brad.
It's a good question.
What we think and what we say and what we believe is, we're on a path, and we're totally aligned with Yahoo! on this.
The collaboration has been fantastic, and the right people are focused on it.
We'll have this turned around by the end of this calendar year, and move forward from there.
And we're still on a path to do that, and I think both sides are signed up for that plan.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
COLIN GILLIS, BGC:  Hey, Peter.
On that same theme in Online Services, can you give us a sense of what percent of the expense is ongoing cost, and what percent might be transition costs that could possibly roll off?
PETER KLEIN:  The bulk of it is ongoing costs.
There is a little bit of transition costs, but you should think of the bulk of it as ongoing costs.
And really the dynamics of that business, as you know, it's a high fixed cost business, it's a scale business.
And as we grow our revenue for search, that's a highly leveraged revenue dollar that we get that goes against that fixed cost base.
COLIN GILLIS:  So, clearly improving our RPS is our goal that we're laser focused on as we've talked about.
PETER KLEIN:  Completely.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator next question.
BRENDAN BARNICLE, Pacific Crest Securities:  Thanks so much.
Peter, how should we think about repatriation of cash as you guys generate so much in some of these foreign jurisdictions?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, you know the broader issue of just income tax policy we'll leave to the experts.
Obviously, we're supportive of long-term enhancements to our income tax policy.
In terms of repatriation specifically, I don't think it's a big issue one way or the other for either our operations or our strategies, or what we're able to do.
We've obviously had a very good year, both in terms of our financial results, and our ability to deliver cash back to shareholders.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Yes, good afternoon.
Could you discuss the monetization trends you may be seeing from Xbox Live?  It seems like you've got some decent subscriber growth.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, it's really been fantastic.
As we've growth the subscriber base there's actually a couple of revenue streams.
There's a subscription revenue stream, and then there's the transactional revenue stream for people who actively engage with the service and that can buy purchases while they're engaged in that.
And that really helps to accelerate the monetization of that business, and that's a really amazing long-term opportunity for us, particularly as we continue to take share of just the whole console platform.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Ed.
And we'll do a call out for Ed, who is calling us from Tokyo, where it must be four in the morning right now.
So, thanks for calling in, Ed.
Operator, next question.
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowen and Company:  Thank you, and a very nice quarter.
Peter, I just had a question on guidance.
In the past you've talked about Windows revenue growth roughly tracking PC unit growth.
We all know about the mix shift to emerging markets, but is there anything you can say to help frame how we should think about the gap between Windows revenue growth and overall PC growth in Fiscal '12?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, you know, I think I would stick with the framework that we gave and there's hopefully a lot of texture to that and depending on what assumption one makes about the growth in emerging markets versus developed markets and businesses versus consumers really impacts what that growth will be.
Obviously the faster growth there is in emerging markets relative to developed is more headwind for the Windows growth, relative to the overall PC market.
But, I think understanding what your belief is about those dynamics should help a lot with that.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay.
Operator, let's take one more question please.
TIM KLASSEL, Stifel Nicholas:  Yes.
Good afternoon and congrats on the quarter, as well.
Office 365 has now been out in the market for a little while, but you have multiple bundles at very wide price points.
Can you sort of point to a bundle or the bundles that appear to be the most popular right now?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, it's been out for about a month.
So, it's really too early to tell.
But, I would say that the philosophy behind the pricing is to provide the right set of choices for every customer and every segment, depending on what their needs are.
So, ultimately I think we'll see a broad cross section of customers choosing different pricing plans, whether you're a small and medium business who has never had Exchange, or SharePoint, or Lync before, there's a really affordable option for you to jump in.
For enterprises who need much more scalability, who need premium versions, they can pay a little bit more.
So, as always, we really believe in understanding what the different needs are, different customer segments, structuring our SKUs and our pricing to reflect the best options for every customer segment, depending on their needs.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Tim.
So, that will wrap up the Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
Just a reminder that Microsoft's 2011 financial analyst meeting will be on the afternoon of September 14th in Anaheim.
FAM will be held in conjunction with BUILD, our developer conference, which will kick off the morning of September 13th at the Anaheim Convention Center.
We encourage investors to attend BUILD, or watch the keynotes via Web cast, as it will offer people the opportunity to learn directly about our product strategies, and roadmaps.
Please contact us if you have not received an invitation, as pre-registration will be required.
Thanks again for joining us, and have a great day.
Thank you.
Microsoft First Quarter 2012 Prepared Remarks
This presentation contains statements that are forward-looking.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factors section of  our Form 10-K, Form 10-Qs, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Today, Im pleased to share with you our first quarter financial results.
Weve started fiscal year 2012 with good momentum.
We have great products in market, customer satisfaction is high, and we have important strategic investments and alliances that position us well for long-term growth.
This quarter, we saw revenue growth across all of our segments.
Similar to prior periods, we continued to see broad-based demand across geographies, including Europe.
Within our segments, the Microsoft Business Division continued its momentum with revenue of $5.6 billion, growth of 8%.
Despite the best efforts of competitors, Office remains the overwhelming choice for productivity, evolving with our customers and posting impressive revenues.
We are extremely pleased by the market reception to Office 2010 this far into the launch cycle.
Were 15 months post-launch, but we still saw an increase in the consumer PC attach rate for Office this quarter.
And, for businesses, Office 2010 remains a top priority.
Just as important, businesses are also adopting our productivity server applications including Lync, SharePoint, and Exchange, either on-premise, or in the cloud with Office 365.
The early success of Office 365 has surpassed our expectations.
Businesses around the world, and of all sizes, are making the commitment to Microsofts cloud services.
Our business infrastructure offerings, including Windows Server, Hyper-V, and System Center, are a top priority for enterprises.
The flexibility, performance, scalability, and price advantage of our private cloud products uniquely meet the needs of the market.
And with Windows Azure, we enable our customers to build new applications and extend their existing private cloud assets to the public cloud.
As we discussed at our financial analyst meeting, we are increasingly delivering integrated experiences across multiple devices - from the phone, to the Xbox and TV, and to the PC.
Earlier this month, we launched an updated version of our Windows Phone operating system with a broad array of new features and services, including enhanced integration with Bing, Xbox LIVE, and Office 365.
With Nokia, Samsung and other devices coming to market, we are well-positioned to become the third mobile ecosystem.
In the living room, we continue to differentiate the entertainment experience for Xbox users around the world, and we recently announced partnerships with nearly 40 leading TV and entertainment providers.
Powered by Kinect and voice search through Bing, users will be able to easily search and enjoy content from a large collection of content providers through their Xbox 360 consoles.
And on the PC, Windows 7 is the operating system of choice for almost half a billion people around the world.
Combined with the innovative hardware being brought to market by our OEM partners this holiday season, Windows will continue to deliver the great experiences that people want.
During the quarter, we unveiled the developer preview of the next version of our PC operating system.
Windows 8 creates a modern platform designed for a new generation of hardware experiences enabled by touch and a diversity of chip architectures.
In search, monetization of our ad platform remains below our expectations and we continue to partner closely with Yahoo! to address the platform gaps and inefficiencies.
We recently agreed to extend the RPS guarantee payments to Yahoo! reflecting the strength of our partnership, and our continued commitment and optimism about the financial opportunity ahead of us.
Last week, we reached a significant milestone with the closing of our acquisition of Skype.
We welcome Skype employees into the Microsoft family.
And, we welcome the over 170 million people who rely on Skype for their voice and video calls on a monthly basis.
Now that the deal is closed, we are starting the integration of Skypes world-class services and global-networked platform across our portfolio of products and services including Lync, Windows Live Messenger, Windows Phone, and the Xbox platform.
Together, we will redefine social and real-time communications for consumers and businesses around the world.
In summary, we are off to a good start to the year.
Customer demand across the breadth of our product portfolio is healthy and we remain focused on our strategic investments and partnerships that will help drive future growth.
With that, Im going to hand it back to Bill to provide more details on our results.
BILL KOEFOED, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
Thanks Peter.
First I am going to review our overall results and then move on to the details by business segment.
Revenue for the quarter was $17.4 billion up $1.2 billion, or 7% year over year.
Operating income was $7.2 billion, cash flow from operations was $8.5 billion and earnings per share was $0.68, an increase of 10%.
Foreign exchange did not materially impact our net income during the quarter.
Coming off a record Q4, enterprise demand for our products remained strong and our customers continued to add both products and seats to their enterprise agreements.
At the end of the quarter, unearned revenue was $15.7 billion, and our contracted not billed remained over $18.5 billion.
Turning to the PC market, we estimate that the overall market grew 1-3%.
Within that: 
PC sales to emerging markets continued to outpace developed markets.
Business PCs grew 5% to a quarterly record of almost 35 million PCs.
And consumer PCs were flat, primarily impacted by weakness in netbook sales.
Now, Ill move on to the results for the Windows and Windows Live Division, where revenue was up 2% and grew in line with the PC market.
As usual, youll find the OEM revenue bridge in our earnings slide deck.
Overall, the Windows business continued to show momentum.
During the quarter, we surpassed 450 million copies of Windows 7 sold since launch and enterprise deployments of Windows 7 progressed.
This quarter OEM licenses grew 4% and within that, business licenses grew 6%.
While we have seen the cannibalization of netbooks, sales of Windows licenses on traditional consumer PCs showed healthy growth of 14%.
And as we look towards the holiday season, we are particularly excited about the lineup of impressive ultrabooks that will be in market from our OEM partners.
Now, Ill move on to the Microsoft Business Division where revenue grew 8%.
Consumer revenue increased 7% despite difficult comps from the year ago launch of Office 2010.
The business transactional portion grew 3%, driven by strong attach in developed markets partially offset by the impact of PC geographical market mix.
The multi-year licensing portion of the business grew 9%.
Collaboration and communication continued to be a pillar of strength to our Office business.
Lync, SharePoint and Exchange collectively grew double digits.
Lync revenue grew over 25% as customers increasingly chose Microsoft for their voice and video rollouts.
We are focused on the opportunities in this large and growing market.
With Skypes highly engaged users spending an average of 125 minutes per month, were particularly excited about the role Skype can play in connecting individuals and businesses together with voice and video.
Last quarter we announced the launch of Office 365, the latest version of our cloud-based productivity platform.
We are thrilled with the early results.
In the first ten weeks of Office 365 availability, the number of new customers exceeded what took us over 2 years to build with the first version of our business productivity online service.
Also, weve seen Office 365 customers buy more products and drive new revenue streams.
For example, when weve won a competitive bid in the enterprise for messaging and email, 80% of the new customers have bought SharePoint and Lync, in addition to Exchange.
And historically small businesses have only bought Office; but today with Office 365, 80% of the time weve seen them buy the bundle of SharePoint, Lync and Exchange.
Now lets move on to Server and Tools which posted 10% revenue growth and grew faster than the server market.
Our multi-year license revenue continued to perform well and grew double digits this quarter.
Enterprise services revenue was up 17%.
Windows Server premium and System Center revenues grew mid-teens as the build out of private cloud environments and the virtualization of data centers has increased server density and has shifted buying behaviors towards our premium Enterprise offerings.
Our data platform business also continued to perform well.
SQL Server Premium revenue grew nearly 20% this quarter as customers increasingly looked to SQL Server to power their business intelligence and mission critical workloads.
We continue to build on our strong Server & Tools portfolio. At our BUILD developer conference in September we took the wraps off Windows Server 8, the next major release of the worlds most-used Server operating system, which will be cloud-optimized to work in both private and hybrid cloud scenarios. In addition we highlighted our data platform with the upcoming release of SQL Server 2012. We also announced our plans to support Apache Hadoop both on Windows Azure and Windows Server to embrace big data.
Next Ill move to the Online Services Division, where revenue grew 19%.
Online advertising revenue was up nearly 21% driven primarily by search.
Bings US organic market share ended the quarter at 14.7%, up 30 basis points this quarter and 350 basis points year over year.
This quarter, we made progress in differentiating our offering by deepening Bings social integration with Facebook and Twitter, and made enhancements that simplify decision-making and task-completion. 
While Online Services improved its year over year operating performance, we continued to face monetization challenges, which we are partnering closely with Yahoo! to resolve.
Now let me move to the Entertainment & Devices Division where revenue grew 9% and we continued our leadership of the US console market.
Gears of War 3, which is only available on Xbox, effectively kicked off the holiday season and sold 3 million units in its first week of release.
Gaming is an important component of living room entertainment and in addition to our blockbusters such as Forza 4, Dance Central 2, Halo Anniversary and Kinect Sports Season 2, there will be over 70 Kinect titles available for the holidays.
Beyond gaming, next quarter is also when nearly 35 million Xbox LIVE users will begin to enjoy the new television content and experiences from our announced partnerships.
During the quarter, we released the updated version of Windows Phone to market and it has received favorable reviews from both industry press and our customers.
We also signed a broad agreement with Samsung that includes increased collaboration on the development and marketing of Windows Phones.
Now, let me cover the remainder of the income statement.
Cost of goods sold was driven by the following:
First, we saw an increase in royalty costs resulting from strong transactional sales on Xbox LIVE and the increased sales of royalty bearing Xbox 360 games, notably Gears of War 3.
Second, Enterprise Services continued to grow rapidly
And Third, online service costs increased, which included Yahoo! traffic acquisition costs.
Operating expenses were $6.4 billion, an increase of 8%, primarily due to compensation changes, legal expenses, and Puerto Rican excise taxes.
In the first quarter we increased our dividend to $0.20, an increase of 25%, and we returned $2.7 billion to shareholders in buybacks and dividends.
So in summary, we saw broad based strength in our businesses and got off to a good start to the year both in revenue and EPS.
With that I will hand it back to Peter, whos going to discuss our business outlook.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Thanks, Bill. For the remainder of the call, Ill discuss our expectations for the second quarter and full year.
Beginning with the Windows and Windows Live Division, we expect revenue to continue to be impacted by market dynamics similar to what we experienced the past several quarters with PC growth in emerging markets significantly outpacing growth in developed markets. 
Turning to the Microsoft Business Division. 
Transactional revenue, approximately 40% of the divisions total, will likely lag the overall PC market for both the second quarter and full fiscal year reflecting a higher mix of PC shipments to emerging markets, and the prior year launch impact.
In addition, when updating your models, remember that last year we recognized $224 million of revenue related to the Office 2010 tech guarantee.
Multi-year licensing revenue, approximately 60% of the divisions total, should grow mid-to-high single digits for the second quarter and low double-digits for the full fiscal year. 
Moving to Server and Tools. Approximately 30% of the divisions revenue comes from transactional licensing, 50% from multi-year licensing, and 20% from enterprise services.
For the second quarter and full fiscal year:
We expect transactional revenue to generally track with the hardware market;
Multi-year licensing revenue should grow low double-digits; and
Enterprise Services revenue should grow about 20%.
Turning to the Online Services Division.
We are focused on improving the financial performance of our search business.
Our number one priority is to resolve the monetization challenges of the combined ad platform.
We are working very closely with Yahoo! on bridging the RPS gap.
As we improve RPS, revenue should track the online advertising market more closely.
Moving on to the Entertainment and Devices Division.
Including Skype, we now expect revenue to grow low double-digits for the second quarter and high teens for the full fiscal year. 
Switching to overall cost of goods sold for the company. We expect COGS growth to have similar dynamics to what we experienced the past three quarters.
Growth will be driven by increased Xbox console sales, Xbox LIVE royalty costs, the inclusion of Skype, Enterprise Services, and online costs, including Yahoo! traffic acquisition costs.
We have adjusted our fiscal year operating expense guidance to include Skype and the associated integration costs.
As a result, we now expect operating expenses to be $28.6 to $29.2 billion for the full fiscal year.
We expect our effective tax rate to be 19 to 21% for the second quarter and full fiscal year, and we still expect capital expenditures to be about $2.5 billion for the full fiscal year. 
For the second quarter, we expect unearned revenue to roughly follow historical seasonal patterns.
We continue to expect unearned revenue at the end of the fiscal year to grow low double-digits compared to the prior fiscal year.
As I discussed at our financial analyst meeting last month, we have a balanced approach to capital allocation: investing in growth, returning cash to shareholders, and maintaining a strong balance sheet. 
We are investing in the significant growth opportunities we see for our businesses by building integrated products that deliver a differentiated value proposition, and accelerating our growth in compelling scenarios like real-time communications with the acquisition of Skype. 
We will also continue to return cash to shareholders. This quarter, we increased our dividend 25%. And we are continuing our $40 billion share repurchase program approved by the board of directors in 2008, of which $11.2 billion remain.
In summary, our financial results this quarter build upon an already strong financial foundation, one that provides stability while at the same time giving us the flexibility to take advantage of growth opportunities. 
And with that, I'll turn it back to Bill, and I'll take some questions.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Peter.
We want to get to questions from as many of you as possible, so please stick to just one question, and avoid long or multi-part questions.
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  Thanks very much.
My question is about Skype.
Is 100 percent of the Skype revenue going to be in the E&D segment?  And, if it is, it looks like the revenue and earnings contribution, or OPEX contribution is a little bit lower than I would have expected.
Are there any write-downs, or any shifts, or any kind of transitional issues that we should be thinking about in terms of the run rate for Skype relative to what it was historically?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, there are going to be integration associated costs, some amortization of IP, things like that, that you may or may not be considering.
But, yes, it will all appear in E&D.
RICK SHERLUND, Nomura:  Thanks.
I'm used to a little more controversy.
It seems pretty clean.
On Skype, Peter, could you just talk a little bit about the model for Skype?  What are you going to do different to get the revenues up?  How do you monetize Skype?  And then, also, just on ultra-books.
The issue in Thailand with the floods that Western Digital says is going to take out a lot of production, are you anticipating any problem with PCs, and maybe that shifts the market over to solid state, and these ultra-books look kind of interesting.
Any reason to believe that we could see some actual acceleration in the market from adoption of ultra-books, or are you thinking we might see some slow down because of what we've seen in Thailand?
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Rick.
I'll start with the Skype question, and then we'll get to the other questions.
Obviously, the first thing I'll say is, we closed the deal last week.
So, we're real-time doing a lot of the great work on the product integration planning.
We've got folks here, you know, sort of in the building as we speak really working hard on what the plans are going to be.
And so, I think, over time, it will become more clear.
I think as we've been talking about since we announced the acquisition, and the opportunities are incredibly exciting across the portfolio of our products, whether it's Lync, or Windows Live Messenger, or Xbox, or on the phone, and so I think not only are there great opportunities to integrate across our product portfolio, but as they were working on even before we announced the acquisition new revenue opportunities related to advertising and premium services.
So, all of that is coming together as we speak.
And, mostly we're incredibly excited to get to work together more fully now that the deal has closed.
In terms of your question about Thailand, the first thing I want to say, obviously, is our thoughts go out to all the individuals that are affected there, and we're thinking about them.
In terms of the impact of that, you're correct, it doesn't impact solid state, which is good.
And I would say this, about overall the impact, I think historically the global supply chain has been pretty resilient to occurrences like this.
And so, over time, we'll have to watch this very carefully to see kind of what the overall impact is.
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Hi.
Good afternoon, guys.
Peter, I was just wondering, the Windows attach in inventory boost was a nice tick up this quarter, and I'm just wondering if you could kind of give us a sense of how you're doing from a piracy standpoint in terms of that's what helped in the quarter or did you actually see more inventory billed?
PETER KLEIN:  It was some of both.
So, it was some inventory and some attach.
We're definitely seeing improvements in attach sort of across the board, so definitely making some improvements on piracy.
And then some of that improvement was a little bit of inventory billed as we head into the holiday.
But, to your point, we are definitely seeing improvements in attach this quarter, which was a big driver.
HEATHER BELLINI:  Great.
Thank you.
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi:  Hi, thanks.
Bill, I'm wondering, as you look at the OSD losses here, you actually lost less money than we thought on the revenue number that was lower.
Just first wondering if you could comment going forward if we should expect that this level of loss is what we should sustain?  And then, as you look at the model overall, you know, we saw lower losses, but that didn't flow through as much of the bottom line as we might have expected.
How are you thinking about any upside that comes through the lower losses in OSD, and impacting the bottom line of the company overall?
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Walter.
As we've been saying, the key to the profitability of this business is to continue to grow our revenue.
And to do that, we have to continue to grow share, and grow our revenue per search.
That's certainly what we're focused on.
Obviously, it's a high fixed cost business.
Within that, we have been managing the expenses.
And so we are taking every opportunity to manage the profitability of that business.
But, by far, the most important thing to continue to increase the profitability is to make sure we continue to grow the revenue, and to do that we need to make sure that we get the revenue per search up.
So, that's what we're laser focused on.
And that's what we've got people working closely with Yahoo! on every day, and we'll continue to focus on that, and that's the most leveraged thing we can do for OSD profitability, and ultimately the company's bottom line.
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  Hi.
I just wanted to drill into the Skype contribution a little bit more.
I'm just wondering if there are some products you're going to be discontinuing, certain services, certain new things conversely that you're going to be adding?  And also this one-time transition type expenses, Peter, if you can quantify how much of that will impact the P&L that you've already guided to in the quarter, just to get an understanding of how much will go away as you settle into a steady state on the Skype business?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Kash.
Clearly, it's a little premature to talk about sort of changes, and what we're going to do with the products.
As I said, mostly what we've seen this week is an incredible excitement with their engineering people, and our engineering people getting together to talk about all the opportunities.
As we flesh those plans out, obviously, we'll have a lot more to say about that.
In terms of the expense side, what I would say is, everything that's included there is included in our guidance framework that we gave you, so that's probably the best guidance I can give you on those expenses.
PHILIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi, thanks.
Another good quarter, guys.
I just want to focus back on MBD.
You guys have been trending at or above, frankly, PC shipments for several quarters now.
Where do you think we stand in just sort of the adoption cycle, particularly in the large enterprise of Office 2010, and especially when we think about rolling sort of the ecosystem out, where are we in that?
And also, Bill, just one quick follow-up, I think you gave the transactional revenue growth for MBD, but I'm not sure if you gave that for Server and Tools.
Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, on the last question, the transactional revenue for Server and Tools should track the hardware market.
PHILIP WINSLOW:  All right.
Sorry, I meant this quarter.
PETER KLEIN:  Oh, this quarter, sorry.
I'll answer the question, on MBD, you know, it's really interesting, there's a couple of things going on, particularly in the enterprise, that really provides sustenance for the ongoing business, one is the great sort of traction we get from the integration of SharePoint and Exchange and Lync with Office 2010.
So, not only is there really good resonance for the Office application, but increasingly, as Bill talked about, customers are deploying communications and collaboration technology with that.
There are a lot of legs to go on the productivity server applications piece of the business.
The second thing I would add is the cloud.
Increasingly every time we go in and talk to enterprises about productivity, they want to have a conversation about public cloud services, not necessarily because they want to deploy public cloud tomorrow, but they really want to understand the roadmap, and understand where that's leading.
And we found that crates an incredibly good conversation that then leads to a broader conversation of a long-term commitment to our platform and applications.
And I think obviously that's a long-term phenomenon with a lot of room still to go.
So, the way I think about it, yes, for the Office application, particularly on the transactional side coming off a launch year, there is some difficult comparables.
But on the enterprise side with the additional products, and the cloud, that's really been a driver of our growth.
And it's really a long-term catalyst.
BILL KOEFOED:  And, Phil, transactional for STB was low single digits, which we believe was roughly in line with the server hardware market, as Peter mentioned.
BRENDAN BARNICLE, Pacific Crest Securities:  Thanks, guys.
I had two quick ones on the guidance.
Peter, first, on the Windows and Windows Live, in the previous quarters you've talked about business PCs no longer outpacing consumer.
That language isn't in, is that no longer as big a factor?
And then, second, on the server and Tools, you've pretty substantially increased your guidance around the enterprise services revenue.
I'm wondering what's accounting for that up-tick, and we saw good strength in that in the quarter as well?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
We are still seeing business outpacing consumer.
So, thank you for that.
And, on the enterprise services, it's interesting, we're really seeing healthy demand for our consulting services to help people architect and deploy sort of the next generation of the products that we're bringing to market, both in Server and Tools and MBD.
You can see the connection there, right?  Server and Tools continuing to grow double digits.
People are really investing in their data centers, and in the private cloud.
And we're helping people do that, and also think about and contemplate what that's going to mean to migrate to the public cloud ultimately.
The same thing is true with the productivity server applications, how do you start deploying Lync and SharePoint, and how do you think about transitioning to Office 365 over time.
So, we're really seeing    we've got a strong pipeline of business there, and that's why you're seeing the growth both in the cost, frankly, to service that demand, because obviously it's a variable cost business.
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Thanks.
Peter, just on the enterprise business, any changes in customer behaviors as the quarter progressed, or as you look at your pipeline, I think, there's obviously been some concern over some more scrutiny around some larger deal sizes, I was just curious in terms of what you're seeing?
PETER KLEIN:  No.
We didn't see any changes in that flavor throughout the quarter.
BILL KOEFOED:  And I would just add, unearned came in kind of right in line with our expectations.
So, we continue to execute well on the annuity side, for sure.
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Hello.
I wanted to drill in a little bit on the hosting costs, which on MBD was a big chunk of the increasing cost of revenue.
How much do you think this is pointing to a lower margin, has Office 365 and Dynamics Online gained traction?  If so what do you think we should be modeling against?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, great question.
Obviously particularly in the short run delivering a service has a different margin profile than delivering software.
It's going to have a lower gross margin percentage, but ultimately should have a higher gross profit dollar.
So, what you should be thinking about is as we scale you see accelerated revenue growth at a lower gross margin percentage, and higher growth of gross profit dollars.
BILL KOEFOED: But, I would add, we're such in the early days there that I don't think that it's had a big impact on our business performance to date.
PETER KLEIN:   That is correct.
That was a long-term business model perspective, but it's not material today.
JOHN DIFUCCI, JPMC:  Thank you.
Peter I think bookings were flat this quarter, from a year ago and I assume you got some benefit from foreign exchange.
So, on a constant currency basis they're probably down a little bit.
This is after four quarters of some really nice growth here.
I think the last time it was flat or down was during the recession.
Is this simply a sign of some difficult macro, of a difficult macro environment, or was it just a difficult comp year-over-year, or even a strong quarter last quarter that might have pulled some business forward on that?
PETER KLEIN:  Exactly.
Thanks, John.
It's definitely more of the latter.
Across the board all of our metrics for revenue transactional, unearned, CNBs, all what we expected.
And it's really just a function of the year-over-year comps, and the strong Q4 that we had, and we're excited about the pipeline, as we head into Q2.
And as you know, Q1 is probably our lowest sort of selling quarter anyway, during the year, seasonally.
So, we feel good as we head into Q2.
BILL KOEFOED:  And we reflected that in our unearned guidance that we gave you last quarter, which was we expected sequential kind of Q4 to Q1, that sequentially it would decline a little bit more than normal.
So, I'd say it kind of came in line with what we had expected it to be as I said, earlier.
COLIN GILLIS, BCG Financial:  Hey, Peter.
Can you just update us on the percentage of cash that's offshore, and just give us a sense as to how much on-shore cash you need to have to comfortably run operations?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, of our cash about 51 billion is offshore.
COLIN GILLIS:  And what percentage of cash do you need to keep on shore, just to keep the lights on and the dividends getting paid?
PETER KLEIN:  That's not how we think about it.
We've got plenty of cash.
It's not an issue.
COLIN GILLIS:  Okay.
Thank you.
BRAD REBACK, Oppenheimer:  Great, thanks a lot.
Peter, as we think about the Xbox Live business, you've greatly expanded the content available there.
Are there opportunities here for additional premium service contracts with people, or is it going to be mainly transactional to get that content?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, without being specific about this particular case I think from a business model perspective you're thinking about it right.
There are lots of opportunities to think about how you might monetize, delivering unique and compelling entertainment experiences, and that's clearly kind of how we think about it.
That's sort of been the strategy with the Xbox business all along, right.
Once you get that incredible installed base of engaged users, how can you deliver a set of interactive entertainment, experiences, sort of across the board, and what that means.
And so from a business model perspective there's lots of interesting ways to monetize that.
BILL KOEFOED:  I would just add, as you've seen our results, Xbox Live has been phenomenal both in terms of growth of users, growth in revenues, the content that we have coming out this holiday season is going to be super-exciting, and obviously as I mentioned in my remarks, we're going to have over 70 games out this holiday season.
So, we believe that we have the most compelling entertainment experience in the living room and hopefully for those of you who don't have it, you should go out and check it out this holiday season, because it's going to be pretty exciting.
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Hi, good afternoon.
I just wanted to ask a question following the announcement of you Samsung deal, what your assumptions are for royalties around mobile phones, and also whether you've built in any assumptions from phone into entertainment and devices.
PETER KLEIN:  So, in terms of the deal we haven't announced any of the specific terms of the deal.
And we talked conceptually about the deal, and we're super-excited about their    the commitment to the platform and all of that related to that is included in the entertainment and devices division.
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowen and Company:  Okay, thank you.
I just had a follow-up to Adam's question.
You raised your guidance, Peter, for the EDD business this year to high-teens growth, although of course this now includes Skype, so a couple of questions around that.
First, do you still expect to see mid-teens growth for the EDD business organically, and second I don't know that there are that many long-term Skype subscribers.
But, is there going to be a deferred revenue write down for Skype, and if so how much?
PETER KLEIN:  You know, I think it's    why don't we    the second question we'll talk to you about when we actually report Skype results, after the next quarter, because we just closed that last week.
And on the E&D business, I would say generally, yes, our guidance is in line with guidance we've given before.
GREGG MOSKOWITZ:  Thank you.
TIM KLASELL, Stifel Nicholas:  Good afternoon, everybody, a follow-up question to Brendan's comment about business PCs growing faster than consumer PCs, where do you think we are in the enterprise Windows 7 upgrade cycle, are we middle innings, are we getting towards the end?  How do you guys feel about that?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, I think we're middle innings.
I think we expect that dynamic of business PCs growing faster to last throughout this fiscal year at least.
So, I'd say middle innings.
JASON MAYNARD, Wells Fargo:  Hi, good afternoon, guys.
Since fixing the Yahoo! RPS challenges are obviously an issue for improving OSD, how do you guys go about sort of ensuring that there won't be any disruption to your efforts given all of the call it market talk about what's happening with Yahoo!, because clearly if it's acquired or split up, there's all sorts of potential outcomes that could cause maybe more disruption to what you're trying to accomplish, so how do you kind of preserve the process, if you will?
PETER KLEIN:  We've got a really good relationship with Yahoo!  This is a long-term alliance.
Everybody is working really well together.
They're super-focused on what we need to do, and no matter what that's the goal at hand, and the teams are working really well together to do that.
So, that's kind of how we're approaching it, and focused on it.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay, so that will wrap-up our Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
Thanks again for joining us today, and have a good afternoon.
END
Microsoft Second Quarter 2012 Prepared Remarks
This presentation contains statements that are forward-looking.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factors section of  our Form 10-K, Form 10-Qs, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Im pleased with our performance this quarter.
Despite a challenging PC market, we delivered solid financial results.
We saw strong demand for our business products and services, and had a record holiday season driven by the unique entertainment experience we have built with Xbox 360.
This quarter, the strength of our product portfolio enabled us to grow revenue 5% to $20.9 billion.
Combined with our ongoing operating expense discipline, even as we prepare for a big launch year, we delivered record earnings per share of $0.78.
Similar to prior periods, we saw broad-based growth across geographies, with particular strength in emerging markets.
Within our segments, the Microsoft Business Division had another good quarter as businesses and consumers around the world look to Microsoft to meet their productivity needs.
Six quarters post launch, Office 2010 continues to exceed our expectations with increased consumer and business PC attach worldwide.
We saw double-digit revenue growth across our key business application workloads including Exchange, SharePoint, Lync, and Dynamics CRM and ERP.
As businesses large and small look to the cloud to lower costs and enable new ways of supporting a distributed workforce, they are turning to Microsoft.
With Office 365, we give customers powerful productivity and collaboration tools at great value.
Today, more than 100,000 businesses have made the commitment to our online services.
Whether on premise or in the cloud, Microsoft remains the top choice for productivity.
The Server & Tools business delivered another strong quarter as we continue to execute on our strategy of cloud-optimizing every business.
CIOs are increasingly turning to our business infrastructure offerings, including Windows Server, Hyper-V, and System Center, as they look to Microsoft for the security, flexibility, and manageability they need to build world-class private clouds.
This quarter marked the ninth consecutive quarter of double-digit growth for Windows Server Premium revenue and the eleventh quarter of double-digit revenue growth for System Center.
On the data platform, we remain the worldwide unit share leader with SQL Server.
Consistent with our strategy, we are growing our revenue share with marquee customer wins on mission-critical workloads and business intelligence capabilities.
This year, we will bring to market the next generation of our server offerings, including Windows Server 8, SQL Server 2012, and System Center 2012 which deepen and broaden our platform for the private cloud.
Combined with the power of Windows Azure for the public cloud, our offerings give enterprises the identity, virtualization, application development and management tools they need to efficiently progress in to the new era of hybrid IT.
The PC market was challenged this quarter, with particular softness in the consumer segment.
However, Windows 7 momentum in the enterprise continued and today, over 1/3 of enterprise desktops worldwide are on Windows 7.
And with the future release of Windows 8, we believe the ecosystem will benefit from the new range of capabilities and scenarios that it enables.
In search, we saw improvements in RPS this quarter as we partnered closely with Yahoo! to address the monetization challenges of the combined ad platform.
We are pleased with the progress and are working hard to continue that trajectory.
In the year since Windows Phone launched, we have worked diligently alongside our partners, including Nokia, to bring a differentiated experience to the mobile platform.
Earlier this month at the Consumer Electronics Show, we showcased the latest innovations in Windows Phone to very positive reviews.
With these new devices, we are increasing the choices for consumers around the world to find the Windows phone that is exactly right for them.
As I mentioned, Xbox 360 had a record holiday season as we continue to differentiate home entertainment.
Whether its using Bing voice search on Xbox to quickly find the movies and shows you want to watch, or enabling more interactive TV as we demonstrated at CES with Sesame Street and Elmo, Xbox and Kinect are bringing together our technologies to redefine the living room experience.
Beyond gaming and entertainment, with the Kinect for Windows program which launches February 1st, our technology will further innovation and creativity across industries.
During the quarter, we started the integration of Skypes world-class communication products and global-networked platform into our portfolio of products and services.
While it is still early, we are excited by the momentum we have seen thus far, and by the opportunities to redefine social and real-time communications for consumers and businesses around the world.
As I have consistently mentioned, operating expense management is a priority for Microsoft.
Reflecting our ongoing discipline and prioritization of investments, operating expenses grew just 4% this quarter.
In summary, we delivered solid financial results despite a challenging PC market.
The strength of our product portfolio drove solid top-line growth, we delivered record earnings per share, and we are well positioned for future growth.
With that, Im going to hand it back to Bill to provide more details on our results.
BILL KOEFOED, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
Thanks Peter.
First I am going to review our overall results and then Ill move on to the details by business segment.
Revenue for the quarter was a record $20.9 billion, up 5%, or $900 million year over year.
Operating income was $8 billion, cash flow from operations was $5.9 billion and earnings per share was $0.78.
Foreign exchange did not materially impact our net income this quarter.
Enterprise demand remained strong as our customers continued to add both products and seats to their enterprise agreements and our renewal rates remained solid.
At the end of the quarter, unearned revenue was $15.3 billion, and our contracted not billed balance was approximately $19 billion.
Turning to the PC market, as I mentioned last week, it was a challenging quarter for the industry.
Factors such as the flooding in Thailand, macroeconomic uncertainty and competing form factors resulted in an overall market that we estimate declined 2-4%.
In the PC market, it appears that the impact of the hard drive supply-chain constraints were not limited to a specific region or OEM-type.
While absolute volumes were impacted, we did see the following trends continue:
PC sales to emerging markets outpaced developed markets.
The business PC refresh cycle continued with business PC growth of 2%.
The decline of netbooks negatively impacted consumer PCs which were down 6%.
Netbooks, which a year ago represented about 8% of the PC market, now represent only 2%.
Excluding netbooks, consumer PCs grew 2%.
Now, well move on to the results for the Windows and Windows Live Division, where revenue was down 6%.
As usual, youll find the OEM revenue bridge in our earnings slide deck.
The primary differences between the PC market and Windows revenue were the continuing growth of emerging markets faster than developed markets and inventory draw down from the prior quarter.
We have now sold 525 million Windows 7 licenses since launch, and as Peter mentioned, we are seeing sustained momentum on enterprise deployments.
In December, we announced that Windows 8 Beta would be available in late February and we also previewed the Windows Store, which will be the hub where users can discover and download applications.
For developers, the Windows Store represents a significant opportunity given its broad reach, flexibility, and favorable economic terms.
Now, well move on to the Microsoft Business Division where revenue grew 3%.
Recall in Q2 last year that we recognized $224 million of revenue for the Office 2010 Technology Guarantee Program, and if you exclude that, revenue grew 7% for the quarter.
Consumer revenue declined 17% year over year, and declined 2% when factoring in the impact of the technology guarantee program that I just mentioned.
The outperformance relative to the overall PC market was driven by attach gains which continue despite being 18 months since the launch of Office 2010.
Business revenue grew 9% and within business, multi-year licensing revenue grew 12% and transactional revenue grew 3%, driven by strong attach worldwide.
We continued to see strong growth in our productivity solution offerings.
Lync, SharePoint and Exchange each grew double digits.
Weve previously shared with you the opportunity that we see for unified communications, and we are beginning to realize that potential.
Lync revenue grew over 30% as customers such as Volkswagen and LA Fitness chose Microsoft to be their voice and video solution.
This quarter Office 365 became the first major cloud provider to comply with leading EU and US standards for data protection.
Meeting these high standards enables businesses to more fully realize the potential of the cloud.
We also had our first major service enhancement to Office 365 which extends the companys next-generation cloud productivity service to reach businesses in 22 additional markets.
During the quarter, companies such as JetBlue, Campbell Soup, Patagonia and Wunderman chose Office 365 to enable their employees and customers to work together in the cloud.
We are also pleased with our momentum in cloud services for education, where we now have more than 22 million users, a 100% increase over the prior year.
Our Dynamics business continued its momentum where revenue grew double digits both in CRM and ERP.
Dynamics CRM grew over 30%.
Dynamics CRM had important competitive wins this quarter against Salesforce.com and Oracle, such as Safety-Kleen Systems and the American Heart Association.
The common theme amongst switchers was that Dynamics CRM has a familiar user interface which improves productivity while delivering lower operating costs than the competition.
Now lets move on to Server and Tools where revenue grew 11%, driven by multi-year license revenue that was up mid-teens and Enterprise Services.
We saw broad based strength across our products.
In our data platform business, SQL Server grew low double digits, outpacing industry growth due to the strength of our premium editions.
This quarter we saw competitive database wins against Oracle, such as UK based retailer The Co-Operative Group, which switched to SQL Server because of its advantages in business intelligence, security, flexibility and cost.
We also saw strong market anticipation for SQL Server 2012, with over 100,000 downloads in the two months since the release candidate was made available.
In the private cloud, Windows Server Premium revenue grew high-teens, and System Center grew over 20%.
On Tuesday we announced System Center 2012 which brings many of our Azure cloud capabilities to an integrated private cloud management solution for the first time.
We also announced great competitive wins against VMware with accounts such as T.Rowe Price, Unilever and Lufthansa Systems.
System Center 2012 integrates eight separate component products into one unified solution, streamlining installation and reducing the time it takes to deploy from days down to hours.
Additionally, we provided a clear path to Windows Azure for customers who are looking for a public or hybrid cloud solution.
In the public cloud, our December release of Azure enhanced ease of use and simplified deployment, as well as delivered new open source capabilities with Hadoop support.
We are seeing strong growth in the number of large customers signing up to use Azure.
One such example is Sony Pictures Crackle online content service, which has moved to Azure due to the cost savings, agility and performance that it provides.
Now Ill move to the Online Services Division, where revenue grew 10% and operating performance improved for the second consecutive quarter.
Online advertising revenue was up 13% driven primarily by search.
The increase in search revenue was driven by both rate and volume improvements.
Bings US organic market share ended the quarter at 15.1%, up 40 basis points this quarter and over 300 basis points year over year.
Now let me move to the Entertainment & Devices Division where revenue grew 15%.
According to third-party research, Xbox was the number one console in the US during calendar year 2011, and had 46% of US console sales in December.
During the quarter, we sold 8.2 million consoles, which was up over 25% despite a soft gaming console market.
Kinect continues to impress customers, with 18 million Kinects having been sold since launch just over one year ago.
Xbox LIVE members grew 33%, with 40 million users now enjoying Xbox LIVE.
In December, Xbox released the new Metro-style dashboard and added dozens of new entertainment applications and content partners to the platform.
While it is early, engagement has been quite impressive as the number of people using entertainment apps from November to December increased by almost 50%.
We continue to make progress with Windows Phone.
During the quarter, Nokia began to bring some of their great new devices to market, which adds to the growing list of compelling phones available from our OEM partners.
At CES the talk of the show were the new LTE Windows Phones from Nokia and HTC that will be available on AT&T in the coming months, joining the Lumia 710 which is now available on T-Mobile.
In October, Skype officially joined Microsoft.
This quarter, over 200 million people used Skype to communicate with family, friends and businesses.
For calendar year 2011, over 300 billion minutes of calls were made over the Skype network, an increase of 50%.
The teams are working closely on the integration across Microsoft and we will share more as we get further along the roadmaps.
Now, let me cover the remainder of the income statement.
Cost of goods sold increased 17% driven by the following:
First, we saw an increase in costs resulting from strong Xbox console sales and increased Xbox royalties.
Second, Enterprise Services continued to grow rapidly; and
Third, online services and traffic acquisition costs increased.
Operating expenses were $7.3 billion, an increase of 4%, primarily due to compensation, legal expenses, and Puerto Rican excise taxes.
This quarter we returned $2.7 billion to shareholders in buybacks and dividends.
So in summary, we saw strong demand from our business customers and our Xbox platform delivered a record holiday season.
We were able to navigate a challenging PC market to deliver solid top line and earnings per share growth.
With that I will hand it back to Peter, whos going to discuss our business outlook.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Thanks, Bill. For the remainder of the call, Ill discuss our expectations for the third quarter and full fiscal year.
Beginning with the Windows and Windows Live Division, we expect revenue to continue to be impacted by market dynamics similar to the past several quarters - PC growth in emerging markets will outpace developed markets, and business PC growth will outpace consumer PC growth.
We also expect the hard disk drive shortage to continue to challenge the PC market through at least the next quarter.
 
Turning to the Microsoft Business Division. For the third quarter and full fiscal year:
Transactional revenue, approximately 40% of the divisions total, should lag the overall PC market reflecting a higher mix of PC shipments to emerging markets; and  
Multi-year licensing revenue, approximately 60% of the divisions total, should grow low double-digits. 
Moving to Server and Tools. Approximately 30% of the divisions revenue comes from transactional licensing, 50% from multi-year licensing, and 20% from enterprise services.
For the third quarter and full fiscal year:
We expect transactional revenue to generally track with the hardware market;
Multi-year licensing revenue should grow low double-digits; and
Enterprise Services revenue should grow high teens.
Turning to the Online Services Division. We are focused on improving the financial performance of our search business and are looking for ways to increase RPS and streamline costs. For the third quarter and full fiscal year, we expect revenue to show year over year improvements in RPS. 
Moving on to the Entertainment and Devices Division.
We continue to be very pleased with our share of the worldwide console market.
However, the console market is softer than we previously expected and as a result, we now expect revenue to grow high single-digits for the third quarter and mid-teens for the full fiscal year. 
Switching to overall cost of goods sold for the company. COGS growth will continue to be impacted by the changing mix of revenue as we have seen the past few quarters.
We expect COGS to grow about 8 - 10% for the third quarter and mid-teens for the full fiscal year.
As a result of our focus on operating expense management, we are lowering our fiscal year guidance.
We now expect operating expenses to be $28.5 to $28.9 billion for the full fiscal year, including the impact of Skype.
This represents year over year growth of 5% to 6%.
We expect our effective tax rate to be 19 to 21% for the third quarter and full fiscal year, and we still expect capital expenditures to be about $2.5 billion for the full fiscal year. 
For the third quarter, unearned revenue should roughly follow historical seasonal patterns.
We continue to expect unearned revenue at the end of the fiscal year to grow low double-digits compared to the prior fiscal year.
As we look forward, we have the strongest product pipeline we have ever had.
Were pleased with the early enthusiasm around our upcoming wave of products that enable CIOs to cloud-optimize their business.
And we are excited by the opportunity to unify the consumer experience across our phones, PCs, tablets and TVs with our new Metro-style design.
And with that, I will turn it back to Bill and we will take some questions.
BILL KOEFOED, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
Thanks Peter.
We want to get questions from as many of you as possible, so please stick to just one question and avoid long or multi-part questions.
Operator, please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
(Operator Direction.)
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  Hey, guys.
Thanks for the question.
My question is about the material improvement in OSD margins quarter on quarter.
It looks like you held firm on expenses year on year.
Does that reflect a new philosophy around that business in terms of driving profitability, and can you update us on where you think you are on the RPS improvement?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Adam.
As we've been saying, the key to profitability in that business is to grow our top line because it scales really well.
The marginal impact of that is very high, because it's a high fixed cost business.
We have been, as we've been growing share, and improving our RPS, especially this quarter, holding the line on operating expenses, and merely streamlining.
The most important thing long-term, as we've said, is to continue to grow that share, and grow the revenue per search.
So, we're pleased with that trajectory, and want to keep on that.
And we are watching the costs very carefully so that that revenue marginally goes to the bottom line, and that's what you saw happen this quarter, and that's the trajectory we hope to stay on.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
WALTER PRTICHARD, Citi:  Hi, thanks.
Just wondering on the EDD side, it looks like you called out the Nokia payments as part of COGS as a driver, and I'm wondering, you've been pointing us to mix of revenue types as mainly the driver there of COGS.
Could you help us out with how meaningful those payments were, and how should we expect those to continue to track as we move into future quarters?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
It's part of it.
There were several things impacting the gross margins in the E&D business.
Obviously one is just the volume of consoles and the mix of consoles, high end versus low end; the mix of software, whether it's first party or third party, that has a different margin characteristic; and so that's the biggest piece in E&D.
Then, the Nokia piece is also another piece that plays into that.
The biggest piece is the mix of business in the E&D business, and then Nokia is also another driver of that.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
RICK SHERLUND, Nomura:  Thanks.
On the hard drive shortage issue, I spoke with Gartner on Monday, and they were looking for PCs down 1 percent.
You guys have said down 2 to 4.
And they helped reconcile that, suggesting that there were some issues in terms of the pipeline of products, and if the inventories are reduced in the pipeline, that might reconcile why the two of you are viewing the industry somewhat differently.
I'm just curious if you think that's going to continue into the next quarter.
I know we're going to see an impact in this next quarter, I'm just curious whether you and Gartner might be more in line with each other going forward, or if there is more inventory reduction in that pipeline that might be an ongoing impact above and beyond perhaps what we're seeing from the numbers that Gartner and IDC are giving us?
PETER KLEIN:  That's impossible to say, Rick.
You know, I say, obviously for this quarter, we obviously are very confident and comfortable with the estimate.
As we said during the remarks, we expect the impact to continue on at least through the next quarter.
And I think the best thing to do is, at the end of that, we'll probably all have a better view, and we kind of assess where we are and what it looks like going forward.
BILL KOEFOED:  I would say just generally on the inventory, as well, obviously as I said in my remarks, there was an inventory draw down to end the quarter.
I think there was an overall, I think both IDC and Gartner have also talked about the fact that the overall supply chain for PCs is obviously leaner than it was three months ago.
So, we'll have to see how fast kind of people ramp back up, how fast the PC ecosystem rebounds, and that will obviously impact, as Peter mentioned, inventories at the end of the quarter as well.
So, a good question.
Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Hi.
Thank you.
I was wondering, Peter, if you could talk a little bit about which businesses are the furthest along regarding their COGS transition as you move more and more of your revenues to the cloud, if you could kind of rank order them for us?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
I would say Office 365 is really far along.
We've had a lot of good momentum, and obviously one of the things that drives you up the sort of margin scale is getting the economies of scale, the volume, and we talked about some of the numbers, the 100,000 businesses, the great sort of demand we've had for sort of the Office Business all up, including Office 365.
So, I would say that's probably farthest along, followed closely by Windows Azure as we sort of add new enterprise customers, new ISVs, new developers to that.
Certainly, Office 365 is accelerating up the ramp.
BILL KOEFOED:  And the other thing that I would add is, obviously OSD will call it kind of our largest cloud property.
And as Peter mentioned earlier, I think in one of the questions, you know, it obviously has achieved scale, and as a result kind of every incremental kind of search ends up becoming 100 percent margin.
So, we are at different stages, I think, within some of eh different business products, but certainly around running a cloud infrastructure we feel like we've got quite a good handle on that primarily from our search business.
Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
JOHN DIFUCCI, JPMC:  Thank you.
My question essentially follows to Rick, it has to do with the Windows OEM revenue bridge.
I'm just curious, on some of these items how they sit today.
For instance, and I believe, Bill and Peter, you take account for those inventory changes in the Windows attach and inventory line.
And last quarter it added about 5 percent to the quarter, this quarter it was a 2 percent hit, and then, Bill, you noted that the inventory draw down had an effect there.
Can you give us a sense of where you think channel inventories are today relative to what you might call normal levels?  And then also just quickly on that last line in that bridge, the OEM revenue adjustment, when is this stuff going to stop being negative?  It's been slightly negative for quite some time now, and shouldn't it have stopped like three years after the Vista launch, because wasn't it related to XP and having Internet Explorer as part of that as a meaningful part of that versus for Vista?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
We'll take the second one first, next year that should go away.
So, to answer your question, yes, that's what you would expect and that's what will happen.
On the first question on inventory, in any given quarter inventory is going to sort of go up and down depending on what's going on in the channel.
As you noted, sometimes it's a tailwind, sometimes it's a headwind like it was this quarter.
It's hard to say precisely where it stands and what it's going to be like next quarter.
We will sort of look at it when we get there.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Thank you.
Question for you, how much of the year over year decrease in the consumer revenue on the Office product is due to licenses specifically included in OEM sales of PCs as compared to standalone Office sales to the consumer market?
BILL KOEFOED:  It's mostly associated with OEM.
I mean, the driver that we use for that part of the MBD business is specifically tied with the PC unit growth of consumers.
And so, as I mentioned in my remarks, we actually outperformed that.
But that's the best driver.
It's not complete, but that's the best driver of trying to be able to predict or interpret that result.
Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi, guys.
Good quarter.
I've just got a question on the Windows Division.
When you think about the impact of Windows 8 coming out, obviously the second half of this year, how do you think that's going to impact build plans amongst the OEMs, but also inventory levels when we get to the summer?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Probably premature to talk about that.
I think we need to get closer to it.
So, the thing I would say is, just from an ecosystem perspective, there's an incredible amount of excitement and innovation going on across vendors, like the chip vendors, and all the OEMs.
You actually see that starting today with the ultra-books that you're seeing with Windows 7.
And so the fact of the matter is, there's a ton of innovation happening today for Windows 7.
There's a ton of excitement for enterprises for both Windows 7, and looking forward to Windows 8, and what that gives them in terms of an end user experience, and IT manageability.
So, I don't think about it so much as looking forward.
There's a ton of innovation going on today.
You see it in the ultra-books, you see in both the ARM and x86 chip vendors are doing.
And so that sort of continues, and is sort of on the regular pace.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  All right.
Thank you very much.
If you look at the last few quarters, we've been through tough comps, the slightly lower revenue growth rate, and also the mix issues that have caused the margins, the gross margins to go down.
As you come out of this tough cycle and start to get into the next set of launches, should we think about the gross margins as starting to go in the other direction just based on what looks to be better mix between your Windows, the typical software businesses, as you get into a launch year.
Part of me says, maybe the margins are bottoming here, because I completely respect the fact that you've got other mix issues that are more longer term, as you have the Entertainment and Devices Business, the costs there, et cetera.
But shouldn't margins start to go back up as you head into launch year?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Kash.
Yes, certainly margins are a function of mix, and to the extent there's a higher mix, and higher margin products, that will have a positive impact on margins, and it's not unrealistic to think that in a launch year you can see higher growth in higher margin products.
So, it will depend on what the mix is, but I think it's a very plausible scenario.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENDAN BARNICLE, Pacific Crest Securities:  Thanks so much, guys.
I was wondering if you could give us any color on what you saw geographically in terms of growth trends, and in particular any in particular in Europe or Asia that was weak or strong?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
We saw particular strength in emerging markets, particularly what we call the BRIC markets, Brazil, Russia, India, and China.
That was really a driver of growth for us, and that's exciting for us, because we've got strong and growing positions there, and that's where kind of disproportionate economic growth is happening sort of worldwide.
But, as Bill mentioned, and as I mentioned, we saw broad-based strength and demand across geographies, but with particular strength in emerging markets.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator direction.)
ED MCGUIRE, CLFA:  Hi, good afternoon.
You called out 100,000 businesses that are engaged in online services, could you comment on the impact that this transition is having on recognized revenues versus unearned and contracted not billed?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, it's interesting, subscription businesses aren't that much different from our existing multi-year licensing business in the sense that it's sort of billed up front and then recognized over time, just like our multi-year licensing agreements.
And so it really doesn't have a significant impact on the sort of flavor, or character of our revenue recognition, or unearned revenue.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRAD REBACK, Oppenheimer:  Great, thanks a lot.
Peter, the business PC growth rate was down about 300 basis points sequentially, was that all economic or hard disk drive?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, the one thing I'd say is the overall business environment sort of remains very strong for us.
And so all our macro-indicators for business spending on IT remain good, unearned revenue, our renewals for enterprise licensing agreements and enterprise deployments of Windows 7.
In terms of PCs as we said, there is still growth and we're still sort of in the refresh cycle.
I do suspect that some of that is due to supply chain and maybe a small amount due to macro, but it's small.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowan and Company:  Okay, thanks and good afternoon.
Peter, you mentioned ultra books earlier, and on the heels of CES we're going to be seeing a lot more of them hit the market.
Can you talk about what this means for Microsoft and more importantly when might ultra books be ready for the mass market, from a cost perspective?
PETER KLEIN:  What it means, for me what it represents is sort of the excitement and the opportunity long-term in building compelling devices for consumers and businesses around the world.
There's so much innovation still to get done, there's so many new form factors, so many new use cases, and I think it's great to see what the ecosystem does when it works together, as I mentioned before.
You know, in terms of the sort of price points in mass market, we'll just sort of wait and see how that evolves before commenting on that.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator direction.)
TIM KLASSELL, Stifel Nicholas:  Yes.
Good afternoon everybody, just a question on the EDD.
You mentioned a little softening in the console sales.
Do you think that's due to mix shifting towards lower-priced units, or is that business just being more seasonal?  When we model that going forward should we make that a more seasonal, holiday type of an event than we currently do?
PETER KLEIN:  You know, in terms of the over  first of all, for our console business we feel really good about our sort of relative position in the market and our ability to take share and have a really strong competitive position.
In terms of the seasonality, I don't think there's anything that indicates it's sort of more or less seasonal than we've seen in the past.
Like many consumer businesses like this, it will always be relatively stronger at the holiday season.
And in terms of some of the mixes, some of it is a function of product cycle, if you think about the Kinect sensors and how we sold those into our installed base, and now we're selling more bundles, those kinds of things.
The seasonality hasn't materially shifted.
BILL KOEFOED:  Obviously when big title games come out, that tends to drive kind of a big cycle.
So, that's something we need to pay attention to around this business.
Okay.
Operator, we're going to take one more question, please.
(Operator direction.)
ROBERT BREZA, RBC Capital Markets:  Hi, thanks for squeezing me in.
Bill, maybe could you just comment a little bit back on the  I think it was a Credit Suisse analyst talking about the Windows 8 release at the end of February.
Given the complexity you're adding into Windows 8 with mobile, et cetera, making that kind of a cross-platform experience.
I mean, do you expect that to kind of delay the traditional milestones, or how should we think about Windows 8 going forward?  Thanks.
BILL KOEFOED:  I wouldn't think about kind of traditional milestones.
I would say one of the things that Tami talked about at CES last week was just how important it is for us to work on and with developers to create a really vibrant developer ecosystem.
And so one of the things we also talked about with the beta release was the Windows store, really making sure we're going to have quite a few apps that are going to be up on the Windows store at beta.
Obviously, one of the things she and Steve both talked about last week is that any Windows 7 PC could run Windows 8, but obviously there will be kind of some kind of new and interesting form factors that are going to come out here as we get further on down the road.
So, I don't know that I would think about it, except as we said earlier, we're on track, we feel really good about where we are on the product, and this next super-important milestone is the beta release and having a really great developer ecosystem to kind of surround that.
So, great question.
ROBERT BREZA:  Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay.
So, that will wrap up the Q&A portion of today's call.
We look forward to seeing many of you at the numerous conferences in which we're going to be participating at this quarter.
For those of you unable to attend those events in person you will be able to follow our comments at Microsoft.com/investor.
Please contact me, or anyone on my team, if you need the additional details.
Thank you, again, for joining us today and have a great afternoon.
Bye-bye.
END
MSFT Earnings Conference Call
Bill Koefoed, Peter Klein
Thursday, April 19, 2012
(Operator Direction.)
BILL KOEFOED:  Thank you, Carol.
And thank you, everyone, for joining us this afternoon.
As usual with me today are Peter Klein, Chief Financial Officer; Frank Brod, Chief Accounting Officer; and John Seethoff, Deputy General Counsel.
Our financial summary slide deck is on our website, Microsoft.com/investor, and is intended to follow our prepared remarks, and provide the reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
As a reminder, we will post today's prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Note that all growth comparisons we make on the call today will relate to the corresponding period of last year unless we specify otherwise.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript at the Microsoft Investor Relations website until April 19, 2013.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements, which are predictions, projections, or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Forms 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
Okay.
And, with that, I'll turn the call over to Peter.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Bill.
And thanks everyone for joining us.
I'm pleased with our performance, as we delivered another quarter of solid financial results.
Our robust portfolio of enterprise products and services drove revenue growth of 6 percent to a third quarter record $17.4 billion.
Combined with our ongoing operating expense discipline, even as we prepare for one of our biggest launch years, we delivered operating income growth of 12%.
Let me provide more color on the business.
Our business desktop offerings remain a top priority for CIOs.
This quarter businesses continued to refresh their hardware, and as a result we saw healthy growth in business PCs around the world.
As they purchase new PCs, businesses are also deploying Windows 7 and Office 2010 to increase productivity and manageability while reducing their total cost of ownership.
Today, approximately 40 percent of enterprise desktops worldwide are on Windows 7.
And we see continued momentum as the remaining desktops upgrade from Windows XP over the next two years.
As CIOs look to address the needs of a more social and mobile workforce, our productivity services, such as Office 365, have become an important solution.
Our communication and collaboration offerings, such as Exchange, SharePoint, and Lync, all grew revenue double digits, and are well positioned in this growing market.
On the infrastructure side, the Server and Tools business delivered double-digit revenue growth with SQL Server leading the way.
We've now launched System Center 2012 and SQL Server 2012, and the new versions of Windows Server and Visual Studio are on the horizon.
Our product roadmap and vision are driving new customer wins, and strong enterprise agreement renewal.
We are confident that we are uniquely positioned to address the needs of CIOs as they strive to efficiently manage private and public cloud.
Establishing a vibrant Windows Phone ecosystem is a priority for us, and we are working with our partners, including Nokia, to enable more features, markets, and devices.
We are pleased with our Nokia partnership, and the pace of innovation across devices, including the Lumia 900, which recently launched on AT&T's 4G LTE network.
In gaming and entertainment, while industry console sales were softer than our expectations, we continue to maintain our share leadership position.
With Xbox Live, we are adding more content and partners as we expand the entertainment experience, and build on our leading position in the living room.
And in search, we are focused on addressing RPS and operating performance.
We are seeing our hard work pay off with year over year improvements in both areas.
In summary, solid revenue growth, and our ongoing commitment to fiscal discipline delivered strong financial results.
We are enthusiastic about the market reception to our products and services as we continue to execute well heading into our launch wave.
With that, I'm going to hand it back to Bill to provide more details on this quarter's results, then I'll come back and provide some thoughts on our outlook for our fourth quarter, and the next fiscal year.
BILL KOEFOED:  
Thanks Peter.
First, I'm going to review our overall results, and then I'll move on to the details by business segment.
Revenue for the quarter was $17.4 billion, up 6%, or roughly $1 billion.
Operating income was up 12% to $6.4 billion, cash flow from operations was a record $9.6 billion and earnings per share was $0.60.
Remember, in Q3 last year we had a $461 million, or $0.05 per share benefit related to a partial tax settlement with the IRS, and if you exclude that EPS grew 7% for the quarter.
Foreign exchange did not materially impact our net income this quarter.
From a geographic perspective, developed markets remained healthy and we saw strong double-digit growth in emerging markets.
Businesses continue to make long-term investments in the Microsoft platform and as a result, multi-year licensing as a percentage of our total revenue grew to approximately 40%.
This quarter we saw strong enterprise agreement growth in both new business and renewals.
At the end of the quarter, unearned revenue was $15.2 billion, up 17%, and our contracted not billed balance was over $19 billion.
Moving on to the PC market, we estimate the worldwide PC market grew 2 to 4 percent this quarter.
Business PCs grew 8 percent as businesses continued to upgrade their hardware and software to Windows 7.
When excluding netbooks, consumer PCs grew 6 percent.
We are pleased with the early demand for ultrabooks as they reinvigorate personal computing with innovative design, high performance, and enhanced battery life.
Now, I'll move on to the results for the Windows and Windows Live Division, where revenue was up 4 percent.
As in past quarters, you'll find the OEM revenue bridge in our earnings slide deck.
Overall, Windows revenue slightly outgrew the underlying PC market due to the strength of the business refresh and attach gain in several geographic regions.
In late February, we made the Windows 8 consumer preview available.
It is important to note that the development of Windows 8 on both Intel and ARM is proceeding on our schedule.
Now I'll move on to the Microsoft Business Division, where revenue grew 9 percent.
Consumer revenue increased 2 percent, while business transactional revenue grew 5 percent, again, outperforming our historical trend.
Multi-year licensing revenue grew 13 percent as customers continued their commitment to our productivity services.
As businesses embrace social enterprise scenarios, they are turning to the combined power of Exchange, SharePoint, and Lync to enable their presence, collaboration, and communication needs.
This quarter Exchange and SharePoint both grew double digits while Lync revenue growth accelerated to over 35 percent.
During the quarter, we launched the technical preview of the next version of Office, code named Office 15, with public beta coming later this summer.
Our Dynamics business continued its momentum, and revenue grew double digits.
Dynamics CRM revenue grew over 30 percent with more than to more than 2.25 million users, and 33,000 customers who leverage Dynamics CRM every day.
Now let's move to Server and Tools which posted another solid quarter with 14 percent revenue growth, and over 20 percent bookings growth.
Transactional revenue grew low single digits, roughly in line with the underlying server hardware market growth.
Multi-year licensing revenue was up high teens, and enterprise services, once again, grew more than 20 percent.
Our growth in market success this quarter demonstrates that our customers really value our unique ability to deliver a solution, which spans the private and public cloud.
In the private cloud, Windows Server Premium revenue grew high teens, and System Center grew more than 20 percent.
We launched the beta version of Windows Server 2012, and announced the general availability of System Center 2012, which will help customers progress beyond virtualization to build efficient and secure hybrid cloud.
In the public cloud, we recently announced strategic partnerships with leading service providers Accenture and Hitachi to offer enterprise-ready cloud solutions on our Windows Azure Platform to accelerate application deployment and migration.
We are the only company which can deliver a common identity, virtualization, management and development platform to our customers, across both private and public clouds.
In our data platform business, SQL Server revenue grew high-teens while SQL premium revenue grew more than 30% as customers increasingly selected the premium edition to power their business intelligence and mission critical workload needs.
In early April, we announced general availability of SQL Server 2012 which now enables businesses to scale on demand and create flexible hybrid deployments.
Hundreds of global, industry-leading customers, such as Mitsui, Volvo, Revlon, and LG Chemical have already deployed SQL Server 2012 for production use to leverage its enhanced performance, reliability and high availability features.
We also recently announced the second preview of Hadoop-based services with customers, such as Webtrends, using it to glean simple, actionable insights from complex data sets hosted in the cloud.
Hadoop integration along with the powerful analytical capabilities in SQL Server 2012 position us well to capture the full potential of Big Data growth.
With major releases in each of our server product offerings we continue to strengthen our enterprise portfolio and empower businesses to be both more agile and efficient.
Moving on to the Online Services Division, revenue grew 6% and operating performance improved by $300 million.
This quarter, online advertising revenue was up 9% driven by volume and rate improvements in our search business.
In the Entertainment & Devices Division revenue declined 16% reflecting the soft gaming console market.
Xbox maintained its share leadership in the U.S.
this quarter and we continue to expand the content available in Xbox LIVE, with the release of three new major entertainment applications Comcast XFINITY TV, HBO GO and MLB.TV, all with Kinect integration.
We are working to bring Windows Phone to more people.
Our progress can be seen with the April launch of 4G LTE phones through AT&T, our launch in China with multiple OEMs, and the enabling of sub $200 phones with more silicon support.
With this work, and the building enthusiasm around Windows Phones, we have seen the number of apps published in the marketplace increase by 50% over the past 3 months.
Turning to Skype, we continue to be pleased with both the pace of the integration, and the rapid growth of the business.
This quarter, Skype users made over 100 billion minutes of calls over the Skype network, an increase of 40% from the prior year.
I will now cover the remainder of the income statement.
Cost of goods sold increased 1% reflecting changes in the mix of products and services sold.
Operating expenses were $7.1 billion, an increase of 4 percent mainly due to higher people cost.
Operating income increased 12% to $6.4 billion.
And this quarter we returned $2.7 billion to shareholders in buybacks and dividends.
To summarize, we saw a strong enterprise uptake for our Server and Office products and continued business demand for PCs leading to healthy topline growth.
Along with our revenue growth we were able to drive margin expansion with our strong focus on cost management.
And with that I will hand it back to Peter, whos going to discuss our business outlook.
PETER KLEIN:
Thanks, Bill.
For the remainder of the call, I will discuss our expectations for the fourth quarter with some high level themes as we begin to think about Fiscal 2013.
Let me start with the fourth quarter.
Within the PC market, we expect growth in business PCs to outpace consumer PCs and growth in emerging markets to outpace developed markets.
In the Microsoft Business Division, multi-year licensing revenue, which is approximately 60% of the divisions total, should grow low double-digits.
Transactional revenue, which is the remaining revenue in the division, should lag the overall PC market reflecting a higher mix of PC shipments to emerging markets.
Within Server and Tools, approximately 30% of the divisions revenue comes from transactional licensing, 50% from multi-year licensing, and 20% from enterprise services.
We expect transactional revenue to generally track with the server hardware market, and multi-year licensing and Enterprise Services revenue to both grow high-teens.
In the Online Services Division, we will continue to focus on RPS improvements as well as operating efficiencies.
For our entertainment and devices divisions, we expect revenue to grow low double digits.
We expect COGS to grow 8 to 12 percent for the fourth quarter, as has been the case in prior quarters, the mix of revenues will continue to impact this number.
We are revising our operating expense guidance downward to $28.3 to $28.7 billion for fiscal 2012.
We expect our effective tax rate to be 19 to 21 percent for the fourth quarter and we continue to expect capital expenditures for the full fiscal year to be about 2.5 billion.
Unearned revenue will roughly follow historical sequential growth patterns.
Now, I would like to spend a few minutes looking ahead to Fiscal 2013, which will include an unprecedented refresh of our major products.
* With Windows 8 and its availability on both X86 and ARM, we believe the ecosystem will capitalize on the new range of capabilities and scenarios Windows 8 enables.
* In the enterprise the addition of Windows Server 2012, combined with the momentum of SQL Server and System Center, position us to take share as businesses increasingly look to cloud optimize their IT infrastructure.
* And in productivity we believe Office 15 will help people work, collaborate and communicate smarter and faster than before, driving growth in the Office business.
* Consumers will see ongoing innovations in Xbox, Skype, Windows Phone, and Bing.
So as you can see, there is a lot to look forward to next year.
We expect Fiscal 2013 operating expenses to be $30.3 to $30.9 billion, which represents growth of 6 to 8 percent from the mid-point of our updated Fiscal 2012 guidance, as we continue to prioritize our spending and manage our expenses against the backdrop of a big product release year.
In closing our product portfolio is stronger than it has ever been, and customer satisfaction with our products and services is high.
And with our latest wave of innovation, paired with ongoing operating expense discipline, we are well positioned to continue delivering value to shareholders.
And with that, I'll turn the call over to Bill who will take some questions.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Peter.
We want to get to questions from as many of you as possible, so please stick to just one question and avoid long, or multi-part questions.
Operator, can you please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
(Operator Direction.)
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  Thank you, nice quarter, guys.
My question is about the enterprise upgrade cycle.
The clock is ticking on XP obviously, but you are only at 40% of the enterprises upgraded.
Where do you think that number goes? Do you think it's front-end loaded towards calendar '12 versus calendar '13? And how do you think about how that impacts the model, given some recovery with DLAs? Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Well, the only thing I can say, Adam, is obviously it's high on the prior list for CIOs to upgrade their business desktops, and we've seen that.
We've seen that in deployments, as we talked about, and it remains a high priority.
Exactly how that will play out over the next couple of years, it's hard to say.
The Memorandum has been great so far.
It remains a top priority, so we see that momentum continuing, really, over the next couple of years.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Thank you.
I was just wondering, Peter, a few years ago, and you might not have been CFO at the time, you guys had talked about online and what your goals were five years out.
And, talking about 20% organic market share and that could get you to breakeven.
I mean, given what we are seeing in terms of RPS, although you are doing a very good job on the OpEx side, how would you say you're thinking about that today?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, thanks, Heather.
The same basic dynamics continue, right? We need to do two things.
We need to grow our share, we need to grow our RPS, so really, improve our monetization.
At the same time as managing the operating performance, which we've been doing.
So, the same characteristics apply.
We are making progress on both counts, as Bill indicated, we saw gains in both volume and rate, and we need to continue to do that, sort of monotonically, quarter-after-quarter and year-after-year.
BILL KOEFOED:  Yes, I would just add on to that, and I've been reminding some investors to go back and watch the FAM presentation that Qi Lu gave back in September.
We do view our search asset as a pretty strategic asset for the Company.
The capabilities that it offers are leveraged across our -- we think can be leveraged across our whole product set, so I do think our strategy has evolved from whatever conversation you had a couple three years ago, because we see the opportunity to leverage the asset being even more powerful than maybe we did at that point.
But, a good reminder if people haven't looked at that video, you can go back and look at it on the site.
Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
RICK SHERLUND, Nomura:  Yes, thank you.
On EDD, just sort of curious whether there is anticipation.
We're not really looking for much at E3 this year.
I think new console, people are thinking is maybe next year.
There is Halo 4 coming.
Just how you thinking about with more and more gaming going to mobile, what do you think the outlook is beyond next quarter for EDD? Do we need a new console cycle to create growth in that segment?
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Rick.
You know we feel really good about both our market position and our strategy.
If you think about what we've done over the last couple of years, we've really staked out a unique value proposition and a unique strategy when it comes to not just the gaming console, but also the UI technology with Kinect.
And importantly, Xbox Live and all the entertainment content that comes with that, which we view as a persistent long-term revenue stream, both from a subscriber perspective, as well as a transactional perspective.
And so, we feel great about our leadership position.
We've been the number one console for the last 15 months or so.
We feel great about our unique value proposition and the growing business we have with both Kinect and Live, and we think that's really persistent.
If you look at the engagement that our subscribers have, the amount of time they spend doing entertainment, as opposed to gaming, is increasing all the time.
And so, I think the strategy and the value proposition there plays out very well over the next several years.
RICK SHERLUND:  Will Skype be a big benefit to that division going forward?
PETER KLEIN:  Skype will be a big benefit across the company as we've talked about how it plays across all of our businesses.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi:  Hi, thanks.
Peter, you guys had a much better enterprise performance than I think most of the peers that we've seen report that are enterprise-exposed, IBM, et cetera.
And I'm wondering if you could help us out with understanding where you saw strength across your business there? Was it more small business, medium business, enterprise? Were there any trends there that might help us understand why you're outperforming some of your peers?
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Walter.
Yes, it was all segments.
I would highlight the enterprise.
And, it's really broad-based.
Businesses are investing in data centers.
They're investing in their desktops, because they see technology as a way to really both cut costs and improve their strategic positioning.
For a while, COI's had been saying Microsoft is a top priority.
And we're really, really starting to see that, both on the infrastructure side and the desktop side.
We feel great about our product lineup, particularly in Server and Tools.
If you think of what we've done with Systems Center and SQL Server, and the upcoming release of Windows Server 2012, we kind of have a unique value proposition for enterprises, which is all about the hybrid, private and public cloud, which nobody else really has.
We've seen growth across both of those things.
Similarly on the Business division side, we've broadened the Office business in several important ways over the last several years.
One is in the experiences and workloads that people are getting in communications and collaboration, and that's been a huge growth driver.
And secondly, again, is cloud services and how that expands from helping people understand our road map from where they are today to how they get to the public cloud.
I think those things taken together across the board have allowed us to take share and allowed us to grow both of those businesses, and you're really starting to see that take hold.
And we're really excited about the product lineup that's coming in the next six to nine months.
BILL KOEFOED:  I would just add on to that, I think investors sometimes put companies in a box and say you are either in private cloud or you're in public cloud.
And as Peter mentioned, we are in both.
I mean we have high growth rates in both.
And we are, as Peter said, really the only company that's got that breadth of offerings in the growth rate on both the private, the public, and then importantly, we've kind of coined this term of hybrid IT, where you can have a road map as you kind of want to use both to manage your IT infrastructure.
So, yes, we feel really good about where we are in the share that we are taking in the market place for sure.
Next question, Operator.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Thanks.
You commented that you saw strong, multi-year licensing, and I was just curious if you could just talk about how the upcoming cycle is helping influence that? And if I got this right, Bill, I think you mentioned new enterprise agreements, you also saw strength there.
So, if you could just talk through the dynamics of what you are seeing on these multi-year deals?
PETER KLEIN: Yes, the way that the product pipeline impacts our Multi-year Licensing business is enterprises, when they invest in a multi-year licensing agreement, they're making a long-term investment in their platforms, in their infrastructure.
And they are making a long-term investment in their vendors.
And so, it's important to really understand the road map.
And that's where the pipeline really helps, and that's really been, I think, a big driver so far.
And that applies not only to the workloads and the capabilities in the products themselves, but as Bill just mentioned, the private and public cloud road map, because people really are starting to think about long-term how do they make that transition from where they are today in their data centers to a public cloud world.
So, having that road map and having that pipeline really impacts our current period Enterprise business, and I think that's what you saw, not only in Server and Tools, but also in the Business division, as well.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Thank you.
So, we saw strong numbers on System Center growing well, as well as SQL Server, and yet we're just about to enter a product cycle.
Normally, I guess, they would slow down a bit.
What do you think is the driver of why this has continued to accelerate into the cycle?
PETER KLEIN:  I'll just go back to our continued vision, our continued roadmap, the capabilities that we're offering.
I mean it's a combination of the features and capabilities, particularly in System Center 2012, and SQL Server 2012.
SQL Server 2012 is an amazing value proposition when you think about its scalability, when you think about business intelligence and analytics.
And when you think about the roadmap to the public cloud.
People are understanding not only current features in the products, but they are looking towards the future roadmaps.
And I think that's what's really driving that.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi, thanks, guys, great quarter.
Just have another question on the Server and Tools division.
Obviously Intel is coming out with a new chip, Romley here, probably shipping to OEMs now, probably see it actually being delivered in servers late Q2, Q3 in the calendar.
How do you think these chip cycles actually are going to impact your business? Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  We're super-excited about it, but I think about the business more broadly obviously, customers making long-term investments in their roadmap.
We love what they're doing, we think that's an interesting thing, and to the extent the ecosystem technology evolved, that's always a good thing for how businesses are investing in their infrastructure.
But, I wouldn't want to overstate it.
It's a much broader issue in terms of the long-term road map, but certainly, having advances in technology, whether it's in hardware or in the data center, is a great thing all up.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
JOHN DIFUCCI, JP Morgan:  Thank you.
Peter and Bill, I think the Windows numbers were a little stale out there, as far as consensus numbers.
But, even when you adjust for the more recent PC unit shipment data and something in line with what you guys said, I think Gartner and IDC were at least in the neighborhood there.
Even when you make those adjustments the Windows business was even stronger than what we would have expected anyway.
And I guess I'm just trying to get a little more color on that, or figure that out.
I guess a question maybe on the OEM revenue bridge.
You got plus 2 percent from attach and inventory.
Bill, I think you said that business refresh and attach was strong in some regions, but I would think anyway, that given that PC shipments are much stronger in emerging markets, even if some emerging markets were a little bit better than normal, you still wouldn't necessarily get an aggregate attach that would be stronger.
So, I guess the question is, was there a meaningful move in inventory, OEM inventory,  that helped a bit this quarter, because those numbers are stronger than I would have thought.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks.
No, it's actually a couple of things.
One, yes, on emerging markets, but business PCs is what really drove the Windows business.
And so if you think about the Windows revenue growth being really on the high end of our estimated PC shipment range, it's really a function of, one, business PCs really doing well relative to consumers.
And again, that's consistent with the theme we've seen on businesses investing in their technology.
And in addition to that, we did see some attach gains.
I mean, that's just reductions in piracy, kind of broadly, not in any one place.
That was a tailwind this quarter.
As you know, sometimes that's not always a tailwind.
In general in the long term, that tends to be on the up-tick, but this quarter that attach and inventory gain is really partially attach.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Thanks, Peter.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, John.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  Hi.
Thank you guys.
I don't have any questions.
Thank you very much.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
COLLIN GILLIS, BGB Financial:  Thank you.
Can you just update us on the changes and the refresh in the marketing group, where the priorities are for the spend and any major upcoming campaigns?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
The marketing organization, you know, continues on.
We are always making sort of tweaks and changes, and making sure we're being as efficient and effective as possible in getting all the resources where we want them.
If you think more broadly about our marketing focus as a company, clearly heading into this launch wave of our major core products, like Windows, like Office, like Windows Server, you can imagine we're going to be focusing most of our marketing talent, and most of our attention on those areas.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENDAN BARNICLE, Pacific Crest Securities:  Thanks so much.
Peter, should we assume that we're going to see the same Windows Upgrade rights around Windows 8 that we've seen around prior releases?  And, therefore, should we be expecting to see some big swings in Windows revenue at some point in the middle of next year or some point during next year because of the deferrals like we've seen in the past?
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Brendan.
Obviously, we're super-excited about the launch of Windows 8, and we're heads down trying to get that released.
We haven't said anything, and will not today.
But we'll have more to talk about in terms of programs and promotions as we get closer to the launch date.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay, Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Hi, good afternoon.
When you look through the pretty extensive product refreshes you have across the portfolio, are you thinking that there may be the possibility that customers may pause in any of your products?  And as you look at seasonality, is there a likelihood that we might see a bit more pronounced seasonality leading up into some of the big launches?
PETER KLEIN:  I think generally, particularly in the enterprise, you don't really see a seasonality impact.
As you think about how large enterprises plan their information technology spend, they sort of have a long-term roadmap, they're on it.
They execute against it when they do.
Obviously, our long-term roadmap, as I said, impacts that.
And so it's more about their long-term planning cycles than it is about sort of any product cycle, particularly in the enterprise which is where a lot of the growth is coming from, and a lot of the products are coming from.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay, Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
RAIMO LENSCHOW, Barclays:  Thanks for taking my question, and congrats on the quarter.
I was having a forward-looking question on the gross margin.
Remember in the last few quarters that you had a slight negative mix effect there.
As I look into the new product launches into the next year, they're in all kind of high gross margin areas.
Is there anything that stops that feeding through in the P&L, or should it be a straightforward one?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Well, you're correct.
Mix is what drives the gross margin percentage, and obviously we saw that this quarter.
And so, you're right in the math of that, if there's good growth, better growth in higher margin products that will have a positive impact on gross margin.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowan:  Okay, thank you.
This past quarter both Gartner and IDC saw a better than expected PC up-tick in the European corporate market, and your reported Windows revenues certainly support that.
I know broadly speaking the business refresh was healthy.
I just was wondering if there is anything you would add that might have contributed to an up-tick in Europe PC growth?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Nothing specific to add to that.
As we talked about, we saw broad based growth geographically in business in particular, and so there's nothing unusual or specific in Europe about that.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay.
Operator, last question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
JASON MAYNARD, Wells Fargo:  Good afternoon, guys.
I had a question on the Fiscal '13 OPEX guidance, which is a couple of points, looks like, if you use the midpoint, ahead of the Fiscal '12 growth rate.
And I'm just curious, the delta obviously I would assume would come to some of the product launches.
But the question broader is, do you think you have enough spend baked into that model to account for the big push you're going to need to make around perhaps on the smartphone side given that that's an area where you're coming from behind, given all the other products that you're going to be releasing, and obviously consumer push, and some of the new enterprise products?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Jason.
Obviously, over the last several years and even longer, we've really been focused on making sure we're prioritizing our spend to the highest value areas.
And so you ask a good question, and our approach is exactly the same like we've done the last couple of years.
We're really looking at next year and saying, how can we move effectively and most efficiently allocate the resources to the areas that drive the best long-term results.
And we think we've got a good balance there, as we've had in the past.
We've tried to be transparent and consistent in that, and really predictably execute against that.
I think what we've got next year is a good balance between the exciting launches that we have that really drive both short and long-term growth as well as hopefully a good financial result.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay, so that will wrap-up our Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
We look forward to seeing many of you at the numerous conferences in which we will be participating this quarter.
For those of you unable to attend in person, you will be able to follow our comments at Microsoft.com/investor.
Please contact us if you have any additional questions or need additional details.
Thanks again for joining us today.
Really appreciate it, and take care.
Bye-bye.
END
Bill Koefoed, Peter Klein
Thursday, July 19, 2012
(Operator Direction.)
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Erin.
And thank you, everyone, for joining us this afternoon.
As usual with me today are Peter Klein, Chief Financial Officer; Frank Brod, Chief Accounting Officer; and John Seethoff, Deputy General Counsel.
On our website, Microsoft.com/investor, is our financial summary slide deck, which is intended to follow our prepared remarks, and provide the reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
Note that all growth comparisons we make on the call today will relate to the corresponding period of last year.
Unless specified otherwise, all impacted numbers for the current quarter have been adjusted for the $540 million revenue deferral related to the Windows Upgrade Offer, and the previously announced $6.2 billion goodwill impairment charge.
As a reminder, we will post today's prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript at the Microsoft Investor Relations website until July 19, 2013.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements that are predictions, projections, or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Forms 10-Qs, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
Okay.
And, with that, I'll turn the call over to Peter.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Bill.
And thanks everyone for joining us.
We started the fiscal year with good momentum, and closed with a solid finish.
Throughout the year, we delivered top line growth, and remained disciplined on cost management while continuing to execute on our product roadmap.
Our enterprise products and services remain a top priority for CIOs as they navigate macroeconomic challenges.
They are adopting our solutions for increased productivity, manageability, and security at an overall lower total cost of ownership.
Windows 7 and Office 2010 both reached new milestones as enterprises benefit from our business desktop offering.
Today, over 50 percent of enterprise desktops worldwide are running Windows 7.
And software assurance attach rates are at an all-time high.
And even two years after launch, Office 2010 attach continues to grow as businesses make long-term commitments to the Office platforms.
Our productivity server offerings continue to perform very well with double-digit growth.
Our newest server offering, Lync, grew over 45 percent this quarter, and we are excited about the unified communications scenarios that are enabled by new voice, video and social capabilities.
Office remains the number one productivity application, and today it's on more than one billion PCs worldwide.
On Monday, we released the customer preview of the new Office, which puts mobility, social, and cloud at the forefront.
Combined with the power of Windows 8, we are enabling a new platform of computing that gives the end user unparalleled choice for consumption and productivity.
Our Server and Tools products deliver on the vision of the modern data center by enabling multi-tenancy, scalability, and continuous services, all while using a single pane of glass for management.
No other technology company can offer the hybrid cloud solutions that give customers the ability to manage and scale their applications, data and processes across both public and private clouds.
As I look back, when I first became CFO of Server and Tools in 2003, it was a $7 billion business.
Since then, it has grown to nearly $19 billion in revenue, and the opportunity for future growth has never been better.
Xbox continued its evolution as an entertainment platform, and has solidified its place in the living room.
With the help of Kinect and Bing, discovering and accessing content has never been easier.
And with the recently announced Xbox Smart Glass, we look to make entertainment smarter, more interactive, and more fun.
Moving to the Online Services Division, we continue to grow share, increase revenue per search, and improve operating performance.
Despite this progress, our expectations for future growth and profitability are now lower than we previously expected.
As we announced earlier this month, we took a write-down on the goodwill that arose mainly form the aQuantive acquisition.
We continue to believe that search is a strategic asset for Microsoft, and are prioritizing our resources into the areas we believe drive the most business value.
With Windows 8 and Windows Phone 8, we see a great opportunity to benefit from the trend towards smart mobile devices.
We feel that we are uniquely positioned to address the security and manageability challenges that CIOs are dealing with today as a result of this trend.
And for users, we offer compelling experiences across devices with data and services that are connected seamlessly via the cloud.
In summary, we delivered solid financial results while embarking on the largest launch wave in our history.
We are pleased with the long-term commitment that enterprise customers are making to our offerings as it demonstrates a high level of confidence in our product and service roadmap.
Importantly, customer satisfaction is at an all-time high.
This past year, we delivered significant product releases, such as SQL Server 2012, System Center 2012, and updates from Azure, Bing, and Xbox Live.
And enthusiasm is building for the coming year that includes important releases from Windows, Windows Phone, Office, and Windows Server.
With those thoughts, I'll hand it back to Bill to provide more details on our results, and then I'll come back to provide some thoughts on our outlook for the first quarter, and full Fiscal Year 2013.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Peter.
First, I'm going to review our overall results, and then I'll move on to the details by business segment.
Revenue for the quarter was $18.6 billion, up 7 percent or $1.2 billion.
Operating income was $6.9 billion, up 12 percent.
Earnings per share was 73 cents, up 6 percent.
Cash flow from operations was $7.7 billion, up 29 percent.
And for the full year, it was a record $31.6 billion.
Foreign exchange did not materially impact our net income this quarter.
From a geographic perspective, developed markets grew mid single digits, and we saw continued double-digit growth in emerging markets.
We delivered solid financial results despite a tough economic environment, which demonstrates the strength and breadth of our businesses.
Our compelling product portfolio across Windows, Server and Tools, and the Microsoft Business Division is driving strong demand from small businesses to the largest global enterprises.
Multi-year licensing revenue grew 14 percent, and made up over 40 percent of our total revenue for the quarter.
Unearned revenue was a record $19.5 billion, up 14 percent, and our contracted not billed balanced was over $19.5 billion.
Turning to the PC market, we estimate that the worldwide PC market was roughly flat this quarter, with approximately 85 million PCs sold.
Business PCs were up 1 percent, and consumer PCs were down 2 percent.
Next, I'll move on to the results for the Windows and Windows Live Division, where revenue was generally in line with the PC market.
As in past quarters, you will find the OEM revenue bridge in our earnings slide deck.
Adoption of Windows 7 remains strong, especially among enterprises, which are benefiting from the security and management capabilities that come with the operating system.
This quarter volume licensing revenue grew double digits.
During the quarter, we launched the release preview of Windows 8 to a positive reception, and we recently announced that Windows 8 will reach general availability on October 26th.
Windows 8 represents a significant opportunity for developers, OEMs, and other partners to extend a new range of form factors, capabilities, and scenarios to billions of people around the world.
Now, I'll move on to the Microsoft Business Division, where revenue grew 7 percent.
Business revenue grew 9 percent, and within that multi-year licensing revenue grew 12 percent, and transactional revenue grew 2 percent driven by higher attach worldwide.
Consumer revenue declined 4 percent reflecting consumer PC dynamics in developed markets, which was partially offset by higher attach rates.
We saw strong growth in our productivity server offerings with Exchange, SharePoint, and Lync collectively growing double digits this quarter.
CIOs continue to invest in our application roadmap, and new productivity scenarios.
As Peter mentioned, Lync revenue growth accelerated to over 45 percent as enterprises chose our unified communications platform.
We believe unified communications is a huge market opportunity, and we are pleased to see these results.
Just a year ago, we introduced Office 365.
It is now offered in 88 markets and 32 languages.
In just one year some of the biggest global brands have embraced Office 365 to share information and connect with customers and partners.
Global brands such as Lowe's, Qantas, Japan Airlines, and Hallmark Cards have adopted Office 365 to unify their communication and collaboration experience with a secure, trusted platform.
Earlier this week, we released the customer preview of the next version of Office.
It features an intuitive design that works great on Windows 8 with touch, stylus, mouse or keyboard.
It is available as a cloud-based subscription service, and includes Skype credits, and extra SkyDrive storage.
With SkyDrive integration, content is always available across all types of devices.
It enables modern scenarios, such as digital note taking, reading and markup.
It is social and makes it easy to connect with people and information.
With People Card there is an integrated view of contacts from LinkedIn and Facebook.
And speaking of social, this morning we announced that we have closed the Yammer acquisition.
Yammer ads best in class enterprise social networking to our portfolio of cloud-based productivity services.
Dynamics revenue grew 7 percent and within that Dynamics CRM revenue grew over 25 percent and added 360,000 users this quarter.
We now have more than 2.7 million users and 36,000 customers that use Dynamics CRM to get a consistent and familiar experience inside Office.
Now, let's move to Server and Tools, which posted another solid quarter with 13 percent revenue growth.
Transactional revenue declined to low single digits, while multi-year licensing revenue grew more than 20 percent, fueled by the wave of our new server products.
Enterprise services grew 15 percent.
In the private cloud Windows Server premium revenue grew double digits, with greater scalability, improved performance, and cost efficiencies, Hyper-V continues to win share against VMware.
In anticipation of what is coming in Windows Server 2012, we are already seeing customers like Unilever move form VMware to Hyper-V.
System Center revenue grew roughly 20 percent and we continued building momentum and demand for our private cloud capabilities.
With the release of System Center 2012, and our leadership in Windows Server Active Directory, we have a compelling device management and application delivery platform.
In the public cloud we launched a major release of Windows Azure, which enables infrastructure as a service capabilities, ads 48 countries, offers media services, and brings new capabilities to developers.
We are excited that Windows Azure Media Services is being used to deliver Olympics coverage in high definition.
This quarter Windows Azure had significant customer and partner wins and we added roughly 800 new enterprise customers.
In our data platform business SQL Server revenue grew 20 percent, outpacing industry growth.
Every week we see customers moving to SQL Server, because of its superior business analytics, security, flexibility, and cost effectiveness.
SQL Server Premium revenue grew more than 30 percent, as enterprises continue to deploy it for their mission critical workloads, and business intelligence needs.
High performance and BI capabilities offered by SQL Server 2012, along with Hadoop integration will enable our customers to capture the full potential of big data.
As I look back at the year, SQL Server revenue grew more than half-a-billion dollars and with the technology advancements in SQL Server 2012 we are well positioned for future growth.
Next I will move on to the Online Services Division, where revenue grew 8 percent and operating performance improved by 266 million, or 36 percent.
Online advertising revenue was up 12 percent, driven primarily by rate improvement in our search business.
Bing's U.S.
organic market share ended the quarter at 15.6 percent, up 120 basis points, year-over-year.
In the Entertainment and Devices Division revenue grew 20 percent, despite the soft console market Xbox continues its leadership position and had 47 percent share of the U.S.
market in June.
Additionally, Xbox Live membership increased by more than 15 percent; driven in part by the new content partners we have brought to Xbox.
We also announced Xbox SmartGlass, which will connect phones, PCs, and tablets with the Xbox 360 console, to enable more interactive and engaging entertainment.
For Windows Phone there are now approximately 100,000 apps in the marketplace, and Windows Phone unit sales grew more than 50 percent sequentially.
In June we announced that Windows Phone 8 will arrive later this year.
Windows Phone 8 is based on the same core technologies that power Windows 8, and it will unleash a new wave of features for consumers, developers, and businesses.
Moving on to Skype.
We continue to progress with the integration and you got a taste of that with our Office announcement this week.
This quarter 115 billion minutes of calls were made on the Skype network, an increase of over 50 percent from the prior year.
I will now cover the remainder of the income statement.
Cost of goods sold increased 12 percent, primarily due to Nokia platform payments, inclusion of Skype costs, and growth in enterprise services.
Operating expenses were flat at $7.5 billion.
Operating income increased 12 percent to $6.9 billion.
This quarter we returned $2.7 billion to shareholders in buybacks and dividends.
So, to wrap up, we saw strong demand from our business customers, leading to solid financial results.
Along with our revenue growth we were able to maintain strong cost discipline and drive operating margin expansion.
And with that, I will hand it back to Peter who is going to discuss our business outlook.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Bill.
For the remainder of the call I'll discuss our expectations for the first quarter and full Fiscal Year 2013.
As we look forward we expect many of the trends from 2012 to continue, companies will prioritize the transition to the modern desktop.
CIOs will continue to invest in cloud solutions to deliver productivity and scalability to their business.
Consumers will increasingly leverage cloud services to ensure their content is always available across any of their devices.
Rapid innovation will continue in hardware, services, and the underlying infrastructure that is needed to support mobile computing.
With our current portfolio and roadmap we believe we are well positioned to capitalize on these trends.
Now turning to our outlook by business.
For Windows, in the first quarter we expect to defer 1.0 to 1.2 billion related to the Windows upgrade offer and presales of Windows 8 to OEMs prior to general availability.
Just a reminder that amounts deferred for the Windows upgrade offer will get recognized upon the earlier of redemption, or the expiration of the program on February 28, 2013.
We expect the current dynamics of the PC marketplace to continue in the first quarter.
Excluding the impact of the deferrals associated with the Windows upgrade offer and pre-sales, we expect Windows revenue to slightly trail the PC market for the quarter.
With new touch-enabled features in Windows 8, and new form factors hitting the market this fall, we expect Windows 8 to drive the PC ecosystem forward.
Excluding the deferrals from Fiscal Year 2012, for the year we expect Windows revenue to be roughly in line with the PC market.
Note that this does not include the impact of Surface PCs, which we will update you on in the coming months.
In the Microsoft Business division multi-year licensing revenue, which is approximately 60 percent of the division's total, should grow low double digits for both the first quarter and full year.
Transactional revenue, which is the remaining revenue in the division, should lag the overall PC market until the launch of Office, due to the normal cyclical slowdown in advance of the next version, and then slightly out-perform the PC market post-launch.
In Server and Tools our customers are moving from transactional licensing to multi-year licensing agreements.
This impacts our mix of revenue and for next year we expect multi-year licensing to be approximately 60 percent of the division's revenue, transactional licensing to be 20 percent, and enterprise services to remain at 20 percent.
With the shift in multi-year agreements, we expect transactional revenue to slightly lag the overall server hardware market for the first quarter and full year.
For both the first quarter and the year we expect multi-year licensing revenue and enterprise services revenue to both grow low teens.
In the Online Services Division we look to build upon improvements in share and search monetization with focused investment in the highest value areas.
For our entertainment and devices division, while we have been maintaining our share leadership position, the console market has been showing year-over-year declines.
For games, Halo 4 will launch in Q2, while gears of war was a Q1 title last year.
With these considerations in mind we expect revenue to decline high-teens in the first quarter, and to be roughly flat for the full year.
We expect COGS to grow single digits in the first quarter, due primarily to the Nokia payment addition of Skype, and growth in enterprise services partially offset by lower console volumes.
We are reaffirming our guidance for operating expenses of $30.3 to $30.9 billion for Fiscal 2013, and as you create your models you should expect higher expense growth rates around the timing of the launches.
As a reminder, other income includes dividend and interest income, offset by interest expense and the net cost of hedging.
In the current low interest rate environment we expect these items to generally offset absent one-time events.
For the full Fiscal Year we expect our effective tax rate to be 19 to 21 percent, and capital expenditures to be slightly over $3 billion.
Adjusting for the impact of the Windows upgrade offer and presales we expect unearned revenue will roughly follow historical sequential growth patterns for the first quarter.
In summary, we delivered solid financial results in both the fourth quarter and for the full fiscal year.
We enter Fiscal 2013 with great momentum and are excited about our upcoming launches.
With that, I'll turn the call over to Bill and we'll take some questions.
BILL KOEFOED:  Thanks, Peter.
We want to get to questions from as many of you as possible, so please stick to just one question, and avoid long or multi-part questions.
Erin, can you please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
(Operator direction.)
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  Hey, guys.
Thank you and congratulations on a good end to the year.
In past Windows cycles commercial and retail licensing and inventory rebuild have enabled you to outpace the PC market.
How should we think about those factors around Windows 8 and are you including OEM-related tablet sales in your PC market forecast for next year, or should we be excluding those like Surface?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Adam.
I'd go back to the  the first question, I'll go back to the sort of guidance we gave for how we expect Windows to really ignite the PC market and how we expect Windows to do relative to the PC market.
Obviously we said it was going to lag a little bit in the first quarter, pre-launch, and for the full year we'd be roughly in line.
Obviously that means for the remainder of the year slightly ahead.
And also, think about sort of emerging markets versus developed markets and what that means for the overall growth of Windows, relative to the hardware market.
On the second question on the PC market, I would sort of say when we talk about the PC market we're largely consistent with how the third parties would report on the PC market traditionally.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator direction.)
RICK SHERLUND, Nomura:  Thanks.
On Office 365 I'm kind of curious how we should be thinking about how that revenue ramps up.
You haven't really talked much about the availability of Office 365.
I know it's included with WinRT.
Should we expect then that it's broadly available in the market with the October 26 launch date of Windows 8?
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Rick.
I think generally you're characterizing it correctly.
We're really excited about the new Office and what that means for Office 365, being broadly available for both consumers and enterprises.
And we do think this is a real accelerant for the business.
To date it's been a really compelling part of the overall Office story.
We talk with every customer about the cloud roadmap and that's one of the drivers of what we're seeing broadly across MBD, not just in Office, but in SharePoint, Lync, and Exchange.
And I think you're thinking about this right that when we get to the new Office in conjunction with Windows 8 we really accelerate what we're doing for both consumers, as well as businesses of all sizes.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator direction.)
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Thank you.
Yahoo! in their earnings call on Tuesday reported that the revenue per search they're getting from Microsoft is below the Microsoft guaranteed threshold and that the guarantee expires Q1 2013, I guess that's Q1 2013.
The CFO alluded to a clause in the search agreement that gives Yahoo! an out if there's no parity.
First, is this correct, and second what if any impact would this have on the search strategy if they decided to break this agreement?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, what I'd say Mark is we're sort of laser beam focused on the partnership that we have with Yahoo.
We've been very encouraged by the improvements, the year-over-year improvements we've seen over the last several quarters.
And to be honest, 100 percent of our focus right now is on making sure we continue to drive those gains, which will benefit both parties of the partnership, and make sure that's successful for both companies, because it's obviously very strategic for both of us.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Hi, thank you very much.
Peter, you mentioned on the call the increase in Server and Tools multi-year licensing revenue as a percentage of the total segment.
I'm just wondering if you could walk us through kind of what the biggest drivers are behind that and should we expect kind of the trajectory we're seeing here to continue?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Heather.
The biggest piece of that we're seeing is SQL.
And we're getting so much great traction with big enterprises.
We're really starting to make progress in Tier-1 applications.
And what we're seeing now is many more long-term, multi-year agreements for SQL, which used to be more of a transactional business, but now as bigger companies are making the commitment to our data platform, putting their mission critical applications on it, they are signing more of a new kind of licensing that we have just for SQL for multi-year licensing agreements.
So, by far the biggest impact is in SQL and, yes, with the new version of SQL Server 2012 we expect that to continue.
BILL KOEFOED:  Just to add on, I mentioned in my script that year-over-year revenue for SQL was up over half-a-billion dollars.
Just awesome momentum in SQL and the database business and our competitive strategy in the marketplace has just really been playing out.
Operator, next question please.
(Operator direction.)
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citigroup:  Great, thanks.
I wanted to just ask a follow-up, or ask a question on the contracted backlog.
I know we're accustomed to looking at that with the unearned number, but it looks like that number, if I look at the sequential trend there, it was a little light of what we've seen on similar Q4s, where you've seen a more robust quarter over quarter growth.
I'm just wondering was there something about the shape of the enterprise annuity business, or what you saw in the quarter that caused that?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Walter.
No, as you pointed out, we tend to look at it all up on our sort of annuity business, both contracted, as well as the unearned and taken as a whole.
We're obviously very pleased with what we're doing.
We're pleased with the performance we've had with our customers.
We're pleased with the renewal rates.
We're pleased with the trend that we just talked about with SQL.
I wouldn't highlight anything unusual there.
BILL KOEFOED:  I would just add on that our enterprise agreement renewal rate was certainly within, if not at the higher end of our historical range.
So, we feel really good about the execution of the sales force this quarter and I think that definitely played out toward the end of the fiscal year.
Operator, next question please.
(Operator direction.)
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi, thanks guys, another great quarter.
I just want to focus back on the EDD division.
You talked about relatively flatish revenue.
You gave a lot of color on some things, in terms of revenue contributions there.
But, when you think about the operating expenses, and just the profitability of that business, what would you expect this coming fiscal year, and at sort of this point in the cycle?
PETER KLEIN:  When I think about E&D I feel really good about the evolution of the business model for the entertainment business.
You've seen us really add the content partners that we have and grow the Xbox Live business.
So, historically the profitability has been largely sensitive to the console market, and that's still a big piece of it.
But, as we broaden the business we now are at different revenue streams.
And obviously the other thing I would say is with Halo 4 coming later this year, having a really hot first-party title is always a great thing from a profit perspective.
When I think about the business model going forward I feel great about some of the content that's coming.
I feel great about the subscription business with Xbox Live and some of the access and discoverability we have with Kinect and Bing, as well.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question please.
(Operator direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Good afternoon.
Peter, you've had a really strong multi-year operating margin improvement in the server business and I was just curious if you could give us a sense of what you're seeing that's causing that and how should we think about that going forward, in terms of that trajectory?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, I know.
It's a great question.
As that business has really accelerated and shown great revenue growth, we're obviously getting the benefits of the scale that you get, right, because a lot of the expenses are R&D expenses, and so we've really been able to improve those margins at the same time that we've been building out both the public and private cloud assets as well.
And as we talked about before, we're really encouraged by the trajectory of that business, and we think there's continued headroom from that perspective.
BILL KOEFOED:  I would just add on,  when Satya spoke at one of the conferences this past year, he talked about the fact that our roadmap there is something that enterprises are really buying into.
He used this term "hybrid cloud" and he talks about this is a strategy of working with enterprises to focus in their on premises capability as well as their public cloud capability, and being able to offer the opportunity for people to kind of manage that interchangeably.
And really feel like we've got just the unique set of capabilities there.
And as Peter said, we've been making a lot of investment there, and you're really seeing that show up in our revenue growth.
Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  Hi, thank you very much.
If the PC market, if you were to include Windows OEM tablets as well, and if Windows tablets really grow faster than conventional PCs, would you be able to stick to your comment that Windows revenue would grow in line with the PC market?  Thank you.
BILL KOEFOED:  Yes.
Let me take that.
There's a whole bunchI think Peter talked about this a second ago, but there's just a whole bunch of moving pieces in there.
As he talked about, there's emerging markets that are growing faster than developed markets.
Obviously, there's a different pricing.
We have different prices in emerging markets than we do in developed markets.
Obviously there's also some upgrade revenue that we'd be recognizing during this year.
I think, Kash, to your point, there could be some tablet growth.
Look, to be honest, it could grow faster.
But, at the same time, the best estimates that we have are that we're going to grow in line with all the information that we have available.
KASH RANGAN:  Thank you, Bill.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
JOHN DIFUCCI, JP Morgan:  Thank you.
My question is to the Server and Tools Business.
I guess when I back into what the transactional business is, I guess the question is did it decline this quarter?  And when I look at the guidance you're giving, Peter, why would the transactional business slightly lag the hardware market?  I think that sort of implies that you're losing share, and I don't think that that's what's happening out there.
Can you help me a little bit with this?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
No, you're right.
It's not losing share, it's that it's transitioning to the multi-year licensing business for both Windows Server and SQL Server.
So, that's really what we're seeing.
And Bill gave you some of the numbers when he was talking about some of the growth in SQL Server revenue, and just the all-up multi-year licensing business for the Server and Tools Business.
It's really just a mix to the multi-year agreements, which we love because it's people making longer-term commitments to the platform.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  So, these are people that had been buying transactional that are moving to multi-year, because it sounded a little bit like they were large enterprises that might have been shifting, and buying more Windows than they would have bought other stuff in the past.
PETER KLEIN:  In general, in total, when people are buying new Server and Tools Products, they're more often going to multi-year licensing agreements than transaction, where that wasn't as much the case in the past.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENDAN BARNICLE, Pacific Crest Securities:  Thanks so much.
Guys, you mentioned that in SQL Server 2012 you're going to have Hadoop support.
I was wondering if you could give us any more details on what you're planning there, and what we might look for in terms of functionality that's going to be enhanced with the Hadoop support edition?
BILL KOEFOED:  You know, Brendan, neither Peter nor I are probably technically savvy enough to be able to offer a great answer on that one.
But we're happy to get somebody form the Server and Tools Business who can go deep on the technology, and we'd love to talk about what we're doing around that, and certainly arrange a follow-up call with you in the future.
So, thanks for the question, and we'll follow-up with you.
Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
RAIMO LENSCHOW, Barclays:  I'm going back to Adam's question at the beginning, if you think about the timing of the Windows 8 launch, and the impact it has on the financials, is there anything that we should think differently this time given that you have like new form factors, the tablets are coming in, your OEM partners still need to come up.
So, have you tried to model the financial impact?  Do we need to be aware of a slight delay there compared to previous cycles?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Well, I would refer you to the guidance that I gave when we look forward, and the general answer would be, like in previous launches, we're incredibly excited about the capabilities, probably actually more excited about what we're doing with Windows 8 and re-imagining what you can do with Windows.
And in particular what we're doing, and what our OEM partners are doing to deliver really cool devices, and really exciting form factors.
So, the general answer is, no, we're probably more excited about this launch than any launch in along time.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
COLIN GILLIS, BCG Financial:  I just want to follow up on the transition from transactional to long-term agreements, and also the success with the renewals.
Can you just give a few factors for this?  Is it the product roadmap, is it cost savings?
PETER KLEIN:  You know, thank you, it's actually all of those things.
Certainly, the product roadmap, and the new capabilities that we have cross the board, whether that's System Center 2012 and SQL Server 2012, which is now, and what's coming in Windows Server later this year, as well as the public-private cloud story, which really, really resonates.
So, what people are investing in is that roadmap, because they see where they're going long-term, and they're partnering with us to get where they need to get long-term through the increased capabilities in our technology.
And I would add that total cost of ownership does play a big piece of that, particularly on the SQL side.
COLIN GILLIS:  Congratulations.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Yes.
Good afternoon.
I would like to come back to Server and Tools, you mentioned Lync was growing 45 percent.
What's behind that?  Is it competitive wins or new implementations, or attach in multi-component deals?  And also if you could address the impact of some of the licensing changes on the growth in SQL Server?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Let me start with Lync, and I'll try and tame myself because I just love Lync.
The reason it's growing so fast is because of the capabilities that it provides, as well as the cost savings it provides for companies is really compelling, and it really resonates well with customers.
It's lots of new implementations.
Some of it is competitive, some of it is just new applications that people think of really re-imagining how communications happens.
This is one place where the Skype acquisitions plays in and kind of what we showed a little bit this week is how we're really re-imagining communications broadly for all of our customers.
And that story really resonates very well.
It's very easy to sell, it's very easy to see.
The capabilities are very easy to show.
So, that's just a great product, a great set of capabilities, a great value proposition for CIOs and end users alike.
And, as Bill said, we think unified communications is a really big market opportunity for us, and we've felt that for a long time, and we're really starting to see it with this version of Lync, and what we're doing going forward.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowen and Company:  Thank you.
Good afternoon.
The premium mix went down 6 points sequentially, and was lower than we've seen in a while.
Just wondering if you think a fair amount of this was perhaps driven by the Windows 8 program where users can pay one price to upgrade regardless of what Win7 SKU that they buy, or whether due to emerging markets and other factors.
PETER KLEIN:  Mostly emerging markets.
You're right about that.
BILL KOEFOED:  Operator, next question, please.
Actually, this will be our last question.
(Operator Direction.)
BRAD REBACK, Stifel Nicholas:  Great.
Thanks a lot.
Peter, you talked about CAPEX being about $3, it's been running at about $2-2.3 the last couple of years, so about a 30 percent increase.
What's that predominantly related to?
PETER KLEIN:  Mostly related to the increase in our cloud businesses sort of across the board.
We're getting good adoption and acceleration, so it's a little bit of an increase related across the board, Azure, Office 365 capacity.
BILL KOEFOED:  Okay, great.
That will wrap-up our Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
We hope you all have a great summer.
We look forward to seeing many of you at the numerous conferences in which we will be participating this quarter.
For those of you unable to attend in person, you will be able to follow our comments at Microsoft.com/investor.
Please contact us if you need any additional details.
Thanks again for joining the call today.
And have a great day.
END
Microsoft First Quarter 2013 Prepared Remarks
On our website, Microsoft.com/investor, is our financial summary slide deck, which is intended to follow our prepared remarks, and provide the reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
Note that all growth comparisons we make on the call today will relate to the corresponding period of last year.
Unless specified otherwise, all impacted numbers for the current quarter have been adjusted for the $1.2 billion revenue deferral related to the Windows Upgrade Offer and Windows 8 pre-sales to OEMs, and the $189 million revenue deferral primarily related to the Office Offer.
As a reminder, we will post today's prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript at the Microsoft Investor Relations website until October 18, 2013.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements that are predictions, projections, or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Forms 10-Qs, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
Okay.
And, with that, I'll turn the call over to Peter.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Our first quarter revenue was flat year over year at $17.4 billion, reflecting solid growth in multi-year licensing but a slowdown in transactional revenue.
Our transactional revenue, which includes our OEM business, was impacted by a challenging PC market, normal purchasing slowdowns in advance of upcoming product launches, and tough economic conditions, particularly in Europe.
This impact was offset by growth in multi-year licensing revenue which benefited from healthy renewals of enterprise agreements as customers continue to make long-term commitments to the Microsoft platform.
Our productivity and infrastructure offerings remain a top priority for CIOs.
	In productivity, our collaboration and communication solutions continued to perform well with double-digit revenue growth this quarter.
	In the datacenter, our virtualization capabilities and hybrid-cloud scenarios are enabling enterprises to move to the modern datacenter on their terms.
	And on the data platform, we are well-positioned to take share as customers increasingly turn to SQL Server 2012 for their mission critical workloads and business intelligence needs.
As part of our ongoing focus to increase the overall value we bring to our customers, we are enhancing our unique hybrid IT capabilities with targeted acquisitions like StorSimple and PhoneFactor.
Acquisitions of industry-leading solutions like these accelerate our ability to help CIOs better manage their environments.
As I mentioned earlier, the PC market was challenged this quarter.
In addition to a tough economic environment and competitive pressures, OEMs drew down their Windows 7 inventory as they began the transition to Windows 8.
Our partners are building an incredible breadth of hardware.
To date, we have certified over 1,000 unique Windows 8 systems including beautiful new tablets, convertibles, laptops, and all-in-ones.
And there will be more to come.
As I look at where we are, we have kicked off the largest launch wave in our history, and in a twelve-month period, we will have refreshed nearly all of our major products.
With these launches, you are seeing the investments weve made over a number of years converge.
And more importantly, you are seeing us execute on our commitment to deliver devices and services that people love and businesses need.
Whether we build our own devices, as we have chosen to do with Xbox and Surface, or work with our partners to develop stunning new Windows devices, we will continue to offer consumers and businesses wide-ranging choices so that every user can get exactly what they want, at the price that is right for them.
With Windows 8 and our cloud services, we will delight users with an integrated experience across their devices.
Right out of the box, Windows customers will be connected to unique communications, productivity and entertainment services from both Microsoft and our partners.
With services like SkyDrive, which allows users to store and manage their data online, or the recently announced Xbox Music, which brings entertainment to the forefront, users can access their content seamlessly, from any device, at any time.
With the new Office, which will be made available in the coming months, we will enable productivity scenarios that take full advantage of the hardware coming to market, including new mobile form factors with touch and pen capabilities.
And with Skype, Yammer, and other services, we put social directly into productivity and collaboration.
Within the enterprise, CIOs are using technology to drive their business strategy forward.
Whether its making employees more productive, unlocking key business insights, or managing a growing number of devices, we are uniquely positioned to address their needs.
Our products are scalable and flexible, and provide the lowest total cost of ownership.
As we enter this new era at Microsoft, theres incredible opportunity for our partners, developers and customers, and we are well-positioned for sustained profit growth in the future.
With those thoughts, I will hand it back to Bill for more details on our results, and then Ill come back to provide some thoughts on our outlook for the second quarter and full fiscal year 2013.
BILL KOEFOED, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
First, I'm going to review our overall results, and then I'll move on to the details by business segment.
Revenue for the quarter was flat at $17.4 billion.
Operating income was $6.7 billion, down 7%.
Earnings per share was 65 cents, a decline of 4%.
Cash flow from operations was roughly flat at $8.5 billion.
Foreign exchange had a $257 million or 2 percentage point negative impact to revenue this quarter, but the impact to net income was immaterial.
From a geographic perspective, this quarter we saw tough conditions in Europe, where revenue declined mid-single digits.
In emerging markets, PCs were roughly flat, a significant deceleration from the growth rates we had been seeing previously.
Our enterprise business in emerging markets continued its double-digit revenue growth.
When looking at our revenue mix, consumer and business transactional revenue declined, which is typical ahead of launches.
Multi-year licensing revenue remained strong with 15% growth, representing roughly 45 percent of our total revenue for the quarter.
When adjusted for the $1.9 billion cumulative impact of the Windows and Office revenue deferrals, unearned revenue was $17.7 billion, up 13%.
Our contracted not billed balance was roughly $20 billion.
Now lets move on to the PC market.
We saw the overall PC market decline this quarter in advance of the launch of Windows 8, and in part due to competitive pressures and the challenging macroeconomic climate I noted earlier.
Business outperformed consumer, and emerging markets outpaced developed markets, although at a reduced rate.
Moving to the results for the Windows Division, revenue declined 9% and lagged the PC market due to OEM inventory drawdown prior to the Windows 8 launch and the ASP dynamics of emerging markets relative to developed markets.
We have discontinued the bridge to the PC market, as Windows 8 will be a platform across a broad set of form factors.
As we go forward, we will provide updated information and metrics about our business performance in the new context.
The shape of Windows revenue this quarter was non-linear as revenue slowed down dramatically in the first two months, driven by the weak PC market dynamics.
Revenue accelerated in September as OEMs started to build up for Windows 8 launch demand.
Windows 8 OEM pre-sales revenue was roughly $800 million, approximately 40% higher than Windows 7 pre-sales revenue in the comparable launch quarter.
This quarter volume licensing revenue grew double-digits and our Windows 7 enterprise deployments continued to grow though at a slower rate than last quarter.
On Tuesday we announced pricing, market availability and opened pre-orders for Surface.
Next week, on October 26th, we will launch Windows 8 and Surface.
With a modern user interface, ability to support multiple form factors, and a rich platform to build apps, Windows 8 opens up significant opportunities for partners, developers and customers.
Now, I'll move on to the Microsoft Business Division, where revenue grew 1 percent.
Business revenue grew 3 percent, and within that, multi-year licensing revenue grew 8 percent.
Reflecting the PC market dynamics, consumer revenue declined 8 percent.
Last week, we released to manufacturing the new Office and announced that it will be generally available in the third quarter of fiscal year 2013.
The new Office has a fresh look and touch-friendly interface that lights-up on Windows 8 devices.
Since the customer preview in July, millions of people have downloaded the preview or signed up for the service and we feel great about the feedback and positive response from users.
The new Office is also in the cloud and features social enterprise capabilities with SharePoint, Yammer and Skype.
It is our most comprehensive Office release ever.
Our productivity server offerings continued to perform well.
Exchange, SharePoint, and Lync collectively grew double-digits again this quarter.
Lync revenue grew at an impressive rate of over 40% as enterprises chose our unified communications platform for their communication and collaboration needs.
Dynamics revenue grew mid-single digits and within that Dynamics CRM revenue grew over 30 percent.
This quarter, we announced key milestones to our ERP portfolio with updates to Dynamics GP and NAV.
Both these releases deliver great value to customers and partners through faster and more efficient implementations and compelling application functionality.
Now, let's move to Server and Tools, which posted another solid quarter with over 20 percent bookings growth and 8 percent revenue growth.
Enterprise services grew 13 percent and multi-year licensing revenue grew 19 percent driven by new customers who are investing in our product wave.
Transactional revenue declined this quarter driven in part by a slower server hardware market and customers switching to multi-year licensing.
In the datacenter, we are seeing strong adoption of our platform across cloud, on-premise, and hybrid scenarios.
System Center revenue grew more than 20 percent and we launched Windows Server 2012 in September with increased management and virtualization capabilities.
Customers like Acer, Equifax and Volkswagen Financial Services are already using its robust set of technologies and features including network virtualization, live migration, and continuous availability.
We continue to gain virtualization share as customers like Pella and the City of Barcelona switch from VMware to Hyper-V and System Center to build private clouds with increased efficiencies and higher savings.
In the public cloud we continued the pace of innovation and announced the release preview of Windows Azure Mobile Services which connects Windows 8 apps to a cloud backend hosted in Windows Azure.
As Peter mentioned, over the past few weeks we announced the acquisitions of StorSimple and PhoneFactor which will enhance our position in data storage and device management.
In our data platform business, SQL Server revenue continued to grow double-digits.
SQL Server Premium revenue grew more than 20 percent, as customers continue to deploy it for their mission critical workloads, and business intelligence needs.
By combining the power of SQL Server, SharePoint and Office, CIOs can create scalable self-service BI platforms.
Users can leverage these platforms to analyze and interact with data in bold new ways, make real-time decisions and gain insights from Big Data.
We are seeing how SQL Server 2012 has raised the bar and positioned us to grow faster than the competition.
Next, I will move on to the Online Services Division, where revenue grew 9 percent.
Online advertising revenue was up 15 percent, driven primarily by rate improvement in search, offset in part by a decline in display revenue.
Operating performance improved by $150 million, or 29 percent.
Increasingly, users are finding better search results at Bing.
In blind tests, nearly two in three users choose Bings web search results over Googles results.
And over 10 million users have visited the Bing It On challenge where they can compare Bing and Google head on.
In the Entertainment & Devices Division, revenue declined 1%.
While the console market was tough, Xbox maintained its strong share and had 49% of the U.S.
market for the quarter.
This holiday season we have a great lineup of games headlined by Forza Horizon and Halo 4, and complemented by a rich catalog of Kinect games.
We continue to see strength in Xbox LIVE, where membership grew over 15%.
This week we announced Xbox Music, which leverages the cloud to integrate the music experience across the tablet, PC, phone and TV, and has a worldwide catalog of over 30 million songs.
Xbox Music is the most comprehensive service available.
It provides users unlimited streaming music on Windows devices, lets them play music based on similar artists and styles, and allows them to purchase songs and albums.
Theres no other music service out there today that matches the capabilities of Xbox Music.
We are excited about the upcoming launch of Windows Phone 8.
We have a strong device line-up and breadth of operators across key markets.
We will share more about Windows Phone 8 at our event on October 29th.
Moving on to Skype.
This quarter 120 billion minutes of calls were made on the Skype network, an increase of 58 percent.
We continue to make progress with the integration of Skype into our portfolio of products, and have announced the upcoming federation between Lync and Skype which will allow users to access their contacts through a common interface.
Skype is also central to communications in the new Office, and Skype calling is included in the upcoming Office 365 subscription service.
I will now cover the remainder of the income statement and share some expectations going forward.
Cost of goods sold increased 10 percent, primarily due to Nokia platform payments, inclusion of Skype costs, growth in cloud infrastructure and enterprise services.
As we look forward, excluding Surface, we expect COGS to grow high-single digits for the full fiscal year.
Operating expenses grew 2% to $6.5 billion.
For the full fiscal year, we are reaffirming our guidance for operating expenses of $30.3 - $30.9 billion.
Other income this quarter was $226 million, driven by the gain from the MSNBC sale.
Other Income includes dividend and interest income, offset by interest expense and the net cost of hedging.
In the current low interest rate environment, we expect these items to generally offset for the remainder of the year.
This quarter, our tax rate was approximately 19%.
For the full fiscal year, we expect our effective tax rate to be 19 - 21%.
Adjusting for the impact of the Windows Upgrade and Office Offers, we expect unearned revenue will roughly follow historical sequential growth patterns for the second quarter.
We expect capital expenditures for the full fiscal year to be roughly $3.5 billion.
This quarter we returned $2.9 billion to shareholders in buyback and dividends and raised the dividend 15% to 92 cents per share annually.
Now I will turn it back to Peter for our revenue outlook.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
For the remainder of the call, Ill discuss our revenue expectations for the second quarter and full fiscal year 2013.
Starting with Server and Tools.
Product revenue, including transactional and multi-year licensing, is about 80% of the divisions total revenue, and enterprise services is the remaining 20%.
As we noted last quarter, our customers are moving from transactional purchasing to premium products and multi-year licensing agreements.
We expect product revenue to grow high-single digits for the second quarter and low double-digits for the full fiscal year.
And we expect enterprise services to grow low double-digits for the second quarter and mid-teens for the full fiscal year.
In the Microsoft Business Division, multi-year licensing revenue, which is approximately 60% of the divisions total, should grow low double-digits for both the second quarter and full fiscal year.
Excluding the Office deferral, transactional revenue, which is the remaining revenue in the division, should grow low-single digits in the second quarter, and mid-single digits for the full fiscal year.
As a reminder, when updating your Q2 models, you should defer between $850 and $950 million of revenue related to pre-sales into the channel and the Office Offer.
Amounts deferred for pre-sales will be recognized upon general availability, while amounts deferred for the Office Offer will be recognized upon delivery, redemption, or the expiration of the program in the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2013.
?
Moving on to the Entertainment and Devices Division, while we have been maintaining our share leadership position, the console market continues to be challenged.
As a result, we expect revenue to decline low teens in the second quarter, but to grow low-single digits for the full fiscal year.
In the Online Services Division, we look to build upon improvements in share and search monetization.
For the second quarter and full fiscal year, we expect revenue growth to be consistent with the dynamics seen in the first quarter.
In the Windows Division, as a reminder, second quarter growth will reflect the recognition of $800 million of revenue from first quarter pre-sales, partially offset by roughly $100 million of additional deferred revenue related to the Windows Upgrade Offer.
Remember that the Upgrade Offer expires at the end of February, at which time we will recognize all remaining deferred revenue.
Looking forward, we eagerly anticipate the launch of Windows 8.
We are bringing a new range of capabilities and scenarios to Windows.
And with support of system-on-chip architecture, we are moving beyond the traditional PC to the widest range of Windows hardware we have ever seen.
New hardware will debut next week, and will broaden over the coming months.
With Windows 8, we are giving developers a modern platform on which they can build rich, immersive apps unlike any the Windows ecosystem has seen.
The Windows Store offers developers attractive financial terms and broad reach.
And with its grand opening next week, the Windows Store will have a strong line-up of apps.
Just as with the hardware, the line-up of apps will become more robust over time.
?
In addition to delivering Windows 8 next week, we will also launch Surface.
Designed to be the ultimate stage for Windows, Surface allows users to seamlessly transition between consumption and creation and is an example of the substantial innovation that is enabled by Windows 8.
We are hard at work manufacturing the devices, and will ramp production over time.
October 26 only marks the beginning of a journey we will take together with our partners and developers.
Our collective success will be evident over time as we change the way people experience the power of technology.
Questions & Answers
RICK SHERLUND, Nomura:  On the Windows and Windows Live Division, there was no real guidance for the year.
You just said you'd recognize all remaining deferred revenue.
Can you just help us understand what the variables are that we should be thinking about other than what the PC market grows at?  And by PC market, I think we need to define that as all Windows 8 compatible devices, including tablets.
So, are there mix shift issues, the price you realize on a tablet versus a traditional notebook?  What are kind of the variables we should be thinking about in terms of how to model Windows and Windows Live revenues for the year?
PETER KLEIN:  Actually, that's exactly right.
One of the exciting things about Windows 8 is how it really redefines how people think about devices and the experiences they get across those devices.
And up until now, that's sort of narrowly been defined as PCs or tablets, and customers have been forced to choose and make tradeoffs, frankly, of what they get.
With Windows 8, you can kind of get whatever you want at whatever price point you want.
So, whether you want a convertible with touch and pen and integration with your line of business apps; whether you want a tablet for great information and communications and entertainment; whether you want a touch ultrabook; all those things come into play and all those things are available with Windows 8.
I think over time we're going to see how that plays out, and that's the opportunity for us.
And it's really a factor of thinking about how all those are going to play against each other.
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Great.
Thanks.
Thanks, Bill and Peter.
Just to Rick's question a little bit more specifically, and I was on another call before this, and maybe you said it.
But can you give us a sense of your expectations for Surface in the quarter, or if you can't do that can you give us a sense for what preorders were thus far just to give us a sense of how that's ramping out of the gate, and what your expectations are for that?
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Heather.
Right now we're focused on our launch, both of Surface and Windows 8 next week.
And so that's really what we're excited about and the opportunity to show people all the great devices, and all the great capabilities, and so we're not talking about that now.
As we mentioned on the call, we're working hard on production, we're ramping production.
We're excited about what we've heard so far, the feedback has been great, the reviews have been really good.
I think that demonstrates what we've been talking about, the capabilities and experiences that Windows 8 delivers across various form factors.
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  Hi, thanks, guys.
I'm going to shift to the server and tools business.
The billings were a little bit better than we thought, but the recognized revenue and the forward guide was a little bit lighter than we had been looking for and I just wanted to drill into some of the expectations for the forward guidance.
Are you assuming the transactional environment remains weak?  Do you still think you can out pace the transactional piece in terms of your business and what should we be thinking about in terms of the convergence of billings and recognized revenue?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Adam.
What we are continuing to see is the migration from transactional revenue to multi-year licensing agreements, which is great, because it's one of the things that's driving the business, which is the vision we have for the roadmap, the resonance that has with our customers.
And so they're making long-term commitments to the platform and so it's one of the reasons we gave you the bookings number and the multi-year licensing revenue number, 20 and 19 percent, because that's what you're seeing.
So, as that's growing faster than the transactional, you'll see the bookings and the backlog grow, and the recognized will follow over time.
So, that's really the thing to watch for in server and tools, and we continue to be very bullish on opportunity, sort of across the board whether that's through Windows Server, System Center, what we're doing in the private cloud and public cloud, and certainly with SQL Server.
So, that trend that we're seeing and the migration to the multi-year licensing agreement is driving that business both now and for the long-term.
BILL KOEFOED:  And just to build on that, this is one of the strongest bookings quarters we've had in the last several years, so again, for a $19 billion business to have over 20 percent bookings growth we feel obviously in addition to all the products that have come so far this year, I think we feel pretty excited about the opportunity in that business.
So, thanks for asking that question.
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Thank you.
So, a question, given the slowdown in the PCs, how should we think about the change, or what's going on in the Windows adoption process?  Are we seeing continuation at the current rate, or is there some proportional slowdown in the rollout of Windows 7?
PETER KLEIN:  We continue to see    if you're talking about enterprise adoption, we continue to see that grow this quarter, although at a slower rate than we have in past quarters.
But, that opportunity remains very large.
We're over 50 percent deployed and remember the end of life for XP is about a year-and-a-half away.
So, that remains a great opportunity for us that we see continuing on.
MARK MOERDLER:  But, it is slowing a bit?
PETER KLEIN:  It did this quarter.
BILL KOEFOED:  It did, yes, just this quarter.
And it's a summer quarter, so I don't know that I would read too much into just one period.
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi:  Thanks.
Just a follow-on with some launch questions.
So, there's sort of two changes here to the business that we'll see going forward.
One is the hardware piece in Windows and the other is what looks like a pretty big ramp up on the retail side, with some store presence, understanding that the latter is probably in your guidance.
Can you just remind us on the store side where you're allocating the expenses and, as that presence potentially grows over time, how you expect that to impact your financials?  And then on Surface, should there be anything we think about, other than sort of a price times a unit and make a margin assumption.
Are there any other nuances around the way you account for Surface in your financials?
PETER KLEIN:  The first question was about the retail stores and where that's showing up?
WALTER PRITCHARD:  Yes, where the expenses are.
PETER KLEIN:  Got it.
The expenses are in corp, and they show up a little bit in COGS, and a little bit in operating expenses.
And sorry, what was the second part of your question?
WALTER PRITCHARD:  Just on Surface, is there anything else we should be thinking about in terms of how to model the impact of Surface?  We know the price.
We can make a unit assumption.
We can make a margin assumption.
Is there any deferrals, any OPEX impact, any warrantees?
PETER KLEIN:  No, you're thinking about it right.
WALTER PRITCHARD:  Okay.
Great, thanks.
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  Hey, thank you very much.
As you enter the world of the new form factors, since you're coming a little bit behind, relative to Apple, what is the right way to think about your differentiation relative to the consumer market opportunity for tablets, and the enterprise market opportunity for tablets.
Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Well, I think one of our differentiations is we give everybody what they want for the purpose they want it.
When I talk to CIOs, for example, in enterprises one of the things they're really excited about is that Windows 8 devices give them a chance for their employees, their users of the technology, to have the devices they want and bring to work, that they get the kind of manageability, security, integration with their line of business apps that they want.
So, I think there's a big differentiation in the enterprise across all the form factors, especially tablets that are increasingly coming into the work place.
On the consumer side, I think there's a range, not only a range of price points and different kinds of form factors, but also unique and differentiated set of services and experiences that come with the device, including Office, including SkyDrive, including Xbox Music.
So, I think across the board you see similar differentiation both in the enterprise and on the consumer.
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Thanks.
Peter, if Surface is successful shouldn't the COGS be well above the high single digit growth for the fiscal year?  I'm just curious why you excluded or are you just waiting to see how the traction is before you give us more guidance, or what is the explanation for that?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, that's exactly right.
We'll see how it goes.
JOHN DIFUCCI, JPMC:  Thank you.
I have a question on the deferred revenue specifically for the Windows business.
Even if you exclude the adjustments, deferred revenue for this business increased in the quarter and you normally, or actually you always see a seasonal decline.
I guess, can you talk a little bit about that?  What do we see in there?  Is this tied to multi-year deals in this business now, or is it something to do with some of these adjustments that maybe we're accounting for correctly.
PETER KLEIN:  Great, thanks, John.
It actually is that.
It's multi-year licensing deals continuing to grow double digits.
So, that's what's driving the deferred there.
So, that's one sort of example of how enterprises are continuing to see value and adopting Windows.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Great.
Thanks Peter.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, John.
COLIN GILLIS, BCG Financial:  Great, thank you.
Looking at the server and tools line again, when the results first printed we were asked quite a bit if that was showing any weakness in the enterprise spend environment.
It sounds like a lot of that was just driven by the rotation of multiple-year contracts.
But, can you talk about the marketplace right now, and if the marketplace is weakening, do you find that to be an advantage, given the cost preferences in that line?
PETER KLEIN:  It definitely is the migration from transactional licensing.
Irrespective of weak market, strong market, we've got a great value proposition.
It does play very well in tough macroeconomic times, because one of our great value propositions is the savings and efficiencies people get from using integrated technology across their stack at a really good price performance characteristic.
So, I would say, we feel great about our value proposition in any environment.
It does play well in a tough macro environment, but what we're seeing now in the financials, this is why we highlighted the bookings growth and the multi-year licensing growth, is related more towards the migration from the transactional business.
COLIN GILLIS:  Great, thank you.
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Thanks, guys.
I just have a question on the margins of Surface, kind of the high level.
I don't want to know the exact margin percentage, but how did you guys price Surface relative to Bob.
I mean, obviously, you guys have talked about this, but I'm including applied revenue amount for a Windows license, did you also take into account sort of I'd call it a weighted average attach rate of Office for a device, and then add on a gross margin fort the hardware, just kind of how you built up to that?  And then just kind of at a high level what was the pricing thoughts behind Surface, was it to drive adoption of the platform, was it to actually to make this a business, and does that change at all near term versus longer term?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, thanks.
As with any pricing decision, it's really about the value proposition you had for your customers, and the degree of capabilities and value you're delivering to them at a variety of price points for what they want.
And that's really fundamentally what drives all of our pricing decisions.
Do we have a really compelling value to offer our customers for the capabilities that we're delivering.
And that's what we do across all our business, and that's what drives our economic performance.
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Looking at how you're beginning to combine product and services with Office, Office 365 for home, and then the bundling of services with Windows RT, looking forward is this going to change the way that you allocate what might have been transactional revenues in the past to a combination of transactional and services revenues?
BILL KOEFOED:  Yes.
Generally that is correct.
As we move to more delivery as services, that will show up as services revenue as well as transactional revenue.
That is correct.
But I do think it's a long-term trend, and you saw that in the commentary that we made around our Server and Tools business, but we are having people that are making longer term commitments to Microsoft, and that shows up in our annuity business in server, it shows up in things like Office 365 where people are having a subscription service.
It shows up in things like Xbox Live, which you've seen happening over the last couple of years.
So, Ed, I think you've got it right that we're seeing a lot more people that are committing to a longer-term relationship with Microsoft, which is clearly what we're striving toward.
BRAD REBACK, Stifel Nicholas:  Great.
Thanks a lot.
Peter, historically the transactional aspect of MBD has followed the PC market roughly.
Is there any reason to think that that's not the case here for the final three quarters?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
In general, there are two things that impact the transactional business of MBD, one is PC market, and the other is product cycles.
So, one of the things we also see in the period right before launch of a new product on the transactional side in businesses is a slowdown, and also it does track the PC market.
So, those are the two things to keep an eye on.
RAIMO LENSCHOW, Barclays:  Thank you.
Peter, historically when we had the launch of a Windows product, there was a big uptake, especially on the consumer side.
Now this time around, it's obviously a different form factor set they're playing in, and consumers need to get used to it.
How do you think about the momentum we should see in terms of the first quarter out, the second quarter out, et cetera?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Well, without giving specific guidance, we're certainly very excited about the capabilities that come with Windows 8, and the excitement that comes from that, and we're excited to talk about at the launch next week.
I think I'm encouraged by what we saw from the Windows 8 selling that we've seen so far, the 40 percent growth over the comparable period last time.
And so, we'll just keep an eye on that and watch as we get further into the launch.
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowen and Company:  Thank you.
This is somewhat of a follow up to Raimo's question.
Over the past several months, many of those reviewing Windows 8 for PCs, while praising the significant innovation behind the OS, have also continued to focus on the dual interface, and the adjustment that users will have to make.
Is that something that causes you concern just when it comes to initial adoption levels of Windows 8?  Just wondering how you would think about that.
PETER KLEIN:  You know, not a lot.
I hear the feedback, and as a user we sort of gotten used to it very quickly.
At Microsoft, when we do innovations historically across our products, oftentimes there is new things that come, and I understand initially people look at those things, and what we've seen over time is that those innovations have delivered way more value and way more productivity, and way more better usability.
And so, I'm very confident that that is even more true with the great technologies and capabilities and experiences that we have with Windows 8.
BILL KOEFOED:  And I think you have seen that in the reviews of people who have used it over a longer period of time.
And, again, for those of you who will be hopefully using it early, you'll see that show up in your experience as well.
<End of Q&A>
Microsoft Second Quarter 2013 Prepared Remarks
On our website, Microsoft.com/investor is our financial summary slide deck, which is intended to follow our prepared remarks, and provide the reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
As a reminder, we will post today's prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript at the Microsoft Investor Relations website until January 24, 2014.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements that are predictions, projections, or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Forms 10-Qs and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
Before I hand the call over to Peter, Id like to remind you that all growth comparisons we make on the call today will relate to the corresponding period of last year.
Also, unless specified otherwise, all impacted numbers for the current quarter have been adjusted for the cumulative effect of the revenue deferrals and recognition related to Windows, Office and Xbox video games, and details of the adjustments can be found in our financial summary slide deck and press release.
And, with that, I'll turn it over Peter.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Thanks everyone for joining us.
I am pleased to welcome Chris as the new head of Investor Relations.
Chris has been with Microsoft for over 16 years and has been in diverse Finance roles, which gives him a good background for this role.
I also want to thank Bill for all he has accomplished over the past four years and congratulate him on his new role as the CFO of the Skype division.
This quarter, we had record revenue of $22 billion and record earnings per share of $0.81.
It has been an exciting quarter with the launch of Windows 8 and Windows Phone 8.
In the enterprise we continue to see solid demand for our business products and services with particularly strong growth in multi-year licensing.
Multi-year licensing revenue benefited from healthy renewals of enterprise agreements as customers continue to make long-term commitments to the Microsoft platform.
Our robust portfolio of enterprise products and services enables CIOs to build efficient infrastructure, unlock business insight, improve productivity, and support bring-your-own-device.
* In the Data Center, recent releases of Windows Server 2012 and System Center 2012 are driving customer wins and strong renewals.
Our Cloud OS roadmap uniquely positions us to support the hybrid infrastructure needs of CIOs by providing one consistent platform that can span their own datacenter, a partners datacenter or Windows Azure with ultimate flexibility, portability and scale.
* On the data platform, we are growing our revenue share as enterprises continue to move mission-critical workloads to SQL Server and deploy it for their business intelligence solutions.
* In productivity, we are excited about the upcoming launch of the new Office and how it redefines user experience with mobility, social and cloud features.
The new Office features a fast, fluid design that takes full advantage of the new Windows interface.
With Skype and Yammer integration, it unlocks new experiences for communication and collaboration and brings social directly into productivity scenarios.
* With Windows 8, businesses will now be able to give their employees thin and light devices without compromising on security or manageability.
Windows 7 momentum in the enterprise continues and today, over 60% of enterprise desktops worldwide are on Windows 7.
We have talked about Windows 8 as Windows reimagined, from the chipset to the user experience.
As we undergo this transformation it is important for us to bring the entire ecosystem along with us.
With the launch in October, we collectively took the first of many steps in changing the way people use technology at work and at play.
Since then, the number of Windows 8 certified systems has nearly doubled, the number of apps in the Windows store has quadrupled, and Windows users have downloaded over 100 million apps.
To date, we have sold over 60 million licenses of Windows 8.
Our partners, including OEM hardware manufacturers, app developers, and retailers, have worked hard to get us to where we are today.
Its early days and an ambitious endeavor like this takes time.
Together with our partners, we remain focused on fully delivering the promise of Windows 8.
As part of our work to advance the ecosystem, we launched Surface Windows RT last quarter.
Surface is one part of the overall Windows 8 story.
With tight integration across hardware and software, Surface highlights the unique innovation enabled by Windows 8.
We launched it exclusively in our stores and in select geographies, and are expanding our retail and geographic footprint.
As we look forward, we strive to deliver seamless experiences across hardware, software and services.
Windows 8, Windows Phone 8 and Xbox 360 provide a similar look and feel to users.
This consistency, complemented with our cloud services like Bing, SkyDrive, Xbox LIVE and SmartGlass, unifies the consumer experience.
In the Enterprise we continue to design and deliver world-class cloud solutions that allow our customers to move to the cloud on their own terms.
The compelling experiences we deliver across our devices and services, as well as our large partner and customer base, uniquely positions us for sustained future growth.
In summary, this quarter the strength of our product portfolio delivered record revenue and earnings per share.
As we enter calendar year 2013, theres tremendous opportunity for our partners, developers and customers to leverage the capabilities and scenarios our significant product releases have enabled.
With that, Im going to hand it back to Chris to provide more details on our results.
CHRIS SUH, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
Thanks Peter.
First, I'm going to review our overall results, and then I'll move on to the details by business segment.
Revenue for the quarter was up 5% to $22 billion.
Operating income was $8.3 billion, up 4%, and earnings per share was 81 cents, also up 4%.
Foreign exchange had a $200 million, or 1 percentage point negative impact to revenue this quarter, and a $154 million or 2 percentage points negative impact to net income.
From a geographic perspective, we saw growth return in developed markets, and saw mid-teens growth in emerging markets.
Bookings were strong, growing 11%, as we continued to see customers making long-term commitments to our products.
You see the results in the following metrics:
	Multi-year licensing revenue grew 15%
	Unearned revenue grew 13% to $17.4 billion
	And our contracted-not-billed balance was over $21 billion
Moving to Windows, this quarter total revenue grew 11%.
Within that, OEM revenue outperformed the underlying x86 PC market, reflecting increased demand in our distribution channels.
While inventory levels ended the quarter at slightly higher levels than the prior year, we believe them to be in a healthy range given the recent launch.
Non-OEM revenue grew over 40%, driven by Windows 8 upgrades, sales of Surface and double-digit growth in volume licensing.
Within the x86 PC market, we saw similar trends to prior quarters, with emerging markets outperforming developed markets, and business outperforming consumer.
The consumer segment was most impacted by the ecosystem transition, as demand exceeded the limited assortment of touch devices available.
Next, Ill walk through our Server and Tools business, which posted another solid quarter with 9 % revenue growth.
Product revenue grew 9% and within that, multi-year licensing revenue grew 17%.
On the strength of both new and existing customers, bookings grew a solid 15%.
For the modern data center, we continue to be on the forefront of innovation with our Cloud OS roadmap, which provides a flexible platform for CIOs to manage their infrastructure, applications and data.
With the launch of Windows Server 2012 in September, we delivered a cloud optimized operating system, and have continued to gain share in virtualization.
To further strengthen our Cloud OS platform, we have introduced a steady stream of innovation in Windows Azure including Virtual Machines, Media Services, Web Site Services and Mobile Services.
Our management product, System Center continues its momentum and delivered 18% revenue growth.
In our data platform business, SQL Server revenue grew 16%, driven by strength in SQL Server Premium.
Revenue growth continues to outpace the market, as customers increasingly use SQL Server for their mission critical applications and business intelligence needs, making it the most pervasive data platform.
On the BI side, were delivering on our strategy to enable analysis of all types of data, while also accelerating time to insight.
Were empowering organizations to realize the power of Big Data as Hadoop is now compatible on Windows Server and Windows Azure.
With SQL Server 2012, we took the next step forward in advancing in-memory capabilities, and see tremendous opportunities ahead.
Now I'll move on to the Microsoft Business Division, where revenue grew 3%.
Consumer revenue declined 2% with x86 PC market dynamics being partially offset by gains in attach.
Businesses are choosing Microsoft as their productivity platform for the future.
This is evidenced by the healthy 18% bookings growth and near historical high renewal rates for Office.
Business revenue grew 4%, and within that, multi-year licensing revenue grew 10%.
Our productivity server offerings continue to perform well, and again this quarter, Exchange, SharePoint, and Lync collectively grew double digits.
Lync revenue grew at an impressive rate of 35%, as customers continue to be drawn to both the enhanced productivity that it enables, and also the economic benefits of our solution.
Next, Ill move on to the Online Services Division, where revenue grew 11%.
Online advertising revenue was up 15%, driven by significant search rate improvements, offset in part by a decline in display revenue.
With revenue growth, and ongoing expense management, we delivered another quarter of operating performance improvement.
In the Entertainment & Devices Division, revenue declined 2%.
In the important holiday season, Xbox continued its leadership position in the U.S.
console market.
Halo 4 launched in November, and has already become the best-selling title of the critically acclaimed gaming franchise.
We did defer $380 million this quarter for games where the buyer has rights to receive content in the future.
The video game Deferral was included in the Q2 guidance, and we expect it to be recognized in Q3.
We also continued to expand the content available in Xbox LIVE, further solidifying Xbox LIVE as the premier entertainment service in the family room.
Windows Phone saw strong growth in both phone and patent licensing revenue.
In November, we launched Windows Phone 8, with our strongest lineup of both carriers and devices.
Windows Phone sales were over 4 times higher than they were last year.
And at CES this year, more partners were announced, as the Windows Phone ecosystem continues to grow.
Skype had 138 billion minutes of calls on its network this quarter, which was up 59%.
Now Ill cover the remainder of the income statement.
Cost of goods sold increased 1%, due to the full quarter of Nokia platform payments, Surface, and growth in cloud infrastructure, partially offset by declines in Xbox consoles.
Operating expenses grew 10% to $8.0 billion, primarily related to marketing for product launches.
This quarter, our tax rate was approximately 18%.
And finally, and we returned $3.5 billion to shareholders in buyback and dividends.
Now I will turn the call back to Peter for our outlook.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Thanks, Chris.
For the remainder of the call, Ill discuss our expectations for the third quarter and full fiscal year 2013.
Looking ahead with Windows, we know that our growth depends on our ability to give customers the exciting hardware they want, at the price-points they demand and a wider range of apps and services to meet their diverse needs.
We are hard at work with our partners to meet these goals.
One of our biggest partners, Intel, not only delivered the Clover Trail chip this year, they have said they will deliver their next generation chip, Haswell, in 2013, which will enable even more advances in the device market.
This is just one example of the innovation we are seeing from our chip partners.
We also need to continue to work with our hardware partners as they create thin and lightweight devices on both x86 and ARM chipsets that offer compelling touch experiences that bring Windows 8 to life.
You started to see the next wave of Windows devices at CES, and collectively we will work to ensure that we have the most compelling devices  and the right mix of devices  in the marketplace.
During the quarter, we launched the first device in our Surface family of products.
We recently increased production and expanded distribution to third party retail partners.
Next month, we will make Surface Windows RT available in 14 additional countries.
At the same time, we will also launch Surface Windows 8 Pro, which provides the power and performance of a laptop in a tablet package.
With the broadening of the Surface lineup, we will continue to highlight the power of Windows 8 tightly integrated with fantastic hardware.
On the app front, we are deepening our engagement with developers.
While the number of apps in the Windows Store has quadrupled since launch, we clearly have more work to do.
We need more rich, immersive apps that give users access to content that informs, entertains and inspires.
While there is a lot of work ahead of us, we are incredibly excited by the opportunities to both broaden and enrich the Windows ecosystem.
With the launch of Windows 8 and Windows RT, we are positioned for growth across a massive addressable market from tablets to laptops and Ultrabooks to all-in-ones.
We will continue to work closely with our partners through this transformation as we collectively reimagine Windows.
As you update your models remember that the Windows Upgrade Offer expires at the end of February.
At that time, we will recognize $1.1 billion, which is all of the remaining deferred revenue related to the Upgrade Offer.
Within Server and Tools, product revenue, including transactional and multi-year licensing, is about 80% of the divisions total revenue, and enterprise services is the remaining 20%.
We expect product revenue to grow low teens for the third quarter and low double-digits for the full fiscal year.
And we expect enterprise services to grow mid-teens for the third quarter and the full fiscal year.
In the Microsoft Business Division, multi-year licensing revenue, which is approximately 60% of the divisions total, should grow low double-digits for both the third quarter and full fiscal year.
Excluding the Office deferral, transactional revenue, which is the remaining revenue in the division, should outperform the x86 PC market in the third quarter and for the full fiscal year.
As a reminder, when updating your Q3 models, we expect to recognize between $250 and $300 million of revenue related to pre-sales into the channel and the Office Offer.
We expect most of the remainder of the deferral to be recognized at the expiration of the program in the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2013.
In the Online Services Division, we look to build upon improvements in share and search monetization.
For the third quarter and full fiscal year, we expect revenue growth to be consistent with the dynamics seen in the second quarter, with search revenue growth partially offset by lower display revenue.
Moving on to the Entertainment and Devices Division, in the third quarter, we expect to recognize $380 million related to the video game deferral.
Excluding recognition of deferrals, we expect revenue to grow high-teens in the third quarter and low-single digits for the full fiscal year.
Switching to overall cost of goods sold for the company, COGS growth will continue to be impacted by the changing mix of revenue as we have seen in the past few quarters.
As we look forward, excluding Surface, we expect COGS to grow high single-digits for the full fiscal year.
We are reaffirming our full fiscal year guidance for operating expenses of $30.3 to $30.9 billion.
Other Income and Expense includes dividend and interest income, offset by interest expense and the net cost of hedging.
In the current low interest rate environment, we expect these items to generally offset one another for the remainder of the year.
We expect our effective tax rate to be 17 to 20% for the full fiscal year, and we expect capital expenditures to be about $3.5 billion for the full fiscal year.
For the third quarter, excluding the impact of deferrals, unearned revenue should roughly follow historical seasonal patterns.
In summary, we delivered solid financial results for the second quarter.
We have good product momentum in the market, and are excited about the opportunity to help our customers take advantage of the advancing trends in technology.
With that, Ill turn the call over to Chris and well take some questions.
Questions and Answers
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi.
Thanks guys and congrats on a good quarter in a pretty tough macro environment.
I just want to spend a moment on Surface.
You obviously talked about ramping up production and distribution of that.
Just what are some of your goals as you look at Surface RT and Pro for this year?  And within that context how should we think about the profitability of the Surfaces?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Phil.
As we said, we think of Surface as one part of the overall Windows 8 story.
Certainly this quarter it was a contributing factor to the revenue growth in the Windows business.
And what it does is it sort of highlights some interesting innovation that can happen to sort of demonstrate the power of Windows 8 when tightly integrated with hardware and software and some new categories of devices.
And we've obviously had some limited distribution this quarter in our stores and as you know we're excited about expanding that.
So, you know our goal is to continue to build that business, to highlight the incredible power of Windows 8 in an interesting set of devices.
We're going to expand geographically.
We're going to expand the product lineup.
We're going to expand retail distribution and capacity.
So, we look forward to sort of continuing the growth of that business.
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi:  Hi, thanks.
I'm just wondering, Peter, if you could talk about, obviously one of the big differences here between your devices in the market and some of the competing devices, I think the price point of touch machines, Windows devices are much higher?  And I'm wondering if you could just talk about what you've learned here in the first three or four months of the Windows launch, how important price is to the customer base in terms of driving units and what do you think the outlook is in terms of getting price points down the devices in aggregate, in order to potentially drive some demand?
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Walter.
We learned a lot this quarter.
We learned a lot about the types of experiences and scenarios and to some extent the price points customers are looking for from their devices.
We saw some really great demand for some of the touch devices that we've brought to market.
In some cases we didn't have the supply that we needed to satisfy that demand.
I think from a price point we learned I think what we've always suspected, which is there's segmentation and differentiation.
One of the powers of the Windows ecosystem, obviously, is the variety of devices and form factors and experiences at a variety of price points.
And I think we learned that that continues to be important.
And as I said, we're working very closely with both our chip partners, as well as the OEMs, to bring the right mix of devices, which means, to your point, the right set of touch devices at the right price point, depending on the unique needs of the individual.
I think we learned a lot about that and one of the things you'll see is a greater variety of devices at a bigger variety of price points that kind of meet the differentiated needs of our consumers.
RICK SHERLUND:  MBD, I just want some clarification, because the revenue growth is a little slower than I would have thought.
But, it looks like what we're seeing is this transition in the business.
It looks like it's more instead of business transactional it's more multi-year licensing.
And the bookings growth would suggest that business is changing to be more revenue over time versus up front.
I just wanted clarification, if I'm thinking about that correctly.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
Thanks, Rick.
You're thinking about it absolutely correctly.
We've seen big increases in the multi-year annuity business.
Bookings growth was very strong.
And so you are seeing that transition to sort of a long-term commitment to the business.
Secondarily, this quarter, obviously in a pre-launch quarter, cyclically you tend to see a slowdown in the transactional business, as well.
But, that was secondary to this longer-term trend of transition to a multi-year commitment.
ADAM HOLT, Morgan Stanley:  Great, thank you.
Sorry to ask a model question, my question is about cash flow and I guess two factors around cash flow.
Could you just drill in a little bit into the delta between bookings growth and billings growth in the quarter and then could you also just touch on the inventory in the quarter?  It looked like it was a little above what it normally is?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Well, as always, the sort of difference between bookings growth and billings growth is going to be a function of the mix of long-term agreements, right, because our multi-year licensing agreements are three-year agreements.
And so bookings will include all of the revenue from those agreements.
And then typically those are billed a year at a time, so the billings growth will be sort of that one year of billings.
So, to the extent we see this sort of growth in a multi-year licensing business you're going to see a build-up of bookings growth that's going to be fast.
You're going to see a build-up of the deferred revenue and then the recognition on the income statement over time.
So, to the extent we continue to see this transition to long-term commitments you'll expect to see that trend continue.
Your second question was on inventory.
You say inventory, you mean on the balance sheet?
ADAM HOLT:  Yes.
PETER KLEIN:  The inventory is a function of kind of both what's happening in the Xbox business and Surface.
They're sort of offsetting impacts this quarter.
Some of it is from Surface and then some of it is from the Xbox business.
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Great.
I had a question about, Peter, you mentioned the renewal rates in MBD continue, I guess they're at a record and continue to move higher.
I'm just wondering if you could share with us what's driving the increase and the renewal rates and how much runway do you have left there?  And then actually I had a follow up on Adam's question about inventory, because it usually goes down in the December quarter.
Obviously you have Surface now.
So, it jumped up.
But, did we see the traditional Xbox work down of inventory that we normally see?  So, should we be looking at the fact that the delta between the draw down that you normally see and the fact that I think it went up, or was roughly flat this quarter was the result of Surface?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Okay.
I'll start with your first question, which was MBD annuities?
KASH RANGAN:  Renewal rates.
PETER KLEIN:  I think it's a combination of things.
Heather, as you know, over time we've been broadening the notion of how we think about productivity.
So, I think it's a combination of a couple of things.
One is just the product set.
Lync is a big driver, SharePoint, Exchange.
So the connection between the collaboration and communications technology and the enhancement to just the productivity applications themselves, I think Office 365 and the roadmap to the cloud is really exciting to customers.
And part of the reason they're making a long-term commitment to MBD and to the Office and related products, is because they really --- our roadmap to the cloud really resonates with them and how they get there over time and how that works.
And I think also our roadmap, from a capability perspective and what's coming in the new Office, with social, again advances in the cloud, is really driving sort of a roadmap that's compelling to customers and so that's why they're making long-term commitments to the platform.
So, that's great to see.
And on inventory, yes, you're thinking about it right.
I think you saw the normal sort of draw down from the Xbox business and any offsetting increase there was related to Surface.
KASH RANGAN, Bank of America Merrill Lynch:  Hi, thank you very much and happy New Year.
It's already quite a bit into the year.
But, what I was wondering was, in the holiday season post a launch from Microsoft typically we get a big effect of the PC industry.
It's happened every cycle.
I guess we had some competition from tablets and what not.
We didn't quite see the kind of whiz bang effect with a typical Windows launch.
I'm curious to get your take on what is it that the media and the industry seems to have gotten wrong?  What are the misperceptions about Windows 8 and how do you think the year is going to play out, as far as Windows 8 receptivity in a consumer market and a business market?
Thank you very much.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Kash.
Windows 8, as I talked about.
Windows 8 is a big, bold re-imagining of Windows across the whole ecosystem.
And I think this was the start of that process.
I think we all collectively learned a lot about from the user interface to the touch devices.
And as I tried to give context on the call, there's a lot of things we're working on with our partners that I think continues to drive this process forward over the next several quarters, whether it's the chipset, whether it's with developers for the kinds of applications that people want, and certainly for the kinds of touch devices at the right price points that consumers want.
I think all of that is continuously improving.
We're continuously learning.
And it happens over time.
This is a big, ambitious re-imagining of Windows.
And this quarter was the first step in that process.
KASH RANGAN:  Got it.
So the traction, the ramp should get better over time, and we should not be judging the cycle by the December quarter necessarily?
PETER KLEIN:  I highlighted the things that drive that.
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Peter, just on the gross margins, they've been under pressure the last several years, and there's a lot of components that go in that you get to see, but certainly we don't get to see.
Can you give us just the puts and takes of, perhaps, is there any change later in the year where you start to see some of the component of the COGS start to --- expenses start to come off, or not?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, COGS is always going to be a function of the mix of the types of revenue.
So, it's really going to depend on what your underlying assumptions are about the different components of the revenue, whether that's hardware related revenue in Xbox and now in Surface; whether it's multi-year licensing business in consumers and what's online services.
So, at any point in time it's really going to depend on that mix of revenue, which is just going to cycle over time.
So, we try to give you some sense for the rest of the year how we see that playing out in total at Microsoft.
And, again, that's going to be a function of the mix we see between the various components.
CHRIS SUH:  And reiterating Peter's guidance, excluding Surface.
High single digits COGS growth excluding Surface.
JOHN DIFUCCI, JP Morgan: 
Peter, you said that the Windows OEM revenue outperformed the x86 PC market.
And your comments imply some Windows inventory build in the channel, which I believe you normally see during a quarter with a Windows launch as OEMs build inventory in preparation for the launch.
Would it be accurate to assume that the Windows out-performance was primarily, I mean relative to the PC market, was primarily due to the inventory build, or was there something else there happening?  Was there anything else?  You used to give us that bridge, which you haven't for a while now, but I'm just wondering if any of those other factors had a big influence?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
The three biggest components of the 11 percent total revenue growth and the 11 percent adjusted for the recognition of the deferrals in the Windows Business were the retail upgrade, the sales of Surface, and then multi-year licensing agreements within enterprises.
To your point, there was some tailwind from inventory, which was normally, as you highlight, kind of what we see in a launch quarter, and as Chris said it's within sort of the healthy range that we typically see, but that was some tailwind.
But the three big impacts all up on the Windows revenue were the retail upgrades, sales of Surface, and the enterprise annuity business, which continues to grow double digits.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Any detection of any piracy effects or changes?
PETER KLEIN:  We're on the same long-term trend on piracy that we've always been.
That wouldn't highlight anything sort of specific this quarter, but as always we're fighting piracy across all of the dimensions, and the long-term trend should be good.
But that will cycle up and down in any given quarter.
COLIN GILLIS, BCG Financial:  Hey, Peter, the trend in OSD in terms of the smaller losses, is that a run rate that we can think about going into the March quarter?  And also when you talked about the improvement in revenue per search is there any more color or quantification you can put around that?
PETER KLEIN:  You know, on the first question, I looked at the guidance we gave on the revenue.
We continue to work hard on the cost structure, but certainly as we highlighted the dynamics on revenue will be relatively consistent to what you see this quarter.
In terms of the monetization, it's what we've been very focused on in the work we've done with our partnership with Yahoo!, and part of it is the quality of the searches that we've been doing.
It's sort of the realization of all the work we've been doing on both the search engine as well as the ad platform to make sure it's finely tuned to deliver the best economic results.
And that's what we've been --- we've been talking about this for a year-and-a-half, two years.
We've been really focused on that with our best talent.
And you start to see that paying off.
That's what's driving monetization.
BRENDAN BARNICLE, Pacific Crest Securities:  Thanks so much.
Peter, you highlighted the market share gains you guys are seeing in SQL Server and specifically you talked about BI and mission critical applications.
I was wondering if you could give us any more color on the use cases and applications where you guys are particularly seeing the biggest gains, and any impact that pricing may be having on that?  Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes.
The biggest impact is the capabilities that we've delivered with SQL Server 2012.
And in terms of the use cases, there's a couple of things that sort of fall into those buckets of mission critical and BI.
In terms of mission critical, we're seeing large enterprise customers re-platform on SQL for any number of things underneath their ERP, underneath what other major sort of LOB apps they have that sort of drive their business.
And that's really an emerging trend with 2012 and what that does.
That's really advanced.
And I would add that that's been one of the drivers of our transition to multi-year licensing, because now we're seeing customers commit more and more to SQL as part to their multi-year enterprise agreements as well.
On the BI side, the combination of SQL as well as SharePoint and Excel is really compelling to customers in terms of the business insights they can generate from their line of business application systems.
And I think really the combination of the types of    what you see front end on Excel on top of the SQL database has really been a powerful driver for both businesses, frankly.
And that's a lot of what's driving the multi-year licensing business up for both MBD and STB.
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowen and Company:  Okay.
Thank you.
You had mentioned that over 60 percent of enterprise desktops now are running on Windows 7.
Looking forward, how do you expect the cadence of migration activity to unfold from now until the termination of XP support and in early to mid-2014.
Does it continue at a similar pace for a while, and at what point do we probably see this moderate?
PETER KLEIN:  The one thing I would say is, not only are over 60 percent on Windows 7, but about 90 percent have expressed that they have a plan to do that.
So, I expect to see sort of a steady drumbeat between now and the end of life for XP support in April 2014 for that to continue, because the incentive is there and the desire to do that has been expressed by our customers.
So, I would expect to see that continue over the next year, year and a quarter.
RAIMO LENSCHOW, Barclays:  Thanks for taking my question.
Just to follow on that one, you've had one quarter of Windows 8 now, what was the feedback that you had from the enterprise so far?  Obviously, they're still in the middle of the Windows 7 upgrade, as well, but what's the point that they liked about Windows 8?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, there's a couple of things.
They like the ability to get thin, lightweight devices with the kind of security and manageability that they're used to, to manage their businesses.
And also there's early interest in new applications being developed with the Windows 8 interface, which is a new way for their users to interact with their business applications.
I think you'll see those two things are early information and driving sort of business interest in Windows 8.
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Thank you.
Good evening.
I wanted to follow up on Rick's question about the transition from the transactional to multi-year deals.
How much of your --- this is going back to Rick's question --- regarding the transition of transactional to multi-year revenues, what in your business reflects the transition and purchasing of on-premise to hosted or cloud offerings, like from Office to Office 365, or server to Azure and other similar transitions?
PETER KLEIN:  Well, a cloud purchase will sort of mirror a multi-year annuity purchase.
It's a very similar way to accomplish the same thing.
You're making a long-term commitment.
The revenue is going to be recognized in a similar fashion.
Today we see a hybrid where customers are buying their multi-year enterprise agreements, they'll also add on some cloud services with that.
But, it will manifest itself in our financial results in a very similar way.
<END Q&A>
Microsoft Third Quarter 2013 Prepared Remarks
On our website, Microsoft.com/investor is our financial summary slide deck, which is intended to follow our prepared remarks, and provide the reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
As a reminder, we will post today's prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript at the Microsoft Investor Relations website until April 18, 2014.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements that are predictions, projections, or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Forms 10-Qs, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
Before I hand the call over to Peter, Id like to remind you that all growth comparisons we make on the call today will relate to the corresponding period of last year.
Also, unless specified otherwise, all impacted numbers for the current quarter have been adjusted for the cumulative effect of the revenue deferrals and recognition related to Windows, Office and Xbox video games, and the expense related to the non-tax deductible European Commission fine.
Details of the adjustments can be found in our financial summary slide deck and press release.
And with that, I'll turn it over Peter.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Thanks, Chris, and good afternoon, everyone.
Before I get into my comments about the quarter, let me say a few words about the CFO transition we announced today.
As we all do throughout our careers, at various times we assess our personal and professional goals and priorities.
Sometimes we change jobs, sometimes we change companies, and sometimes we step back to focus on family and other personal goals.
As we approach the end of our fiscal year, for me personally, its a good time to re-focus my priorities and spend time with family in a way I havent previously had the chance.
I feel great that the company is on a path to an exciting future in devices and services, and I couldnt be more proud of and confident in the finance organization.
I look forward to working with my successor on the transition, including getting out and meeting with many of you.
I have truly enjoyed working with all of you.
And now on to the quarter.
Im pleased to report we drove revenue and earnings per share growth of 8%, even as we navigate an evolving device market.
Our results reflect our diversified portfolio as well as the investments we have made in key strategic areas.
During the quarter, we launched the new Office, our enterprise cloud services continued to gain traction, and we continued to take market share in the data platform.
Before I dive into more details on our progress in these areas, I want to address whats top of mind for many of you, which is our Windows business.
There is no doubt the device market is evolving.
Consumers and businesses are increasingly shifting their focus to touch and mobility and as a result, they want touch-enabled computing devices that are ultra-thin, lightweight, and have long battery life.
While Windows revenue has been impacted by the transition from the traditional PC to a new era of computing devices, the overall addressable markets are growing, and we are excited by the opportunities ahead of us.
We built Windows 8 with touch and mobility at the center of the experience which positions us well in this new era.
However, the transition is complicated given the size of our hardware and software ecosystem.
We still have an immense amount of work to do, yet we feel good about the foundation we have laid, and are optimistic about the long-term success of Windows.
So I want to take some time now to be clear about where we are in this journey and what we are doing to help drive this change.
With Windows 8, we are setting a new, accelerated pace for updates and innovations as we focus on making the Windows experience richer and better.
Since launch, we have delivered several important updates to improve our mail, storage, search, music, and video services.
During the quarter, we also added to the Surface family of devices with Surface Pro which combines the performance capabilities of a PC with a modern tablet design.
Looking ahead, we will release the next version of Windows, codenamed Windows Blue, which further advances the vision of Windows 8 as well as responds to customer feedback.
The assortment of touch-enabled devices that are built for Windows 8 by our OEM partners is also improving.
Over the last couple of months, we started seeing devices that take full advantage of Windows 8, and we expect to see more devices, across more attractive price points, over the coming months.
As part of this, we also are working closely with OEMs on a new suite of small touch devices powered by Windows.
These devices will have competitive price points, partly enabled by our latest OEM offerings designed specifically for these smaller devices, and will be available in the coming months.
In the upcoming back to school selling season, we expect to see devices that incorporate advances from throughout the supply chain, including chipsets.
Haswell, Intels fourth generation Core processor, will help enable new devices that combine performance benefits with power savings.
Later in the year, we expect to see devices based on Intel's upcoming Bay Trail Atom processor which promises to deliver tablets and hybrid PCs with extended battery life at competitive prices.
Today in the Windows Store, there are six times as many apps since launch, and we expect more to be added as we gain traction with Windows 8 adoption.
In June, we will host BUILD, our developer conference, where we will provide more tools and information for developers to build great Windows 8 apps.
In retail, we are working to improve the consumer purchasing experience.
Our initiatives include focused efforts to further educate and incentivize retail sales professionals, and to have better in-store product differentiation.
In summary, Windows is transforming to the new era of computing.
As I said on our last earnings call, growth in Windows depends on our ability to give customers the exciting hardware they want, at the price-points they demand, and a wider range of apps and services to meet their diverse needs.
We are hard at work with our partners to meet these goals, and were confident we are moving in the right direction.
Now, switching gears to productivity.
This quarter, we launched the latest version of Office which brings mobility, social, and cloud features to the worlds most popular productivity app.
Importantly, the new Office represents a fundamental shift in our model.
Now, both businesses and consumers can access Office through subscription.
With this shift, we expect to grow our customer base, increase customer satisfaction via continuous updates, and reduce piracy.
As our enterprise customers modernize their productivity infrastructures, we are confident they will continue to deploy Office 365.
We also expect our transactional customers to increasingly transition to the cloud with Office 365.
Its been a while now that weve been talking about our investments in the cloud, and Im pleased to share that we are starting to realize the benefits of those investments in a meaningful way.
Office 365 lights up with this latest release as evidenced by our growing customer adoption.
This quarter was our strongest ever, with net seat additions up five times over the prior year.
One in four of our enterprise customers now has Office 365 and the business is on a $1 billion annual revenue run rate.
Our Server & Tools business continues its momentum with yet another solid quarter of revenue growth.
Within the data platform, we continue to take share with our strength in mission critical and business intelligence workloads.
Enterprises recognize the power of SQL Server to unlock business insight and as a result, we continue to significantly outpace the market and are seeing new deployments and very healthy renewals.
In enterprise cloud, just in the last week, we launched our Windows Azure Active Directory and infrastructure as a service offering on Windows Azure.This innovation across platform and infrastructure services uniquely positions Microsoft as the only cloud provider who can offer customers a comprehensive hybrid cloud solution that integrates existing IT infrastructure with all the benefits of the public cloud.
Xbox continues to be at the center of our living room strategy, having evolved from gaming to an entertainment platform.
Whether they are playing games, being social, or watching movies, consumers continue to be drawn to Xbox LIVE.
Xbox LIVE now has over 46 million members, up 18% from the prior year.
Clearly, theres a lot of momentum and with E3 only a couple of months away, we look forward to sharing more shortly.
In summary, our diversified portfolio drove solid revenue and earnings per share growth.
We are hard at work - here at Microsoft and with our partners - to drive Windows 8 adoption forward.
At the same time, we have strong momentum in our enterprise businesses, including our cloud services.
Combined with our unique consumer assets like Xbox LIVE and Skype, we are well positioned to deliver on our devices and services strategy.
And with that, Ill hand it over to Chris to discuss our quarterly results in more detail.
I will then come back to discuss our expectations for the fourth quarter and beyond.
CHRIS SUH, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
Thanks Peter.
First, I'm going to review our overall results, and then I'll move on to the details by business segment.
Our diversified portfolio helped us deliver solid financial growth this quarter.
Revenue was up 8% to $18.8 billion and operating income increased 5% to $6.7 billion.
Earnings per share grew 8%, to 65 cents.
Foreign exchange had a $180 million, or 1 percentage point negative impact to revenue this quarter, and a $99 million or 2 percentage point negative impact to net income.
From a geographic perspective, we saw similar growth rates across both developed and emerging markets.
Multi-year licensing revenue continued to be strong, growing 16%.
Additionally, unearned revenue grew 13% to $17.1 billion, and our contracted-not-billed balance was over $21 billion.
In the Windows division, revenue was flat this quarter.
Within that, OEM revenue performance was in line with the underlying x86 PC market which continues to be challenged as the PC market evolves beyond the traditional PC to touch and mobile devices.
This quarter, inventory levels were drawn down as the channel awaits new Windows 8 devices.
Non-OEM revenue grew 40% this quarter, driven by sales of Surface, and continued double-digit growth in volume licensing.
Businesses continue to value the Windows platform.
Volume licensing of Windows is on track to deliver almost $4 billion in revenue this year, and nearly three quarters of Enterprise Agreements that weve signed this year include Windows.
Additionally, this quarter we saw continued progress in the transition of Windows XP to Windows 7, and now two thirds of enterprise desktops are running Windows 7.
Next, Ill move onto our Server and Tools business, where we continue to have good momentum.
Revenue grew 11%, highlighted by multi-year licensing revenue which grew 20%.
The strength in multi-year licensing reflects the commitment and confidence that our customers have in our products and roadmap.
In the data center, the premium version of Windows Server, which targets Tier 1 application workloads, saw significant revenue growth again this quarter.
Companies such as Dominos Pizza and Xerox continue to look to Hyper-V and System Center to deliver their critical business applications.
Revenue for System Center grew 22%, and Hyper-V, our virtualization product, has gained 4 points of market share over the past year.
Our momentum in public cloud continues with more innovation, greater customer adoption and a comprehensive suite of offerings.
Enterprise customers like NBC Sports and 3M continue to choose Windows Azure for their cloud platform needs.
Recently we launched Windows Azure Active Directory, which is an identity and access management solution designed to support cloud based line-of-business applications.
Today, over 2.9 million businesses, government bodies and schools are already enjoying the benefits of Windows Azure Active Directory, using it to manage access to Office365, Dynamics CRM online, Windows Intune and Windows Azure.
In our data platform business, SQL Server revenue grew 16%, and again outpaced the broader market.
Usage of SQL Server for Tier 1 applications continues to grow, based on functionality, reliability and value.
In addition to our efforts in Big Data, we are developing in-memory BI technologies, built right into SQL Server, that achieve breakthrough improvements in transaction processing.
Now, I'll move on to the Microsoft Business Division, where revenue grew 5%.
Within that, business revenue grew 10%, driven by 16% growth in multi-year licensing.
In January, we launched the new Office for consumers.
The new Office introduces touch, social, and mobile scenarios, as well as tight integration with SkyDrive, enabling access to documents from any device.
The new Office is also available as a subscription, which benefits customers as they are always using the most modern version of Office.
As Peter stated, we expect this shift to grow our customer base, and we saw strong early adoption of the subscription service.
I would like to remind you that with subscriptions, the revenue is earned ratably over the length of the subscription, rather than at initial purchase.
All up, consumer revenue was roughly in line with the consumer PC market, influenced by this shift to subscriptions and strong attach gains.
In terms of our productivity server offerings, we continued to see strength with Exchange, SharePoint, and Lync, each growing double digits.
Specifically, Lync revenue grew over 30% again this quarter, with excitement around the platform continuing to grow.
Ninety of the Fortune 100 companies are now using Lync, and there are more than 5 million seats of enterprise voice deployed.
At our Lync 2013 conference in February, we announced that Lync and Skype connectivity for presence, instant messaging and voice will be available to all Lync users by the end of June.
Connecting these audiences is a key milestone as we deliver on the promise of truly unified communications.
Next Ill move on to the Online Services Division, where revenue grew 18%.
Online advertising revenue was up 22%, driven by another quarter of significant search rate improvements.
Operating performance improved 45% this quarter, driven by revenue growth, and continued expense management.
In the Entertainment & Devices Division, revenue grew 33%.
Xbox sold 1.3 million consoles and maintained its share position in a soft console market.
Xbox LIVE continued its strong momentum, and we continuously look for ways to further extend the value of Xbox LIVE, for both our members and content partners.
And as evidence of the expanding benefits, we saw transactional revenue grow roughly twice as fast as member growth this quarter.
Momentum with Windows Phone continues to build.
The devices, now available at broad range of price points, are receiving great reviews, and carrier support continues to grow.
We now have over 10% share in several countries, but realize that there is still a lot of work ahead to break through in some key markets.
With growing awareness of Windows Phone, and sustained innovation from our hardware partners, we feel well positioned to continue our momentum.
Now Ill cover the remainder of the income statement.
Cost of goods sold increased 21%, principally driven by Surface, growth in cloud infrastructure, and royalties on Xbox LIVE content and video games.
Operating expenses grew 4%, primarily related to product launch marketing.
This quarter our effective tax rate was approximately 19%.
And finally, we returned $2.9 billion to shareholders in buyback and dividends.
Now I will turn the call back to Peter for our outlook.
PETER KLEIN, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Thanks, Chris.
For the remainder of the call, I will discuss our expectations for the fourth quarter and share some thoughts on Fiscal Year 2014.
Let me start with the fourth quarter.
In the Windows Division, similar to this quarter, revenue will continue to reflect sales of Surface and strong volume licensing, while OEM revenue will be impacted by the declining traditional PC market as we work to increase our share in tablets.
Within Server and Tools, product revenue, including transactional and multi-year licensing, is about 80% of the divisions total revenue, and enterprise services is the remaining 20%.
We expect both product and enterprise services revenue to grow low double digits.
In the Microsoft Business Division, multi-year licensing revenue, which is approximately 60% of the divisions total, should grow low double-digits.
Excluding the recognition of revenue from the Office Upgrade Offer, transactional revenue, which is the remaining 40% of the divisions total, should be in-line with the x86 PC market.
As a reminder, when updating your Q4 models, we expect to recognize approximately $780 million of revenue related to the Office Upgrade Offer.
In the Online Services Division, we expect revenue to grow low double-digits reflecting growth in search revenue, partially offset by lower display revenue.
Moving on to the Entertainment and Devices Division, we expect revenue to grow mid-teens.
For the fourth quarter, we expect COGS to grow mid-teens, including Surface.
Other Income and Expense includes dividend and interest income, offset by interest expense and the net cost of hedging.
In the current low interest rate environment, we expect these items to generally offset.
We are reducing our full fiscal year guidance for operating expenses to $30.2 to $30.5 billion.
This range excludes the impact of the European Commission fine of $733 million.
For the full fiscal year, we expect our effective tax rate, excluding the expense related to the European Commission fine, to be 17 to 20%, and we continue to expect capital expenditures to be about $3.5 billion.
Excluding the impact of the Office Upgrade Offer, unearned revenue should roughly follow historical seasonal patterns.
Now, turning to Fiscal 2014.
We expect fiscal 2014 operating expenses to be $31.6 to $32.2 billion, which represents growth of 4 to 6% from the mid-point of our updated fiscal 2013 guidance.
We will continue to prioritize our spending while investing in the significant opportunity that is ahead of us.
As we look towards the future, we have a solid foundation of products and services in market and our leadership team is collectively focused on advancing every one of our businesses.
You can expect to hear more about the specific actions we are taking over the next few months.
With that, Ill turn the call over to Chris and well take some questions.
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Thank you.
And thanks, guys, for the cloud data.
We've been looking for a lot of this, so it's very helpful.
Let me ask, I guess, two related parts to that.
Can you give us a sense on the growth metrics in terms of Office 365, which is what you're starting to give here, in terms of revenue, users, customers, something that we can think about there?
And the second half of that, can you give us a sense in terms of the percentage of Office 365 customers that are net new to Exchange?  I know you've given little bits of data on SMB, and new SMB customers, but any sense there would be appreciated.
Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Mark.
On Office 365, the metric that we gave was net seat additions are up five times over the prior year.
So that gives you some growth metric in addition to the revenue number.
To your point on Exchange, or more broadly I would say about other workloads, we're seeing exactly that dynamic.
So, not only are we addressing and reaching new customers segments, like SMB, but many of them have never had a productivity server workload before, not just Exchange, but others as well.
And even those that have had Exchange are now using other workloads.
So, we're seeing most of our customers having more than one workload.
So, across every division in terms of new revenue streams from the service, new customer segments, and new workloads, there's a lot of new, and that's what's driving the growth and the opportunity that we've been looking for.
MARK MOERDLER:  Thank you very much, I appreciate it.
And I'll be looking forward to hearing what you're doing the rest of your life, and good luck.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Mark.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question, please.
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi, thanks guys.
You provided a little bit of color on Surface.
Obviously, we're seeing an expanding portfolio there.
I just wonder if you have a sense of how this is evolving, especially on the distribution side, and how the product is doing versus your expectations.
And then, when you start to think about going forward, how would you also expect the other product portfolio to evolve as well as distribution?
PETER KLEIN:  Great question.
As I said, we are expanding both the product set and distribution, and that is broadly all devices inclusive of Surface.
We are expanding distribution of Surface.
We're now in 22 countries, seven new retailers.
And we'll continue to look to expand that, not only just expanding but improving the experience.
And that's true not just for Surface, but broadly for Windows 8 devices, and so we'll be investing against that for both Surface and a broader array of Windows 8 devices at multiple price points, including lower price points going forward.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you.
Next question, please.
WALTER PRICHARD, Citi:  Thanks, Peter and Chris.
I wonder if you could weigh in.
There's been a bit of a debate this quarter around sort of what the underlying PC market did.
And I think we've seen numbers ranging from a mid single digit decline to a mid-teen decline.
I'm just wondering first if you could weigh in on that?  You've in the past given some sort of range.
And then related to that is, if you look at the second half, I'm wondering how we should set our expectations around this kind of mid to high end Haswell release from Intel in terms of impact it may have on the PC market versus the later in the year, more holiday time, lower end ATOM release, and how those two chip releases may have an impact on what you're expecting from the device market and overall impact on Windows?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, thanks, Walter.
On the PC market, I would look to some of the third parties, IDC and Gartner, they're sort of in the 12-13-14 down range this quarter.
And in terms of the chipsets, you know, we've always felt that with Windows 8 there was a process of the ecosystem really innovating across the board, and you're really starting to see that on the chips.
And we're very encouraged by both Haswell and some of the ATOM processors to really improve the overall user experience that Windows 8 delivers.
And over the coming selling season, I think that's very encouraging.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Walter.
Next question, please.
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Great.
I was wondering, Peter, if you can help.
We've heard Intel talk about Haswell, and they mentioned it on the call, I think it was last night.
You obviously mentioned it.
I guess I'm just wondering, what can you guys do to specifically help grow your tablet share, given you are reliantex the Surface productson OEM partners to really hit a broad segment of the market.
And I'm thinking in general given the OEM partners don't have much wiggle room on the margin side, what can you do to help kind of stimulate your market share in particular in the mobility and in the tablet side?  Thank you.
And good luck in the future, we're going to miss you.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks.
I've enjoyed working with you.
I think broadly in improving our position in tablets, and just generally in devices there's five or six to dimensions, ranging from what we're doing with OEMs on the devices and the range of devices and how we have a range of price points; what the chips can do, because I think that's part of it; both first party and third-party applications and we've seen improvements across the board there; the user interface and how we're innovating across the user experience; and then distribution.
So, if you start sort of from the bottom up, all the way to when you buy the products, we're working across all those dimensions.
And on the device side we are working closely with the OEMs to help them take Windows 8 and show it off in all its glory, across different form factors.
I talked about new smaller form factors and how Windows 8 can innovate to improve that experience.
So, I think the biggest thing we're doing is helping to develop new and improved user experiences across the board, across size, across price points, to deliver a really compelling Windows 8 experience.
And it's not just the devices, like I said, it's the chips, it's the apps, it's the buying experience, it's the user interface.
So, we're really focused on all five or six of those dimensions going forward.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Heather.
Next question, please.
KEITH WEISS, Morgan Stanley:  Thank, you guys, for taking my question and nice quarter.
I wanted to ask about the impact.
You mentioned on the call that going to subscription revenues does have a near-term impact on revenues.
I was wondering if you could help us out and understand whether we're seeing that impact today and perhaps to what degree with the strong uptake of some of the cloud services, particularly like Office 365?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, it's a good point.
Yes, we are seeing that particularly in our transactional business and in MBD.
As people move from what may have been a transactional or perpetual license, where the revenue is recognized up front, to a subscription service where it's recognized ratably.
So, you're basically deferring the rest of the term of the subscription.
So, in the short-term you'll be deferring revenue that if it were bought not in a subscription would have been recognized immediately.
As the subscription business is growing you'll see that impact growing.
But, over time what you'll get more looks like an annuity revenue stream that's more predictable, and has higher customer satisfaction, and probably higher retention rates going forward.
But, in the short-term that will impact mostly in the transactional side of the MBD business.
KEITH WEISS:  Excellent, thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question, please.
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Thanks.
Peter, just on the gross margin, it's been under pressure for the last several years, but this quarter it did bounce back.
Can you just give us a sense of how you think gross margins will trend and do you expect this is a stabilization we should expect a slow improvement from here, or expect more of the same in terms of where they've been in the last couple of quarters.
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, gross margins as you know are always going to be a function of mix.
And so depending on where you are in the quarter, the biggest driver of what your gross margin is going to be is mix.
So, if you have a big hardware quarter that has low gross margins that will impact it.
The biggest things that are going to impact the mix are going to be hardware, cloud services, and enterprise services or people services.
It is a fact that we are starting to get scale in our cloud services and so the growth that we're seeing in Office 365 is really coming at an improved margin as we scale that up.
So, within each we make progress, and then overall in a given quarter for the company it's going to be a function of mix.
So obviously in a holiday quarter where you sell a bunch of hardware that will have an impact on gross margin.
But, I think one of the main takeaways for me is in particularly some of our cloud services we're really starting to get scale.
Bing continues to improve their margins and Office 365 is really starting to get to scale.
So those things are really encouraging.
BRENT THILL:  Thanks.
Congrats, Peter.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Brent.
We'll take the next question please.
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Hi, thanks for taking my question.
You just launched your Azure infrastructure as a service just went generally available this week.
And I'd love to get some color on how much that's figuring in the long-term contracts, the growth in long-term contracts, and what your expectations might be for more traditional infrastructure as a service uptake over the next several quarters.
Thanks.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, great question.
It's clearly a key enabler of our all-up cloud OS story and how we're driving what we're doing with enterprises in the data center.
With infrastructure as a service we now have the most complete end-to-end offering through platform and software, identity, and access.
But, having the infrastructure is a key enabler and I think a real accelerator for the Windows Azure strategy and really more broadly the cloud OS strategy.
We now have a complete end-to-end story through the data center from private, to hosted, to public, from infrastructure to platform.
So, I think it's, again, a key enabler of that all-up strategy and accelerator.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Ed.
We'll take the next question please.
JOHN DIFUCCI, KPMC:  Thank you.
Peter, I'd just like to echo other's thoughts here.
It truly has been a pleasure and I wish you the best going forward.
My question is for Chris and Chris I just want to clarify something you said about inventories.
I think you were taking about PC inventory.
But, with the Windows business can you give us your assessment of what Windows inventory is at OEMs, especially given the disappointing PC shipment data this quarter?
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, John.
Yes, I did mention the fact that we believe inventories were drawn down.
We do think that they're at normal levels at this point though.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Okay, great.
Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, John.
I appreciate it.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question please.
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowen and Company:  Okay, thank you.
Good afternoon and, Peter, I'll echo my sentiments as everyone else did, as well.
So, in recent periods we've seen your MBD growth significantly outpace PC unit growth, although we now have a dynamic where your Office subscription is really resonating with customers.
So, the question is just looking at this on a directional basis, is MBD revenue out-performance relative to PC units something that you think is sustainable going forward?
PETER KLEIN:  Yes, the answer is it will depend.
It's certainly an offset between attach gains we're making against the market, offset against some deferral as revenue moves to a subscription.
So, it will kind of depend each quarter.
Long-term it's a great trend, because we're building up a banked book of business on the subscription side, which will become less and less connected to the PC market.
GREGG MOSKOWITZ:  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Gregg.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Gregg.
Mary, I think we have time for two more calls, two more questions, please.
RAIMO LENSCHOW, Barclays:  Thanks for taking my question.
Peter, all the best.
A quick one, if you look at kind of IBM coming out earlier on today having a relatively tough quarter given the economy, can you just comment a little bit of what you're seeing out there, especially in the Server and Tools Division, but other guys are really struggling.
So, help us understand how you see the economy?  Thank you.
PETER KLEIN:  I think about the economy, and then I think about the value proposition of our products.
Clearly, there are tough spots in the economy.
I think enterprises and CIOs are looking for what they've always been looking for, which is how do they get the best value for their dollar to move their businesses forward.
And I think we have a very good story in terms of the value that enterprises and small and medium businesses get from the capabilities that they can get from us, particularly in the data center with SQL.
And as you compare SQL Server to competing products, the performance that you get relative to the price is a really compelling value proposition.
And that's what's been enabling us to take share, the same on virtualization as well.
And so I think for us it's a combination of having the most complete roadmap for getting to the cloud, as well as the best collection of products that have price performance characteristics that are attractive to CIOs that are allowing us to have growth in our enterprise business, particularly in Server and Tools.
RAIMO LENSCHOW:  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Raimo.
Last question, please.
BRAD REBACK, Stifel:  Thanks very much.
Peter, as you look at the PC data over the course of the quarter, could you give us any sense of how that trended, and following up on that, as you think about the business upgrade cycle, which should be over by this time next year, do we risk a real fall off again in the PC business because the upgrade cycle has aided what has been a difficult PC market for the last couple of quarters?  And best of luck, by the way.
PETER KLEIN:  Thanks, Brad.
On you first question, there wasn't anything sort of abnormal in terms of the trends during the quarter.
On your second question, I think the upgrade cycle, particularly for businesses, will be interesting over the next year.
I think over the longer term what's more interesting is the long-term evolution we're seeing in the device market, which I think is actually going to be more of a driver than any sort of temporal upgrade cycle.
I think people are looking to innovations to happen faster.
People are getting new experiences and new form factors, and that's what Windows 8 was designed to take advantage of.
And so I think about the opportunity more about the new capabilities and the new sets of services and experiences people can get on their devices and different kinds of devices than it is about an upgrade cycle that's driven by something else.
BRAD REBACK:  Great.
Thanks very much.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Brad.
Okay.
So that will wrap up the Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
We look forward to seeing many of you in the coming months at events such as E3, TechEd and BUILD, as well as at various investor conferences.
For those of you unable to attend in person, these events will generally be webcasted, and you will be able to follow our comments at Microsoft.com/investor.
Please contact us if you need additional details.
Thanks again for joining us today and take care.
Thank you.
Microsoft Fourth Quarter 2013 Prepared Remarks
CHRIS SUH, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
On our website, Microsoft.com/investor is our financial summary slide deck, which is intended to follow our prepared remarks, and provide the reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
As a reminder, we will post today's prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript at the Microsoft Investor Relations website until July 18, 2014.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements that are predictions, projections, or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Forms 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
Before I hand the call over to Amy, Id like to remind you that all growth comparisons we make on the call today will relate to the corresponding period of last year.
Also, unless specified otherwise, all impacted numbers for the current quarter have been adjusted for the cumulative effect of the revenue deferrals and recognitions related to the Windows and Office upgrade offers, the $900 million charge for inventory adjustments primarily related to the new Surface RT pricing we announced earlier this week, and the goodwill impairment charge from last year.
You can find details of the adjustments and reconciliations of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures in our financial summary slide.
AMY HOOD, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Thanks, Chris, and good afternoon, everyone.
Thanks for joining us today.
In many ways, our fourth quarter results reflect the trends we saw developing throughout the fiscal year.
The consumer x86 PC market declined as users continued to prioritize devices with touch and mobility.
At the same time, we saw continued strength in our enterprise products and cloud solutions, and increased adoption of our consumer services.
This quarter, our Windows business declined as the device market continued to evolve beyond the traditional PC.
We are working to transition the business into this modern era of computing, taking advantage of the new scenarios enabled by Windows 8.
As weve said before, given the complexity of the ecosystem, this journey will take time, but we continue to make incremental progress.
In June, we released the public preview of Windows 8.1.
It blends the desktop and modern experience, and has new features and improvements in areas such as personalization, search, built-in apps, and cloud connectivity.
Windows 8.1 will be a free update to existing Windows 8 users, and will be made available to OEMs in August, less than one year since launch.
To increase and improve retail distribution, we entered into a strategic partnership with Best Buy to create a Windows Store in over 600 Best Buy locations.
These store-within-a-store locations provide a large-scale, hands-on consumer experience that showcases Microsoft devices and services.
The percentage and breadth of touch devices available at retail continues to improve.
The first 8-inch Windows tablet became available at retail a few weeks ago.
It has legacy application compatibility, includes Microsoft Office, and retails for less than $400.
We expect additional compelling small-screen devices to be available in the coming months.
Less than a year ago, we launched Surface RT and Surface Pro  each with a unique value proposition.
Surface is one part of our journey to bring innovative, compelling Windows devices to market in the modern era of computing.
With each step, we analyze our progress and fine-tune our action plan as needed.
Heres what we did this quarter:
We reduced the price of Surface RT by $150 to $349 per device.
As a result of this price change, as well as inventory adjustments for related parts and accessories, we recorded a $900 million charge to our income statement.
While this resulted in a -$0.07 impact on earnings, we believe this pricing adjustment will accelerate Surface RT adoption and position us better for long-term success.
We also increased retail distribution this quarter.
Surface is now available in 29 markets and more than 10,000 retail locations.
We expanded the availability of Surface to our business and institutional customers.
Through our new channel expansion program, commercial customers are able to purchase Surface devices from authorized resellers in the US.
Over the next few months, we will authorize commercial distributors and resellers in more countries.
So, in summary on Windows, we are working hard with our partners to gain share in the evolving and growing device market.
I want to be very clear - we know we have to do better, and thats one reason we made the strategic and organizational changes we made last week.
With over 1.5B Windows users around the world, a transition of this magnitude takes time.
We are confident we are moving in the right direction.
Now, on to our enterprise business which continues to be strong.
We closed out the year with record unearned revenue of $22.4 billion as businesses continue to make long-term commitments to the Microsoft platform.
Within our Server and Tool business, we continue to make significant improvements in performance, reliability, and scalability with SQL Server.
As a result, customers are increasingly moving mission critical and BI workloads to the platform.
While SQL Server has been the unit share leader in the market for some time, it has consistently outgrown the market over the past 12 months, and is now the second largest database in revenue share.
We recently announced the next versions of Windows Server and System Center which will continue to deliver on our Cloud OS vision.
With new features and enhancements in virtualization, storage, and networking, we are empowering our customers to more efficiently manage their application services, and their private, hosted, and public cloud infrastructures.
In Windows Azure, we continue to innovate and broaden our cloud platform offerings.
We recently announced an important enterprise partnership with Oracle that will enable customers to run Oracle software on Hyper-V, and in Windows Azure.
In June, we announced the public preview of Windows Azure in China, operated by 21Vianet, making Microsoft the first multinational organization to offer public cloud services in China.
As a result of the greater choice and flexibility, we are seeing increased customer traction  both in terms of an increase in enterprise customers, and average deal size.
Our productivity solutions continue to be a top priority for CIOs.
As enterprise customers look to modernize their productivity infrastructures, they are increasingly turning to Office 365.
We recently announced the expansion of commercial availability into several new markets, making Office 365 available in over 125 markets worldwide.
Im pleased to share that momentum is accelerating and Office 365 is now on a $1.5 billion annual revenue run rate.
During the quarter, we saw ongoing momentum for our consumer services such as Office 365 Home Premium, SkyDrive, Xbox LIVE, Skype, and Outlook.com.
By giving consumers rich, high-value experiences across productivity, communication, and entertainment, these services can help give our products -- and our overall ecosystem -- a strategic advantage in todays marketplace, where the line between home and work is blurring for many customers.
Our unified communication offerings of Skype and Lync are a great example of where consumer and enterprise products can be mutually reinforcing and create more opportunity for Microsoft.
In summary, the fourth quarter continued many of the trends we saw developing throughout the fiscal year.
We continued to make important strides towards our strategy  to create a family of devices and services for individuals and businesses, to empower them for the activities they value most.
Some of our investments are already paying off, while others reinforce the foundation that positions us for future growth and profitability.
And with that, Ill hand it over to Chris to give more details about this quarter, before I come back to share thoughts on the first quarter of fiscal 2014.	
CHRIS SUH, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
Thanks Amy.
First, I'm going to review our overall results, and then I'll move on to the details by business segment.
Revenue was up 3% to $19.2 billion and operating income declined 11% to $6.2 billion.
Earnings per share declined 19%, to $0.59 cents.
Foreign exchange had a $257 million, or 1 percentage point, negative impact to revenue this quarter, and a $177 million or 3 percentage point negative impact to net income.
From a geographic perspective, revenue in the US was strong relative to other regions.
Annuity revenue continued to be strong, growing 13%.
We had record unearned revenue of $22.4 billion, and our contracted-not-billed balance was approximately $21 billion.
Now to the results for the Windows Division where revenue declined 5% this quarter.
The x86 PC market continued to decline.
While business PCs showed modest growth, we estimate consumer PCs declined more than 20%.
As a result, OEM revenue declined 15%.
OEM revenue lagged the PC market primarily due to market dynamics in China, and lower ASPs, reflecting the introduction of our small screen touch offerings and current period incentive programs.
Non-OEM revenue grew 22%, driven by sales of Surface, and continued double-digit growth in volume licensing, as businesses across all areas and segments continue to value the Windows platform.
This quarter we saw continued progress in the transition from Windows XP, and today, almost three-quarters of enterprise desktops are running Windows 7.
Volume licensing of Windows delivered more than $4 billion in revenue this year.
Next, Ill walk through our Server and Tools business, which posted another solid quarter with 9% revenue growth and double-digit bookings growth.
Product revenue grew 9% driven primarily by growth in premium versions of Windows Server and SQL Server.
Our cloud momentum continues with strong customer adoption, upsell to higher level services, and increased innovation.
We released a number of Azure services including Mobility, Media, and Website services and a growing number of customers are already using multiple services for their cloud platform needs.
We added 25% more Enterprise customers this quarter and now over 50% of the Fortune 500 are using Windows Azure.
In the data center, System Center grew 14% and the premium version of Windows Server, continued to see significant revenue growth.
Hyper-V, our virtualization product, continued to gain market share over the past year.
Companies such as Aston Martin and Grant Thornton continue to look to Hyper-V and System Center to deliver their critical business applications.
In our data platform business, SQL Server revenue grew 16%, and again outpaced the broader market.
Last month, we announced SQL Server 2014, the next version of our data platform, which has in-memory capabilities built right into the core database.
We also announced Power BI for Office 365, a cloud based BI solution that combines the power of SQL Server with the familiarity of Office.
Now, I'll move on to the Microsoft Business Division, where revenue grew 2%.
Within that, business revenue grew 7%, driven by 10% growth in annuity revenue.
Consumer revenue declined 27%.
Results in our consumer business were driven by declines in the consumer x86 PC market and the shift to subscription, offset in part by attach gains.
As our customers transition to this new subscription model, there is a short-term impact to revenue due to the changes in the timing of revenue recognition, but over time, we expect our revenue to grow, and become more recurring and predictable.
With the subscription model, we are providing greater value to our customers, through frequent product updates, new cloud services, and attractive pricing.
We saw strong early adoption of the subscription offering and now have more than 1 million Office 365 Home Premium subscribers.
It has been a big year for Office 365 and as Amy said it is now on a $1.5 billion annual revenue run rate.
This was our strongest quarter ever with more net seat adds in the quarter than in all of fiscal year 2012.
We are seeing strong upsell with 1 in 3 Office 365 seats now running premium workloads.
In terms of our productivity offerings, we continued to see strength with Exchange, SharePoint and Lync each growing double digits.
Lync revenue grew over 30%, driving our enterprise communication business to deliver more than $1 billion revenue this fiscal year.
Additionally, we met a key milestone in the Lync and Skype integration, and users can now seamlessly communicate in voice and IM across the two services.
Next Ill move on to the Online Services Division, where revenue grew 9% and operating performance improved by $107 million, or 22%.
Online advertising revenue was up 11%, driven by both rate and volume improvements in our search business.
In the Entertainment & Devices Division, revenue grew 8%.
Xbox LIVE transaction revenue grew nearly 20% and is providing economic opportunities for publishers in this soft console market.
This quarter we announced our next generation gaming and entertainment console, Xbox One.
And at E3 we showcased an impressive lineup of games that will be coming to the new platform.
Progress with Windows Phone continues as our partners including Nokia, Samsung, Huawei and HTC are delivering new phones at a broader range of price points.
Telefonica also recently announced an enhanced marketing effort to promote Windows Phone 8 devices.
And with the recent Sprint announcement, Windows Phone 8 devices will now be available on all major US operators.
Now Ill cover the remainder of the income statement.
Cost of goods sold increased 14%, principally driven by Surface and growth in cloud infrastructure.
Operating expenses grew 9%, primarily related to sales and marketing for Surface and Windows 8.
This quarter our capex increased as we continued to invest in our cloud infrastructure and expand our geographic footprint to support the growth in our online businesses.
And finally, we returned $2.9 billion to shareholders in buybacks and dividends.
AMY HOOD, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Before I discuss our expectations for the first quarter, Id like to spend a few minutes discussing last weeks announcement on One Microsoft.
If you havent already done so, I encourage you to read our Strategy Memo and Steve Ballmers email to employees.
Microsoft is rallying behind a single strategy.
As part of this, we implemented a new organizational structure that will allow us to advance our strategy more quickly and more efficiently.
We are currently in the process of determining what changes, if any, will be made to our reporting segments.
In late September, we will host a financial analyst event here in Redmond at which point we will discuss our strategy, our new organizational structure, and any changes to our reporting segments.
We will also give more thoughts on our full year outlook at that time.
Please look for additional details from Chris over the coming weeks.
Now, moving on to our expectations for the first quarter.
In Windows, we expect revenue to continue to be negatively impacted by the decline in the consumer x86 PC market.
Excluding the impact of the Windows Upgrade Offer in the prior year, OEM revenue should account for approximately 65% of the divisions revenue, and should decline mid-teens.
Non-OEM revenue should account for approximately 35% of the divisions revenue, primarily reflecting revenue from volume licensing and Surface, including Surface RT at its new price point.
When updating your models, keep in mind that in first quarter of fiscal 2013, prior to the launch of Surface, OEM accounted for 75% of the divisions total revenue.
Within Server and Tools, product revenue, including transactional and multi-year licensing, is about 80% of the divisions total, while enterprise services is the remaining 20%.
We expect both product and enterprise services revenue to grow high single-digits.
In the Microsoft Business Division, we expect business revenue to account for approximately 85% of the divisions total, while consumer revenue should account for the remaining 15%.
Business revenue should grow mid single-digits, reflecting low double-digit growth in annuity revenue, and the shift from transaction licensing to cloud services.
With the ongoing shift to subscriptions, consumer revenue will lag the x86 consumer PC market by approximately five percentage points, even as attach continues to grow.
This excludes the impact of the Office Upgrade Offer in the prior year.
As a reminder, business revenue accounted for 80% of total revenue in the prior year.
In the Online Services Division, we expect revenue to grow low double-digits reflecting growth in search revenue, partially offset by lower display revenue.
With the Entertainment and Devices Division, we expect revenue to decline low single-digits as the industry awaits the next generation consoles.
For the first quarter, cost of goods sold will reflect Surface as well as the impact of the capital expenditures we made in fiscal 2013.
As a result, COGS should grow over 20%.
Other Income and Expense includes dividend and interest income, offset by interest expense, and the net cost of hedging.
In the current low interest rate environment, we expect these items to generally offset.
For the first quarter, regarding capex, we expect continued growth in our investments in our global datacenters.
Excluding the impact of the Windows and Office Upgrade Offers, unearned revenue should roughly follow historical seasonal patterns.
Now, turning briefly to the full fiscal year.
We are reducing our operating expense guidance.
We now expect fiscal year 2014 operating expenses to be $31.3 to $31.9 billion dollars, with growth in the low-teens for the first quarter.
We expect our tax rate to be between 18% and 21% for the full fiscal year.
In summary, as we look back on the year, fiscal 2013 was a pivotal time for Microsoft.
With Windows 8, we increased our addressable markets.
Our OEM partners have started capitalizing on the new opportunities, delivering a wide range of new Windows hardware  from phones, to tablets, to new PCs.
We extended our first-party devices through Surface and the announcement of Xbox One.
We modernized productivity with Office 365 changing our business model  for the first time, both businesses and consumers can now access Office through subscription.
We took share from competitors in key enterprise markets.
We added several new features, including infrastructure-as-a-service capabilities, to Windows Azure.
With Azure, we are fundamentally changing the way businesses manage their IT infrastructure.
And, we continued the expansion of our datacenter footprint which enables us to deliver high-value services and experiences globally.
As we look to fiscal 2014, were focused on a single strategy.
With our new organizational structure, we believe we will be able to execute more quickly and more efficiently, driving long-term growth, profitability, and shareholder value.
With that I'll turn it back to Chris and we'll take some questions.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Amy.
We want to get to questions from as many of you as possible, so please just stick to one question.
Operator, please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citigroup:  Thanks, Amy.
I'm wondering if you could talk a little bit aboutyou talked about COGS in Q1 and you don't mention COGS for the rest of the year.
Obviously you have Xbox One launching in the second quarter.
Could you give us some guidance about how we should think about that product having an impact on margins, maybe comparing it to the 360, or anything else you could do to help us directionally with the COGS impact beyond Q1?
AMY HOOD:  As we transition to a devices and services company, I think you should keep in mind that we expect CAPEX to continue to grow as we ramp our business.
Specifically, to Xbox One, and the new generation of consoles and launches, I think you should think about that as we think about all console lifecycles.
So keep that in mind as you model COGS and seasonality throughout the year.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Walter.
Next question, please.
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Thank you.
Can you give us some color on the short-term revenue impact of the move to the cloud?  Is it just MBD?  Is it also in Server and Tools?  How does the license revenue convert to cloud revenue?
AMY HOOD:  Mark, thanks for that question.
It is primarily in MBD, where we had a higher percentage of our revenue that was accounted for transactional, both on the business side and in the consumer side.
So I think that's why you've seen us in our outlook for Q1 try to start to explain that transition to consumer by saying that we expect it to lag the PC market by approximately 5 percentage points while attach increases.
MARK MOERDLER:  Is there a similar lag on the transactional side on the enterprise?
AMY HOOD:  Yes, you can see it when we gave the guidance for the business segment.
We said 10 percent growth in the annuity and so that would clearly say that part of that is a transactional move from recognized up front revenue to multiyear licensing agreements.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Mark.
Next question, please.
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi, guys.
Just a follow-up on both those two.
First, Amy, obviously when you go to a subscription model, you have less up-front, kind of lower billings that first year versus license.
I'm wondering if you could give us sort of a backfill where a dollar of cloud or Office 365 revenue would have been in that first year $3 relative to license, just so we can try and backfill and help with the transition?
And then also to Walter's question about Xbox COGS.
Maybe you could give us a sense for if this cycle really should be any different than previous cycle when you thought about pricing relative to the cost of the console itself?  Thanks.
AMY HOOD:  I'll try to remember both those questions.
Let me take the second one, because it's the most recent in my mind.
I would not think about this console cycle as being any different from prior cycles.
So let me go back to the first question, which is can I give an example, I believe, of how to think about the transition from how we used to recognize revenue when we bought something up front, transactional versus buying a subscription from us.
I'll give an example.
If you used to buy a license from us as a consumer and paid us, for example, $100, for ease of math, we recognize the $100 in the period in which it was purchased.
Now if that same person went and bought Office 365 Home Premium, and once it's activated we will recognize the revenue over the period of the purchase, which is 12 months, and recognize it ratably.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks.
Next question, please.
KEITH WEISS, Morgan Stanley:  Thank you guys for taking my question.
I was wondering, focusing on the Server and Tools Division, you guys came in with high single digit growth versus the guidance of low double-digit growth.
I was hoping you could walk us through some of the elements that perhaps transpired during the quarter that caused that gap, why it came in slightly below expectations there.
And to what extent was the shift towards subscriptions a part of that?
AMY HOOD:  Let me start by saying Server and Tools had a very good quarter.
We continue to win share in virtualization with SQL Server and we continue to grow faster than both Oracle and IBM.
Revenue did grow 9 percent, which importantly far outpaced the underlying hardware market.
And over the period of the quarter, we did see the hardware market fundamentally come in a bit lower than we had expected.
CHRIS SUH:  Great.
Thanks, Keith.
Next question, please.
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Great.
Thank you very much.
Amy, I was wondering if you could talk a little bit about the incentive pricing you've been doing, not just on your own devices, like Chris mentioned in his prepared remarks, but also in the OEM market?  And if you haven't done incentive pricing at the OEM level, is there a chance we could see this strategy going forward as a way to help lower the price points of consumer PCs, and then hence trying to spur demand?  Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Heather.
I think it's a great question.
I do think that we should think about incentives, and all of our programs, including a small screen touch SKU that we've launched, as a way to increase the breadth of our Windows devices available across all price points.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Heather.
Next question, please.
RICK SHERLUND, Nomura:  Thanks.
I wonder if you have any perspective for us on, you've got Intel's Haswell chip shipping now, 8.1 coming in probably October.
Are you sensing that OEMs are trying to manage inventories down for the time being and waiting cautiously?  Intel suggested that maybe you're seeing some inventory liquidation.
So I wonder if you could just give us a sense for what you're hearing from the OEMs?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Rick.
I think like the rest of the ecosystem, we are excited by the advances Intel has made with this fourth generation core processor.
And we're also looking forward to the next ATOM chip.
But with launch less than a month ago, I think it's a little bit too early for me to say, and we'll have to wait and see how the quarter plays out.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Rick.
Next question, please.
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Amy, on the expenses, you're revising next year down, and it looks like your expense growth will materially slow from what it was this year.
I'm just curious if you could just help us understand where that's coming from, how you're thinking about that for next year?
AMY HOOD:  Well, actually, I think this isI feel good, because I think in some ways the reorg we announced last week, along with our increased focus on our new single strategy has allowed us to really look and say what are the things we're going to put behind and focus to improve our execution.
And so I feel quite good about our ability to do that.
And you've heard us say before, many of the reasons we did this reorg are about doing things better and more efficiently.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you.
Thanks, Brent.
Next question, please.
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Hi.
Good afternoon.
Amy, you had discussed your increased CAPEX this quarter, and I was wondering if you could address the margin profile of your cloud services?  In the comments, you discussed how you have higher data center costs.
And what I would like to understand is whether this is temporary as you're ramping up this transition towards subscription business, or whether this actually changes the gross margin profile of these revenues?  Thanks.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Ed.
It's a good question.
As we transition to a device and services company that is a multi-year commitment to evolve our business, and you should expect the CAPEX will continue to grow as we ramp that business.
With the expansion of Azure service offerings and the continued momentum in Office 365, as well as our consumer services, investing in this global footprint to meet customer demand is incredibly important and quite strategic.
And really the question is our ability to scale smartly, and that will create an advantage for us that we can pass along to our customers.
And so I look forward to being able to move these data centers globally to reach more people with more services.
CHRIS SUH:  Operator, next question, please.
JOHN DIFUCCI, JP Morgan:  Thank you.
Amy, your CAPEX this quarter was about $700 million or greater than $700 million, greater than you guided just 90 days ago.
Why was there such a sudden change?  I know Chris, I think, explained why it was high, higher, and why it's going to be higher going forward.
But why was it such a sudden change so dramatically just in this quarter?  And will this planned increase going forward affect your ability to do things like buyback shares?
AMY HOOD:  In Q4, really, as we continued to add Azure services, in fact we added over 80 this quarter, and with the increased demand of Office 365, and this $1.5 billion annual run rate up from just a billion in Q3, I would think about that as our ability to increase demand and meet demand globally with our services.
And so doing that in Q4 was important, because you want to be ahead of demand there.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  So was that something that was unexpected?  You just had higher demand in Q4?
AMY HOOD:  We're accelerating.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Okay.
Amy, will this affect your ability to buy back shares going forward, this increasing CAPEX?
AMY HOOD:  No.
Our cash, we returned $2.9 billion this quarter, over $12 for the year, and we'll continue to take a balanced approach to capital allocation with those investments, acquisitions where they make sense, and return of capital to shareholders.
CHRIS SUH:  Okay.
Next question, please.
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  Hi.
Thank you very much.
Amy, congrats on your first conference call as the CFO.
My question has to do with the Windows side of the business.
I know that you had an impairment charge for the inventory clearance.
But even if I add that back in, it looks like the operating margins in the Windows Business were sequentially lower quite materially.
I just wanted to get some insights into what drove that from the March quarter into the June quarter?
As you look further out into the operating margins for the Windows Business, given that you're going to be focusing on Surface, how should we think about the margin structure?  I guess you have a volume threshold to clear before you can start to make a margin given that it's more of a product.
But there are really two parts to that question.
I would love to get your insights.
Thank you so much.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Kash.
Let me address what I think were the two components.
The first component felt like a general question about margins this quarter for Windows.
As you said, they were impacted by Surface.
And the second one is by the marketing investment we continue to make in the ecosystem to move it forward.
Overall I think as you think about the Windows division as we report it, obviously since there's a mix between hardware and software, you should continue to expect margins to reflect that mix.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Kash.
Next question, please.
ROSS MCMILLAN, Jefferies:  Thanks a lot.
Amy, I just wanted to drill into the billings growth where we adjust for the unearned and it's a lot higher for the Server and Tools business which is obviously going through a transition towards more subscription arrangements, a lot higher there than in the MBD segment.
I'm just wondering if you can compare and contrast why that might be.
I understand the consumer piece in MBD, but is the other piece of this just that there are more sort of traditional licensing arrangements in MBD with enterprise customers and so the impact from the transition is all the greater, and that's why you see that more subdued billings growth rate in MBD?  Thanks.
AMY HOOD:  Ross, thank you.
It's always terrific when someone answers their own question.
You actually have it exactly correct.
ROSS MCMILLAN:  Great, thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Ross.
Next question, please.
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowen and Company:  Thank you very much and good afternoon.
Just a follow on a big on Kash's question, with Windows revenue coming in where it did, we're getting a few questions from investors about how Windows fared this quarter, relative to PC units.
If we were to exclude tablet revenues, both Surface and otherwise, I was just wondering Amy if you might be able to say roughly on a year-over-year basis how Windows PC revenue compared to the low double-digit PC unit decline cited by the IDCs and Gartners.
AMY HOOD:  Chris actually covered that a bit in his comments, but let me reiterate, because I do understand the question, I think, which is related to our OEM revenue 15 percent, down 15 percent.
It was related, I believe, to China, lower ASPs on the small screen SKU that we mentioned, as well as some of the incentive programs that we had in place during the quarter.
GREGG MOSKOWITZ:  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Gregg.
Next question, please.
RAIMO LENSCHOW, Barclays:  Thank you and, Amy, welcome on the first earnings call.
I had a question on the business PC side, that certainly was an area of strength for the Windows division and you saw some growth there.
Can you talk a little bit about if that's kind ofif you see that as a sustainable number, or is that still driven by the end of life for Windows XP?  Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Yes, as we mentioned, our Windows business did make incremental progress in the business side.
We expect that to continue in Q1.
And with the end of life of Windows XP next year, we expect continued migrations.
And today in the enterprise about three-quarters of desktops are already running Windows 7.
RAIMO LENSCHOW:  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Good.
Thank you.
Next question, please, operator?
BRENDAN BARNICLE, Pacific Crest Securities:  Thanks so much.
Amy, contracted but unbilled was down sequentially from Q3, the first time we'd seen that in the last two years.
What's attributing to that shift?
AMY HOOD:  Thank you.
Actually I think our strong annuity growth, as well as our record unearned balance I do believe supports our belief that the strong performance of our multi-year license agreements is in place.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks.
Operator, I think we have time for one more.
KARL KEIRSTEAD, BMO Capital Markets:  Thanks.
I just wanted to ask a question about the mix shift to multi-year licensing across Microsoft that's been a big part of the story.
It's been up about 5 percentage points year-over-year each quarter in Fiscal '13.
Amy, I'm just wondering as we look forward to Fiscal '14 can we expect it to increase at that clip, or is the software assurance attach rate now getting high enough that that mix shift should start to moderate?
AMY HOOD:  I continue to believe we'll have double-digit annuity growth next year.
So I think that shift you've seen, especially as we continue to move people to our cloud services, will continue.
KARL KEIRSTEAD:  Okay, thanks.
CHRIS SUH:  Okay.
So that will wrap up our Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
We look forward to seeing many of you in the coming months at various investor conferences and at our financial analyst meeting to be held in late September, where we'll share more details about our long-term strategies, new organizational structure and outlook for the rest of the fiscal year.
Thank you again for joining us today.
END
Microsoft First Quarter 2014 Prepared Remarks
Operator:  Welcome to the first-quarter 2014 Microsoft Corporation earnings conference call.
At this time, all lines are muted.
I would like to turn the call over to Chris Suh, General Manager of Investor Relations.
Chris, please proceed.
CHRIS SUH, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
Thanks operator.
On our website, Microsoft.com/investor is our financial summary slide deck, which is intended to follow our prepared remarks, and provide the reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
Our website also includes information related to our new financial reporting segments which were announced September 19th, 2013 and discussed with investors in our conference call on September 26th.
As a reminder, we will post today's prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript at the Microsoft Investor Relations website until October 24, 2014.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements which are predictions, projections, or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Forms 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
Before I hand the call over to Amy, Id like to remind you that all growth comparisons we make on the call today will relate to the corresponding period of last year.
Also, please keep in mind that with our new segment reporting structure, adjustments for items such as upgrade offers, tech guarantees, and Pre-sales are consolidated into Corporate Other to provide better comparison of operating results.
Unless specified otherwise, all impacted numbers for the current quarter have been adjusted for the cumulative effect of last years revenue deferrals related to the Windows Upgrade Offer, Windows 8 Pre-sales, the Office Offer, and a $113 million revenue deferral in the current quarter, primarily related to Windows 8.1 Pre-sales.
You can find details of the adjustments and reconciliations of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures in our financial summary slide deck.
And with that, I'll turn it over Amy.
AMY HOOD, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Good afternoon, and thank you for joining us today.
By now, youve had a chance to look at our press release, earnings slide deck, key performance indicators, and our 10-Q.
Our results have been reported using the new reporting framework I first discussed at our financial analyst meeting in September.
Since this is a new way to think about our business, Im sure you will have a lot of questions, so after our prepared remarks, well allow more time than usual for Q&A.
And with that, let me dive right in.
This quarter we delivered record first-quarter revenue.
We did it while working though a significant transformation of our organization, and while making significant moves to implement our new strategy.
Our company is focused, and delivering.
Our enterprise business remains strong, despite a macro environment that some have characterized as tough.
We are driving our business forward with industry-leading solutions in key areas like collaboration, unified communications, and cloud services.
And high customer satisfaction is driving high enterprise agreement renewal rates.
At the same time, we are making meaningful progress in our consumer business.
We saw growing engagement and adoption across our major consumer services including Office 365 Home Premium, Skype, Bing, and SkyDrive.
And with the new Windows, were building high value experiences for our consumers that allow people to use our devices and services all day long, whether at work or at home.
From a geographic perspective, we saw broad-based revenue growth.
Overall, both developed and emerging markets showed strength.
The U.S.
and parts of Western Europe were particularly strong, while China was weak.
Now, let me share some quick thoughts on the PC market, which turned out better than we expected.
Were seeing signs of stabilization in the business segment with two consecutive quarters of growth and a relatively stable outlook for the next couple of quarters.
While the consumer segment is more volatile with increasing competition for share of wallet, it also performed better than expected, particularly in developed markets.
With that backdrop, lets move on to Windows.
Were seeing favorable reviews and customer enthusiasm for Windows 8.1, which became available last week.
Windows 8.1 delivers on Microsofts promise of a quick innovation cadence, launching less than one year after Windows 8.
Based on extensive customer feedback, we added more customization capabilities, made the UI simpler and easier to use, added new and smart ways to search, improved the power management, and allowed multitasking, even on a tablet.
Combined with the progress our OEM partners are making, we are collectively increasing the selection of compelling Windows devices available to meet the dynamic needs of all segments of the market.
This holiday, well see competitive opening price points on tablets and laptops, such as the Dell Inspiron 15 for less than $300.
Well also see exciting mobile devices - from 6 inch phones to 10 inch tablets - many with Microsoft Office.
In the six inch category, were incredibly excited by the Nokia Lumia 1520 phablet announced just this past Tuesday.
For eight inch tablets, Toshiba, Dell, and Lenovo will have devices available for less than $300.
And for ten inch tablets, we of course like the new Nokia Lumia 2520 with LTE.
In addition to third-party devices, we are also excited about our first-party line up.
With Surface, we are making progress with better in-market execution.
As a result, we more than doubled the number of units we sold over the prior quarter.
In terms of mix, Surface RT did better than expected.
With Surface Pro, we saw some customers delay purchase in anticipation of Surface Pro 2, which delivers significantly improved battery and processor performance.
Moving on to the enterprise where demand for our solutions continues to be strong.
Earlier this month, we announced our Fall wave of enterprise products and services which touches nearly every aspect of IT.
Were seeing solid growth, were outperforming our competitors, and we are taking share in areas like virtualization and data platform.
Our hybrid infrastructure and management offerings continue to be top choices for CIOs with Window Server Premium and System Center growing double digits again this quarter.
The latest versions of Windows Server, System Center, and Windows Intune deliver enhancements in networking, storage, and device management for Windows and alternative platforms.
These enhancements will help customers realize the promise of hybrid cloud computing across their datacenters, hosted clouds, and Windows Azure.
In the data platform, SQL Server continues to outpace the market.
The next version, SQL Server 2014, will offer new in-memory and cloud capabilities that increase performance and unlock new hybrid scenarios.
Later this month, we will make Windows Azure HDInsight, our Hadoop-based big data solution, generally available.
We continue to bring additional value to the Windows Azure platform.
This quarter, we delivered a number of updates that enable faster connectivity, improve security, and integrate access and identity across on premise and cloud applications.
With all of the innovation were delivering to our enterprise customers, we continue to be uniquely positioned to capture more and more of the addressable market.
Before handing it off to Chris, Id like to say couple of additional things.
As part of our new reporting framework, weve disclosed segment gross margins.
The segment breakout is important in understanding our performance because each of our businesses are impacted by different dynamics, and have different margin profiles.
In Devices and Consumer, the sequential change in gross margin dollars reflects the progress we are making towards our strategy of delivering a compelling family of devices and services.
While we feel good about the increased traction we saw with Surface this quarter, we know there is more to do.
We are intensely focused on improving our capabilities in key areas like demand planning and supply chain management, and on achieving scale as quickly as possible.
And in Commercial, were already seeing the benefits of the investments weve made to transform our business model from perpetual software licensing to services.
In our commercial cloud business - which includes Office 365, Azure, and other Microsoft services  we saw year over year gross margin expansion.
With regards to our proposed acquisition of substantially all of Nokias devices and services business, we still expect the transaction to close in the first quarter of calendar 2014.
We will provide an update to the EPS impact, if any, post-closing.
So, in summary, we are executing better, getting our customers what they want, and making meaningful progress through the early stages of our transformation.
And weve accomplished all of this while also working through the One Microsoft realignment and several significant announcements.
Were committed to executing and delivering  and so far, thats what weve done.
With that backdrop for the quarter, Ill hand it over to Chris to give more details about our performance, before I come back and share thoughts on our outlook.	
CHRIS SUH, GENERAL MANAGER INVESTOR RELATIONS:
Thanks Amy.
First, I'll review our overall results, and then I'll move on to the details by business segment.
Total revenue was up 7%, to $18.6 billion, and came in about $700 million better than our expectations.
And without the impact for foreign exchange, revenue would have been $200 million, or 1 percentage point better.
Annuity revenue was particularly strong and grew 11%, driven by Commercial performance.
Cost of goods sold increased 23%, which was in line with our expectation of over 20% growth.
This increase was primarily due to higher Surface costs, and also higher depreciation, related to the capex investments weve made to support our cloud services strategy.
As a result, gross margin grew 3% to $13.5 billion, reflecting the changing mix of our revenue.
All up operating expenses grew 8%, which was generally in line with our expectations, with the exception of G&A which declined due to lower legal expenses.
We continue to be thoughtful and diligent in how and where we focus our resources.
In advertising, the team has embraced One Microsoft, and the benefits are already accruing with improved messaging and results.
And in R&D, we are continuing to focus our resources while accelerating our cadence.
Operating income and earnings per share both declined 3%, to $6.4 billion and $0.63 cents, respectively.
Unearned revenue grew a healthy 14% to $20.1 billion, and our contracted-not-billed balance grew to over $21 billion, driven by Commercial strength.
Our inventory balance sequentially increased by $675 million, mostly due to builds of Xbox 360 and Xbox One.
Ahead of the holiday selling season, Xbox represents over half of our overall inventory balance.
Inventory for Surface products declined sequentially, even as we built levels ahead of this weeks Surface 2 and Surface Pro 2 launches.
This quarter we announced a 22% increase in our quarterly dividend, to $0.28 per share, and also announced a $40 billion share repurchase program.
We returned $3.8 billion of cash to shareholders, our highest quarterly amount since the second quarter of fiscal year 2011.
I am now going to talk about performance in each of our reporting segments.
Our Devices and Consumer Licensing segment is comprised principally of Windows OEM, consumer Office, and Windows Phone including related patent licensing.
Our Windows OEM business performed better than expected, declining 7% versus our expectation of a mid-teens decline.
As Amy noted, we believe we are seeing stabilization in business PCs which grew again this quarter and drove Pro revenue growth of 6%.
We also saw better-than-expected performance in the consumer part of our business.
Non-Pro revenue declined 22%, but was several points better than expected.
Excluding the impact of China, which continues to have different dynamics than other emerging markets, non-Pro revenue declined 17%.
Together with our OEM and retail partners, weve brought an incredible breadth of Windows devices to market.
Weve also made meaningful improvements to our advertising campaigns which now clearly highlight the value proposition of our devices.
As we head into holiday, were excited by the opportunities to bring the new Windows experience to even more users around the globe.
Consumer Office licensing revenue declined this quarter.
The financial impact of the shift to Office 365 Home Premium was generally in line with our expectations.
Office 365 subscribers benefit from the natural integration of services such as SkyDrive and Skype, and have the flexibility to access the service from numerous end points.
Whether via traditional licensing or subscription, customers continue to see the value in Office, as overall attach of Office increased this quarter.
The Windows Phone ecosystem is seeing sustained progress.
While we have work to do, our share is growing in many geographies, the device portfolio is expanding, and the number of apps available in the marketplace is increasing.
I will now move on to our Devices and Consumer Hardware segment, where revenue grew $401 million, driven almost entirely by Surface.
With improved sales and marketing efforts, combined with pricing and promotional activities, we saw Surface units and revenue grow sequentially from Q4, with the mix of sales shifting towards the 32 GB RT device.
Demand increased for this device, both in retail and in education.
From a gross margin perspective, in addition to product costs which grew as a result of increased Surface sales, we also incurred non-product expenses as we readied inventory lines for the new Surface lineup and the holiday sales cycle.
Moving to Devices and Consumer Other.
As a reminder, this segment includes our online marketplaces, advertising, Xbox Studios, Office 365 Home Premium, and other consumer products and services.
This quarter, revenue growth in this segment was driven by both an increase in advertising revenue and also volumes in our online marketplaces.
Search advertising revenue grew 47%, driven by continued revenue per search improvement and query volume growth.
Bing has now grown its share of search queries in the US to 18%.
Gross margins declined slightly due to higher royalty costs and also infrastructure cost growth as we expand the geographic footprint of our services.
Turning now to our Commercial business, where all up Commercial revenue, across both on-prem and cloud services, grew 10% this quarter.
Notably, even as we invest for growth, we saw gross margin expansion in our commercial cloud business.
Across our commercial portfolio, we saw healthy renewals, a continued shift to premium products, and strong adoption of our cloud services.
Our enterprise cloud strategy is resonating with customers, and server product revenue grew 12%.
SQL Server revenue grew double-digits, with SQL Server Premium revenue growing over 30%.
Our Commercial Office products also remained strong, and grew 11%.
Within this, SharePoint, Exchange and Lync collectively grew double-digits, with Lync growing nearly 30%.
Helping to drive this demand for our server and Office products, is deployment of hybrid cloud solutions.
This quarter, revenue for our Commercial Cloud services grew over 100%, as services such as Office 365 are integrated with Azure services, for comprehensive cloud solutions.
Importantly, we are seeing strong customer adoption, with Office 365 seats and Azure customers both growing triple-digits.
Dynamics CRM Online is also expanding its base, with two-thirds of new Dynamics CRM customers opting for the cloud.
With that overview of our Commercial business, let me share the financial performance in each of our Commercial reporting segments.
Revenue in the Commercial Licensing segment grew 7%.
And, in our Commercial Other segment, revenue grew 28% to $1.6 billion.
As a reminder, Corporate and Other is where we consolidate adjustments for tech guarantees, Pre-sales and the like.
In the comparable quarter of last year we had aggregate deferrals of $1.4 billion for Windows and Office, and this quarter we deferred $113 million, primarily related to Windows 8.1 Pre-sales.
Having now talked through our results for this past quarter, let me turn it over to Amy to discuss our forward looking guidance.
AMY HOOD, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER:
Thanks, Chris.
As we look towards the second quarter, we are assuming the macro environment remains generally the same.
With this, we expect many of the dynamics we saw in the first quarter to continue, with strong performance in our commercial business and ongoing improvement in our consumer business.
Importantly, were set up for a terrific holiday season.
Well have a wide variety of Windows-based devices in market.
Earlier this week, we launched Surface 2 and Surface Pro 2.
And in November, well launch our next generation console, Xbox One.
Building on the performance and unique experiences that gamers love, it will also deliver an innovative entertainment experience by bringing movies, music, sports and live TV together in one place.
With that, lets get into the outlook, starting with Devices and Consumer.
In Licensing, we expect revenue to be $5.2 billion to $5.4 billion.
This range reflects similar dynamics to what we saw in the first quarter.
As I noted earlier, we expect the business PC market to be stable, however, the consumer PC market is subject to more volatility.
In Hardware, we expect revenue to grow 35% to 45%, to $3.8 billion to $4.1 billion, reflecting the expanded Surface line up, and the much anticipated Xbox One launch.
The 10 percentage point range reflects variability in device unit volumes.
In the consumer hardware business, such variability is not uncommon, especially during launches and the holiday season.
And in Devices and Consumer Other, we expect revenue to be $1.7 billion to $1.8 billion.
Search revenue should continue to grow reflecting improved revenue per search and query volume.
As a reminder, in Q2 of the prior year, we launched Halo 4 which contributed $380 million of revenue to this segment.
Now, moving on to Commercial.
We expect revenue to grow 9% to 11%, in line with the first quarter.
As we think about this part of the business, were confident in our ability to continue to add value to our products while providing low total-cost-of-ownership for our customers.
In Commercial Licensing, we expect revenue to be $10.7 billion to $10.9 billion, with similar dynamics to what we saw in the first quarter.
This includes healthy renewals and strong annuity revenue growth from volume licensing with Software Assurance.
In Commercial Other, we expect revenue to be $1.7 billion to $1.9 billion, reflecting ongoing momentum in our commercial cloud business and enterprise services.
As CIOs increasingly look to capitalize on the opportunities of cloud computing, were confident they will continue to look to Microsoft for their IT solutions.
Moving on to cost of revenue which we expect to be $7.9 billion to $8.3 billion next quarter.
This range primarily relates to the unit variability in hardware revenue.
In Surface, we are still in the early stages of the lifecycle.
As you know, there are many things that go into bringing hardware to market, including both variable and fixed costs.
We are intensely focused on building volumes and achieving scale to cover these costs and get to profitability.
As you think about the economic model for Xbox, you should keep in mind that console margins are just one aspect of the overall platforms financial performance.
Attach of games, accessories, and Xbox LIVE services also contribute to the economic model.
We expect the launch of Xbox One to be the biggest in Xbox history, and we feel great about our ability to continue our leadership position in the living room.
Moving on to operating expenses.
We expect opex to grow 6% to 8%, to $8.5 billion to $8.6 billion.
We also reaffirm our full year guidance of $31.3 billion to $31.9 billion.
We continue to invest in innovative experiences for our customers while remaining focused on expenses.
We still expect full year capital expenditures to be about $6.5 billion, even though we only spent $1.2 billion in the first quarter.
Given the nature of the investments, there is variability from quarter to quarter due to our success-based approach as well as timing of delivery and completion.
We expect our tax rate for the full year to be between 18% and 20% depending on our geographical mix of earnings.
When adjusting for tech guarantees and product deferrals, we expect unearned revenue to be roughly in-line with historical trends.
So, in summary, Im really pleased with our results this quarter.
It was a great start to the fiscal year as we executed and delivered across all of our businesses.
We are on track with implementing the transformation of the company around the one Microsoft strategy, and at the same time are not missing a beat in executing faster.
And as we look forward to the second quarter, our enterprise business will remain strong.
Were also set up for a fantastic holiday season with Surface, Xbox One, and a host of devices from our partners, which will allow us to reach new customers and drive increased engagement.
With that, Ill turn it back to Chris and well take your questions.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Amy.
And with that, we're going to move onto the Q&A.
Operator, please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Good afternoon.
Amy and Chris, thanks for the additional details.
I know everyone appreciates the forward-looking details.
My question is on the Commercial revenue.
I'm seeing an impressive number in a seasonably soft Q1.
Your guidance assumes also a continued good trajectory.
Maybe if you can walk though why you think you're outgrowing your peers, and what has led to this double-digit number?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Brent, for that question.
I do thinkwhen I think about the Commercial business, and focus on our unearned revenue growth, the 14 percent, plus our bookings growth, which is quite strong as well, 6 percent, I think about the roadmap.
The strength of the commitments that customers are making is really for the forward-looking.
It's a three-year commitment to the Microsoft platform, both to our cloud and on prem solutions, the breadth and strength of that roadmap and our offerings, and I think in many ways that's what gives us the confidence that we're outperforming our peers.
And also I think it speaks a lot to the innovation in the roadmap we've shown, whether it's for Azure, Office 365, or our broader server portfolio, I do feel quite good about both our competitive positions and our ability to execute.
I think we did a great job in the field this quarter remaining focused on delivering what we needed to deliver to our customers, and we were quite pleased.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
PHILIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi.
Thanks, guys, and congrats on a great quarter.
I just want to focus in on Xbox and Xbox platform.
Amy, I'm wondering if you can give us maybe some color on how it performed this quarter?  But in particular as you look into the December quarter here, obviously you gave that gross margin guidance, but I was wondering if you would talk sort of high level about how you're approaching just the Xbox One launch say versus Xbox 360 from a perspective of how you're pricing it relative to COGS, and just sort of how the build of Xbox One looks versus 360?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Phil.
I think it's a great question that gives me the opportunity to talk about the breadth of the portfolio that we'll have to offer at holiday.
And then talk a little bit about the gross margin profile as well that we have amongst those products.
We are excited that we'll have a great value offer at holiday with Xbox 360, and we'll also have a great choice with our innovative Xbox One platform to really give us a good breadth rolling into holiday of selections across price points.
We did with Xbox One make a decision to really enable a first class experience out of the box.
There is Kinect, there is a headset, and there is the console, and depending on where you are around the globe there may be a game included as part of bundles for geographic interest.
As I said, the best way always to think about the life value of the Xbox plan is over its lifecycle.
I'm excited about the increased opportunity that Xbox One allows us to attach more and different services beyond what we historically thought of as simply a gaming platform.
And when I think about the opportunity going forward, it is important in Q2 to realize that will impact our gross margin in the short-term.
But winning the platform at holiday and our positioning to do that allows us to grow profitability in a far different way over the lifecycle.
So hopefully that helps.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Phil.
Thank you.
We'll move on to the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
JOHN DIFUCCI, JP Morgan Chase:  Thanks.
Amy, billings were about what we modeled for the quarter, but deferred revenue was about $700 million less than we expected anyway, which was equal to the upside in revenue.
So I'm just curious, did you end up recognizing a greater portion of revenue up-front this quarter than you normally would, because I realize given how you recognize revenue, I guess the question could be said was the transactional portion of the revenue in the Commercial segment greater than it is typically this quarter?
CHRIS SUH:  Hi, John.
This is Chris.
I'm going to jump in a little bit, and I'll let Amy add on.
I think the way to think about it, and the way we think about it is, we did see growth across annuity and non-annuity in the business, but also the changing dynamics is the mix of the dollars that are going into unearned revenue.
As we bill more contracts and some of our subscription offerings that changes the nature of the term.
If you think about one-year subscription offerings and things like this, that has a little bit of an effect on the unearned revenue.
AMY HOOD:  Let me add a little bit, I would have said, John, both of the things you said are true, and both are good, which is I do think our unearned balance growing 14 percent year over year was better than we actually had expected from our perspective, and we also saw very good non-annuity performance within the quarter particularly in Office and in SQL, which I think are very good signs, we believe, for both to see the strengths broad-based.
As you know, the annuity portion tends to be related to large customers making long-term commitments.
Some of the non-annuity is exciting because it tends to be smaller customers who have decided to go ahead and upgrade to the most recent version of Office, which is also encouraging.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Okay, thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, John.
We'll move to the next question, please, Operator.
(Operator Direction.)
KEN LONG, Citigroup:  Hi, guys.
This is Ken Long for Walter.
I guess we wanted to focus a bit on Windows.
And the OEM business was down to 7 percent this quarter versus 15 last quarter in what seemed like a reallyyou guys had a lot of pressure on ASPs and what-not.
I guess what drove some of the quick turnaround from quarter to quarter, maybe if you can just dig in a little bit there?
AMY HOOD:  Let me try to break it up a little bit, Ken, to make sure I understand and get a chance to talk about the overall performance.
Business was better than we expected, so actually ASPs were probably higher than many people had modeled and that we had expected due to mix, growing 65 percent in the Pro segment was both better than we expected, and probably better than many people had considered.
Now in the Consumer segment, you know, the minus 22, taking our China to minus 17.
I think it's generally overall when you take those two numbers, probably aligned with most of the device level estimates for PCs we've seen across the industry, and from some of our peers reporting in the system.
I do think we were impacted by some inventory levels that did come down a bit actually this quarter as well.
So I think overall we do think that things are probably more stable in the business segment and encouraging, and in consumer and developed markets particularly were better than we had seen.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Ken.
Next question, please.
Thank you.
(Operator Direction.)
KEITH WEISS, Morgan Stanley:  Thank you guys for taking the question.
You saw a real market up-tick in the advertising revenue, in the search advertising revenue.
Any particular catalyst you could point us to in terms of what really catalyzed that part of the business, and how sustainable that's going to be on a go forward basis?
AMY HOOD:  Sure.
Thanks, Keith.
A couple of things, it was driven as you noted both by RPS improvements and volume improvement, which is encouraging.
I also think underlying that are some real technical improvements we've made within the search engine, the algos are better, and the investments we're making are really allowing us to monetize at a higher level.
We also saw some strengths in a few other geos, which helped increase the performance there.
So I do believe that trend we expect to continue into Q2.
KEITH WEISS:  Excellent, thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Keith.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question.
(Operator Direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Hi, great.
Thank you, Amy and Chris.
I just was wondering, you talked about the entry of a lot of new SKUs that are coming out for the holiday season.
I'm just, as we start thinking about building our OEM models, how do we think about ASPs for this eight-inch and below category that you referenced there's a lot of product coming out with?
AMY HOOD:  Good question, Heather.
Let me talk about first the importance of the breadth of the offers that we're putting into market.
With Windows 8.1, one of the focuses we had was to expand both the opportunity for screen sizes and to reach new price points, and to cover really from the smallest to the largest with touch and non-touch.
And I think our ability to work with partners and some of the sales execution we've seen in the field have led to have a broad opportunity at retail for holiday for devices.
It is important, I do hope in some waysthis is a question that is a bit awkward.
You always want to say ASPs, it's good to have ASPs go up.
Transparently going forward, as we make more progress, especially in the smaller screen sizes, we should expect units to go up and be very excited about that in terms of share, but ASPs would trend down.
I don't think that will have a materialour guidance does not assume a material impact to ASPs in Q2.
But over the long-term I actually do understand the question it would affect ASPs to be on that trend line assuming we are successful in those lower-end device sizes.
HEATHER BELLINI:  Thank you very much.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Heather.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you.
Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Thank you.
And, Amy, thank you for giving so much more data and guidance, we appreciate it.
A couple of quick attach questions.
You said that the Consumer Office last quarter was going to be down roughly 5 percent, lower than the PCs due to the move to subscription.
You said the attach was higher this quarter.
Should we think that the dip was roughly in line with that?
CHRIS SUH:  Hi, Mark, this is Chris.
Let me try to clarify the number just so we're all on the same page.
We did say Consumer Office did decline this quarter.
Last quarter, you're right, we said about 5 points of impact.
And so the impact, indeed, was about what we expected.
But with the increase in attach, they sort of tended to offset each other in the end.
And so the numbers came in pretty much as expected.
So I think that's the right way to think about it.
AMY HOOD:  But, of course, I can't let ChrisI'm going to add a little to the answer.
Sorry.
Mark, I do think it's important for us to continue to reiterate the importance of the success of the Office 365 Home Premium SKU from a strategic standpoint.
We have done a very good job, and I would say as a mix percentage of the SKU it continues to do even a little better than we had hoped in terms of execution at the end point and driving value.
And while that does have an impact on the initial ASP of the SKU, the long-term lifetime value of that product in my belief, given the always up to date, first to see innovation, use across multi-endpoints, inclusion of Skype, inclusion of SkyDrive, really does allow for a higher lifetime value, and ultimately a happy customer.
And so I really am encouraged by our progress and our execution there.
MARK MOERDLER:  One other quick question, any sense for what commercial licensing would have been if not for the move to cloud subscription?  Does it make a material change yet at this point?
CHRIS SUH:  No.
The best way to think about that, Mark, is if you look atit's not an exact offset, but when I talked about the commercial business all up I gave the construct around products like commercial office, commercial server as all up across both on prem and commercial.
So we talked about Office growing 11 percent across both commercial licensing and commercial other in aggregate.
If you look at the specific segment, you'll see that Office in the commercial licensing segment actually grew 6 percent, so you can see that we're having outsized growth in the commercial other segment, which maybe helps at least dimensionalize the size of the growth in relative terms.
MARK MOERDLER:  Thank you both.
(Operator Direction.)
RICK SHERLUND, Nomura Securities:  Thanks.
Just to follow-up on Mark's question, I believe there was a slide at FAM that showed about $150 million of negative impact in the quarter from the move to the cloud, which in and of itself it's about 1 percent of revenue, so it's kind of not a very big deal.
And I think most of that was from Office versus Server and Tools.
If you say it's about as expected, I guess I'm just looking for some clarification here.
Is really the only impact we're seeing in the Office segment versus Server and Tools, or was there much impact in that part of the business from the move to subscription?
AMY HOOD:  Rick, let me clarify, the 150, you're right, was actually just related to the consumer Office segment.
It had no broader connotation beyond that.
So that $150 million in a quarter on consumer Office actually does have a meaningful impact to the growth of that especially versus PCs.
So that being said, obviously we've talked about the momentum in our broad Office 365 revenue.
IT is a bigger impact across not just Office, because I think that's actually not the way of thinking about Office 365's impact.
There it's really around Exchange, Lync, SharePoint, and the broad server impact there is actually more meaningful than its impact on maybe Office client on the commercial side.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Rick.
Next question, please.
ROSS MACMILLAN, Jeffries:  Thanks a lot.
I have two questions.
Just first on the device and consumer licensing business, your forecast for Q2 suggests a moderating decline.
And I was curious as to whether on the corporate OEM side, if you will, that's just a reflection of the ongoing stabilization trend, or do you also expect to see improvement on the consumer OEM side?
And related to that, how do you think about the impact of the end of life of XP on the corporate OEM side?  Do you think that the improvement is completely unrelated to that end of life forthcoming, or do you think there could be some impact related to that?  Thanks.
AMY HOOD:  Great.
Let me divide up that question.
I think, as you said, it's two parts.
Our Q2 guidance for devices and consumer licensing really says that the trends we saw in Q1 on both sides continue in Q2.
So I think that's an important distinction as you noted and asked for clarification on.
So I hope that's helpful in that component.
And when it comes to end of life of XP, I tend to think about that more on the VL side as well, and the strength there which will be in the commercial reporting segments.
We continue to make progress on the XP install base, and now a little over 75 percent of the PCs are running 7.
And so I do think as we continue to get to end of life of XP, you'll see the impact more on the VL side of the business than you would in the device and consumer licensing segment.
ROSS MACMILLAN:  Thank you very much.
That's helpful.
And maybe one quick follow-up, just on the Office business overall in the commercial segment, if you think about units, whether licensed or 365, when you just think of the aggregate pool of units, you sort of alluded to it before, but did that perform in line with your expectation, or was it actually slightly better on a unit basis?
Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  It was slightly better, Ross, is the best way of thinking about that from a unit perspective.
ROSS MACMILLAN:  Thank you very much.
Congratulations.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Ross.
We'll take the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Hi.
Thanks for taking my question.
I was wondering if you could address the conditions in China in a little bit more detail, not just on the consumer but also in the commercial as well as what your expectations might be given the lifting of the ban on game consoles for Xbox there?  And also if you could just address some of what you're seeing in terms of commercial cloud adoption outside of the U.S.?  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  I'll take the first part of the question.
As I said on the call, the macro conditions in China, which I think are consistent with what some of the other companies have reported as well, have been challenging.
Our total revenue across all of our business, including the PC-related businesses, were down year-over-year, and I think that is overall impacting our results in China all up.
I think the second part of your question was related to commercial cloudI'm sorry, can you repeat your second question?
ED MAGUIRE:  I was wondering about Xbox expectations there, but also the trends of commercial cloud adoption in areas outside of the U.S.?
AMY HOOD:  We haven't really talked specifically about our expectations for China on the Xbox.
But let me take the second half of that question.
Our performance in both Office 365 and Azure has actually been quite good both in the U.S., to your question, and outside the U.S.
Part of the reason that you've seen us investing on the capital expense side is to continue to build out the opportunity set, because we are seeing good demand outside the U.S.
and I do think our ability to be competitive there is just as high as it is here.
So we've already seen that growth.
QUESTION:  Thank you.
ED MAGUIRE:  Thanks, Ed.
Next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
JASON MAYNARD, Wells Fargo:  Hey, guys.
I wanted to drill a little bit into how you're thinking about holiday on the consumer hardware side, and specifically just expectations around Surface, and then also any insight or color you think in terms of what your expectations are with RT versus Pro.
Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Jason.
I think overall for holiday, given our guidance, we clearly do expect a healthy holiday performance across the portfolio.
I say that, because we do have offerings that provide great value from having Surface V1 RT still in marketing, Surface 2, Surface 2 Pro, plus Xbox 360, plus Xbox One, really does provide both a value portfolio and those who want the latest and greatest experience have something covered.
The guidance does include good performance across all of those product lines.
We did see, I think as Chris and I both talked about, a lot of progress in sales execution on Surface in particular this quarter.
And that does give us more confidence about our ability to execute again well in Q2.
In particular, as you noted, RT did do quite well this quarter and I look forward to seeing that continue with the Surface 2 device, as well, at holiday.
CHRIS SUH:  Great.
Thank you, Jason.
We'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
KASH RANGAN, Bank of America Merrill Lynch:  Hi, thank you very much for all the details, as well.
Just maybe my math skills have gotten horribly weak, but I just took the midpoint, Amy, of your revenue guidance for the different line items and also the midpoint of your cost of revenue inputs and the midpoint of your OPEX, I come up with what looks to be about a 10 percent reduction to where I think most sales side models are.
Maybe I'm doingI'm hoping that I did something wrong here.
But, if that's the case, its about 23 percent op margin relative to the 33 or so that you did last year.
So can you just walk us through what are the items that you're assuming in your cost structure, which effectively makes the op income flat, although you are getting a good revenue growth rate?  I just wonder if there are any one-time items, or if it's emblematic of a shift in your business model to devices and consumer, especially with Nokia going forward.
I wonder if we should not be thinking about op margins, but really op income growth rate.
Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Kash.
I think the one thing I would urge you to do as you think about the guidance we gave is looking specifically at the D&C hardware guidance, as well as making sure you're mapping the COGS very specifically to whatever assumption you're making in D&C hardware.
Given the business model of Xbox, that can and will have an impact in Q2 to the overall gross margin structure.
So as you think through that I think that's probably one of the assumptions that it may sound like using the midpoint could lead you a bit off of where I would have expected.
KASH RANGAN:  Got it.
Thank you very much.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Kash.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Kash.
Next question please.
(Operator director.)
RAIMO LENSCHOW, Barclays:  Thank you.
I just want to follow on from Jason's question earlier on.
Can you talk a little bit about where you see the improved success and the sales execution success on the Surface?  Is it kind of commercial, is it consumer, and what's driving the improvement there, and how much is kind of the improved revenue run rate also driven by the fact that the channel needed to be ready for the holiday season?  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Hi, Raimo.
Thanks for the question.
As we talked about, especially for this last quarter of Surface, we saw two things I'll mention, which is popularity of the Surface 32-gigabyte RT device, that one was more successful this last quarter.
And we actually saw demand increase in both commercial and in the education customer segment, as well.
So we did see some improvement across both those segments.
AMY HOOD:  Yes, I would say that another way.
It was in retail and in education was really our RT performance.
CHRIS SUH:  Sorry.
That's what I meant.
AMY HOOD:  I just want to make sure that was clear.
It really was better execution at retail, and in EDU, and I still look forward to building a commercial channel, which we are just starting to do as we continue to add resellers to our model.
RAIMO LENSCHOW:  Perfect, thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks.
(Operator direction.)
BRENDAN BARNICLE, Pacific Crest Securities:  Thanks so much, guys.
I had two quick ones.
One was the SQL Server success continues to be very impressive, particularly relative to the field.
So I'm wondering where you're seeing kind of the most success there.
Is that market share gains, is that pricing is getting into some new markets? If you could add some color there that would be helpful.
And then when is your expectation for the next sort of update on Nokia?
AMY HOOD:  Great, let me take the second one first, because it's the easiest.
We still do expect the transaction to close in the first calendar quarter of 2014.
And post-closing if there are any EPS impact changes to what we said before we'll give them post-closing.
So now back to your original question on SQL.
That's a terrific one to get to talk about.
Our growth there is as you said both share growth and revenue growth.
It's happened I think generally both in BI, which we've seen a lot of traction with.
I don't know if you've had a chance to see some of our PowerView announcements recently.
Our ability to sort of span form the end user to the hardest big data problems really has resonated both in the market and with industry analysts who have taken, I think, a strong position that we're the real market leader there.
The other thing I would say is a very healthy performance of our premium SKUs, our premium SKUs have continued to provide market growth and I think are competing quite well with the competition.
BRENDAN BARNICLE:  Great.
Thanks, guys.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Brendan.
Next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowen and Company:  Thank you very much and good afternoon, guys, just two questions.
First, Amy, if I recall correctly I believe last quarter you had mentioned an expectation for double-digit annuity growth in fiscal '14.
Is that still how you're thinking about the annuity part of the business? And secondly the year-over-year cloud revenue growth you reported was certainly impressive.
But, I was wondering if you could shed some light perhaps on how much of Azure billings or revenue are incremental versus cannibalistic?
AMY HOOD:  Two good questions.
I do expect our annuity growth, and the guidance we gave it still does assume double-digit annuity growth going forward.
And I think our performance this quarter gives me confidence that the guidance in Q2 is the right one, given our strength and our competitive position.
Secondly on cloud revenue, your question gives me an opportunity to talk about the importance of our hybrid cloud.
Within especially our server business our ability to power the cloud whether you want to run it, you want a service provider to run it, or you want to use ours is really an incredibly powerful story.
And I think in some ways whether or not it's cannibalizing becomes somewhat difficult.
What we've generally found right now is that it has been often additive.
And if you look at our server growth all-up, which we tried to provide to help give some parameters around that, to give some confidence that we're both growing the base and providing additive opportunity, I think that's the number I would probably look to, to see the impact there.
GREGG MOSKOWITZ:  Great.
Thanks very much.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Greg.
Operator, I think we're down to our last question.
(Operator direction.)
KIRK MATERNE, Evercore:  Thank you very much for fitting me in.
I guess two quick ones for you, Amy, on the commercial cloud offerings.
I guess first around Office 365 you mentioned you've seen pretty good uptake even outside the U.S.
I was interested in just your ability to monetize Office 365 in some of the emerging markets that have been challenging over time for Office.
Then secondly, as a follow up to Gregg's question on server, within Azure how much of the uptake in Azure is coming from sort of existing Microsoft logos, versus bringing on net new logos onto the platform?  Thanks.
AMY HOOD:  Great.
Thanks, Kirk.
I'm going to talk about two things.
I do think it's interesting, maybe the best example of how to think about us moving beyond our traditional markets is the fact that we were the first to commit to a data center in China, a market that we've historically had challenges monetizing at a high level.
We went there.
We're going there with Office 365 and Azure.
We look forward to being able to make progress.
We're investing both headcount and capital dollars, because we do believe it provides an interesting opportunity for us to begin monetizing in markets that have been harder for us to grow maybe with our more traditional business model.
Secondly, with Azure I think we've seen both, but the thing I would say is what's been really helpful is that as we make it easier to attach Azure services to our normal rhythm in the field, through our enterprise agreements, and through volume licensing, it provides a really helpful way, and a really easy selling motion, to provide customers flexibility.
We add it in the normal rhythm of a sales motion.
We allow people to try, use and buy.
And that has served us well in terms of being able to expose Azure to more and more customers in a normal selling cycle.
So I think that's probably one of the better ways.
It's the same actual selling rhythm we've used with Office 365 so successfully.
And with that, I wanted to say thank you.
I know that this quarter we changed reporting segments, and that requires a lot of work.
So thank you for all the work put in to understand our transition that we're trying to make as a company.
And so let me turn it back to Chris to say his final words.
CHRIS SUH:  So that wraps up today's earnings call.
We look forward to seeing many of you in the coming months, at various investor conferences.
For those of you unable to attend in person, these events will generally be webcast and you'll be able to follow our comments at Microsoft.com/investor.
Please contact us if you need any additional details and thanks for joining us today.
AMY HOOD:  Thank you.
Chris Suh, Amy Hood
Thursday, January 23rd, 2014
(Operator Direction.)
CHRIS SUH:  On our website, Microsoft.com/investor is our financial summary slide deck, which is intended to follow our prepared remarks, and provide the reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
As a reminder, we will post today's prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript at the Microsoft Investor Relations website until January 23, 2015.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements which are predictions, projections, or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Forms 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
Before I hand the call over to Amy, please keep in mind that all growth comparisons we make on the call today will relate to the corresponding period of last year.
Also, unless specified otherwise, all impacted numbers for the current quarter have been adjusted for the cumulative effect of last years revenue deferrals and recognition related to Windows, Office and Xbox video games.
As a reminder, with our new segment reporting structure, we have consolidated adjustments of this nature into Corporate and Other to provide better comparability of operating results.
You can find details of the adjustments and reconciliations of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures in our financial summary slide deck.
And with that, I'll turn it over Amy.
AMY HOOD:  Thank you Chris.
Good afternoon and thank you all for joining us today.
As I look back on the quarter, I am pleased with the results as we exceeded our expected revenue growth while continuing to maintain our focus on improved execution and cost management.
Our Devices and Consumer segment had a very good quarter, and grew 13% with a successful holiday.
Our Commercial segment had another great quarter and grew 10% to over $12 billion, as we continue to deliver on our differentiated cloud strategy.
We performed well this quarter, and you see it in our financial results.
This holiday, we continued to make significant progress in the consumer space, headlined by Xbox One, which launched in 13 markets and sold in 3.9 million units in just over 5 weeks.
According to NPD Group figures, Xbox One was the leading console in the US for the month of December, which was its first full month in market.
When adding in Xbox 360, which held the third spot, Xbox led the US market with 46% share in December.
We are excited by this enthusiastic response from our loyal customers, and are working to increase the availability of Xbox One.
With Surface, demand continued to grow benefiting from improved execution at retail and favorable reviews of the new Surface devices.
Sequentially, both units and revenue more than doubled this quarter, with customers recognizing Surfaces differentiated value proposition as one device for everything in their life.
We feel good about the progress we have made over the past couple of quarters, and are enthusiastic about the overall opportunity ahead with Surface.
The Windows ecosystem as a whole is also making important progress. Earlier this fall, we launched Windows 8.1 which enables smarter, faster and more personalized devices and our OEM partners are taking advantage of this.
Over the last few months, theyve delivered a breadth of differentiated devices designed to meet a wide range of customer needs. Were encouraged by what weve been able to accomplish with our partners, and collectively we will continue to focus on driving the Windows ecosystem forward.
Now let me share some perspectives on what we saw in the PC market, which was slightly better than our expectation.
Business PCs grew again, for the third consecutive quarter, and benefitted from an improving macro environment, better availability of innovative new hardware, and a refresh cycle ahead of Windows XP end of support.
Additionally, growth was higher in large enterprises than small and medium sized businesses.
Consumer PCs, while better than our expectations, continue to be soft as they face challenges from competing form factors.
And, as a general theme, developed markets outperformed emerging markets.
Windows continues to be the platform of choice for business.
This quarter Windows Pro revenue grew 12% and outpaced the underlying business PC market.
This was driven by faster growth in both enterprises and developed markets where Pro attach is higher.
Windows non-Pro revenue however was down 20% reflecting the dynamics of the consumer PC market.
Now lets move to our commercial business, where key metrics remained strong.
Bookings grew 12% and renewal rates remained in line across our product portfolio, even with a large expiring base in the quarter.
Unearned revenue grew 12% and our contracted not billed balance is at a record level of over $23 billion.
To me, this is important, as these long-term commitments demonstrate the confidence that customers have in our product roadmap, where we are investing in key areas such as Big Data, infrastructure management and cloud computing.
In Big Data, our upcoming release of SQL Server 2014 builds on the momentum weve established.
Offering a complete business intelligence solution for Big Data, SQL Server is driving significant In-Memory performance gains.
Additionally, it enables hybrid cloud solutions with cloud backup and disaster recovery as well as providing enhanced availability and security.
Hybrid infrastructure and management offerings also continue to be important priorities.
Windows Server, Azure and System Center are the centerpieces of our hybrid cloud strategy, and together they enable portability and scalability of workloads.
Using our suite of products, customers get high scale virtualization, built in software defined networking, and hybrid business continuity that enables their modern data centers.
As CIOs look to cloud computing to reduce costs and deliver business agility, they are turning to our cloud services.
Office 365 and Dynamics CRM Online offer customers the ability to transition easily to the cloud and benefit from enterprise-class features and a familiar user interface.
Additionally, Windows Azure provides the scalability and flexibility that addresses their evolving infrastructure and platform needs.
In summary, we had a very good quarter across our consumer and commercial business.
We are taking share with many products, and seeing improvements in areas where we needed to be better.
As we do this, we continue to prioritize the deployment of our resources to areas that accelerate innovation and deliver products that our customers love.
With that overview of the quarter, Ill hand it over to Chris to give more details about our performance, before I come back and share thoughts on our outlook.
CHRIS SUH:  First, I'm going to review our overall results, and then I'll move on to the details by reporting segment.
We had a successful holiday quarter, and our broad, diversified portfolio helped us deliver record revenue in Q2.
Total revenue was up 11%, to $24.5 billion.
And without the impact of foreign exchange, revenue would have been higher by $196 million, or 1 percentage point.
Cost of goods sold increased 46%.
This increase was primarily due to costs associated with the new Xbox and Surface products, which launched this quarter, and also growth in cloud infrastructure supporting our consumer and commercial offerings.
Even as we invest in our devices and services initiatives, gross margin was flat at $16.2 billion.
Operating expenses grew 3%, which was below our guidance, as we continue to focus on prioritizing spend towards strategic growth initiatives.
Operating income and earnings per share both declined 4%, to $8.0 billion and $0.78 cents, respectively.
This quarter, we returned $4.3 billion of cash to shareholders in buybacks and dividends, our highest amount in the last 12 quarters.
I am now going to talk through performance in each of our reporting segments.
In Our Devices and Consumer segment, revenue grew 13%.
Within this, the Licensing segment, which primarily includes Windows OEM, consumer Office, and Windows Phone, declined 6%, reflecting the overall PC and device market trends.
We continue to see similar dynamics to the previous quarter.
Total Windows OEM revenue declined 3%.
As Amy described, the 12% growth in Windows Pro was offset by 20% declines in Windows non-Pro.
Excluding the impact of China, where we continue to draw down inventory levels, Windows non-Pro revenue declined 14%.
Office attach, including our cloud offerings, was up again this quarter.
Traditional Consumer Office licensing revenue declined 24%.
However, we estimate that approximately 16 percentage points of this decline was due to the shift to Office 365 Home Premium.
Excluding this impact, traditional consumer Office outperformed the underlying consumer PC market.
Next, I will move on to our Hardware segment, where revenue grew $1.9 billion or 68%, driven by a good holiday quarter for our consumer devices.
Xbox One had a record launch and together with Xbox 360, we shipped 7.4 million consoles.
For Surface, we saw improved sales of Surface RT, and also introduced Surface 2 and Surface Pro 2 into the market.
Moving to Devices and Consumer Other.
As a reminder, this segment includes our online marketplaces, advertising, Xbox Studios, Office 365 Home Premium, and other consumer products and services.
Revenue in this segment declined 10% when compared to last year, when we launched Halo 4.
Search advertising revenue grew 34%, driven by continued revenue per search improvements and query volume growth.
Bing has now grown its share of search queries to 18.2% in the U.S.
Office 365 Home Premium adoption continues to be strong.
With this service, customers are always running the most up-to-date version, have content available across their devices with SkyDrive integration and get free Skype minutes.
The overall value proposition is resonating well with customers and we now have more than 3.5 million subscribers.
For the quarter, it accounted for more than 15% of total consumer Office licenses sold.
Turning now to our Commercial segment, all up Commercial revenue and gross margin, across both on-premise and cloud services, grew 10%.
The Commercial Licensing segment, which reflects our traditional software licensing, grew 7% and our Commercial Other segment, which captures our commercial cloud services as well as our enterprise services business, grew 28% to $1.8 billion.
As economies of scale benefits accrue to these online services, we are seeing gross margin expansion in our Commercial Other segment.
We saw continuing strength across our commercial portfolio.
Server product revenue grew 12%.
In the data center, the premium version of Windows Server, which targets Tier 1 application workloads, saw significant revenue growth again this quarter.
Revenue for System Center grew double digits, and Hyper-V, our virtualization product, gained 5 points of share over the last year.
In our data platform business, SQL Server continued to outpace the market and revenue grew double-digits, with SQL Server Premium revenue growing over 25%.
Our Commercial Office products also remained strong, growing 10%.
Within this, our productivity server offerings SharePoint, Exchange and Lync continue to perform well, with Lync growing over 25%.
We are excited about the unified communications opportunity, as we combine the enterprise richness of Lync and the global reach of Skype to transform the communications experience.
We are pleased with our momentum in cloud services.
This quarter, revenue for our Commercial Cloud services again grew over 100%, as customers of all sizes continued to leverage our cloud services to improve productivity, reduce costs and leverage a secure and trusted platform.
We are seeing broad based adoption, as, Office 365 seats, Azure customers and Dynamics CRM net seat adds all grew over 100%.
We now have 70% of the Fortune 500 companies using at least one of our cloud services.
Having now reviewed our results for this past quarter, let me turn it over to Amy to discuss our forward looking guidance.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Chris.
Before I get into our expectations for the quarter, let me quickly touch on Nokia.
We continue to expect that the deal will close this quarter, but are still in the process of securing all regulatory approvals and meeting closing conditions.
So, all guidance provided here assumes no impact from Nokia.
Assuming the deal closes this quarter, we will include Nokia in our guidance starting in the fourth quarter.
Looking ahead to the third quarter, we are expecting a similar macro environment to what we saw this quarter.
As such, many of the dynamics from the second quarter will likely continue into the third.
With that, lets get into the outlook, starting with Devices and Consumer.
In Licensing, we expect revenue to be $4.1 to $4.3 billion.
This range reflects similar dynamics to what we saw in the second quarter, with business PCs growing, strong Pro mix and headwinds in consumer PCs.
In Hardware, we expect revenue to be $1.9 to $2.0 billion.
This reflects continued post launch momentum with Surface 2, Surface Pro 2, and Xbox One with the upcoming launch of Xbox exclusive, Titanfall.
And in Devices and Consumer Other, we expect revenue to be about $1.8 billion.
Moving on to Commercial, in what is a seasonally slower quarter, we are confident in our ability to continue to be the vendor of choice with our productivity and infrastructure offerings.
In Commercial Licensing, we expect revenue to be $10.4 to $10.6 billion.
In Commercial Other, we expect revenue to be about $1.8 billion, reflecting continued momentum in our commercial cloud business.
We expect COGS to be $6.1 to $6.3 billion next quarter.
This range primarily reflects variability associated with our hardware business.
Moving on to operating expenses.
We expect opex to grow 5% to 6%, to $7.7 to $7.8 billion.
We are also reducing and narrowing the range for our full year guidance to $31.2 to $31.5 billion.
As a reminder, Other Income and expense includes dividend and interest income, offset by interest expense and the net cost of hedging.
We expect these items to generally offset one another.
We still expect our full year tax rate to be between 18% and 20%.
We now expect full year capital expenditures to be about $6 billion, which is down about $500 million from our prior guidance.
This reduction is primarily driven by improved capacity utilization and scale benefits as we converge our online services infrastructure platforms while continuing to support the strong demand that we see in business.
Adjusting for prior year tech guarantees and product deferrals, we expect unearned revenue to sequentially decline as it has in prior years.
So, in summary, I feel good about the financial results this quarter.
We are executing well across the company as demonstrated by share gains in our commercial business, and we are also making important inroads with our consumer offerings.
Looking ahead, there is a lot to be excited about as we continue our transformation around One Microsoft.
With that, I'll turn it back to Chris and we'll take your questions.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Amy.
And with that we'll move on to Q&A.
Operator, please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
(Operator Direction.)
JOHN DIFUCCI, JP Morgan Chase:  Thank you.
Obviously, nice upside on the hardware business with Surface and Xbox.
But my question is on the licensing business, so bear with me a little bit here.
You had both licensing businesses, Device and Consumer and Commercial licensing, they were both better than expected at least by about $100 million each.
At the same time, deferred revenue was shy by something like $250 million.
But there are some conflicting things here.
I'm just trying to get my head around this.
The contracted not billed, Amy, you pointed out was really strong.
It's a big jump by somewhere around $2 billion sequentially.
And you also saw some nice traction in the commercial cloud services; it more than doubled.
I'm assuming it's small.
So here's my question.
With all that happening, is there a shift happening with your on premise corporate business to more transactional versus ratable contracts?  That would sort of help offset the financial implications as you shift to sort of cloud services on the corporate side.
Is that what's happening with all these movements?  Sorry about all the details.
AMY HOOD:  I really appreciate the question because it's going to let me help expand on a couple of dynamics, which I think are at work here.
So now I'm going to ask you to bear with me with a little bit of a long answer.
Let me start with your comment, I think, around the overall commercial licensing bucket, which I'm going to expand to include, as you did, the overall commercial business, both cloud and licensing.
There are a number of metrics that I tend to look at together as opposed to individually to think about how we did in the quarter.
You touched on one, unearned, which grew 12 percent this quarter, which is quite good.
The second is bookings, which grew 12 percent in this quarter, which is very good.
Renewal rates, which were in line across our products.
And finally the CNB balance, the contracted not billed balance being up sequentially $2 billion, as you point out, is very big.
If you think about those together as a group, those data points are very important because together I would say anyI think you said a couple hundred short on unearned.
With those data points together, I would say there's no shortage in terms of commercial licensing and commercial other strength all up.
As you know, contracted but not billed tends to be at the end of a quarter, great, we sign a bunch of contracts that we can't bill for until the very beginning of the next.
Think about that as business done in quarter.
You'll see that come into the unearned balance, frankly, in Q3 as well as into adjusted.
So that dynamic answers really the first question and a part of the question you asked.
So that's sort of a separate piece.
Then you said, well, some of the dynamic could be explained by some strong transactional business in the quarter.
I would say there's one place, and I would actually separate these things because the first was good, and the second was better than we thought.
The non-annuity or transactional did a little better than we thought in quarter as well, and so that's a good point that we didn't bring out, but that is another sort of component of the 10 percent all up commercial growth.
So I guess my answer is, I agree with your transactional comment, but I disagree that it's probably the overallit's a component of a "shortfall" in unearned.
I would say both are actually quite good.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  That's fairly helpful, but it actually just on clarification on the contracted not yet billed, you said that yes, contracts get signed at the end of the quarter, so you're saying that the big jump primarily was because they just hadn't been billed yet versus I could see if you were just signing longer term deals that you're going to bill annually, but that's not what's happening.
It's more about justis that accurate?  Either one could happen.
AMY HOOD:  Yes, that's right.
If something was actually billed at the end of the quarter, it goes into unearned.
Contracted but not billed is actually that the contract was signed, but because the billing won't take place until after the end of the fiscal quarter, it ends up in contracted but not billed as opposed to unearned.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Right.
But are we seeing anytypically your contracts are three years, but are we seeing any extension on the average contract length?
AMY HOOD:  No.
No, that's not one of the impacts.
Thanks, John.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Great.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  We'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Thank you very much.
Two quick questions.
The first one is can you give us any sense of how much of the Office 365 and the Home Premium could be generated by net new users as compared to simply the move over of existing users?  Then I'll ask a second one.
AMY HOOD:  Mark, that's actuallyhere's how I think about the value prop because I can't really say, these are sales through retail and through OEM generally, whether it's a net new user or not.
What I can say is that attach overall went up in the Office Consumer business, which I would say is and could be a sign that some of those are net new.
And I would hope that to be the case.
The value prop of Office 365 Home Premium really does expand the footprint.
It allows for multiple users.
It has cross-platform capabilities with Office for Mac.
It has mobile capabilities as well, and allows for easier trial.
So it does sort of lower many of the barriers to experience and try new products.
So while I can't point and say there's an exact number that is a new user, I can certain say with attach going up that dynamic is helpful.
MARK MOERDLER:  Thanks.
The second quick question is on the Windows side, any sense whether or notwe've seen obviously an improvement on the numbers on here.
Do you believe that's being driven purely by an improvement going on on the market? It's the Windows 7 refresh accelerating as we get closer to the date?  Any sense of what the drivers are both on the consumer and the enterprise side as to why we're seeing the pick up?
AMY HOOD:  Sure.
I covered it a little bit in my comments, but it's probably worth spending a little bit more time.
I apologize.
Let me start with the business market.
I think there really are three factors that I would point to, particularly in the business environment.
The first one may, Mark, also help on the consumer side.
The overall macro-spending environment is better.
It's a little better than we thought and in businesses we're seeing it, you're seeing it in some of the IT spend forecasts you all put out.
They're being raised and I think that has an impact.
The second is I think our partners have done a very good job expanding the types and availability of new and interesting hardware.
That brings people to the store and I think is an encouraging sign.
And finally, as you asked, is the end of life of XP.
That has been an impact and we expect it to continue to be, as we said in Q3.
But, I wouldn't point to simply one of the factors as being the reason, but it is a combination of those factors.
MARK MOERDLER:  Perfect, I do appreciate it.
Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thank you, Mark.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank, Mark.
We'll move to the next question please, Operator.
(Operator direction.)
PHIL WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi.
Thanks, guys, and congratulations on a great quarter.
I just have a question back on the Windows Volume Licensing side.
You kind of touched on it earlier, but you saw 10 percent growth year-over-year this quarter versus 6% last quarter.
So you continue to have very healthy growth here.
One of the questions I've been getting from some clients is:  a) what's driving that; and b) as we get sort of closer and then actually pass the official end of life of XP, how do you think that's going to affect the growth in Windows licensing sort of beyond that point?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Phil.
Let meI'm going to take the opportunity to make your question two questions.
One is to talk about Windows Volume Licensing overall and secondly allow me to talk a little bit about the places that you can see the impact of Windows XP in the current quarter and I think that will help as you think about Q3 going forward.
In volume licensing you're right, it did grow 10 percent in Q2 and we do believe we are seeing some of the benefit of that growth is the end of life of Windows XP.
But, it's also reflective of the value many of our bigger customers are seeing in upgrading to the enterprise version of Windows.
The enterprise SKU includes things like Direct Access, Windows To Go, the corporate image, App Locker, and those really are differentiating and they really do matter to many CIOs.
So I think specifically on VLs, while end of life of XP is one component, it's certainly not the only component.
Now, if I expand your question to sort ofand I think in a way John asked about it, tooI mean Mark asked about it, too, is the end of life of XP.
One place that we've talked about it was Windows and how does it play into the business PC growth.
The second we talked about was volume licensing.
And the third, which I actually talked about in John's question, was offsets and some transactional strengths.
Some of the strengths that we saw in Office transactionally really can be linked back to the end of life of XP.
As people refresh a PC, and if they're buying Pro, those people often are Office customers.
And so if they tend to buy on a transactional basis they'd also see some impact through Office, I think you can tie that back to some of the out-performance we saw in the quarter, as well.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Phil.
Operator, next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Great, thank you and nice execution in the quarter.
Amy I wanted to ask if you could share with us how you see the gross margin profile of the company changing, as you continue with your journey to be a devices and services company, and as you look out to when the transition is complete, and I know you probably don't know when exactly that's going to occur, how do we think about what it will look like?
AMY HOOD:  Heather, thanks.
This is one of those questions that I think is best taken in a bit of a chunk.
First of all, I think if you look at our Commercial segment, I'll do it all up, because I actually think it's relatively easy with that breakdown.
In general, and you saw it this quarter, even as we continue to invest in the infrastructure to support our cloud conversion of our commercial customers to Azure, and Office 365 and CRM Online, our actual gross margin remained flat, which means we're increasing our utilization and growing gross margin in the commercial cloud business as we continue to see traction.
Over time I continue to believe our commercial business in the absolute, moving to the cloud is a net positive, as we talked about before, to overall profit, including increasing the amount of gross margin we make as a company.
So that I think this quarter was 83 percent-ish, so that I would take as a separate bucket from our devices and consumer business.
And now what's interesting is we have a couple of business models there with different gross margin profiles.
And you're actually seeing the impact of some of that in this quarter.
Xbox, as we know, especially with new consoles, like the One, tends to be gross margin negative on the front.
This was a heavy quarter for that.
Over time, for the attach, first, second, and third party games, and other services, the margin profile with any console life changes.
But, it's never going to be at 83 percent gross margin.
It's just a different business even for the market leader, and even successfully generating cash and return.
That is different from other businesses we also have in D&C.
So I think the important thing that I tend to focus on as I go through all these businesses is continued margin improvement within the business, continued efficiency within the business, and continued focus on the absolute profit within each of those areas, and then the mix then becomes more of a math equation, as we continue to grow the overall amount of cash and profit the company generates.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Heather.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Heather.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question please.
(Operator direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Hi, Amy.
Just back on contracted not billed, you had four quarters over $21 billion and then jumping up obviously to north of $23 billion.
That jump that happened, can you just help us understand what are the buckets that made that jump up this quarter?  Is there an easier way to think through where that actually came from?
AMY HOOD:  Yes.
Yes and no, of course.
Brent, let me say, contracted but not billed is related to the number of expirations we have in the quarter.
Chris and, I think, I both talked about we did have a lot of expirations in the quarter.
When those tend to fall at the end it can impact the actual magnitude is the absolute number of expirations, and then the timing of when those fall in the quarter can also impact how it's recognized.
And that's why I never really look at it separately from unearned, bookings, and renewals together.
And so, because timing is one thing, that's why I tend to put them in a bucket and say, together it's a good and healthy trajectory.
BRENT THILL:  And just real quick on the multi-year agreements you mentioned the healthy renewals.
Any color you can add to the re-up on the size of what you're seeing in general across some of those bigger multi-year agreements.
AMY HOOD:  I think in general it reflects the same trends we've been seeing.
It's across our broad portfolio.
You see it across Windows, Office, and Server.
If you look at our KPIs I think that points out that it's pretty broad-based.
So I don't think there's any one particular area I would call out.
It's really more about platform health and commitment.
BRENT THILL:  Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Brent.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Brent.
Next question please.
(Operator direction.)
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citigroup:  Hi, thanks.
A question on the consumer retail side, this is the first year I think we've had a full retail store presence.
You also, I believe, had some presence in some of the Best Buys with sort of mini-stores in there.
And I'm wondering sort of what your take away is from the holiday season and if those efforts you think were part of the reason why you had a pretty successful holiday season, especially on the PC side, and what that experience suggests that you should do in the future, in terms of retail store build-out and general investment around retail?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Walter.
When we talk about improved retail execution, I really think that's the partnership, as you said, with retailers, with our OEMs, and with our efforts to really improve both the devices, the assortment, and the experience of buying in the PC aisle.
So I do feel good about the investment we've made there and we've made them I think thoughtfully and continue to keep a focus on cost and expense as we do that.
So do I think it had an impact?  I do.
But, I really think the broader impact was investments and commitments we had with our partners to also improve the retail buying experience.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Walter.
Thanks.
Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
KEITH WEISS, Morgan Stanley:  Thank you for taking my question, and very nice quarter.
I wanted to dig into the gross margins in the quarter, because by my estimates you guys outperformed the guidance for gross margins that you gave in the quarter despite the fact that you saw significant outperformance in D&C hardware, which as you were saying especially for something like Xbox One which is just out of the gate, really had expectations of being very low if not negative gross margins.
Can you help us understand a little bit of where that gross margin outperformance came from?  Was any of it in D&C hardware getting better yields or sort of better gross margins on those products than your expectations, and if not where did the out-performance come from?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Keith.
I'm glad you asked that question.
With our outperformance, as you pointed out, in D&C hardware, we did actually see increased COGS related to that.
However, that was offset by some COGS improvement, and savings we saw across other areas as we continue to focus on efficiency and execution.
And so you're right, we did see COGS grow with hardware, but we were able to find savings elsewhere as we focus on improved execution.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Keith.
KEITH WEISS:  Excellent.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  We'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
RICK SHERLUND, Nomura Securities:  Thanks.
Congratulations on the margins, cost management, and execution, and also, Amy, I think we all appreciate your very substantive answers to the questions.
Just a follow-up to an earlier question on the contracted but unbilled.
We're seeing with VMware that they had a surge of three-year contracts coming out of the recession, and a lot of those are coming back for renewal now.
Is that what you were suggesting is you've got an unusually large volume of contracts coming up for renewal?
AMY HOOD:  Rick, yes.
In many ways, you've seen this over covering our company for a while.
Expirations can be chunkier.
That's not a year statement.
This quarter we had a big expiry base.
I wouldn't characterize it as sort of abnormally large, but the timing is a bit related to three years ago and the timing of some of the contracts.
So it's probably a consistent driver.
RICK SHERLUND:  Okay, and last quarter we talked a bit about are there any metrics you can help us to understand better what the effect of your revenues is from the shift to the cloud?  I think on Office it's more a net delta that I think you said it hurt you about $150 million in the previous quarter.
Is there any way you can give us a sense of what the net impact is on the business from the shift to the cloud?
CHRIS SUH:  Hi, Rick.
It's Chris.
I think I talked about this a little bit.
The place where you can see the most direct impact is in the Consumer Office business.
We talked about the business on a traditional license basis being down 24 points.
But our estimate is approximately 16 points of that decline is accounted for by the shift to Office 365 Home Premium.
So that gives you sort of a good estimation of the impact, the direct impact we're seeing particularly on the consumer side.
RICK SHERLUND:  That implies it would only be down about 8 percent were it not for the shift to the cloud?
CHRIS SUH:  That's one way to look at it, yes, the net number would be about 8 percent.
RICK SHERLUND:  Terrific.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Yes, good afternoon.
I wanted to ask about phone, because you had not discussed Windows Phone on the call so far, just how it's tracking based on your expectations, whether you are planning on continuing to invest with non-Nokia OEMs, and also, Amy, whether any of your expectations or investment plans for the integration with Nokia have changed in any meaningful way since you announced the deal?  Thanks.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Ed.
That's a good point, we didn't have a chance to discuss the phone results.
We did see growth in Windows Phone, both in the licensing and in the mobile phone IP revenues, both grew this quarter.
I think regarding Nokia, we continue to see the growth in many of the places we've seen it historically.
So unsubsidized markets as well as with entry level smart phone devices.
So I think many of those dynamics haven't really changed.
Do I have any updates to how to think about Nokia other than we continue to expect it to close in the quarter?  I don't.
We mostly remained focused on working hard to get to the point where we're working together as one team to drive that business forward.
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Ed.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  Hi, thank you very much, Amy.
And I appreciate the fact that you're trying to improve the margins in each of the commercial and the consumer businesses.
But the margin difference yield between these two businesses still is a pretty wide one.
It looks like the consumer business is growing.
The pure dynamics that I can see of the consumer business, there are three, one is the margin differential is too wide.
You've tried to improve that.
The margin difference is still wide.
The consumer business trend wise is growing faster than commercial.
And, third, is that you have this shift to the cloud.
So unless you do something like an Adobe or Autodesk, where you force the transition to happen very quickly, there is the risk that you get a lot of growth, which is fantastic, and there's a lot of progress to share, but the margin inflection point could be delayed for several years out.
I think that's was one of the questions that spurred behind I think presumably Heather's question.
That's what I'm trying to get at.
So how long you're going to get this shift to result in a way that we may not see the earnings growth rate, but we may have to wait until some point in time or are you at the point where you can actually force this shift to happen much quicker?  Thank you very much.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Kash.
The way I think about it is, we have a broad portfolio, and we address customers of all types, and in many ways our biggest goal is to meet the needs of our customers whether they be CIOs or consumers.
And setting our business model to support a product and the adoption curve that we want needs to be married with the adoption curve and timing of our customers.
I feel like we've done a very good job of balancing the pace of that.
I've been encouraged by the pace of adoption of many of our cloud services.
You heard the Home Premium numbers today as well as talking about the commercial cloud.
And so for me, it's hard to say, is there too big of a delta.
It's really about managing each of these things toward absolute growth and absolute improvement and having customer adoption.
So I probably just have a different perspective on that than you have.
KASH RANGAN:  Thank you very much.
CHRIS SUH:  We'll go to the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
ROSS MACMILLAN, Jeffries:  Thanks a lot, and my congratulations as well.
Amy, you said that Office 365 Home Premium was more than 15 percent of total consumer Office licenses sold.
And I wonder if you think about your Commercial business, and we either think about it as a percentage of total Office 365 or as a percentage of maybe what's traditionally been transactional, whether you have a similar metric in terms of percentage of total Office licenses sold?
AMY HOOD:  Actually, that's a good question.
We only recently started selling the Office client in our volume licensing agreement through a subscription.
So that is actually good feedback for us to think going forward about talking about the Office specific business that way, because in general we think of Office 365 as being a broad set of assets including Exchange, SharePoint, Lync and Office in the Commercial business.
And we haven't really talked about it given the newness of the model in the enterprise as being as meaningful as it has been in the consumer.
The shift is far faster there on the client.
ROSS MACMILLAN:  Yes.
I just think that would be helpful, especially as we think about it with respect to your traditional commercial transactional business.
Maybe if I could slip one other one just to go back on the contracted not billed.
I just want to be clear in my own mind, because I've heard two things.
One thing I've heard you say was we had stronger transactional business late in the quarter, but I also heard you say that there were frankly more renewals on multiyear that would have resulted in that balance going up, especially if those were late in the quarter.
So am I right to think it's those two factors that are at play here, both stronger transactional and a larger pool, if you will, of multiyear renewals.
And is it relatively evenly balanced between the two.
Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks.
Actually transactional execution in the quarter is recognized all in quarter.
That's non-annuity.
It doesn't go to either the unearned balance or the contracted not billed balance.
So that's not an impact that results in a change to either unearned or CNB.
The latter, which is the absolute size of the expiration date, frankly could or couldn't impact CNB.
It can impact things like unearned growth, but it also can impact CNB depending on if it's contracted in quarter, but not billed until after the end of the quarter.
ROSS MACMILLAN:  That's really helpful.
Thank you for the clarification.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks.
We'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
BRAD REBACK, Stifel:  Hey, how are you guys doing?
AMY HOOD:  Hi, Brad.
BRAD REBACK:  So, Amy, in the Q it talks about the Surface still losing money even at the almost $900 million run rate of revenue in the quarter.
Can you give us any sense of what type of volume you need for that business to have the scale to make some money?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Brad.
When we launched Surface just a year ago our goal was really to create a product that showcased what can happen when you innovate in hardware, in the service, and in the software.
And as you know we've learned a lot over the course of this journey.
And we have to make more meaningful progress.
But, I think for us we've remained focused, as we launch the second version of Surface, to stay focused on both price point and gross margin.
And I think we've made a big leap from V1 to V2.
And I look forward to making leaps as we go forward in our product roadmap.
But, I do think it's more to think about it as a goal we absolutely have, as we continue to integrate the line.
BRAD REBACK:  Great, thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks.
CHRIS SUH:  Great.
We'll move to the next question please.
(Operator direction.)
GREGG MOSKOWITZ, Cowen and Company:  Hi, thank you very much.
Amy, despite the healthy gross margins, your Xbox platform revenue grew $1.2 billion year-over-year, but your related cost of goods sold went up by $1.6.
And I realize there may be additional costs related to launch, but just wondering if you'd talk to expected profitability levels for Xbox over the balance of Fiscal 14?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks.
We'll continue to be in launch mode for Xbox One, especially as many people are excited about the launch of Titanfall in March, and we'll continue to add and expand markets over the course of the year.
So I would continue to think about our investment in being the leading next generation console as certainly extending.
GREGG MOSKOWITZ:  Okay.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you.
So we have time for one more question.
(Operator direction.)
BRENDAN BARNICLE, Pacific Crest Securities:  Thanks so much.
Amy, you mentioned briefly in your comments some of the strength you'd seen in SQL Server, and that seems to be taking market share.
You highlighted a couple of the features, but what do you think is driving that market share gain and a similar question over on the server side, where you seem to have better server numbers than what we've seen in units.
What would be accounting for that additional strength?
AMY HOOD:  Thank you.
You're right.
I only pointed out a few of the value props of SQL Server.
And actually, dating back years the real value prop of SQL has been the breadth of its offerings, analytics, reporting, and core database functionality.
And so over the years I think the balance of those things, and continuing to add and innovate, at very good value, has continued to be appealing.
And as we move forward and add some cloud capabilities into our hybrid model, and continue to add features into the premium levels, when you're the established, and I think in many ways unit leader, then you can focus on continuing to move up the stack, adding value and increasing your premium mix.
And the team has really done a terrific job of doing that, so it's nice to be asked so that I can talk about it.
And I think I mentioned it briefly, but System Center is another where we've gained share in virtualization and I think we're quite proud of the progress we've made especially in that area, and that's enabled a lot of growth, as well.
So I actually appreciate the question.
It's good to be able to talk so positively about those assets.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Brendan.
Okay.
So that wraps up the Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
Just a quick reminder that BUILD, our developer conference, will kick off the morning of April 2nd, in San Francisco.
We encourage investors to watch the keynotes live via webcast.
We'll also look forward to seeing many of you in the coming months at various investors' conferences.
For those of you unable to attend in person these events will generally be webcast and you'll be able to follow our comments at the Microsoft.com/investor website.
Please contact us if you need additional details.
Thanks again for joining us today and take care.
AMY HOOD:  Thank you, everyone.
1
Satya Nadella, Amy Hood, Chris Suh
Thursday, April 24, 2014
(Operator Direction.)
CHRIS SUH:  Good afternoon, and thank you for joining us today.
On the call with me are Satya Nadella, Chief Executive Officer; Amy Hood, Chief Financial Officer; Frank Brod, Chief Accounting Officer; and John Seethoff, Deputy General Counsel.
On our website, Microsoft.com/investor, we have posted a document summarizing our quarterly results as well as a slide deck, which is intended to follow the quarterly results document and provide a reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
Please keep in mind that all growth comparisons relate to the corresponding period of last year unless otherwise specified, all impacted numbers have been adjusted for the cumulative effect of last year's revenue deferrals and recognition related to the Windows Upgrade Offer, the Office Deferral, the Video Game Deferral, and the expense related to the non-tax-deductible European Commission Fine.
As a reminder, in our segment reporting structure, we have consolidated revenue adjustments of this nature into Corporate and Other to provide better comparability of operating results.
We will post this call's prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript at the Microsoft Investor Relations website until April 24, 2015.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements, which are predictions, projections, or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Form 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
And with that, I'll turn the call over to Satya.
SATYA NADELLA:  Thank you, Chris.
It's great to have the opportunity to join today's call.
From my first day, I've said I'm committed to an ongoing dialogue with investors.
Joining these investor calls going forward is going to be a big part of that, and I'm enthusiastic about today's call.
It's been an incredible and busy couple of months.
In addition to executing on our plan and announcing new products and services, I've spent a lot of time gathering feedback and exchanging ideas with customers, partners, employees and investors.
It was important and valuable to see the company with a fresh perspective, to get grounded both on our current reality and future opportunity.
As I've told our employees, our industry does not respect tradition.
It only respects innovation.
This applies to us and everyone else.
When I think about our industry over the next five to ten years, I see a world where computing is more ubiquitous and all experiences are powered by ambient intelligence.
Silicon, hardware systems and software will co-evolve together and give birth to a variety of new form factors.
Nearly everything we do will become more digitized, our interactions with other people, with machines, and between machines.
The ability to reason over and draw insights from everything that's being digitized will improve the fidelity of our daily experiences and interactions.
This is the mobile-first and cloud-first world.
It's a rich canvas for innovation and a great growth opportunity for Microsoft across all our customer segments.
To thrive in this world, we will continue to zero in on the things customers really value and Microsoft can uniquely deliver.
We want to build products that people love to use.
And, as a result, you will see us increasingly focus on usage as the leading indicator of long-term success.
To that end, we are already making progress.
Amy will provide additional detail, but I wanted to say a few words about the quarter itself.
Today's results demonstrate the breadth and strength of our overall business.
We saw strong momentum in cloud services.
Our commercial cloud business more than doubled year-over-year with Office 365 and Azure both performing extremely well.
Business customers continue to make Windows their overwhelming platform of choice, with solid growth both in Windows OEM Pro and Windows Volume Licensing revenues.
We saw continued improvement in search, with our U.S.
search share growing to 18.6 percent and search revenue increasing by 38 percent.
Bing continues to deliver platform capabilities across our products.
One recent example of this is the recently announced Cortana Virtual Assistant for Windows Phone.
And very importantly, across all our businesses we continue to have a rigorous focus on execution and cost discipline, resulting in solid revenue and earnings per share.
I sum up this quarter in two words, execution and transition.
We delivered solid financial results and we took several steps to reorient Microsoft.
In recent weeks, we talked about how we are advancing Office, Windows, and our data platform, and how we think holistically about the constituencies we serve  IT, developers, and the people at the center in a mobile-first, cloud-first world.
We will continue to invest in our cloud capabilities, including Office 365 and Azure in the fast-growing SaaS and cloud platform markets.
We are committed to ensuring that our cloud services are available across all device platforms that people use.
We're delivering a cloud for everyone on every device.
At the same time, we have bold plans to move Windows forward.
We're investing and innovating in every dimension, from form factor to software experiences, to price.
Windows platform is unique in how it brings together consistent end user experiences across small to large screens, broadest platform opportunity for developers, and control and assurance for IT.
And, with the addition of Nokia's talented people and their depth in mobile technologies, we will enhance our device capabilities.
The past two-and-a-half months have been a period of significant change at Microsoft, but also a period of nailing the basics and delivering against our product and financial plans.
In the months ahead, we will continue to intensely be focused on two things  rock solid execution and pivoting the company towards the future.
We will continue to push hard and move quickly, and you will see the proof of that month after month in the products and services we build for the mobile-first, cloud-first world.
What you can expect of Microsoft is courage in the face of reality.
We will approach our future with a challenger mindset.
We will be bold in our innovation.
We will be accountable to our customers, partners, and shareholders.
And with that, I'll turn it over to Amy to go further into the details of the quarter and then we'll be happy to take your questions.
AMY HOOD:  Thank you, Satya.
And good afternoon, everyone.
Let me start with a few things I think are notable this quarter.
Then, I'll give our outlook before moving on to Q&A.
We had a very good third quarter, with solid results across our businesses, and strong momentum in our most strategic areas.
At the same time, we remained focused and disciplined in our spending.
Total revenue was $20.4 billion, up 8 percent, and earnings per share grew 5 percent.
We had outstanding momentum and results in our cloud services.
As Satya mentioned, commercial cloud revenue more than doubled again this quarter.
Office 365 is now on an annual revenue run rate of $2.5 billion, and Azure revenue grew over 150 percent driven by both new customers and increased usage.
In our Office 365 Home service, we added nearly one million new users this quarter, and now have over 4.4 million subscribers.
We continue to enhance its value proposition with new features, premium services, and cross-platform functionality.
As we cross the one year anniversary since launch, we are pleased with the renewal rates we are experiencing thus far.
With Bing, we made clear progress again this quarter.
We grew our U.S.
share and improved RPS significantly.
Display revenue related to portal and e-mail declined, while we saw ad revenue growth in products like Skype and Xbox.
Importantly, we are innovating while expanding our cloud gross margins through both improved scale and continuous engineering efforts to drive efficiency.
Businesses are clearly expressing their overwhelming preference for Windows.
Windows Pro revenue grew 19 percent driven by growth in business PCs, mix shift to developed markets where attach is higher, continued strength in the enterprise, and an increased mix of Pro in small and medium businesses.
Windows Volume Licensing also had a solid 11 percent revenue growth.
Windows XP end of support contributed in part to this growth we saw this quarter, as did a general hardware refresh.
Our Commercial results reflect ongoing strength, and we again outperformed the enterprise IT market.
Customer movement from transactional purchasing to subscription and multi-year agreements was better than our expectations.
Therefore, our Commercial unearned revenue grew 12 percent this quarter, which was above our expectations, and our contracted not billed balance exceeded $22 billion.
We had double-digit growth in SQL Server, System Center, Windows Server Premium, and Lync.
Clearly, our value proposition and product roadmap is resonating.
Xbox One has sold over five million units since launch, and engagement has been high with users spending nearly five hours per day on their console.
We will continue to extend the unique entertainment value proposition of Xbox One, particularly in markets outside of the U.S.
where some services aren't as mature.
Xbox 360 sales exceeded our expectations this quarter.
And, across the platform, Xbox Live members continued to embrace the service, with transactional revenue growing 17 percent.
We do expect to work through some inventory in Q4.
We continue to enhance the value proposition of Surface through both hardware and software innovation, which makes Surface one of the best high value productivity devices available.
This quarter, the mix of sales moved to our second generation and Pro devices, and this change had a positive impact on gross margin.
Now, let's turn to operating expenses.
As a result of our ongoing prioritization efforts, OPEX was favorable to what we expected in January.
Across the company, we are focused on continually aligning our resources to our top priorities, which includes investing in the next wave of innovation for our customers.
We are devoting resources to our sales team and partner ecosystem to ensure they are positioned for the migration to cloud services.
And, finally, our agility is also improving as planned marketing spend was redeployed from Q3 to Q4 in support of a commercial cloud campaign.
With that summary of Q3 results, I'd like to talk about our outlook.
Given the Nokia Devices and Services transaction is closing tomorrow, the guidance I will walk through next excludes any related impact.
Let's start with Devices and Consumer.
In Licensing, we expect revenue to be $4.1 to $4.3 billion.
This range reflects an expectation that the benefits of XP end of support will moderate.
In Hardware, we expect revenue to be $1.3 to $1.5 billion in what is a seasonally slower hardware quarter.
This number also reflects channel inventory draw down for Xbox consoles.
In Devices and Consumer Other, we expect revenue to be about $1.9 billion.
We expect to see continued growth in Office 365 Home and Bing as we drive additional usage.
Moving on to Commercial, we expect revenue across our two segments to be $13.1 to $13.3 billion.
Within this, we expect Commercial Other revenue to be about $2.1 billion on the strength of the transition to our cloud.
And in corporate, we expect to defer revenue of about $100 million.
We expect COGS to be $5.7 to $5.8 billion with variability primarily due to hardware.
And, moving on to operating expenses, for the fourth quarter we expect OPEX to be $8.4 to $8.6 billion.
When adjusting for the prior year European Commission Fine, this represents full-year operating expense growth of about 4 percent.
This is on the low end of our original guidance that we provided a year ago of 4 to 6 percent, as we invest in R&D and sales efforts while rationalizing our marketing spend.
As a reminder, other income and expense include dividend and interest income, offset by interest expense and the net cost of hedging.
We expect these items to generally offset each other.
We expect a higher tax rate in Q4, and the full year tax rate to be between 18 and 20 percent.
We expect capital expenditure to be about $1.5 billion.
As we build out our cloud infrastructure, we are concentrating on hardware, software, and data center optimization and supply chain efficiencies to maximize the benefits of our cloud scale.
The benefits of this work are realized in improving gross margins.
We expect unearned revenue to grow in line with normal seasonality.
Now, let me share some thoughts regarding Nokia Devices and Services.
The acquisition will close tomorrow, which is about four months later than the deal economics we outlined in September assumed.
Since then, the Nokia business results have also changed.
We are focused on the transition from planning to implementation, which accelerates with the deal closing tomorrow.
Given this is a complex body of work that will take time, we do not intend to update our financial guidance for any Nokia impact during the quarter.
However, I want to share the following to help as you update your models.
Under the existing commercial agreement between Microsoft and Nokia, license sales and platform payments are reported in the D&C Licensing segment.
Once the acquisition closes, results for Nokia Devices and Services will be reported in the D&C Hardware segment.
For Q4, we will clearly show the impact of the ending of the commercial agreement, Nokia's ongoing operations, and any one-time integration and severance costs.
And, we remain committed to achieving annual cost synergy targets of at least $600 million within 18 months of close.
Now looking toward Fiscal '15.
Satya and I, along with the rest of the senior leadership team, are working together to solidify our plans for the year ahead.
Our goals are clear.
Get more out of the tremendous resources we have available, drive innovation in products that people love to use, and execute in areas where Microsoft can uniquely succeed in today's mobile-first, cloud-first world.
And with that, let me turn it back over to Chris, and we can move to Q&A.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Amy.
And with that we'll move to Q&A.
Operator, please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Good afternoon.
A question for Satya, just if you could reflect on your initial time as CEO, and maybe give everyone a sense of how you prioritize your near-term objectives here in the next several quarters that would be helpful.
Thank you.
SATYA NADELLA:  Thank you, Brent.
The first ten weeks or so have been extremely energizing.
And as I said, for me what was important was to recharge, talk to lots of different constituents, and relearn the place, and see it for the first time, and just get a different fresh perspective, even in spite of having spent 22 years here.
It's been fascinating to get that fresh perspective.
And, the way I look at it, is even from day one I have had the deep conviction that our vision is about going boldly into the this mobile-first, cloud-first world.
And, we feel that we are well on our way.
If there is anything that I want to do its how we make sure we remain focused on it with every device launch, with every service launch, we keep coming back reinforcing that vision, because at the end of the day it's the purpose with which we approach the vision and the execution behind it which is what counts.
And, to me, being able to think about that deeply, what does it mean for us culturally, what does it mean for us in terms of our plans, and then just getting behind it, leaning into it as an entire company is what's my priority and that's what I obsess about, that's what I focus about.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Brent.
Next question please.
(Operator direction.)
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Thank you very much.
Satya, welcome aboard and thanks for joining the call.
If you don't mind I'm going to ask an overall question, either of Amy or of Satya.
Looking at the Commercial license business, how much of the shrinkage year-over-year in Commercial licenses is driven by the move of traditional license players from license, or license paying customers, from license to the cloud?  How much is related to guys moving from Software Assurance, how much from license?  Can you give any color in there?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Mark, for that question.
Why don't I take that one?  Overall in Commercial Licensing I often talk, as you know, about the commercial business all up, mostly because I think some of the core dynamics really reinforce what we see a bit of what you're talking about, which is that renewal rates have remained high and in line.
Our ability to recapture revenue in those contracts remains strong.
And, our ability to attach cloud products has grown.
So, what we've seen this quarter and what you see even in the Commercial Licensing line itself is that continued switch.
In fact, it was faster this quarter than we had thought.
Really, when you look at our Commercial unearned revenue, along with the CNB balance that we talked about last quarter, we had so many billings at the end of last quarter, when you really normalize for those end-of-quarter billings bookings, were also better than we had expected, in terms of the annuity stream.
So, I think both a transition to long-term agreements is encouraging, in addition to premium products, the addition of new products, as well as the transition to cloud is really core to thinking about the health of the segment all-up.
MARK MOERDLER:  Thank you, I appreciate it.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Mark.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question please, Operator.
(Operator direction.)
KEITH WEISS, Morgan Stanley:  Excellent.
Thank you for taking my question, guys.
And, Satya, again, thank you for joining the call today, it's great to have your views and input shared.
One of the questions I get most often from investors is trying to understand how you're going to approach the role and what you're doing initially in terms of a strategic review going on.
Are you reviewing the businesses and should we expect any big changes in the strategy of Microsoft?  So, I'm going to pose that question to you, in terms of over the next couple of weeks, months, quarters even, is there anything of a strategic review going on?  Is there any big change in the Microsoft strategy that we should be expecting from that review?
SATYA NADELLA:  Thanks, Keith, for the question.
The framework I have in terms of how I'm approaching my job and how we, as a leadership team and as a company, are going to execute and plan, because one of the things that I strongly believe in is you're planning on a continuous basis, you're executing on a continuous basis.
It's not episodic, if you will.
The only way we're going to succeed here is by having this notion that you're planning all the time and you're also making the changes to your plan based on the changed circumstances.
And, I think that's the way to run a company like ours in a marketplace that's as dynamic as ours.
But, that said, I start with, a vision that's very grounded on what the future opportunity is.
This mobile-first, cloud-first thing is a pretty deep thing for us.
When we say mobile-first in fact what we mean by that is mobility first.
We think about users and their experiences spanning a variety of devices.
It's not about any one form factor that may have some share position today.
But, as we look to the future what are the set of experiences across devices, some ours and some not ours, that we can power through experiences that we can create uniquely.
That notion of having a central focus and a central purpose is what I think we've already signaled and we are well on our way to execute on it.
Now, you also need to continuously build some new capability.
When you think about mobility-first that means you need to have a really deep understanding of all the mobile scenarios for everything from how communications happen, how meetings occur, and those require us to build new capability.
We'll do some of this organically, some of it inorganically.
A good example of this is what we've done with Nokia.
Obviously, we're looking forward to that team joining us, building on the capability.
And, then execution, even in the last three weeks or so we have announced a bunch of things where we talked about this one cloud for everyone and every device.
We talked about how our data platform is going to enable this data culture, which is in fact fundamentally changing how Microsoft itself works.
We also talked about what it means to think about Windows, especially with the launch of this universal Windows application model.
How different it is now to think about Windows as one family, which was not true before, but now we have a very different way to think about it.
So, we are well on our way to execute on it.
But, to your core question of are we going to review, we are all the time reviewing.
One of the things that I feel as a leadership team, we have really picked up the pace on asking the hard questions.
What is the believability of any one of our plans and pushing ourselves, because at the end of the day I want to be very accountable to you all, to our customers, to our partners, as a team, by executing on our plans very well, because at the end of the day that's what matters.
So, that at least gives you a framework for how we are approaching it.
KEITH WEISS:  Excellent.
Thank you very much for that.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Keith.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question please, Operator.
(Operator direction.)
RICK SHERLUND, Nomura:  Thanks.
First, Satya, on platform as a service, I'm curious how aggressively you plan to maybe change your business model to a subscription model and drive, like Adobe did, less up-front revenue, more encouraging a subscription and cloud-based, and whether we should begin to anticipate what it might look like to Microsoft as you make this transition to more of a subscription business.
I'm just not sure what the margins are on your cloud business and as you transition most SaaS companies have 70, 80 percent gross margins.
I'm not real sure where you are on your cloud businesses today.
Do we think this is going to be a smooth transition, or might we expect it to be a little more disruptive as you gain more and more traction on a subscription and cloud basis?
SATYA NADELLA:  Great, Rick.
Thanks for the question.
I'll start and maybe, Amy, you'll want to even add.
The way I look at it, Rick, we are well on our way to making that transition, in terms of moving from pure licenses to long-term contracts as well as subscription business model.
So, when you talk about platform as a service, if you look at our commercial cloud it's made up of the platform itself, which is Azure.
We also have a SaaS business in Office 365.
Now, one of the things that we want to make sure we look at is each of the constituent parts, because the margin profile on each one of these things is going to be different.
The infrastructure elements right now in particular is going to have a different economics versus what some of the per-user applications in a SaaS mode have.
It's the blending of all of that that matters and the growth of that matters to us the most in this time where I think there are just a couple of us really playing in this market.
I mean this is gold rush time in some sense of being able to capitalize on the opportunity.
And, when it comes to that, we have some of the best, the broadest SaaS solution and the broadest platform solution.
That combination of those assets doesn't come often.
What we are very focused on is how do we make sure we get our customers aggressively into this, having them use our service, be successful with it, and then there will be a blended set of margins across even just our cloud.
And, what matters to me in the long run is the magnitude of profit we generate, given that a lot of categories are going to be merged as this transition happens.
We have to be able to actively participate in it and drive profit growth.
AMY HOOD:  Let me add a bit, Rick.
I think specifically as you think about the transition and where you'll see it first, I would say year-over-year we had flat to improving gross margins in all segments but hardware, where we had a mix shift to the Xbox console, which from a business model perspective obviously drives a gross margin decline.
But, that being said, within the Office 365 business I start from the fact and a principle, which is having a user, whether they be in the consumer or in the enterprise, have access to our most recent, most innovative, most secure product, which is always going to be for us probably the one born in the cloud, will be a driver of satisfaction and a driver of usage.
Those two things lead to revenue.
You're already seeing that transition in the enterprise where we already sold that way.
The transition is quite easy, from an economic standpoint.
In the transactional business, you saw the impact of it this quarter.
We had a bigger mix shift to annuity, more went on the balance sheet.
We still had strong growth, but you do see the impact intra-quarter.
And, in the consumer side of the business, which you also referenced with Adobe, I think we've just launched another SKU, in addition to Home called Personal, as we continue to drive consumer usage that way.
The launch of Office on the iPad is an example of where we will add the most value, which is in the subscription.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Rick.
Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Great.
Thank you.
Satya, I'll echo everybody's thoughts that it's great to have you on the call, and to hear your perspective.
I was wondering if you could share with us the decision recently to offer Windows for free for sub-9-inch devices, and how you think this impacts your share in that arena.
And also, how should we think about Windows pricing given your comment about how Windows is going to kind of play in different market segmentations.
How do we see Windows pricing evolving, if at all, for other types of form factors over time?
SATYA NADELLA:  First of all, thanks, Heather, for the question.
Overall, the way I want us to look at Windows going forward is what does it mean to have the broadest device family and ecosystem?  Because, at the end of the day, it's about the users and developer opportunity we create for the entirety of the family that's going to define the health of the ecosystem.
To me, it matters that we approach the various segments that we now participate with Windows, because that's what's has happened.
Fundamentally, we participated in the PC market, now we are in a market that's much bigger that the PC market.
We continue to have healthy share, healthy pricing and, in fact, growth as we mentioned in the enterprise adoption of Windows.
And, we plan to, in fact, add more value, more management, more security, especially as things are changing in those segments given BYOD and software security issues.
We want to be able to reinforce that core value.
Then, when it comes to new opportunities from wearables to Internet of things, we want to be able to participate in all of this with our Windows offering, with our tools around it, and we want to be able to price by category.
And, that's effectively what we did.
We looked at what made sense for us to do on tablets and phones below 9-inches, and we felt that the price there needed to be changed.
We have modernization ratios on the backend for those.
That's how we're going to approach each one of these opportunities, because in a world of ubiquitous computing we want Windows to be ubiquitous.
That doesn't mean it's one price, one business model for all of that.
And it's actually a market expansion opportunity, and that's the way we're going to go execute on it.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you.
Operator, next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
JOHN DIFUCCI, JP Morgan:  Great.
Thank you, and welcome, Satya.
I'm going to give Amy a question here for numbers.
Amy, we see sales and marketing expense declined 7 percent year-over-year in this quarter.
Can you remind us if there's anything unique last year, or is this just better controls?  And, along these same lines, free cash flow, excluding acquisitions, grew 2 percent, which is a bit of a surprise given the direction the company is going.
And, the first time in seven quarters we've actually seen growth in free cash flow.
So can you tell us how we should be thinking about this going forward?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, John.
I was getting lonely, I didn't have any questions.
So, I appreciate it.
Let me start with you first one, which was there any sort of unique thing that resulted in that comparable in sales and marketing.
We did have more launch expense going on a year ago, but we also focused on rationalizing and focusing our marketing dollars in quarter.
So, I think it's a combination of both, and I would probably say more of the latter, which is really thinking and prioritizing more effectively throughout the year to earn the highest ROI on the dollar from spending.
We also did invest in sales year over year.
So most of that is specifically around marketing.
I want to make sure that you understand that where we see opportunity, we're investing in our selling engine to get it.
I would make an important caveat to make sure it's clear when you see year over year sales and marketing decline.
The second half of that in terms of cash flow, I think as we remain focused on prioritizing and really thinking about the return on the dollars we spend, you did see, as I talked about earlier margins increase year over year, all of that has had a positive impact on cash flow.
Thanks, John.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  In going forward, how should we be thinking about that?  Just continued discipline, I guess, around expenses, but also investment where it's needed?
AMY HOOD:  Yes.
I think when we talked at the end about how I think about '15, maybe it's better said as how we think about every day, which is what can we do today, this week, this month, to better invest behind places where we feel like we are uniquely capable of success, and not being afraid to make those changes and finding the agility and the empowerment here to do those things is incredibly important.
And, I would say culturally, Satya mentioned about being more data-driven, I think in addition to the day-to-day which was more focused on customers, I think really it's a cultural statement about how we are going to operate more internally as well.
So, maybe that's the most forward-looking comment I could tell you, which is that being empowered to look weekly, monthly, and see how we can get better, and better, and better.
And I think that's actually driven a lot of excitement around here.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Okay, great.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, John.
We'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
PHILIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi.
Thanks, guys, and congratulations on a great quarter.
And, Satya, great to have you on the call as well.
I wanted to focus in on Office 365.
If you compare it this quarter to last quarter, you've got 1.1 million in Home Premium users, last quarter I think it was 500k.
In September you talked about a run rate of I think 1.5 million, now you're at 2-1/2.
I wonder if you could just talk about the momentum that you're seeing Office 365, and maybe give us your thoughts on sort of the business versus the home/consumer side.
And then, Amy, when you think about Office 365, how do you think about the differences or lifetime value of an Office 365 customer versus a traditional Office user?
SATYA NADELLA:  Let me start, and then, Amy, you should definitely add on to it.
Office 365, I'm really, really excited about what's happening there, which is the core engine that's driving a lot of our cloud adoption, and you see it in the numbers and Amy will talk more about the numbers.
But, one of the fundamental things, it's actually a SaaS application, and it's also an architecture for enterprise.
One of the most salient things we announced when we talked about the cloud for everyone and every device, and we talked about Office 365 having now iPad apps.
We also launched something called the Enterprise Mobility Suite, which is perhaps one of the most strategic things during that day that we announced, which was that we now have a consistent and deep platform for identity management, which by the way gets bootstrapped every time Office 365 users sign up, device management, and data protection, which is really what every enterprise customer needs in a mobile-first world, in a world where you have fast application adoption, and you have BYOD or bring your own device happening.
So to me, the Office 365 growth is, in fact, driving our enterprise infrastructure growth, which is driving Azure growth, and that cycle to me is most exciting.
That's one of the reasons why I want us to keep indexing on the usage of all of this, and the growth numbers you see is a reflection of that.
AMY HOOD:  Phil, specifically to some of your how do we think about the lifetime value, maybe I will use the consumer SKUs, which you started with, as a good example.
First, whenever we launch a new motion, a new SKU in this instance, especially a subscription, I do think it takes some time both for the customer to understand the value proposition as well as for retailers and partners to really hone their motion to pivot selling a new subscription model.
I think you're starting to see some acceleration as well as an increasing awareness of the product, which I think is terrific.
Maybe more importantly, as we think about the value we're adding, the Office on the iPad announcement certainly brought attention as we continue to drive people to the subscription.
I made a comment around renewal rates, and we're happy with them as we've passed the one-year anniversary of the launch.
And, I think when you look at the LTV, we will be better off for many reasons including financially when a person moves to the subscription.
My deep belief is the most important thing we will do is continue to think about how we can modernize, add features, add innovation so that it's more valuable to them every day they use it.
And, that is far easier in a cloud world than it is on prem.
So, I think that's probably the most important driver of LTV long term.
PHILLIP WINSLOW:  Thanks, guys.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Phil.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi:  Hi, thanks.
Amy, just a question for you, I know you're not providing updated guidance for Nokia.
I'm just wondering maybe a little bit of thought behind that decision.
I know the deal closes tomorrow.
You probably could easily move things around here a bit and reported on it early next week and had that benefit.
Is the lack of guidance there, is it just simply you haven't been able to get your hands into that business at this point.
Is there something else that's changed in that business?  I'm just trying to get a sense, because it does sort of open up quite a bit of variability in terms of how people are going to model things over the next three months.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Walter.
No, it really wasn't a choice.
The reality is we've not had the type of access until close where we could confidently begin to give the type of guidance that I believe we've come, and you've come to expect from us, in terms of the depth and analysis required to get there.
They do report in a different accounting system.
It needs to be converted to GAAP.
We've not had access to forward projections.
I haven't had deep access to their systems.
So, until we get that, which really starts tomorrow, it's not really a question of whether it was this week or next week.
It's really a question of us getting the confidence and access to be able to report at the level of detail I know you all would expect me to do.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Walter.
Next question please.
(Operator direction.)
KARL KEIRSTEAD, Deutsche Bank:  Hi, thanks.
I'd like to focus on that server product revenue number of 10 percent and, Satya, I think you know a thing or two about this group, so perhaps I'll direct that to you.
But, that growth rate is so far still above what a lot of your mega cap tech vendors, peers I should say, are posting.
And, I just wanted to ask you if you could try to outline for us the couple of factors that have enabled Microsoft to continue growing that server business well above your peers, and, secondly, if you think that kind of 10 percentish growth is sustainable over Fiscal '15.
SATYA NADELLA:  Thanks, Karl.
I'll start, in fact, both Amy and I worked on that business.
So, we'll both take a crack at it.
You know, it's a pretty exciting change that's happening.
Obviously, that part of the business has been performing very well for a while now.
But, frankly, it's fundamentally changing.
One of the questions I often get asked is, hey, how did Windows Server and the hypervisor underneath it become so good so soon?  You've been at it for a long time, but there seems to be something fundamentally changed.
We've grown a lot of share recently.
The product is more capable than it ever was.
The rate of change is different.
And, it's for one reason alone, which is we use it to run Azure.
So, the fact that we use our servers to run our cloud makes our servers more competitive for other people to build their own clouds.
It's the same trend that's accelerating us on both sides.
The other thing that's happening is when we sell our server products they, for the most part, are just not isolated anymore.
They come with automatic cloud tiering.
SQL Server is a great example.
We just launched a new version of SQL, which is by far the best release of SQL in terms of its features, like its exploitation of in-memory.
It's the first product in the database world that has in-memory for all the three workloads of databases, OLTP, data warehousing, and BI.
But, more importantly, it automatically gives you high availability, which means a lot to every CIO, and every enterprise deployment, by actually tiering to the cloud.
So those kinds of feature innovations, which is pretty boundary-less for us, is breakthrough work.
It's not something that somebody who has been a traditional competitor of ours can do if you're not even a first-class producer of a public cloud service.
So, I think that we are in a very unique place.
Our ability to deliver this hybrid value proposition and be in a position where we not only run a cloud service at scale, but we also provide the infrastructure underneath it as a server product to others, that's what's driving the growth.
The shape of that growth and so on will change over time.
But, I feel very, very bullish about our ability to continue this innovation.
KARL KEIRSTEAD:  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question please.
(Operator direction.)
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Hi, good afternoon, and it's great to hear you, Satya, on the call.
I had a question about the device and consumer licensing.
First of all, the Windows Pro revenue is very strong and, Amy, I know you had alluded to receding impact of XP upgrades.
But, I wanted to get a sense of how sustainable you think that growth can continue.
And, also noticing that the particularly Office consumer revenue is improving on attach rates, and there had been a bit of disconnect there, because of the transition to Office 365.
I wanted to get your thoughts on how long that might be sustainable, or whether this is related to thebroader XP expiration?  Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Ed.
Let me take those in reverse, actually.
On the Office consumer performance, I will always first and foremost think about the combination of Office 365 Home, as well as our consumer performance and that grew, obviously, at a higher rate than 15 percent that we talked about this quarter, that and increasing attach.
There were some dynamics this quarter that I think were important.
Some stabilizing that we've seen in the consumer developed world PC market also benefits, as you might imagine, our Office business.
We have the highest attach rates in developed markets.
So, that tends to be an important driver of Office revenue, whether earned as a license or a subscription.
The second thing is related a bit to your first question.
It's sort of hard to separate oftentimes many of the dynamics in our market.
As we've seen Windows Pro mix increase, for example in small business, when people buy PCs with Windows Pro they're more likely to purchase a form of Office, whether it be a subscription or a license.
That's another dynamic you saw this quarter.
A final dynamic that I'll talk about relating to Office was around Japan.
We did see some pull forward due to the tax increase.
So, that did have an impact on Office consumer growth.
But, even without that, as we talked about, we still had increasing attach and very good performance for the quarter.
Now, backing up, because it's complicated, was the Windows sustainability in the business segment.
As we said, it's very hard to separate cleanly the impact of XP from what is an improving business PC refresh cycle, as well as some positive macro economic trends that we're seeing.
As I said in my comments, the end of XP does create a bit of a moderation in growth.
That being said, the differentiation and value proposition of Pro is clearer than it's been.
The investment in that SKU and the value proposition of Pro has had mix increasing within segments of the market, for example in small business and in the enterprise for people who buy a Windows PC.
So, I think that's an important dynamic that we'll continue to invest in and we're excited to see.
ED MAGUIRE:  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Ed.
Next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
RAIMO LENSCHOW, Barclays:  Thanks for taking my question.
Question for Satya.
As we think about the new world in terms of more usage and it's more software driven rather than device driven, can you talk a little bit how you want to re-engage or further engage with the developer community with the big theme of your presentation at BUILD.
I noticed at BUILD Xamarin was kind of mentioned by a lot of guys, and saw a lot of attention.
But talk a little bit about that, how the developer community is really important for you and what you're doing around that to kind of get the software future of Microsoft going again?
SATYA NADELLA:  Great.
Thanks for the question.
Developers are very, very important to us.
If you're in the platform business, which we are both on the device side as well as on the cloud side, developers and their ability to create new value props and new applications on them is sort of life itself.
I would say a couple of things.
One is the announcement we made at BUILD on the device side really are breakthrough work for us, which is we're the only device platform today that has this notion of building universal apps with fantastic tooling around them.
So, that means you can target multiple of our devices, and have common code across all of them.
This notion of having a Windows universal application helps developers leverage their code assets, which is their core assets, across this expanded opportunity is huge.
There was this one user experience change that Terry Myerson talked about at BUILD, which expands the ability for anyone who puts up an application in Windows Store to be now discovered across even the billion plus PC install base.
And so that's a fantastic opportunity for developers, and we're doing everything to make that opportunity clear, and recruit developers to do more with Windows.
And in that context, we'll also support cross-platform.
One of the things that we have done as a relationship with Unity, we have tooling that allows you to have this core library that's portable.
You can bring your code asset.
In fact, we're the only client platform that has the abstractions available for the different languages, and so on.
Then, on the cloud side, in fact one of the most strategic APIs is the Office API.
If you think about it, you could be building an application for iOS, if you want single sign-on for any enterprise application, it's the Azure AD single sign-on.
That's one of the things that we showed at BUILD, which is how to take advantage of list data in SharePoint, contact information in Exchange, Azure Active Directory information for logon, and those are the APIs that are very, very powerful APIs, and unique to us.
They expand the opportunity for developers to reach into the enterprise.
And then, of course, Azure is a full platform, which is very attractive to developers.
So, that gives you a flavor for how important developers are and what the opportunities are.
RAIMO LENSCHOW:  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Raimo.
Operator, we have time for one more question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
ROSS MACMILLAN, Jefferies:  Thank you very much for taking my question as well.
Amy, I just wanted to go back to D&C Licensing, because I think the guidance for the next quarter suggests a relatively modest decline at the midpoint, certainly more modest than we saw prior to this quarter for the last few quarters.
And, I guess I have two questions.
One is, are you able to separate the XP end of life impact from the broader improvement in corporate PC refresh, for example?
And then, two, Satya, what thought have you given around how you could potentially make what has traditionally a unit model with Windows OEM revenue into something potentially more recurring in nature?
Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Ross.
Let me take the first part of that.
I think our guidance for the D&C Licensing segment takes into account a moderate decline, as I said, in the benefit of the end of XP as well as some of the impacts of the pull forward and also for Japan.
I think in general it's pretty reflective of the trend lines that we discussed.
And, I do think it is hard to really separate completely the difference between a generally improving business PC environment and the end of XP.
We've tried our best to do that in the guidance, and we'll obviously learn more over the coming weeks.
SATYA NADELLA:  The thing I would add is this transition form one time, let's say, licenses or device purchases to what is a recurring stream, you see that in a variety of different ways.
You have backend subscriptions.
In our case it will be Office 365.
There is advertising.
There is the app store itself.
These are all things that attach to a device.
So, we are definitely going to look to make sure that the value prop that we put together is going to be holistic in its nature and the monetization itself will be holistic and it will increase with the usage of the device across these services.
Thats the approach we'll take.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Ross.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Ross.
So, thank you all.
That wraps up the Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
We look forward to seeing many of you in the coming months at various investor conferences.
For those unable to attend in person these events are generally webcast and you can follow the event at Microsoft.com/investor.
Please contact us if you need additional details.
And thanks again for joining us today.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks everyone.
SATYA NADELLA:  Thank you.
END
Satya Nadella, chief executive officer
Amy Hood, chief financial officer 
Chris Suh, general manager of IR
Tuesday, July 22, 2014
CHRIS SUH:  Good afternoon, and thank you for joining us today.
On the call with me are Satya Nadella, chief executive officer, Amy Hood, chief financial officer, Frank Brod, chief accounting officer, and John Seethoff, deputy general counsel.
On our website, Microsoft.com/investor, we have posted a slide deck, which provides a summary of our financial results, a reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures, and a table of Noted Items to aid in understanding our results this quarter.
Additionally, the slide deck contains detailed information regarding the impact of the Nokia Devices and Services acquisition on our financial results.
Our press release is also on the website, and includes an addendum with additional information about our fourth-quarter performance.
Microsoft is reporting the financial performance of the acquired Nokia Devices and Services business in a new segment called Phone Hardware.
Additionally, the Devices & Consumer Hardware segment was renamed to Computing and Gaming Hardware.
The products included in this renamed segment remain the same.
Current year information reflects the financial performance of the acquired business beginning on April 25, 2014.
Any reference to operating expense includes research & development, sales & marketing, and general & administrative, but excludes integration & restructuring charges.
Please keep in mind that all growth comparisons we make on the call today relate to the corresponding period of last year.
Unless otherwise specified, all impacted numbers have been adjusted for Non-GAAP and Noted Items, which are detailed in our press release and slide deck.
We will post the prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and in any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript on the Microsoft Investor Relations website until July 22, 2015.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements which are predictions, projections, or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Forms 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
AMY HOOD:  This month is an important time for Microsoft.
As a leadership team, we're taking bold and decisive action to evolve our organization and culture.
This includes difficult steps, but they are necessary to position Microsoft for future growth and industry leadership.
Today, we'll spend more time talking about the significant changes we're driving.
However, let me first start with this quarter's results.
After that, Satya will talk more about our path forward, and then I'll share our financial outlook before we take your questions.
As I think about our strong execution this quarter, there are three things that stand out to me: significant momentum with our cloud services, progress in a number of our consumer businesses, and continued cost discipline.
Our total fourth quarter revenue was $23 billion, including $2 billion from the Phone Hardware segment.
As you know, our Q4 guidance did not include the impact of the acquisition of Nokia's Devices and Services business.
Excluding that, we grew revenue 10%, exceeding the high end of our guidance range.
Moving on to earnings per share.
Before the impact of the acquisition and the Noted Items Chris highlighted earlier, EPS grew 12%, to $0.66 cents.
These details can be found in the earnings slide deck on our investor relations website.
Geographically, performance was strong across most markets, particularly in North America and in Europe.
We did however see challenging conditions in China, where like many other multi-nationals, we're experiencing a weak business environment which we do not expect to change in the near term.
Our commercial cloud revenue grew 147% this quarter, driven by both Office 365 and Azure.
Our commercial cloud annual revenue run rate more than doubled this year, and now exceeds $4.4 billion.
And, with this rapidly growing scale, we continue to expand our cloud gross margins.
We saw strong commercial seat growth across Office 365, particularly with SMB customers.
Additionally, we added over 1 million new subscribers to Office 365 Home and Personal, and we ended the quarter with 5.6 million users.
Azure has also grown dramatically, with storage doubling and compute tripling this year.
Along with increased usage of our core services, over 50% of our Azure customers are now also using higher value services like the Enterprise Mobility Suite, which has seen strong adoption since the May launch.
We're pleased that our customers are enthusiastically embracing Office 365, Azure, CRM Online and our other cloud services   especially considering it's still early in the cloud transition.
Each customer has unique deployment needs, and as a result, CIOs value the flexibility that our hybrid cloud offerings provide.
You can see this in our commercial bookings which grew 23% this quarter, and our contracted not billed balance now exceeds $24 billion.
As we previously discussed in fiscal year 14, both the quarter and the year presented a large renewal opportunity.
Our differentiated value proposition, combined with strong execution, kept our renewal rates very high.
In addition to transitioning to the cloud, our customers continue to invest in premium versions of our on-prem server products like Windows Server, System Center and SQL Server.
As a result, our server licensing revenue grew 14% this quarter.
We feel good about the progress we are making with Windows.
Developed markets continue to show stability, and we're encouraged by the initial response from OEMs to our new consumer offerings like Windows with Bing.
This quarter, OEM revenue grew 3% as we saw the commercial hardware refresh cycle continue, with businesses updating their devices and renewing their commitment to the Windows platform.
XP end of support contributed to the double-digit growth in both Windows Pro and volume licensing, though the benefits moderated throughout the quarter.
In Bing, we continued to see growth in both usage and monetization.
This quarter, US search query share exceeded 19%, and RPS grew double-digits again.
As we saw in prior quarters, display revenue remains soft.
In late June, we launched Surface Pro 3.
While it's still early, sales are outpacing earlier versions of Surface Pro, and, we are excited to bring the device to many more markets this summer. During the quarter, we reassessed our product roadmap and decided not to ship a new form factor that was under development.
Combined with the transition of production towards our latest Surface offering, we made inventory adjustments which impacted our gross margins.
Also in June, we released our new Xbox One offering, and we're pleased with the response.
At E3, we reasserted our focus on games, with blockbuster titles and key exclusives coming this holiday.
With the progress we are making in channel inventories, the new markets for Xbox One, and our exciting game lineup, we feel well positioned heading into the holiday season.
With the closing of the Nokia Devices and Services acquisition during the quarter, we established a new segment, Phone Hardware, to provide transparency into the progress we'll make as we improve and grow the Phone business.
This quarter, Lumia device sales were primarily driven by good performance in the lower price point 500 and 600 series.
Sales of Non-Lumia devices were in line with the overall feature phone market dynamics.
Our gross margins were impacted by decisions we made to rationalize the device portfolio, as well as acquisition-related amortization expense.
Across the company, we grew gross margin by $1 billion or 7%.
While the faster growing cloud and hardware businesses impacted our overall company gross margin percantage, it's important to note we continue to drive margin growth in key areas with improved discipline and business process:  
* In D&C Other, revenue from search advertising and subscriptions are driving gross margin growth.
* In Commercial Other, margins expanded again this quarter benefitting from both improved business scale and data center efficiency in our cloud services.
* And, we've made key changes to our Hardware business which have been discussed by both Satya and Stephen Elop in the past two weeks.
We've also kept our focus on rigorous operating expense discipline.
Excluding the addition of about $750 million from NDS, our Q4 operating expense came in at the low end of our guidance.
And for the full year, with disciplined decision making, we grew revenue 9% before NDS - more than twice as fast as operating expense which grew 4%.
Our effective tax rate was higher this quarter.
Part of this was due to an adjustment to prior year taxes related to intercompany transfer pricing.
Beyond that, the increase was driven by the inclusion of NDS results and our changing geographic mix.
In Q4, we returned $3.4 billion in cash to shareholders through buybacks and dividends, to finish this fiscal year at $15.7 billion, an increase of 28% over the prior year.
With that overview, let me turn it over to Satya to share some thoughts.
SATYA NADELLA:  Thank you Amy.
Hello everyone.
I'm proud of the results we delivered this quarter and across the fiscal year.
In Q4, on an operating basis we grew revenue 10% and operating income 12%.
We accelerated our commercial cloud business to a $4.4 billion annual run rate.
And perhaps more importantly, we made bold and disciplined decisions to define our core as the productivity and platform company for the mobile-first, cloud-first world.
Before I get into the investment principles and decisions, I want to explain how our focus on productivity and platforms leads us to participate in cloud and mobile markets.
Mobility for us goes beyond just devices.
While we're certainly focused on building great phones and tablets, we think of mobility more expansively.
We think of the opportunity that comes from running our productivity experiences - on Windows, iOS and Android device.
Office 365 and Dynamics SaaS offerings are targeted here.
We also see great opportunity in simplifying and managing the user experiences spanning multiple devices, ecosystems with our identity management, device management and data security.
This is the focus of our Enterprise Mobility Suite.
Similarly when it comes to the cloud opportunity we run an at scale public cloud service and provide servers for private and hybrid clouds.
Azure, StorSimple, InMage and datacenter editions of our server products across Windows Server, System Center and SQL Server all help us participate in the cloud growth.
Our mobile and cloud opportunity view informs our decisions on what to build and where to invest.
More specifically, we used the following three principles to guide our investments.
First, focus investments on the core.
Productivity experiences and platform investments were prioritized across engineering, sales, marketing as well as M&A.
Second, consolidate overlapping efforts.
This means one OS that covers all screen sizes and consolidated dual-use productivity services that cross life and work.
Third, run all businesses in an economically sound way.
We will get crystal clear on the core businesses that drive long term differentiation and the businesses that support them.
For those supporting efforts such as MSN, retail stores and hardware we will also ensure disciplined financial execution.
Now let's talk about the specific investments.
We will be relentless in our focus on our core digital work and life experiences and the two platforms that support it   the Cloud OS and the Device OS and Hardware.
Everything we do starts with digital work and life experiences to delight dual-users   these are users who use technology both at work and in their personal lives.
This is how we re-invent productivity.
Last year, we started to take steps in this direction.
Now OneDrive and OneDrive for business are one team.
Outlook and Exchange are one team.
Skype and Lync are one team all focused on these dual-user scenarios.
We are clear that our experiences are going to be available on all devices.
We have a specific goal for multiple Microsoft applications to be available on every home screen.
This is why we brought Office to the iPad and now there are more than 35 million downloads of Word, Excel, PowerPoint and OneNote.
We believe productivity experiences will go beyond individual applications to deliver ambient intelligence that spans applications.
To that end we introduced Cortana - our personal assistant   in Windows Phone 8.1.
We also believe that productivity includes group collaboration and business processes within organizations.
In February, we announced our Power BI suite to help customers harness the power of big data in order to drive a data culture and greater productivity within their organizations.
Power BI suite enables you to ask natural language questions, do rich visualizations and collaborate around data.
Customers are loving it   in fact, the average monthly users have grown over more than 130%.
We are pleased to see all up Dynamics growth at 13% for the quarter with CRM Online nearly doubling.
And, it's great now to have Dynamics CRM in the Gartner leaders quadrants in both sales and service - the two most relevant areas in the CRM space.
Looking forward, in fiscal year 15, we are increasing our investment in R&D and sales for our Digital Work and Life businesses, even as we cut total operating expenses.
We have a rich roadmap going forward   two examples of our innovation are what we are doing with Delve and Skype Translator.
Delve is an Office 365 cloud based service that is the first in a new breed of intelligent and social work experiences.
Delve will turn enterprise search on its head as information that is relevant to you finds you.
Think of this as the Facebook newsfeed for productivity.
Skype Translator will break down the language barriers in our communications and impact everything from everyday conversations with friends to education to global business.
Additionally, I am pleased to see the progress with Bing now more than 19% U.S.
query share and strong RPS Growth.
Going forward we will drive our Bing related investments to contribute to the core digital work and life experiences such as Cortana, Smart Search, Delve, Power Q&A and many others.
We expect Bing to be profitable, on a standalone basis, in FY16.
Now, let's transition to the Cloud OS.
Our Cloud OS represents the fastest growing opportunity for Microsoft.
Quarter after quarter we drive growth and customer adoption.
Our Server products benefit from our public cloud.
The fact that we use our servers to run our cloud make our server software the most capable in enabling others to build and operate their clouds.
This has led to growth in Hyper-V share which is now at 30.6% and has helped grow datacenter editions of Windows Server and System Center   both up more than 40% for the year.
We also had another breakout year for SQL Server.
With SQL Server 14 we released industry leading in-memory technology across all database workloads of Online Transaction Processing, Data Warehousing and Business Intelligence.
And we grew our SQL business by more than 19%.
Our Azure business is growing rapidly and we further accelerated growth last year.
We grew our datacenter footprint into Australia, Brazil, Japan and China while doubling our capacity in existing regions.
In FY14, we also started to see adoption of our high-value services on top of our base cloud infrastructure.
We announced the Enterprise Mobility Suite   acomprehensive cloud solution to address the consumerization of IT challenges such as BYOD and SaaS application adoption.
EMS brings together Identity Management, Device Management and Data Security into one IT control plane and architecture.
The early data from customer adoption for EMS is very encouraging.
We announced Azure Intelligent Systems Service   our IoT service in the cloud that enables organizations to securely connect, manage and capture machine-generated data from a variety of sensors and devices.
To support these high value services in Azure I have prioritized acquisitions such as
* Greenbutton for big compute, 
* Capptain for mobile backend services, and 
* Just in the past few weeks, InMage for disaster recovery for hybrid clouds.
In FY15 we will make investments to drive this strategy forward.
We will expand our Azure datacenter footprint and increase capacity in existing regions.
We will launch new higher level services, including Azure Machine Learning that currently is in preview.
We will expand our hybrid solutions with new services such as StorSimple, InMage as well as our server products all offering cloud tier-ing.
We will continue to build out the EMS value proposition, and we will expand our sales efforts to drive growth.
Let's transition to Device OS and Hardware   the third component of our core.
In everything we do with our Windows OS and first-party devices, we will light up our digital work and life experiences.
We are approaching the Windows OS business with a bold, challenger mindset and pushing both the product and business model forward.
We start with a focus on business customers - in FY14 we saw these customers recommit to Windows.
In April, we released an update to Windows 8.1.
To start, we improved the core desktop experience with mouse and keyboard advancements.
For enterprises, we released Internet Explorer Enterprise Mode and extended our mobile device management capability.
With the Windows 8.1 update, we also lowered the hardware spec required so OEMs can build tablets and clamshells at lower price points.
In addition, we made the decision to evolve the Windows business model.
Now, Windows licenses are zero dollars for any OEM building a device less than nine inches.
We also added a low-cost Windows offering with Bing integration for OEMs.
This new offering combined with lower hardware specs means OEMs will bring a fantastic line-up of value-based notebooks and tablets to market this holiday.
In June, we launched Surface Pro 3   the most productive tablet on the market today.
The reason it's the most productive tablet on the market is because we thought through the experience end to end.
For example, one of the things you will notice with the Surface Pro 3 is how it excels at note taking - you can jot down your thoughts rapidly just like with a pen and paper.
To make this work in the integrated, natural way, our developers pulled together one vision to write code that resides in the firmware in the Surface Pro 3's pen and its inking reduced the parallax error, the Windows shell, and in OneNote.
And as Amy said, we are optimistic given the early signs from Surface Pro 3's performance in market.
On phones, we saw a good early start to the Lumia 630 and 635 as well as the Lumia 930   especially in Europe.
In the year ahead, we are investing in ways that will ensure our Device OS and first party hardware align to our core.
We will streamline the next version of Windows from three Operating Systems into one, single converged Operating System for screens of all sizes.
We will unify our stores, commerce and developer platforms to drive a more coherent user experiences and a broader developer opportunity.
We look forward to sharing more about our next major wave of Windows enhancements in the coming months.
Our approach to first party hardware going forward is clear - at times we'll develop new categories like we did with Surface.
And we will responsibly make the market for Windows Phone.
However, we're not in hardware for hardware's sake, and the first-party device portfolio will be aligned to our strategic direction as a productivity and platform company.
As I said before, going forward, all devices will be created with the explicit purpose to light up our digital work and life experiences.
The good examples of this today are what we are doing with Surface Pro 3 for note-taking and PPI for meetings.
You can expect to see this type of innovation in our hardware including phones.
Amy will talk more on our plans for disciplined execution around our hardware business going forward.
I want to make a few comments on Xbox.
It's important for us to have a core that is thriving.
It's equally important to place smart, bold bets in other areas where we have the ability to add value and have impact.
That's what we're doing with Xbox.
We made the decision to manage Xbox to maximize enterprise value with a focus on gaming.
Gaming is the largest digital life category in a mobile first, cloud first world.
It's also the place where our past success, revered brand and passionate fan base present us a special opportunity.
With our decision to specifically focus on gaming we expect to close Xbox Entertainment Studios and streamline our investments in Music and Video.
We will invest in our core console gaming and Xbox Live with a view towards the broader PC and mobile opportunity.
I hope you can see that we have bold ambitions and we have made a lot of progress.
Also know that we are well underway in evolving our organization and culture to deliver on these bold ambitions   this includes simplifying how we work and modernizing our engineering processes.
In all that we do, we will be accountable to our customers, partners, and shareholders.
Empowering every individual and organization to do more and achieve more in a mobile-first, cloud-first world   is a huge undertaking.
And it is one that Microsoft is uniquely qualified to take on and change the world.
Thank you.
And, with that, I'll hand it over to Amy to give you more guidance on FY15.
AMY HOOD:  Before going into detail about our outlook, let me first say that all forward looking information assumes the macroeconomic environment remains stable throughout this coming fiscal year.
As Satya detailed, we're taking bold steps to move Microsoft forward with a renewed sense of clarity and alignment.
Our investment plan reflects those changes, as we reallocate resources to aggressively drive towards our goals and pursue the highest growth and financial return businesses.
Even as we invest for growth, we expect our total operating expense in fiscal year 15 to be down from this past year, before considering the addition of the Nokia cost structure, and integration and restructuring costs.
Now, let me address Phone separately.
In fiscal year 14, we recorded about $750 million of operating expense for the Phone business for the period post the acquisition.
Annualized, this would have been about $4.5 billion, but we are aggressively working to drive synergies across key functions such as development, supply chain, and operations as we integrate and right-size the business.
We expect to realize more than $1 billion in synergies, and a result, will be on a path to reach operating break even for the Phone business in fiscal year 16.
Including Phone, we expect operating expense to be between $34.2 and $34.6 billion in fiscal year 15.
In addition to the expense guidance I just provided, and as we announced on July 17th, we expect to incur between $1.1 and $1.6 billion in restructuring expense.
These will be substantially complete in the first half of the fiscal year.
Separately, we will also incur about $150 million per quarter in integration costs such as systems work.
Similar to this quarter, we will continue to report these items in a separate line item in the income statement.
Now   let me give our view on the first quarter.
Starting with Devices and Consumer 
* In Licensing, we expect revenue to be $4.1 to $4.2 billion.
This range reflects an ongoing business PC refresh cycle, headwinds for consumer PCs, and a continued moderation of the benefits from the XP end of support.
* In Computing and Gaming Hardware, we expect revenue to be $1.7 to $2 billion.
This range reflects the continuing ramp of Surface Pro 3 and Xbox One, as both products are introduced into new markets in Q1.
* In Phone Hardware, we expect revenue to $1.9 to $2.3 billion as we align the device portfolio to our strategy.
* And, in Devices and Consumer Other, we expect revenue to be $1.8 to $1.9 billion.
Moving on to Commercial, we expect revenue across our two segments to be $12.0 to $12.2 billion.
Within this, we expect Commercial Other revenue of $2.2 to $2.3 billion.
And, in Corporate, we expect about $300 million of negative impact next quarter.
We expect COGS to be $7.5 to $7.9 billion, with variability being driven by both hardware segments.
We expect first quarter operating expense, excluding integration and restructuring, to be between $8.5 and $8.7 billion.
As a reminder, other income and expense includes dividend and interest income, offset by interest expense and the net cost of hedging.
We expect these items to generally offset one another.
We expect our full year tax rate to be between 21% and 23%.
This is in line with the fourth quarter excluding the prior period tax adjustment, as the changing mix of our business as well as the impact of the NDS acquisition will continue to influence our tax rate.
Investments in cloud infrastructure are necessary to support and enable the significant growth and momentum in our cloud services.
In Q1, we expect CAPEX to increase sequentially to further support our growth.
Similar to fiscal year 14, these investments are decided based on a thorough review of demand and capacity plans to ensure that the investments provide an appropriate return on capital.
We also remain focused on software driven innovation to increase the utilization and capacity of the capital we deploy.
We expect unearned revenue to grow in line with normal seasonality.
In closing, Q1 is the start of an incredibly important year for Microsoft.
We are making important changes to our organization and culture to enable and empower our people to do their very best work.
Mobility and cloud present an enormous opportunity, and we are focusing resources on our core so we can capitalize and deliver on the next wave of innovation, growth, and long term shareholder value.
With that, I'll turn it back over to Chris and we can move to Q&A.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Amy.
And, with that we'll move to Q&A.
Operator, please go ahead and repeat your instructions.
(Operator direction.)
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Thank you very much.
I've got two parts to it.
The first is, Satya, you've been changing the engineering processes within the company, adding more analytics to the process.
How do you see this change impacting both the product and the speed of go to market?
SATYA NADELLA:  Yes, two things, Mark.
One is the diversity of products that Microsoft has from silicon tape out to services that we are continuously updating in Azure, or Office 365, is a lot more than let's say when we first created the Microsoft engineering system.
That was for retail packaged product.
So since then a lot has changed and a lot has evolved.
And, so what we are doing is we are introducing new functions and new skills, design is even more important than it ever was.
Data analytics, as you said, is very important to us.
And, they're not outside functions.
They're functions that are integral to how we do product development, how we do A/B testing, how we do log analysis on a continuous basis.
So, that's the engineering process and culture change that we have ongoing and in fact a lot of learning from a variety of different teams that's now spreading across a lot of Microsoft.
MARK MOERDLER:  And, Amy, one quick question, we saw a significant acceleration this quarter in cloud revenue.
I guess Amy or Satya.
We saw acceleration in cloud revenue year-over-year.
Is this Office for the iPad?  Is this Azure?  What's driving the acceleration and how long do you think we can keep this going?
AMY HOOD:  Mark, why don't I take it, and if Satya wants to add obviously he should do that.
In general, I wouldn't point to one product area.
It was across Office 365, Azure, and even CRM Online.
I think some of the important dynamics that you could point to, particularly in Office 365, I really think over the course of the year we saw an acceleration in moving the product down the market into increasing what we would call the mid-market and even small business at a pace.
And, that's a particular place.
I would tie back to some of the things Satya mentioned in the answer to your first question.
Improvements to analytics, improvements to understanding the use scenarios, improving the product in real-time, understanding trial, ease of use, ease of sign-up, all of these things actually can afford us the ability to go to different categories, go to different geos and to different segments.
And in addition, I think what you'll see, Mark, as we initially moved many of our customers to Office 365, it came on one workload.
And, I think what we've increasingly seen is our ability to add more workloads and sell the entirety of the suite through that process.
I also mentioned in Azure our increased ability to sell some of these higher-value services.
So, while I could speak broadly about all of them, I think I would generally think about the strength as being both completion of our product suite, ability to enter new segments, and ability to sell new workloads.
SATYA NADELLA:  The only thing I would add is, it's the combination of our SaaS offerings like Dynamics and Office 365, our public cloud offering in Azure, but also our private and hybrid cloud infrastructure, which also benefits because they run on our servers, our cloud runs on our servers.
So, it's that combination which makes it both unique and reinforcing.
A best example is what we are doing with Azure Active Directory.
The fact that somebody gets on boarded to Office 365 means their tenant information is in Azure AD.
The fact that the tenant information is in Azure AD is what makes EMS, or our Enterprise Mobility Suite, more attractive to a customer managing iOS, Android, or Windows devices.
That network effect is really now helping us a lot across all of our cloud efforts.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Mark.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Mark.
MARK MOERDLER:  Thank you, I appreciate it.
Congrats on the quarter.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you.
Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Thank you.
Amy, you're taking a very disciplined approach on expenses.
I'm just curious if you could help everyone understand how you're approaching that and your confidence in doing more with less?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Brent.
I'll start and I think Satya actually will have some things to add.
First of all, I would start by saying, I wouldn't ascribe the behavior to me.
I would ascribe the behavior to a senior leadership team and to a group that's focused on investing in the core, focused on making tradeoffs, focused on really accelerating our growth in key areas.
Our ability to make changes really throughout the second half of his year in particular and as we've led into Fiscal Year '15 is really about a group focused on building and investing in something that can really be even greater than it is today.
So, while I would use the word "disciplined" I don't think it's about a person, and it shouldn't be.
It should be about an environment in which every person here thinks about how they can increase their ROI and accrue to the collective.
And, I think we've actually seen the benefits of that in the past two quarters, and I think you'll see it as we head into '15.
SATYA NADELLA:  I think you captured it well.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Brent.
Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
KEITH WEISS, Morgan Stanley:  Excellent.
Thank you for the question, and very nice quarter.
Possibly to talk a little bit about the growth strategy at Nokia.
You guys look to cut expenses pretty aggressively there, but this is, particularly smart phones, is a very competitive marketplace.
Can you tell us a little bit about sort of the strategies for how you actually start to gain share with Lumia on a going forward basis, and maybe give us an idea of what levels of share or what levels of unit volumes are you going to need to hit to get to that breakeven in FY16?
SATYA NADELLA:  Let me start, and Amy can even add.
So overall, we are very focused on, I'll say, thinking about mobility share across the entire Windows family.
I already talked about in my remarks about how mobility for us even goes beyond devices.
But for this specific question, I would even say that we want to think about mobility, not just one form factor of a mobile device, because I think that's where the ultimate prize is.
But that said, we are even year-over-year basis seeing increased volume for Lumia.
It's coming at the low end in the entry smart phone market, and we are pleased with it.
In many markets we now have over 10 percent.
That's the first marker I would sort of say that we need to track country-by-country.
And, the key place where we're going to differentiate is looking at productivity scenarios or these digital work and life scenarios that we can light up on our phone in unique ways.
When I can take my Office Lens app, use the camera on the phone, take a picture of anything and have it automatically OCR recognized and into OneNote in searchable fashion, that's a unique scenario.
What we've done with Surface and PPI shows us the way that there is a lot more we can do with phones by broadly thinking about productivity.
So, this is not about just Word or Excel on your phone.
It is about thinking about Cortana, and Office Lens, and those kinds of scenarios in compelling ways.
And, that's what at the end of the day is going to drive our differentiation and higher end Lumia phones.
AMY HOOD:  And, Keith, as to your specific question regarding FY16, I think we've made the difficult choices to get the cost base to a place where we can deliver on the exact scenarios Satya has outlined.
And, we do assume that we continue to grow our units through the year and into '16 in order to get to breakeven.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Keith.
Operator, next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi, guys.
Congrats on a great quarter.
I just want to dig into Office 365.
You put up another quarter of pretty impressive metrics, going up to 5.6 million Home Premium users.
I think the commercial side grew I think it was 98 percent year-over-year.
And, Satya, you talked about some pretty meaningful download numbers as far as on the iPad.
I wonder if you could just give us an update on Office 365, how it's doing versus your expectations, and sort of what your expectations are over the course of the next 12, 18, 24 months as we continue this transition?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Phil.
In terms of versus our expectations, in this quarter it did do better than we expected and, frankly, we had quite loft goals.
So, I think that is encouraging.
I think I talked about some of those key drivers in the prior question.
When I think really about Home and Personal, because we haven't had a chance to talk specifically about the consumer usage, and you sort of referenced Office on the iPad in your question, I think it's really about continuing to make the subscription value, whether it's through the Home SKU or the Personal SKU, have the most value to a user.
It's about a user having the opportunity to access Office, the world's leading productivity app, on the device of their choice, having it light up the very best on Windows devices, and having that accrue back to our subscriptions.
So, I think our ability to execute on that over the past I guess 18 months that we've had these SKUs in market is quite encouraging.
I don't really look to Office on the iPad as one item, it's a part of the value proposition that I think we make both in the Consumer segment as well as in the Commercial segment.
PHILLIP WINSLOW:  Thanks, guys.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Phil.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Phil.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question please.
(Operator direction.)
RICK SHERLUND, Nomura:  Thanks.
I'm wondering if you could talk about Office for a moment.
I'm curious whether you think we've seen the worst for Office here with the consumer fall off and Office 365 growth and margins expanding there.
If you can look through the dynamics and give us a sense, do you think you've actually turned the corner there and we've maybe seen the worst in terms of Office growth and margins?
SATYA NADELLA:  Rick, let me just start qualitatively in terms of how I view Office the category and how it relates to productivity broadly and then I'll have Amy even specifically talk about margins and what we are seeing in terms of I'm assuming Office renewal.
Is that probably the question?
First of all, I believe the category that Office is in, which is productivity broadly for people, their groups, as well as organizations, is something that we are investing significantly, and seeing significant growth in.
On one end you have new things that we are doing, like Cortana.
This is for individuals on new form factors like the phones where it's not about any single application, but an intelligent agent that knows everything about my calendar, everything about my life and tries to help me with my everyday tasks.
On the other end it's something like Delve, which is a completely new tool that's taking some of what is enterprise search and making it more like this Facebook news feed, where it has a graph of all my artifacts, all my people, all my groups, and uses that graph to give me relevant information to discover.
The same thing with Power Q&A and Power BI, it's a part of Office 365.
So we have pretty expansive view of how we look at Office and what it can do.
So, that's the growth strategy and now specifically on Office renewals.
AMY HOOD:  I would say in general let me make two comments.
In terms of Office on the consumer side between what we sold on-prem, as well as the home and personal, we feel quite good with attach continuing to grow and increasing the value prop.
So, I think that's to address the consumer portion.
On the commercial portion, we actually saw Office grow, as you said, this quarter.
I think the broader definition that Satya spoke to of the Office value prop.
And, we continued to see Office renewed in our enterprise agreements.
So, in general I feel like we're in a growth phase for that franchise.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Rick.
We'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi:  Hi, thanks.
Satya, I wanted to ask you about two statements that you've made, one around responsibly making the market for Windows Phone, just kind of following on Keith's question here.
It's a really competitive market.
It feels like ultimately you need to be a very, very meaningful share player in that market to have value for a developer to leverage the universal apps that you're talking about in terms of presentations you've given at BUILD and so forth.
And, I'm trying to understand how you can do both of those things at once, and in terms of responsibly making the market for Windows Phone it feels difficult, given your nearest competitors there are doing things that you might argue are irresponsible in terms of making their market, given that they monetize it in different ways.
SATYA NADELLA:  Yes.
So one of the beauties of universal Windows apps is it aggregates for the first time for us all of our Windows volume, the fact that even what is an app that runs with a mouse and keyboard on the desktop can be in the store, and you can have the same app run in a touch-first, and a mobile-first way, gives developers the entire volume of Windows, which is 300-plus million units, as opposed to just our 4 percent share of mobile in the U.S., or 10 percent in some countries.
So that's really the reason why we are actively making sure that universal Windows apps is available and developers are taking advantage of it.
We have great tooling; because that's the way we are going to be able to create the broadest opportunity, to your very point about developers getting an ROI for building to Windows.
So, that's how I think we will do it in a responsible way.
WALTER PRITCHARD:  That's great.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Great.
Thank you so much for your time.
I wanted to ask a question about Satya, your comment about combining the next version of Windows into one for all devices and just wondering if you look out, I mean you've got kind of different SKU segmentations right now, you've got enterprise, you've got consumer less than nine inches for free the offering that you mentioned earlier that you recently announced.
How do we think about when you come out with this one version for all devices, how do you see this changing kind of the go to market and also kind of the traditional SKU segmentation and pricing that we've seen in the past?
SATYA NADELLA:  My statement, Heather, was more to do with just even the engineering approach.
The reality is that we actually did not have one Windows.
We had multiple Windows operating systems inside of Microsoft.
We had one for phone, one for tablets and PCs, one for Xbox, one for even embedded.
So, we had many, many of these efforts.
Now we have one team with a layered architecture that enables us to, in fact, for developers bring that collective opportunity with one store, one commerce system, one discoverability mechanism.
It also allows us to scale the UI across all screen sizes.
It allows us to create this notion of universal Windows apps and bring coherence there.
So, that's more what I was referencing.
And, our SKU strategy will remain by segment.
We will have multiple SKUs for enterprises.
We will have for OEM.
We will have for end users.
And, so we will be disclosing and talking about our SKUs as we get further along.
But, my statement was more to do with how we are bringing teams together to approach Windows as one ecosystem very differently than we, ourselves, have done in the past.
HEATHER BELLINI:  Excellent.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Heather.
Next question, please, Operator.
(Operator Direction.)
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Hi.
Good afternoon.
Satya, you made some comments about harmonizing some of the different products across consumer and enterprise.
And, I was curious what your approach is to doing your different hardware offerings, both in phone and with Surface, how your go to market may change around that?
And, also since you decided to make the operating system for sub nine-inch devices free, how you see the value proposition and your ability to monetize that user base evolving over time?
SATYA NADELLA:  Yes.
The statement I made about bringing together our productivity applications across work and life is to really reflect this notion of dual-use, because when I think about productivity it doesn't separate out what I use as a tool for communication with my family and what I use to collaborate at work.
So, that's why having this one team that think about Outlook.com as well as Exchange helps us think about those dual-users, the same thing with Files, and OneDrive, and OneDrive for Business, because we want to have the software have the smarts about separating out the state, caring about IT control and data protection, while me, as an end user, gets to have the experiences that I want.
That's how we are thinking about harmonizing those digital life and work experiences.
On the hardware side, we will continue to build hardware that fits with these experiences, if I understand your question right, which is how will we differentiate our first party hardware.
We will build first party hardware that's creating categories.
A good example is what we have done with Surface Pro 3.
And, in other places where we have really changed the Windows business model to encourage a plethora of OEMs to build great hardware.
And, we are seeing that.
In fact, in this holiday season I think you'll see a lot of value notebooks.
You'll see clamshells.
So, we will have the full price range of our hardware offerings enabled by this new Windows business model.
And, I think the last part was, how will we monetize?  Of course, we will again have a combination.
We will have our OEM monetization, and some of these new business models are about monetizing on the back end with Bing integration as well as our services attach, and that's the reason fundamentally why we have these zero priced Windows SKUs today.
ED MAGUIRE:  Great.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Ed.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Ed.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
KARL KEIRSTEAD, Deutsche Bank:  Thanks.
I wouldn't mind focusing for a moment on the enterprise server side.
That's where, at least for me, much of the upside came.
We haven't seen server product revenue growth in the mid-teens in a while.
Total Microsoft bookings, 20 percent, X Nokia, haven't seen that in ages.
Perhaps the answer to these questions are related, but what's happening with those two numbers to drive the upside?
I'm sure a little bit came with Azure being strong, but that's relatively small.
So, clearly there was an inflection up on the on prem server and tools business.
Maybe part of it was renewal rates.
And, if that's the answer, how much room do we have to go on that?
Thank you.
SATYA NADELLA:  I'll start, and then, Amy, you can add.
Overall, we've had a major revamp of our server lineup, SQL 14 being a recent one which we launched in the last quarter.
And, it's the strength of our server products.
This is that phenomena where our servers have become much more competitive.
Windows Server for virtualization and private cloud, System Center for data center management, SQL for all the in-memory workload capabilities it has and BI, all of that has really benefited from us running our own cloud, pushing our own servers to run these at-scale services.
And, with that being in place, and these refreshes, we are seeing increased investment and interest on our infrastructure when it comes to data centers.
One of the things that as the public cloud is growing, we in fact don't see it, at least for now, as a zero sum.
In fact, we see growth, especially with the virtualization rates, because overall the number of applications on the mobile side are growing, all of those mobile applications drive back end compute and storage, and that back end compute and storage some of it goes in the public cloud, but a lot of it even goes into the data center.
And that's where we have a very good price performance equation and a TCO equation.
And so we are being pretty competitive and grabbing share.
And our Hyper-V share is a good example of that.
AMY HOOD:  I think, Karl, you're right.
When you triangulate the data around our strong trend line on unearned, even commercial bookings growth of 23 percent, and the numbers you exactly talked about, it really was a combination of Office 365, cloud growth, as well as we talked about the benefits of our hybrid offerings, a lot of on prem server growth as well this quarter.
KARL KEIRSTEAD:  Okay, thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Karl.
(Operator direction.)
DANIEL IVES, FDR Capital:  Great.
Thanks, guys.
This is Jim Warren for Dan Ives.
Just can you talk a little bit about the geographies?  You mentioned some North America and Europe strength and maybe you could just talk a little more about the dynamics there in terms of where you're seeing the strength, cloud or PC, et cetera?  Thanks.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Jim.
Actually, I would say the strength across the products isn't geographically specific.
So, it's relatively consistent.
We've seen cloud growth globally.
We've seen on-prem server growth globally.
In general the products get launched first and often in the U.S.
And, so it tends to be the most mature of some of those transitional markets.
But, I think in general my geographic comments are far more holistic than they are product specific.
DANIEL IVES:  Thanks very much.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks.
Operator, we'll have time for one more question please.
(Operator direction.)
BRAD REBACK, Stifel Nicholas:  Hey, how are you.
Thanks very much.
Satya, you guys did a very good job this year of returning capital to shareholders, over $15 billion.
Can you give us some sense philosophically if you see a lot of opportunity for additional repurchase/dividend activity, or is this a level you're fairly comfortable with?  Thanks.
SATYA NADELLA:  Thanks for your question.
Overall my comments remain the same.
I answered this even in the last call, which is the approach we've taken is a balanced approach and a thoughtful approach.
We're going to look at our own need to invest in order to drive growth in the opportunities we see.
I think today's conversation and results show how some of the bets we have made with our cloud are paying off, and it's great to see that momentum and it's, in fact, a pretty broad-based momentum across Azure, Office 365 and Amy mentioned it very briefly even CRM Online growth.
So, to me that remains the core, which is being able to place our capital, to drive organic growth, and for the long-term health of this company.
That said we will have a balanced approach in terms of both share buy-back as well as dividends.
That's the approach we've taken over the last multiple years and that will be the same thoughtful process that I expect us to continue with going into the next fiscal and beyond.
BRAD REBACK:  Great.
Thanks very much.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Brad.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Brad.
Okay.
That wraps up the Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
We look forward to seeing many of you in the coming months at various investor conferences.
For those of you unable to attend in person these events will generally be webcast and you can follow our comments at our Investor Relations website.
Please contact us if you need any additional details.
And, thanks again for joining us today.
Chris Suh, Satya Nadella, Amy Hood
Thursday, October 23, 2014
CHRIS SUH:  Good afternoon and thank you for joining us today.
On the call with me are Satya Nadella, Chief Executive Officer; Amy Hood, Chief Financial Officer; Frank Brod, Chief Accounting Officer; and John Seethoff, Deputy General Counsel.
On our website, Microsoft.com/investor, we have posted our press release and a slide deck which provides a summary of our results this quarter.
Unless otherwise specified, all growth comparisons we make on the call today relate to the corresponding period of last year.
Please note that we have recast certain prior period amounts to conform with the current period presentation with no impact on consolidated net income or cash flow.
Additionally, any reference to operating expenses includes research and development, sales and marketing, and general and administrative, and excludes integration and restructuring charges.
We'll post the prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and in any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript on the Microsoft Investor Relations website until October 23rd, 2015.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements which are predictions, projections or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk-factor section of our Form 10-K, Form 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
And with that, I'll turn the call over to Satya.
SATYA NADELLA:  Thank you, Chris.
Good afternoon, everyone.
Three months ago I outlined how Microsoft is the productivity and platform company for the mobile-first, cloud-first world.
Since then we have galvanized around this direction and are executing well.
I'm proud of the results we've delivered this quarter across all businesses.
Results are up in every category from commercial to consumer to hardware.
With $23.2 billion in revenue for this quarter, we're off to a great start to the year.
More importantly, we're also pleased with the progress we've made in evolving our culture to be fast, innovative, partner-friendly, and customer-obsessed.
As I reflect on this past quarter, there are four important indicators of progress that I want to highlight, cloud, Windows, hardware and finally I'll talk about our ecosystem momentum.
First, our cloud offerings continue to grow at a rapid rate.
More people and organizations are signing up and we're generating more revenue across both commercial and consumer customers.
Our commercial cloud revenue grew 128 percent year over year, the fifth consecutive quarter of triple digit growth.
In fact, we're the only company with cloud revenue at our scale that is growing at triple digit rates.
And 80 percent of the Fortune 500 are now on the Microsoft Cloud.
Office 365 Commercial seats nearly doubled.
Two out of every three new customer seats are premium versions.
Consumer Office 365 now exceeds seven million subscribers, up more than 25 percent from the last quarter alone.
We continue to invest in growing our leadership position in areas with great opportunity.
To that end, we're expanding our data center capacity to meet demand, provide the best customer experience, enable data sovereignty and deliver continuous innovation.
Azure has seen robust growth because of our unique approach as the only hyper-scale public cloud provider with enterprise grade capabilities and true private cloud and hybrid cloud offerings.
We continue to add new features and capabilities faster than ever based on user feedback cycles.
One major Azure service or feature is released every three days on average, opening up many more new user scenarios for our customers.
Our premium services on Azure create new monetization opportunities in media, data, machine learning, advanced analytics and enterprise mobility.
More than 60 percent of the Azure customers are now using at least one of these premium services, such as the Enterprise Mobility Suite, which is off to a very fast start.
Startups and ISVs love our open and flexible approach, and are building on Azure at a rapid pace.
In fact, 40 percent of Azure revenue now comes from startups and ISVs.
Even with our tremendous growth in public cloud, we are still seeing strength in our on premise businesses with double-digit growth across Windows Server, SQL Server, System Center and Dynamics.
This is because of the unique hybrid and private cloud capabilities that are built into our servers.
The second indicator of progress is the improvement in the overall health of the Windows ecosystem in the first quarter.
We introduced an expanded set of Windows offerings which helped drive consumer unit growth in quarter one and will provide incremental opportunity for use of Microsoft services such as Bing.
With these new offerings, OEMs are delivering exciting new devices at extremely attractive price points, including Windows PCs at $199 and below.
In September we took the first steps in publicly sharing more about the next generation of Windows.
Windows 10 will unlock new experiences for customers to work, play and connect across an incredibly broad set of devices with screens from four-inches to 80-inches, and even IOT devices.
Windows 10 will deliver a single unified application development platform, one way to write a universal app across the entire family of Windows devices, and one store with a unified way for applications to be discovered, purchased and updated across all these devices.
Think about it, with Windows 10 developers can build one app that spans billions of devices.
When I talk about putting customers at the center of everything we do, it's especially true for Windows.
We're incorporating customer feedback earlier than ever in the development cycle, especially with our enterprise customers.
This will be the best Windows release ever for businesses and with hundreds of thousands of pieces of feedback flowing into the team already, Windows 10 will be the most collaborative version of Windows we have ever shipped.
Third, I want to highlight some specific markers of advancement in hardware and gaming.
Across the entire hardware portfolio I'm encouraged by the reception from customers, and our continuously improving execution.
Surface had strong results this quarter, driven by positive customer response to Surface Pro 3.
The product lineup is the right one and customers are responding favorably.
Surface Pro 3 is now in 28 markets and importantly we have improved the business economics of this product line.
With phone we have moved quickly to integrate the business.
We are executing on all of the restructuring changes we talked about in the last quarter, while driving Lumia share growth.
We saw modest growth over the prior year, driven by sales in Europe, where we gained share with lower price devices.
Now let's talk gaming.
As I have previously said, gaming is an important category that will drive additive business value for Microsoft.
It is the single biggest digital life category, measured in both time and money spent across devices of all types.
We launched Xbox One in 28 markets, increased console unit sales from a year ago, and grew users of Xbox Live apps by more than 20 percent.
The acquisition of Mojang, which we expect to close in November, extends our ecosystem and community across multiple platforms.
Minecraft adds to our already strong portfolio of first party games and content, such as Halo, and will strengthen our gaming experiences on PCs, and consoles, as well as cross-platform monetization.
The fourth and final area I want to focus on today is the renewed energy and momentum in our partnerships.
As a productivity and platforms company we create vast opportunity for our partners.
We're moving fast to extend our platforms and tools to reach more customers through partnerships.
From SAP and Oracle to Salesforce, Adobe, and IBM, to the latest partnerships we announced this past week with Docker, Cloudera, and CoreOS, great partnerships emerge from great products, strong momentum, and a shared enthusiasm about a long-term vision.
Technology leaders across the board recognize the customer value inherent in products like Office 365, Azure, and Windows.
And they want to align their businesses with our healthy and growing ecosystem.
You'll see more partnerships in the months ahead.
It's the best way to deliver the best possible experience for our customers in today's heterogeneous mobile-first, cloud-first world.
In summary, I'm pleased with the progress we are making.
Teams all across the company are rallying around our core focus to reinvent productivity and create platforms for a mobile-first, cloud-first world.
We will continue to drive the changes that will position us for the future.
We will be accountable to our customers, partners and shareholders.
And we will be relentless in looking for areas to invest for long-term growth.
With that, Amy will go through our Q1 results in detail and share our outlook for Q2.
And then I'll join up for Q&A.
Thank you very much.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, and good afternoon everyone.
As Satya said, we had a very strong start to the fiscal year.
We made meaningful progress with improved execution across all our businesses.
I am encouraged by what we have received, achieved, and believe we are well positioned for the future.
With that said, let me take you through the financial highlights of our first quarter.
Revenue was $23.2 billion, up 25 percent over last year and up 11 percent excluding phone.
Earnings per share were 54 cents, which included an 11-cent negative impact from integration and restructuring expenses.
Excluding that impact EPS grew 5 percent to 65 cents, even after considering the impact of the phone business on profits.
We are accelerating the pace of decision making and taking decisive action to improve how we operate.
This approach is reflected in the progress we've made in restructuring the company and integrating our phone business.
As a result, we incurred charges of $1.1 billion this quarter.
Geographically we saw strong performance across the U.S.
and Europe and consistent with Q4 a more challenging environment in China and Russia.
Let me now discuss our results in greater detail.
Our commercial business had another strong quarter.
Revenue grew 10 percent and unearned revenue grew 12 percent.
Renewal rates were higher than what we've seen in recent first quarters.
And in Office, one-third of renewals included Office 365.
Importantly, we are seeing a mix shift from on-prem to the cloud, from transactional purchasing to annuity, and from standard to premium versions.
Our commercial cloud services continued their exceptional trajectory with another quarter of triple digit growth.
We're investing in higher-level services and new scenarios in Azure, enabled by the scale, cost and flexibility of the cloud.
And these services are expanding our addressable market.
We're adding new users and importantly growing revenue from existing on-prem customers who have adopted Azure services.
Our on-prem data platform infrastructure products continue to have strong momentum with an ongoing shift to premium versions.
Revenue from premium SKUs was up 25 percent this quarter.
Office 365 had another terrific quarter and remains on path to becoming the unparalleled leader for cloud-based productivity apps.
CIOs are selecting Office 365 as the centerpiece of their hybrid productivity solutions, as they look to meet the growing mobile needs of their employees.
SMBs are also realizing the benefits of Office 365, and as a result are moving from transactional purchasing to subscription.
And as Satya mentioned, we're seeing good partnership momentum, as other companies look to integrate Office 365 into their products.
Turning to Windows, Windows OEM Pro revenue performed in line with the business PC market.
And volumes were more consistent with those seen before the XP refresh in Fiscal '14.
Windows volume licensing grew 10 percent, as business customers continue to value the platform's security and manageability.
During the quarter we took important steps to grow Windows usage, and improve the health of the ecosystem.
Both our existing and new OEM partners are bringing to market an expanded set of device offerings at more competitive price points.
Channel inventories are higher than they were last year, reflecting confidence from our OEM partners heading into the holiday quarter.
IP licensing revenue declined this quarter, as our licensees sold a higher mix of low-cost devices, which generated lower per unit royalty.
Consumer Office revenue, inclusive of our subscription offerings, grew 7 percent this quarter.
Within this we saw an accelerated transition to Office 365 Home and Personal, which contributed to a decline in traditional Office license revenue.
Overall it's important to note that we continued to grow attach to consumer devices.
In Bing revenue was driven by both volume and rate growth.
We again delivered double-digit monetization gains, driven by investments in core relevance and ranking algorithms.
These improvements keep us on the path to Bing profitability in Fiscal '16.
And consistent with prior quarters, display revenue remained under pressure.
We are excited by Surface Pro 3 performance, as unit sales are pacing at twice the rate of what we saw with Pro 2.
We're seeing strong interest from students, professionals, and increasingly enterprises, who are replacing their laptops and tablets with Surface Pro 3 for their productivity needs.
Gross margin for Surface was positive this quarter.
Within gaming our results reflect a growing console market, our improved competitive position with the new Xbox One SKU, and the launch of Xbox One into new geos, including the initial channel fill for the launch in China at the end of Q1.
As we head into the holiday season, we're looking forward to the differentiated content that will be available on the Xbox platform, including Sunset Overdrive which launches in late October, and Halo: Master Chief Collection, which launches in early November.
And so in hardware, the focus of the quarter is on positioning the business for the future and we remain committed to reaching breakeven in Fiscal '16.
As part of our restructuring efforts, we started right-sizing our manufacturing capacity, created one development team to accelerate the pace of innovation, and focused our sales and marketing efforts on Lumia, which grew in several key markets.
Sales of non-Lumia phones were down driven by declines in the underlying feature phone market as well as portfolio rationalization as we execute on our phone strategy.
Gross margin this quarter included the benefit of non-recurring items resulting from our business integration efforts.
Operating expenses were favorable to our expectations as we chose to redeploy spend to projects occurring later this fiscal year.
These decisions reflect our disciplined assessment as we prioritize where to best allocate our resources.
Importantly, we continue to invest in developer and customer facing roles to capture the opportunities in key growth categories such as the cloud, big data, and the Internet of things.
Our effective tax rate was 23 percent this quarter, influenced by the changing mix of our business as well as NDS operating losses, and restructuring charges, some of which are not tax deductible.
This quarter we had $1.3 billion of capital expenditures.
We continue to expand the capacity and locations of our data centers to deliver higher service levels, reduce latency, and help meet local data compliance requirements for our global customers.
Importantly, even while making these investments, we continue to grow the gross margin of our cloud business.
This quarter we increased our capital return by 19 percent with $4.6 billion returned to shareholders through buyback and dividend.
As we said in September, the board and management continue to assess our broader capital allocation strategy as we focus on increasing long-term shareholder value.
With that overview of the current quarter, let me now turn to our outlook for the second quarter starting with foreign exchange.
Foreign exchange did not have a material impact on our Q1 results as movements were relatively late in the quarter.
The following guidance is based on current FX rates and should the U.S.
dollar continue to strengthen, it will create headwinds in our foreign transactional business.
The impact of FX on our annuity business is first to be reflected in deferred revenue as it is based on rates when the contract is billed, and then into the P&L at that same rate as the revenue is recognized.
Now moving on to guidance, starting with devices and consumer.
In licensing, we expect revenue to be $4.0 to $4.2 billion.
Remember, in Q2 of last year, we recognized about $650 million of revenue from our commercial agreement with Nokia which has ended.
While revenue recognition for the agreement was heavily weighted to Q2 based on contract terms, COGS were recognized ratably over the course of the year.
Consistent with the current quarter, IP licensing revenue will reflect lower per unit royalties with the changes in the devices (off mike) by our licensees.
With the addition of Office 365 consumer services in Japan, the transition from traditional licensing to a subscription service will negatively impact revenue by approximately $100 million in Q2.
We expect the ongoing business PC refresh cycle to continue.
Though comparables are challenging as we began to see the benefit of XP end of support in Q2 of last year.
We expect that the consumer PC market will remain stable with many of the same dynamics as we saw in Q1.
In computing and gaming, we expect revenues to be $3.5 to $3.8 billion.
This range reflects growth in Xbox One consoles over the last year, but a mix shift to lower price SKUs announced last June.
With the momentum we are seeing with Surface Pro 3, we expect units to grow sequentially.
And so in hardware, we expect revenues to be $2.0 to $2.2 billion.
This range anticipates both year over year and sequential growth in Lumia units driven by the 500 and 600 Series devices.
As a result of the ongoing market dynamics and our portfolio rationalization, we expect both volumes and AFPs of non-Lumia devices to decline in Q2.
In devices and consumer other, we expect revenues to be $2.3 to $2.4 billion, which includes growth from Office 365, the launch of Halo: Master Chief Collection, and continued monetization gain in Bing.
In commercial licensing, we expect revenues to be $10.8 to $11 billion, which includes a slight drag from prior year's estimated XP impact.
With the accelerated shift to our cloud services, we expect Commercial Other revenue to be $2.5 to $2.6 billion.
Overall, we expect our fundamental strengths in our Commercial business to continue.
And in Corporate, we expect about $300 million of positive revenue impact next quarter as we recognize prior period deferrals related to bundle offerings.
We expect COGS to be $9.5 to $9.9 billion with variability driven by both hardware segments.
We expect second quarter OPEX to be between $8.6 and $8.8 billion.
As I mentioned earlier, our Q1 favorability was primarily driven by the timing and our continued prioritization of activities.
Therefore, we still expect full year operating expenses to be $34.2 to $34.6 billion as we remain committed to investing and prioritizing growth areas where we have customer momentum.
Over the remainder of the fiscal year, we expect to incur an additional $500 million of expense related to our restructuring efforts.
This results in total charges of roughly $1.6 billion, the high end of the range we provided in July.
Separately, we are reducing our anticipated integration expenses down to $100 million per quarter for the remainder of the fiscal year.
As a reminder, other income and expense includes dividend interest income offset by interest expense and the net cost of hedging.
We expect these items to generally offset one another.
We now expect our full year tax rate to be between 20 and 22 percent including the impact of integration and restructuring.
In Q2, we expect CAPEX to sequentially increase in support of our growing cloud business.
As you know, we typically see a decline from Q1 to Q2 in our unearned revenue balance.
This Q2 we anticipate a slightly higher sequential decline in our non-commercial segments.
This is primarily due to the $300 million impact from revenue recognition in corporate that I referenced earlier.
We expect Commercial unearned to be in line with historical trends with some of the benefit of our business model transitioned to annuity offset by FX rate impacts.
In closing, this was another quarter of continued growth and disciplined execution.
Across the company we're making thoughtful, data-driven decisions to continually assess and prioritize our resources.
We are also investing to accelerate momentum in key strategic areas, and to capitalize on emerging trends.
We are making great progress in reshaping our company, and I'm encouraged by the opportunity to continue to create long-term shareholder value.
And with that I'll turn it back over to Chris, and we can move to Q&A.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Amy.
With that we'll move to our Q&A.
Operator, can you please repeat your instructions?
(Operator Direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Thanks.
Good afternoon.
On the Commercial revenue it continues to grow at an impressive double-digit rate.
Many of your peers have not been doing quite as well as you have just in the last reporting quarter.
And, Amy, I know you mentioned you were confident about this business continuing.
I'm curious if you could just maybe underscore what you feel you guys are doing differently than what's happening in the peer group in underscoring that confidence going forward.
SATYA NADELLA:  Let me start.
Overall what we see is the increasing competitiveness of our products.
I think that's really what's reflected in our results.
The cloud story I think is fairly clear.
At this point the combination of Office 365, as well as Dynamics CRM in particular, combined with Azure, are driving our cloud growth.
As it turns out the technology that we build for our cloud is what we incorporate in our server products.
In fact, our R&D expense is the same expense.
And that's made our server products very competitive and so against some of our traditional competitors we are seeing significant share gains across the entire infrastructure line of our server products in particular.
And we've also architected our cloud very differently.
We are one of the onlywe are the only hyper-scale cloud provider that also thinks of our server products as the edge of our cloud.
So some of the hybrid capabilities of our serves have increasing attach, and that's also leading to our overall competitiveness, as well as monetization and margin.
And so those are the trends we see in our numbers.
We live in the same macro-environment as the rest, but right now we are confident about our competitiveness driving our results.
QUESTION:  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Brent.
We'll take the next question please.
(Operator direction.)
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Thank you and congrats on the quarter.
Two quick questions relating to cloud, Amy, can you give us a sense of what the revenue run rate for the commercial cloud was this quarter?
And Satya, could you give us a little more on the use cases for Azure?  Is it more test and dev or are you seeing most of it being on the production side?  Thanks.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Mark.
As you know we gave our run rate at the end of last quarter at 4.4 billion and the quotes we've said in our numbers have us on that continued trajectory as we head toward Q1.
So I think the pace and our accomplishments and share gains remain on a good trend line.
SATYA NADELLA:  And as far as the use cases, right now it's actually pretty diversified.
We talked pretty extensively about the customer case studies at our cloud event last week and it turns out that we have ISVs in many cases driving new applications on top of Azure.
There are businesses, for example, NBC, that are reinventing their business models on top of Azure.
We have customers using us for true hybrid, if you are deploying, for example, a SQL Server you can have high availability using Azure.
That's a pretty common deployment now, using Azure as the back plane for disaster recovery and high availability.
Dev test for sure is a workload, but at this point I would say we have emerging ISVs, some of the global ISVs, building their SaaS applications on top of Azure, driving a significant amount of growth.
New businesses and new business models emerging on Azure, as well as hybrid, which I would say are driving.
One of the other categories that I see a lot of lately is IoT.
And the way we participate just on the Azure side, we obviously participate even with our Windows embedded, but on the cloud side we are seeing the attach to our emerging machine learning services, as well as advanced analytics.
That's another place where we are well suited for some of the emerging use cases.
MARK MOERDLER:  Excellent, thank you very much.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Mark.
Next question please.
(Operator direction.)
KEITH WEISS, Morgan Stanley:  Excellent, thank you guys and a very nice quarter.
Perhaps a question for Amy, really nice gross margin improvements across the board, but you did mention some one-time items.
So I was hoping you could help us understand where you're seeing sort of underlying gross margin improvements, particularly if we look at sort of the improvements that you saw in the phone gross margins, as well as the big improvement we saw in the cloud gross margins.
How much of that should we look at as durable on a going forward basis?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Keith.
Let me start with the cloud and then I'll move to your phone question.
Overall, in the commercial business I think we've continued to see gross margin improvement and that is sustainable improvement, as opposed to I think what you characterized as some non-recurring things that I had mentioned.
It continues to be improvements in scale, improvements in our infrastructure, improvements in utilization, really strong work across all of our engineering teams here and so I think our year-over-year improvement, as well as sequential improvement and our ability in the overall commercial business to see the gross margins we did, as the mix shifts to the cloud, I think we're all quite proud of.
Onto the phone business, where I did call out non-recurring items, due to the business integration expense, an easier way, frankly, to think about that, Keith, is our Q4 gross margin and our Q1 gross margin, Q4 was a little depressed is how I would think about it, due to some of the restructuring.
Q1 is a little bit higher.
A more blended rate of those two is probably a better way to think about a go-forward margin, although when you're transitioning any business and all the hard work that we're doing here to prepare ourselves going forward, I do expect to see some volatility in that number.
KEITH WEISS:  Excellent, that was very helpful.
Thank you very much.
SATYA NADELLA:  Just to add, one thing that I'll say is it's sort of fits you into Mark's question, which is in particular on Azure we have some commodity workloads, but we also have many differentiated higher margin workloads, especially the Enterprise Mobility Suite is what I'll call out as a good example of an infrastructure workload completely in the cloud that has got a very different margin structure.
And those are the things that really give us the ability to have good margin structure for our cloud efforts.
KEITH WEISS:  Excellent, that's great.
Thank you very much, guys.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Keith.
Next question please.
(Operator direction.)
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Thanks, guys, and congrats on another great quarter, I had a question on Office 365.
Obviously you all continue to see great growth, both on the commercial and on the home and personal side.
But, we also saw Office commercial products and services continue to grow 5 percent, so one question for Satya and one for Amy.
Satya, how do you feel right now about just momentum, particularly on the commercial side that you're seeing in Office 365 and sort of how you're targeting large enterprises versus SMBs.
Then, Amy, obviously you've talked about some cannibalization of in-period revenue from the success of Office 365, you could help us kind of frame that 5 percent this quarter on the product and services, and how would you think longer term about the revenue and the profitability there?  Thanks.
SATYA NADELLA:  I'll start and then, Amy, I'll turn it over to you.
Specifically on Office 365 the overall product depth and breadth is continuously improving.
One of the great benefits of Office 365 that our customers get to enjoy is that as we innovate and launch new features they get to use them as soon as we have got them deployed on our cloud.
And so that's what's driving both the competitiveness, as well as usage of Office 365, and quite honestly the full consumption of what we build, which I think in the long run is super-important to us and our customers.
But, it also turns out some of the server products that we have, as we are seeing increasing adoption of the cloud we still have, as I said, very competitive server products.
I mentioned a lot of our infrastructure server products.
But, take something like Lync; it's a fantastic product.
It is, again, gaining share in the marketplace.
It's getting deployed in on-premise solutions.
So it's the combination that's driving our growth.
The other dimension we are seeing is Office 365 is a cross-platform cloud service.
We see now coverage across all devices and that leads to customers still using the service even more.
So that combination of effects, competitive server products, very competitive cloud service with new features being added all the time, as well as cross-platform is what's driving our growth.
AMY HOOD:  And let me try to take the second part of that question, Phil, which is really sort of the dynamics between our transactional business, the move to the cloud, and how I think about bridging those numbers.
Our Office transactional business was down this quarter and the difference, as you said, to get to the 5 percent growth is clearly the growth in Office 365 all-up.
The other place that I think always I like to point to in terms of triangulating, when I look at the health of the overall transition is renewal rates.
Our renewal rates are amongst the highest we've had in a Q1.
Both our ability to recapture both the contract, as well as the revenue and the value and add services is higher than it has been.
In addition, we're seeing premium units added more frequently in the cloud than we have on-prem.
And those types of mixes you'll see both in a bookings number, as well as in the unearned balance growth.
And so while the exact dollars in and out at any given quarter may be difficult, I guess, to triangulate on, the components I always look to, to see health, I've outlined there specifically in the Office business.
PHILLIP WINSLOW:  Great, thanks.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Phil.
We'll go to the next question please.
(Operator direction.)
RICK SHERLUND, Nomura:  Yes, thanks.
I wanted to follow up on Phil's question.
I think that Office transition; our analysis suggests that that's a net benefit from here for you.
I'd like Satya and Amy's thoughts maybe about the transition for the rest of the business, if you've got Server and Tools at some point, I mean it continues to show really terrific growth.
At some point I suppose that becomes cannibalized by your cloud business with Azure.
Maybe, Satya, if you can share how you think that transition, how long, how does it transpire, any thoughts and should it be net additive to the revenues and operating income as we've seen on the Office side, and maybe if you could talk on Windows, as well, it looks like it was OEM down a little bit this quarter, which it had been growing.
Are we going to see lower ASPs with these $200 devices coming out this fall?
SATYA NADELLA:  Let me talk a little bit about the dynamics you're seeing in particular with our infrastructure servers, as well as Azure, because it is actually pretty unique, I think, to at least our product offering.
As I said, our servers have become much more competitive, because of the same technology investments we are making in our cloud.
And the use cases that we see in the cloud in many cases happen to be net new workloads.
IoT was not driving our server growth traditionally.
Mobile back-ends was not driving our servers traditionally.
So machine learning and advanced analytics are areas we did not participate even in the past.
So one of the things that we are seeing is a lot of new use cases of Azure, which were really new green field territory for us.
And it turns out that the need for more computing, more storage, and more infrastructure server products is much broader than just even the hyper-scale public cloud, because the one thing that is true as there are more devices is that you need backend.
And that backend in many cases, in regulated industries, with the geo-participation we have, is needed everywhere.
So one of the things that we, in fact, very focused on is enabling others to build their own cloud.
So our private cloud, premium SKU mix is also growing.
You see that in our results.
So at least in the intermediate timeframe we do not see cannibalization.
We see more, in fact, of these hybrid, private, as well as public cloud all being complementary and of course being used together delivers more value to customers and that's where our competitive advantage comes from.
On the Windows side, just to finish off, we wanted to make sure that we have competitive Windows ecosystem participation across all price points.
So we made some deliberate changes to our business model and that is, in fact, playing out in the marketplace where we now have very competitive, full Windows PCs less than $199 going into this holiday season.
And that, in fact, in Q1 caused the market to expand.
That was really by design and so we're happy to see that.
And so on a blended basis; of course, the ASPs will be different, because of the two ranges.
But, overall that's what our goal is.
We want to be able to make sure that we compete on all price points and overall growth of volume.
RICK SHERLUND:  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks.
We'll go to the next question please.
(Operator direction.)
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi:  Hi, thanks.
Satya, I'm wondering if you could talk about you're seeing some progress on the cloud gross margins, but you're also investing pretty heavily.
And I'm wondering how important it is for you, kind of medium and long-term, to be able to get things like Bing, Xbox Live, and Office 365 running on the same infrastructure as Azure, in terms of getting the kind of scale you want and ultimately driving the margins to where you want it to get to.
Is that sort of a prerequisite to get to where you'd like those margins to be?
SATYA NADELLA:  Yes, I mean it's an absolute prerequisite for us to have our entirety of our cloud infrastructure plant drive scale economics for us.
And, in fact, a lot of the core Azure technology around machine management and data center management comes out of our Bing efforts.
We manage all of the supply chain of all of this as one supply chain.
We do the SKU design as one SKU design.
We drive costs of both network storage and compute down all together.
In fact, you should think of Azure as the common fabric of all our applications.
And you look at even some of our games, like Halo, have significant usage of our cloud and that's what's really driving some of the economics.
In fact, the fact thatI celebrate the fact that we don't have just one first party workload, because it's very easy for one first party workload to completely co-opt, if you will, the architecture of a cloud.
But, in our case we have a very diverse set of workloads.
We have Xbox Live.
We have Office 365.
We have Dynamics and Bing.
And that diversity is what allows us to build, in fact, for our own needs a cloud architecture that then can meet many more workloads.
And that's working pretty well for us.
WALTER PRITCHARD:  Got it, thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks very much.
We'll take the next question please.
(Operator direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Great, thank you so much.
Satya, I was wondering if you could share with us, given the amazing XP refresh we've seen over the last 12 to 18 months, as you're talking to customers, how do you feel about the corporate PC refresh cycle in calendar '15?
SATYA NADELLA:  I think it will come back to the pre-XP business PC refresh.
So that's what I think Amy's comments also reflected and that's what we expect to have happen in the rest of this fiscal year.
The thing that, Heather, we are focused on is how do we make sure that not only does the incremental value that we have today on Windows 8 gets adopted.
There are, in fact, lots of use cases, especially around field devices, mobile workforce, where we are, in fact, seeing great adoption of Windows 8.
But, Windows 10 is something that's completely optimized for the enterprise and across all screen sizes, for the mobile worker, as well as the desktop and large screens.
Perhaps one of the most unique things about at least our portfolio and our innovation is that we think that it's the mobility of the individual not the one device that is important in the enterprise and that's what we are building towards with great management and great security.
And so we are pleased with the early feedback we are getting from the first disclosure of Windows 10, and as well as some of the successes we are having with Windows 8 adoption in the enterprise.
But, the adoption I think will get back to a normal PC refresh in the enterprise.
HEATHER BELLINI:  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Heather.
We'll go to the next question please.
(Operator direction.)
DANIEL IVES, FDR Capital:  Thanks.
Satya, what do you think as you move to the cloud and really try to go into this next phase of growth is the biggest challenge and maybe the biggest opportunity from just a high level, as we think about Microsoft going into the next stage?
SATYA NADELLA:  I mean for us the biggest opportunity is to be able to get into spaces.
I mean one of the things that I always think about is for all the success we have had in our server business we were a low-share player.
And when I look at the total IT spend that enterprise customers have today, as I said, we've not participated in many, many areas.
I'll bring up even the data stack.
We have a very good business in SQL Server.
We have perhaps the most competitive SQL Server product ever in SQL 2014, which is growing nicely.
But, if you look at what is secular in terms of growth going forward, it is data, data management in a variety of new ways.
So those are the opportunities we want to be able to take advantage of by doing some good work both in the public cloud, as well as with our server products.
The challenge will always remain at the end of the day for us to make sure that we are bringing together unique offers.
One of the things that I want us as a team to be very focused on is to bring uniqueness that only Microsoft can bring into the marketplace.
That's why this approach around platforms and reinvention of productivity I believe is what we can do.
For sure we're going to have incredible competition, but at the same time I think that if you asked anyone, at least in our campus, whether we deeply get what it means to reinvent productivity, I believe so.
Do we get deeply how to take the various constituents from end users, IT and developers, and harmonize their interest in very unique ways so that enterprises can adopt solutions?  We get that deeply.
So to me staying with that, and staying focused on our unique contribution is perhaps both our opportunity and our challenge.
And we will obviously index on the opportunity side.
DANIEL IVES:  Great job on the quarter, especially relative to your tech peers.
Thanks.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Dan.
We'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
KASH RANGAN, Merrill Lynch:  Thank you for taking my question, Satya.
I just wanted to get your perspective on the business mix.
Clearly you have a very strong and growing consumer footprint, especially with Nokia, and you've got a very solid enterprise backbone.
And it feels like the consumer side of the house is pulling away much faster, and obviously has some implications for how you look at the business in terms of margins, and how they could potentially inflect in the future.
If you could just give us your thoughts, Satya, on how you see that business mix, that will be great.
And also wondering, Amy, if you could shed some light on cost controls, and what were the things that specifically the company engaged in, because sales and marketing expenses came in at a nice surprise, much lower than we expected.
Thank you very much.
SATYA NADELLA:  Thanks, Kash.
So the way I see the market when we sort of talk about productivity and platforms, we really don't make this big distinction between consumer and enterprise.
When it takes productivity apps, we're very focused on dual use.
In fact, one of the pieces of data that Amy and I shared was the growth in the consumer subscriptions of Office 365 even sequentially grew by a significant percentage.
So therefore we're seeing good adoption of our productivity services specifically in the context of this dual use where people want to use it at home and people want to use it at work.
And that's where, in fact, a lot of our R&D investment is to make that very seamless.
So to me that's how we want to drive, and gaming is the one category we have said that we will invest in it for its own sake in driving enterprise value all about gaming.
There are, in fact, lots of benefits which come because of technology.
In fact, the reason why we are so competitive now in Cortana and speech recognition, which I think is core to productivity, is it first started with Kinect and Xbox.
So we'll always have those kind of incidental benefits, but really in gaming we want to have our first party gaming, Xbox Live, console, and as well as PC gaming thrive and drive more incremental value for us.
And Minecraft obviously helps in that context.
So that's how we'll view the future for how we think about our businesses.
AMY HOOD:  Kash, on the overall operating expense and how we've managed that, in general I don't think about it as control using that sense of the word.
I think what is perhaps most impressive is that we have managed to continue throughout the quarter, whether it's week to week or month to month, to look and ask where is the highest ROI we get from our spend?  How can we drive our business forward both in period but also for the future?  It's just as important for us to balance that.
I think we've done a very good job of picking those places, and really investing intentionally and aggressively behind places where we know we're differentiated.
KASH RANGAN:  Wonderful.
Thank you very much.
Happy Halloween.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Kash.
Operator, we'll have time for one more question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
KARL KEIRSTEAD, Deutsche Bank:  Hi.
Thanks.
Question for Amy.
Amy, just thinking through your guide by business segment, everything seems roughly in line but for the D&C licensing guide, which implies I think a 24 percent year over year decline.
And given that that's a 90 percent gross margin business, I just want to make sure I understand what's happening there.
And I have two questions.
I'm wondering if you could help disaggregate how much of that is due to the tough XP related compare versus some other perhaps one time issues that make for a tough comparison, and then, secondly, when in your best judgment do you think that D&C licensing revenue might turn positive?
Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Great.
Karl, thanks for asking that question, it gives me a chance to reiterate how many of those components are one time in nature.
The first and the largest issue is the end of the Nokia Commercial Agreement.
That's about $650 million that we earned in Q2 of a year ago that because of the end of the agreement simple goes away.
So I'll start with that point.
The second component relates to the same trend we saw in our IP business that we saw in Q4, in Q1, we're doing and seeing again in Q2.
So I would also see that exact same trend line and assessment.
The next component which is a change is we have actually launched some of our Office 365 Consumer Services in Japan, which is a geo that we had not been in historically.
That does result in a revenue deferral.
It will end up in unearned.
But that's about a $100 million impact that we wouldn't have seen before that.
And so by the time you move all of that out of the comparison group, you really get back to very similar trends in our D&C licensing business that we saw this quarter for what I think are the components you are focused on, which his OEM Pro and OEM non-Pro, which we expect to really resemble the results we saw this quarter and sort of match the PC business dynamics overall.
KARL KEIRSTEAD:  Okay.
That's very helpful.
And if I could sneak in one more.
Amy, did the $2.9 billion share repurchase feels like an up-tick compared to what you've done every quarter for the last couple of years.
Is this sort of a new level that we can expect from Microsoft, maybe just a thought on the pace of the share buyback?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks for the question.
We are proud of the increase in shareholder return this quarter.
And importantly we're focused on how we can continue to do that as a part of our overall long-term shareholder growth.
QUESTION:  Okay.
Thanks.
CHRIS SUH:  Great.
Thanks, Karl.
And thank you, Amy.
That wraps up the Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
Please note that our second quarter earnings call will be held on Monday, January 26, 2015.
We look forward to seeing many of you in the coming months at various investor conferences.
For those unable to attend in person, these event will be webcast and you can follow our comments at Microsoft.com/investor.
Please contact us if you need any additional details.
And thank you again for joining us.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks everyone.
SATYA NADELLA:  Thank you.
Satya Nadella, Amy Hood, Chris Suh
Monday, January 26, 2015
(Operator Direction.)
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you.
Good afternoon and thank you for joining us today.
On the call with me today are Satya Nadella, Chief Executive Officer; Amy Hood, Chief Financial Officer; Frank Brod, Chief Accounting Officer; and John Seethoff, Deputy General Counsel.
On our website, Microsoft.com/investor, we have posted our press release and a slide deck that provides a summary of our results this quarter.
Unless otherwise specified, all growth comparisons we make on the call today relate to the corresponding period of last year.
Additionally, any mention of operating expense refers to segment operating expenses as defined in the footnotes of our 10-Q and includes research and development, sales and marketing, and general and administrative, but excludes integration and restructuring charges.
We will post the prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and in any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript on the Microsoft Investor Relations website until January 26, 2016.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements which are predictions, projections or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk-factor section of our Form 10-K, Form 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
And with that, I'll turn the call over to Satya.
SATYA NADELLA:  Thank you, Chris.
Good afternoon, everyone.
Today I will focus my top line thoughts on our progress this quarter and the progress we are making in transforming our business.
This quarter we reached $26.5 billion in revenue with an operating income of $7.8 billion.
This quarter's results show the product and business transformation underway at Microsoft.
We saw success in a number of our strategic areas, including cloud adoption, redefining and revitalizing the Windows ecosystem and improving economics in our hardware portfolio.
We also saw some challenges this quarter.
As expected, the one-time benefit of Windows XP end of life PC refresh cycle has now tailed off.
Additionally, we ran into unexpected issues in select geographies.
Where there are execution issues, we will address them.
Where there are macro-economic challenges, we will weather them.
With that in mind, I'll walk you through the quarter.
Let's start with our cloud business, an area where we are extending our leadership position and accelerating our innovation.
In commercial cloud, we saw continued customer and revenue growth across a growing footprint of cloud services, Office 365, Azure, Enterprise Mobility Suite, and Dynamics CRM Online.
In fact, this quarter is the sixth consecutive quarter of triple digit revenue growth in commercial cloud, and we are now at a run rate of $5.5 billion.
Azure Services continue to grow in appeal to enterprise IT and developers with rapid improvements across hybrid services, premium cloud storage and virtual machine offerings, enhanced data and data analytics offerings.
Microsoft Enterprise Mobility Suite is one key area of product innovation that I would like to highlight given the growth and the uniqueness of this offering.
Microsoft offers a comprehensive solution for all devices that brings together mobile device management, mobile application management, hybrid identity management, and data protection into one unified offering through EMS.
Office 365 now includes new application experiences on all phones and tablets for mobile productivity.
Further, we have released completely new scenarios.
This includes Office Sway for visualizing and sharing ideas; Delve to help search and discover content; Office 365 Groups to make it easier to collaborate; Office 365 Video for secure media streaming for businesses.
Finally, we continue to invest in enterprise value by integrating MDM and Enterprise Mobility Suite into Office 365; new encryption technologies, compliance certification and new e-discovery capabilities in Exchange.
In Dynamics CRM Online, we added 53 markets this quarter, bringing us to 130 markets around the world.
We are bringing together CRM with Cortana, Yammer, Power BI, and Skype to add unique value to customers.
We are expanding our capabilities in the cloud through five new acquisitions.
Last week we announced an agreement to purchase Revolution Analytics, the leading provider of statistical computing and predictive analytics, which will enable our customers to unlock big data insights.
We bought Hockey App, a leading mobile app testing and development service, to enhance Azure Services for Mobile Developers.
Our acquisition of Aorato accelerates our ability to give customers unique security capabilities by tapping into behavioral intelligence around identity and access spanning on premise and the cloud.
We are bringing on new capabilities in machine learning as applied to e-discovery and other enterprise compliance processes with the acquisition of Equivio.
And we also welcomed, Acompli, a provider of innovative e-mail applications for iOS and Android.
The common theme across all these acquisitions is advanced data analytics and machine learning driven capabilities that improve with more customer adoption and usage of the cloud.
We are also making progress in our consumer cloud services.
Office 365 Home and Personal revenue grew nearly 150 percent year-over-year as we added 2.1 million net new subscribers since last quarter.
Bing U.S.
search share continues to grow as does search revenue with 23 percent growth this quarter.
I will talk about our progress in Xbox Live later in my comments.
Now let's turn to Windows.
To start, the overall Windows ecosystem is driving more innovation.
Over the holiday season and at CES, our partners showcased a diverse line-up of Windows devices, including more premium device choices than ever.
Last spring we made a strategic decision to introduce new Windows pricing programs to drive unit growth in opening price point PCs as well as tablets.
And this quarter we saw year-over-year growth.
Also businesses continue to value Windows.
We are seeing healthy demand for Windows Pro even though we faced challenging prior year comparables in Q2 as well as in the second half of the year following the Windows XP end of support related PC refresh.
Now let's talk about Windows 10.
Last week was an important milestone on our path to release Windows 10 and usher in an era of more personal computing.
The heritage of Windows was about enabling one single device, the PC.
With Windows 10, we're building a device platform for the mobile-first, cloud-first world.
It's a world where the mobility of a person's experience is paramount, requiring a platform that spans devices from small screens to large screens to no screens at all.
It's a world where interacting with technology is as natural as interacting with other people.
And it's a world that demands trust and security.
It is also a world with rich opportunity for developers, and Windows 10 will be the most attractive Windows development platform ever with our free upgrade offer, and with universal application and unified store for developers, we'll have a large, unified, up to date user base to target.
We want people to love Windows and have made this our most collaborative project yet with more than 2 million insiders giving us feedback every day.
I'm very optimistic about Windows 10.
We are making progress with our own devices, both those in the market today and also the ones that we have recently announced.
This quarter we surpassed the $1 billion revenue mark with Surface for the first time.
The value proposition of being the most productive tablet is resonating.
Further the sales for Lumia phones topped 10 million units, growing 30 percent year-over-year this quarter with strength in devices such as Lumia 500 and 600 series, our affordable smart phones.
In this segment of the market, the combination of our brand and values stand out and we plan to continue to build a beachhead here.
We are also creating new devices, types that open up new markets and opportunities for Microsoft.
In October we launched our first wearable, the Microsoft Band, and just last week we revealed two new hardware with Windows 10, Microsoft Surface Hub and Microsoft HoloLens.
Microsoft Surface Hub will revolutionize group collaboration and meetings, HoloLens and Windows Holographic computing will make mixed reality applications part of every day life across work and home.
I want to talk briefly about Xbox.
Xbox One console adoption accelerated this holiday and was the top selling console in the U.S., and fans on Xbox Live were engaged with the service more than ever before.
However, it's our strategies coming together with Windows 10 that give me the greatest optimism.
The vibrant social gaming community on Xbox Live will span Xbox, Windows PC, tablets and phones.
With Windows 10 gamers on a PC, tablet or Xbox console can play together and games on Xbox One can easily stream to a Windows 10 PC or tablet.
It's also getting clearer how games people love today will evolve to mind blowing experiences in the future when designed for mixed reality that Windows 10 and HoloLens create.
Just imagine what is possible with Minecraft.
Gaming truly is a valuable part of millions of people's lives and Microsoft will excel and increase our lead.
Before closing, I wanted to share a few thoughts on capital allocation.
Over the past several quarters and certainly with last week's Windows 10 announcements you have seen us unleash new innovation in our cloud services with Windows and our hardware.
We did all of this without materially growing our cost base.
This required clarity and purpose and value proposition, realignment of talent and disciplined execution.
Our increasing innovation and competitiveness in today's growth markets, and the creation of new categories is how we will move positively to impact the returns for our investors.
Earlier today we announced our intention to complete the existing $40 billion share repurchase authorization by December 31st, 2016.
This is another step in our ongoing commitment to increase capital return for our shareholders, while investing in the growth of our business.
It, too, shows our optimism for the future growth of Microsoft.
As we move forward, we will certainly continue to be thoughtful in our capital return decisions, balanced across dividends and share repurchases.
In closing, I am encouraged by the progress we are making in our transformation to become the productivity and platform company for the mobile-first, cloud first world.
I am proud of how our teams are stepping up to both change and execute to make this transformation happen.
I'm confident of the decisions and choices we are making to drive our business and products forward, to serve our customers and partners in the future.
With that, I'll hand over to Amy to go through the quarter's results in further detail and share our outlook for the next quarter.
I look forward to rejoining you after that to answer your questions.
Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, and good afternoon everyone.
As Satya shared in Q2, we again made solid progress on our business transformation.
We had strong growth in our cloud and subscription businesses, our annuity renewals were healthy, as customers remain committed to our enterprise portfolio and our hardware products performed well during the holiday season.
As we expected, our year-over-year growth rates were impacted by the prior year benefits that we realized in our OEM and Office transactional businesses, following the Windows XP end of support refresh cycle.
Beyond that, our results in China and Japan fell short of our expectations.
In Japan the PC market lagged due to their macro-economic environment, along with the combined impact of XP end of support and the VAT increase last year.
Our Office attach rate to PCs is very high there, so the weak PC market also impacted Office revenue.
With that said, let me take you through the financial highlights of our second quarter.
Revenue was $26.5 billion, up 8 percent, and would have been one point better without the impact of foreign exchange.
Gross margin grew slightly this quarter, even when comparing against a year ago that benefited from the XP refresh cycle.
Our commitment to ongoing execution improvement and thoughtful portfolio management helps improve the gross margin percentage in each of our operating segments.
Operating income declined 2 percent, which included $243 million of integration and restructuring expenses, excluding that operating income grew 1 percent.
Our reported GAAP earnings per share was $0.71, which included a $0.02 negative impact from integration and restructuring expense and a $0.04 income tax charge for an IRS audit adjustment.
Foreign exchange had a $0.01 negative impact on EPS.
As we discussed last quarter, FX movements first impact our bookings growth and unearned revenue on our balance sheet.
Our contracted, but not billed balance was adjusted down to reflect current FX rates.
Therefore, our bookings were flat this quarter.
Unearned revenue was up 9 percent year-over-year to $21.2 billion.
But, the sequential decline was slightly higher than we expected due to the larger than anticipated impact from FX.
Adjusting for that FX impact, our commercial unearned balance was in line with historical trends and our expectations.
From a geographic perspective, relative to our expectations, the U.S.
outperformed and Europe was generally in line.
As I mentioned earlier, China and Japan were below our expectations.
With that backdrop I will now move to a detailed discussion of our results.
Last year, we ended support for Windows XP.
That stimulated a PC refresh cycle, in particular in developed markets and with business customers.
During the period from Q2, through the end of our fiscal year, Windows Pro revenue growth was over 10 percent and meaningfully outpaced business PC growth.
As expected in Q2, PCs have reverted to a more normalized mix between developed and emerging markets and Pro-attach to business PCs has returned to the levels we saw prior to FY '14.
Also, to drive revenue growth in academic institutions, we lowered the price of Windows Pro for that customer segment.
This pricing change, along with the impact of XP, caused Windows revenue growth to be lower than the relatively stable business PC market we have seen since the end of FY '13.
We again grew Windows non-Pro licenses and saw year-over-year growth in activations.
This was driven by particularly strong demand for opening price point PCs related to the strategic decisions Satya spoke of earlier.
The hardware mix shift to opening price point PCs impacted license mix and therefore aggregate revenue per license in the quarter.
The mix shift was the main driver of our Windows non-Pro revenue decline.
Inventory in the channel is a bit higher than normal, which we expect to work through in Q3.
Office Consumer products and services revenue declined 12 percent and was impacted by the ongoing transition to Office 365, and by the dynamics in Japan where PC growth was lower than we expected in a geography where the paid attach of Office is high.
Adoption of Office 365 Home and Personal remained strong.
And we now have over 9.2 million subscribers.
In our computing and gaming segment, we are proud of the continued progress we are making in our Surface portfolio.
Strong interest in Surface Pro 3 helped to drive record revenue, as well as improved gross margin.
Surface Pro 3 volumes are pacing over three times the rate of what we saw with Surface Pro 2.
In gaming, Xbox One was the console sales leader in the U.S.
Xbox Live users grew and those users increased their purchases of third party publisher content and consumables.
Sales of the Xbox platform exclusives, Halo:  The Master Chief Collection and Forza Horizon 2, were strong.
And this quarter we welcome Minecraft.
We articulated our plan for the phone business back in July, and we are executing to plan.
With our Lumia portfolio of phones, we are driving volumes in the low price device category.
We sold 10.5 million Lumia phones this quarter, an all-time high.
We also sold over 39 million non-Lumia phones.
Even while we make changes to the product portfolio and manage this business for profitability.
We are looking forward to bringing new products to market that will showcase the features that we presented at our Windows 10 event last week.
Revenue and our Devices and Consumer Other segment grew 30 percent.
As noted earlier, Xbox Live transactions and first party games preformed well and contributed to this growth.
Additionally, search revenue growth was strong with improvements in both rate and volume.
Within display, revenue declined on our MSN portal though we saw revenue growth across other Microsoft properties.
We are also pleased by our gross margin expansion in this segment.
Transitioning now to our consumer results where revenue grew 5 percent.
Our annuity revenue remains strong, growing double digits, and renewal rates remained high.
Customers are continuing to move from transactional purchasing to long-term annuity contracts as they show an increased commitment to our product roadmap.
Our transactional revenue declined over 15 percent, slightly more than we expected, primarily in Office, and mostly due to our performance in China and Japan, which I detailed earlier.
Additionally, FX had a greater negative impact on commercial revenue than we had anticipated.
Our commercial cloud services delivered triple-digit revenue growth for the sixth consecutive quarter.
Office 365 continues to be priority for CIOs as both existing and new customers move to the cloud.
This transition accelerated with 45 percent of our renewal seats in Office moving to the cloud this quarter.
We are seeing great growth in revenue from premium Azure Services driven by both the increasing customer base and an expansion in the number of services that those customers deploy.
Within Dynamics CRM Online, customer growth accelerated and revenue nearly doubled.
From a product perspective, Commercial Office Product and Services revenue declined 1 percent, slightly below our expectations.
Annuity revenue remained strong with high renewal rates and continued adoption of Office 365.
Within our Office transactional business, year-on-year comparables are difficult given the benefit from last year's XP refresh, where customers chose to update their desktop productivity solutions along with their PC.
Additionally, the shift to Office 365 continues to impact transactional revenue.
While these dynamics were consistent with our expectations, revenue in China and Japan both fell short given the factors that I noted earlier.
Server Products and Services revenue grew 9 percent, again, outpacing the broader IT market.
Growth in premium mix helped to drive double-digit revenue growth in SQL Server and System Center.
Windows Server annuity revenue grew double digits again this quarter.
Transactional revenue was down primarily due to a declining traditional server market.
Additionally, we are pleased with the performance in our Dynamics business, which grew revenue 13 percent, driven by growth in both on premises and cloud offerings.
Operating expense grew 1 percent to $8.3 billion and was favorable to our expectations.
These results are inclusive of investments that we made in our strategic growth areas, a few of which were showcased last week at our Windows 10 event.
Excluding approximately $750 million from the addition of NDS, operating expense would have declined 8 percent.
Relative to the guidance that we provided for the quarter, roughly half of the favorability resulted from FX changes, with the balance driven by our continue prioritization of spend.
Our integration and restructuring efforts have been focused on optimizing resources across the company, which includes reducing the expense base in our phone business.
To date, we have integrated the manufacturing and supply chain teams across Microsoft while also rationalizing our phone manufacturing capacity.
In operating expense, we committed to reducing $1 billion from the phone cost base, which we have done.
We continue to look for opportunities to drive further efficiencies.
Our effective tax rate was 25 percent and higher than expected due to previously mentioned income tax charge for an IRS audit adjustment.
Beyond that, the increase was driven by the inclusion of phone results and our changing geographic mix.
Capital expenditures were $1.5 billion, driven primarily by investments to increase our capacity as we expanded existing and added new data centers, as well as made server purchases in support of our fast growing cloud business.
This quarter, we increased our capital return by 5 percent, with $4.5 billion returned to shareholders through buybacks and dividends.
And, as Satya reinforced in his comments, we will continue to take thoughtful steps to increase capital return to shareholders with a focus on value.
With that overview of the current quarter, let me now turn to our outlook.
Our guidance is based on our current view of FX rates.
Should the U.S.
dollar strengthen beyond hose assumptions, as it did this quarter, we would see additional negative impact to earnings, revenue, our balance sheet, and our contracted but not billed balance.
As a reminder, in our annuity businesses, the FX impact is first reflected in unearned revenue, which is reported at the rate when the contract is billed.
Then revenue comes onto the P&L at that same rate as it is recognized generally over the next year.
Therefore, in Q3, we will start to recognize a higher percentage of revenue from periods with a stronger U.S.
dollar than the prior year comparison.
In total, we expect that FX will negatively impact revenue growth by approximately 4 points in Q3.
The majority of this impact is in our Commercial Business.
In FY '14, it was our Q2 through Q4 results that most benefited from Windows XP end of support.
As such, our growth rates across Windows Pro and transactional Office will be impacted as our business moves back to pre-XP levels.
On a geographic basis, we expect year-on-year revenue declines in China, Russia, and Japan.
In Japan, Q3 represents an even tougher comparison with the anniversary of the VAT, which again will create different comparables in Windows and Office.
We currently expect the geographic dynamics, challenging comparables from XP, and FX headwinds will be in place throughout the reminder of our fiscal year.
With that overall background, let me move to our specific Q3 guidance starting with Devices and Consumer.
Our revenue guidance includes approximately 4 points of drag from FX.
In licensing, we expect revenue to be $3.4 to $3.6 billion.
This range assumes the more challenging comparables I mentioned earlier.
The range also includes a reduction in channel inventory for Windows non-Pro opening price point PCs.
Within Consumer Office, we expect to see similar trends to Q2, and within our IP licensing business, we expect lower per unit royalties with the changing mix of devices sold by our licensees.
In computing and gaming, we expect revenue to be $1.5 to $1.7 billion.
This range reflects normal seasonality coming out of the holidays for our Xbox and Surface businesses.
In phone hardware, we expect revenue to be $1.4 to $1.5 billion.
This range anticipates accelerating year-over-year growth in Lumia units driven by our affordable smart phone devices.
We also expect the volume and ASPs of non-Lumia devices to continue to decline in Q3.
With this lower aggregate revenue base, we expect gross margins, which include non-cash amortization, to be lower for the next couple of quarters.
In Devices and Consumer Other, we expect revenue to be about $2 billion, reflecting continued progress in key areas like Office 365 Home and Personal, Xbox Live and search.
In our Commercial Business, we expect our significant momentum in annuity and commercial cloud services to continue.
Within our Commercial Licensing Segment, we expect revenue to be $9.7 to $9.9 billion.
In addition to the factors that I discussed which impact our year-over-year comparability, we anticipate a 4-point drag from FX.
In Commercial Other, we expect revenue to be $2.6 to $2.7 billion.
Even after considering the impact of FX, growth will remain robust with expected momentum across our commercial cloud portfolio, Office 365, Azure and CRM Online.
And in Corporate, we don't expect any revenue impact.
As we continue to work towards the launch of Windows 10, we will share additional detailed information regarding any accounting impacts from the Windows 10 free upgrade offer and Windows as a service.
I would like to reiterate that our OEM royalty model, which is paid up-front, will remain in place.
We expect COGS to be $7.1 to $7.4 billion, with variability driven by both hardware segments.
We expect third quarter operating expense to be $8.2 to $8.4 billion.
We are lowering our full year guidance from $33.2 to $33.6 billion, which reduces full year growth, including NDS, 4 to 5 percent.
Our Q3 plans include investments in advertising and customer-facing roles to continue to accelerate our momentum with commercial products such as SQL and the cloud.
These investments are a direct result of reprioritization decisions made during H1.
Over the remainder of the fiscal year, we expect to incur an additional $200 million of restructuring expense.
This results in total charges of roughly $1.4 billion, which is lower than our previous guidance.
Separately, we still expect integration expense of $100 million per quarter for the remainder of the fiscal year.
As a reminder, Other Income and Expense includes dividend and interest income, offset by interest expense and the net cost of hedging.
Given the current FX environment, we expect Other Income and Expense to be negative $100 million in Q3.
We now expect our full year tax rate to be between 22 and 24 percent; this includes the Q2 income tax charge for an IRS audit adjustment as well as the changing geographic mix of our business.
In Q3 we expect CAPEX to sequentially increase in support of our growing cloud business.
Unearned revenue will continue to benefit from customers moving to our subscription services, and high contract renewal rates.
We expect to see low single digit sequential decline in our unearned for Q3, which includes 1 point drag from FX, as new billings will reflect the impact of the strengthening U.S.
dollar.
Our commercial unearned balance will follow recent historical seasonality when adjusted for FX.
In closing, this quarter was another example of the progress that we are making across this company.
Our execution continues to improve, and we are making data-driven decisions to inform our investments, both shorter term, as you have seen in our marketing and sales adjustments, as well as for the long-term as we adjust our product portfolio.
There are, certainly, short-term comparability challenges as we anniversary last year's XP refresh cycle and see the impact of the strengthening U.S.
dollar, but we are confident in the underlying health of our business, proud of the significant innovation we are funding within our prioritized operating budget, and excited to continue gaining share in key strategic markets.
Before I hand it back over to Chris, I would like to announce that we will be webcasting a briefing for the investor community on April 29th in conjunction with our BUILD Developer Conference in San Francisco.
We'll share more details as we get closer to the date.
With that, I'll turn it back over to Chris, and we can move to Q&A.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Amy.
With that we'll now move to the Q&A.
Operator, can you please repeat your instructions?
(Operator Direction.)
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Thank you very much.
I appreciate it.
Amy, can you give us a bit more detail on what's driving the increase in cloud margins within the Commercial Other segment as well as any sense for how accretive the cloud is becoming?  And then I have a follow-up question.
AMY HOOD:  Sure.
Why don't I talk a little bit about that from a math perspective, and I'll let Satya add from some of our engineering improvements, which I think are important.
Mark, as I talked a bit about, we've seen a mix shift as we have moved Office 365 and Azure to our premium service and to premium SKUs within our cloud environment.
That is one of the drivers that helps improve margin growth.
In addition, we've done a lot of hard engineering work, I believe, over the past six quarters to be able to take advantage of more utilization and capacity over time.
And I'll let Satya maybe add a little bit technically.
SATYA NADELLA:  Overall the shift to the higher layer services is the real driver here, which is obviously Office 365 and its various levels is one factor, the other one is what I talked about as the Enterprise Mobility Suite.
That has really got fantastic momentum in the marketplace, because the solution has really come together and is fairly unique, as well as Dynamics CRM.
So these have all got a different profile in terms of margins and they are all now pretty high growth businesses for us.
So when you think about our cloud, you've got to think about the low-level infrastructure.
Even there, we now have premium offerings and then we have higher level services.
So that aggregate portfolio is what helps us move up the margin curve.
MARK MOERDLER:  Excellent and one quick follow-up.
How should we think about monetization, Satya, for the Windows devices sub-9 inch?
SATYA NADELLA:  One of the comments I had made in my remarks was some momentum we are seeing in our consumer cloud services.
So for example, the store monetization, Bing monetization, Xbox Live monetization as Xbox Live is going to span devices, are all things that drive monetization for below nine inches.
So I think of device gross margin in some cases, because we are building devices like the phones, as well as this post-sale monetization using our consumer cloud services as the two additional levers that we have in order to be able to monetize Windows devices.
MARK MOERDLER:  Excellent, thank you, I appreciate it.
CHRIS SUH:  We'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Thanks.
Amy, just on the XP tail off, are there other commercial products that you're seeing being impacted?  I just wanted to be clear there were a lot of questions that is there some type of Halo impact from the XP taking growth down on the other solutions.
AMY HOOD:  Sure, Brent.
Thanks for the questions.
I think it's the exact product portfolio that we talked about last year when the impact was happening.
So let me take this opportunity to sort of walk you through those components again.
Obviously there's the very direct impact, which we talked the most about in terms of Windows Pro.
And its mix would attach to business PCs.
The other important component of that was when people bought a PC, as we talked through the year, they often took the chance on whether generally in the business segment, which impacts in our world commercial licensing as a reporting unit, to buy Office, and generally on a non-annuity basis.
So if you think about that being the next major transactional type purchase, that was driven a year ago at the first externality.
The second was in Windows VL we also saw non-annuity purchases in Windows VL, which again is in our commercial licensing segment.
So if you think about it for a product portfolio, it really is Windows and Office.
If you think about it from a reporting segment, it is the D&C licensing segment, as well as our commercial licensing segment and specifically our transactional revenue growth year-over-year.
BRENT THILL:  Okay.
And just a quick follow-up, just on the reduction in operating expenses for the full year, is this across the board, Amy, or is there a particular area that you're finding more opportunity to cut?
AMY HOOD:  Brent, thanks again.
I actually think of it as a general concept.
I think we are trying to invest behind opportunities where we see them.
Some of those are more public, as we talk about, in terms of our sales and marketing adjustments, or ad campaigns that we run like the commercial cloud.
Others, I think you don't have the opportunity to see until we launch products like we did last week where we were able to re-assort our product portfolio and really move our talent to invest in, I guess mind-blowing is the word Satya used, in terms of product portfolio in that way.
So I'm not sure that all of it, Brent, I would say is across a line in that way.
There are sort of short-term optimization and longer-term portfolio optimization that I think we've talked about this before.
I think the entire senior leadership team views it as an opportunity to think about where we can best innovate and drive the highest value of every dollar that we invest.
And I think we've made great progress as a team.
I think you're seeing that both in the long-term guidance and in, frankly, our day-to-day execution through the quarter.
SATYA NADELLA:  And I would just add that we are also making pretty significant changes in just the very workflow of our engineering teams, and that also leads to us getting more out of our current investment.
So there is significant, I would say, combination of culture change, as well as how we work change that drives more innovation for same dollar.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Brent.
We'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi:  Hi, thanks.
Two questions, one on execution it sounds like you highlighted some issues in Japan and we've heard about VAT from other companies.
Can you just talk about what youre doing to address some of those issues and is there any concern that that might spread beyond what you've seen in Japan and China.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Walter.
Is that both of your questions?  I just want to make sure I get them.
WALTER PRITCHARD:  I'm just trying to understand generally that issue.
I had one other, but if there's time.
SATYA NADELLA:  I'll tell you.
I'll just start by talking about China.
We have in China currently a set of geopolitical issues that we are working through.
We are very committed to China as a market.
We have, in fact, pockets of good growth in China, with our cloud doing fairly well.
But, at the same time we are grounded in the fact that we need more work to do and we are working through them and when they work out we'll let you know.
AMY HOOD:  And I'll talk a little bit about Japan.
And, Walter, to answer your question, I don't have any concerns that that expands essentially on this unique issue beyond Japan.
With Windows end of XP, plus the VAT increase, I do think, as well as some of the macro-economic environment, it tightens far faster than we had anticipated.
And Japan in particular, because of its model for us, it is a non-annuity geography for us.
So impacts in Japan more directly come to the P&L, as opposed to on our unearned, or C&B balances, and that's why this quarter you saw some weakness in commercial licensing.
But, when adjusted for FX, or unearned balance, bookings actually felt quite good from a commercial perspective.
WALTER PRITCHARD:  And then just one question on the Office 365 Commercial.
Can you talk about deployment rates there?  I know you've done a good job of getting those in to contracts.
How many customers are actually running it, running their e-mail and SharePoint and other products in the cloud versus just having the rights to it.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Walter.
I think with all products, I think about the complete sales cycle and I'm really encouraged by the fact that we are doing a good job of moving from the initial sales through deployment, through adding on services, and back to renewals.
And I think the importance of that customer life cycle is really how we think about our workloads and our workload health in the cloud.
The workload that we're furthest along on is obviously Exchange.
It happens to also come with directory implementation.
And so we generally think of a fast deployment and then adding on workloads and premium cycles.
And then as you might imagine that provides an interesting environment for us to add on some of the products actually that Satya mentioned very directly in his comments, such as EMS, or Enterprise Mobility Suite.
So while I think there's always a lag, the actual goal is the commitment that the customer showed to the movement to the cloud and then moving them quickly as we can, but also at their own pace through deployment.
CHRIS SUH:  Great, thank you.
Thanks, Walter.
We'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
KEITH WEISS, Morgan Stanley:  Excellent.
Thank you guys for taking our questions.
I just want to dig into Windows OEM ASPs a little bit and just try to sort of better understand the dynamic between sort of what we see in the marketplace when we look at industry analysts that we're looking at basically sort of flat to slightly down unit growth.
And the down 13 percent OEM revenue growth that you guys are seeing.
Some of this mix, and some of this ASP, I was wondering if you could help us put a little bit more color on it in terms of exactly what that ASP dynamic is going on in terms of these lower entry level editions.
What's that doing to the overall ASP of what you're able to extract from the market?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Keith.
I'll take the opportunity actually to do it for both Pro as well as non-Pro, because I wasn't sure which category you were talking about.
Let me start at the highest level, which is if I look at industry analysts as well as many of our peers in the ecosystem, I actually think we agree with most of the benchmarks in terms of PC unit health across business, which has been stable since FY '13, and across consumer where we've seen meaningful progress made in unit growth both last quarter and especially this one.
So then I'll take a second and talk about sort of the distinction between the revenue growth versus the unit growth.
Let me start first in Pro.
There, there are really two key dynamics.
The first is the return to the XP levels that we saw prior to the XP refresh.
They are consistent.
The dynamic mix in terms of emerging markets and developed as well as enterprise sizing is not an ASP problem in Pro.
It is a return to the attach level we saw before.
The component that actually is impactingthe second component in Pro that is an "ASP/mix" comment is the academic licenses I referred to earlier where we did lower the price and saw an increased unit number.
So that was a second component of the revenue piece.
But the larger component was the XP reversion.
And, again, that's not an ASP comment.
When you come to non-Pro, I think this really refers back to Satya's comments, which is we saw device growth in low price devices, opening price points.
We actually made, I believe, a strategic decision to increase our ability to put devices on the shelf, especially at retail, at prices under $200 to $249 is how to think about the price points that were the most impacted.
We do have the Windows with Bing SKU there.
It is a lower RPL than our traditional non-Pro OEM license.
But I do believe it drove meaningful ecosystem health and as well drove good competitive dynamics in the channel.
And so overall while it did have an RPL impact which does explain, along with mix shift, the minus 13 percent in non-Pro OEM versus the PC license growth that we saw.
I think clearly Satya covered the actual logic to that in terms of overall ecosystem health, which we feel quite good about.
KEITH WEISS:  And if I could squeeze in one follow-up, have you guys done any assessment in terms of the stuff you're seeing in Surface Pro 3 is definitely a sort of real productivity device.
To what extent is that cannibalistic from what would have been Windows PC sales and to what extent do you think you're expanding the market opportunity with that device?
SATYA NADELLA:  I think it's definitely expanding the market opportunity.
One of the things that I feel very good about is the risk we took to introduce the two-in-one category.
And I feel now that we inspire even a lot of activity in our own OEM ecosystem, and we see many good designs coming because it's viewed as a category that drives growth.
And so from that perspective I feel good about leading, because that's one of our strategic goals, which is we want to create new categories faster, more demand for the entire ecosystem.
KEITH WEISS:  Excellent.
Thank you very much, guys.
CHRIS SUH:  We'll take the next question, please, Operator.
(Operator Direction.)
RICK SHERLUND, Nomura Securities:  Thanks.
First, Satya, could you talk about the implications of Windows 10 for a moment.
I'm thinking in terms of a new platform for innovation and maybe if you could talk about post-sale monetization, what do you think the impact is on demand in the industry and the opportunities for Microsoft around the new platform?
SATYA NADELLA:  Thanks, Rick, for the question.
As I said in my remarks, I'm very optimistic about what Windows 10 means for our customers, partners, and Microsoft.
The core idea of Windows 10 is to build a device operating system that spans the gamut from no screens to small screens to PCs and even large screens.
In fact, if you look at our innovation, we are perhaps unique in the large screen innovation that we are doing with Surface Hub, HoloLens, as well as some of the two-in-one form factors.
So overall, I think the most strategic objective for us is to get developer momentum with Windows 10, and that's where we are focusing on with a lot of different actions.
One is the one unified developer platform, which I think of as perhaps the most strategic piece of Windows 10, along with the unified store.
And now couple that with the call we have made to provide an upgrade offer.
We are creating a great opportunity for every developer to write these universal Windows applications that will run on the desktop as well as on our phone and tablets, as well as on Surface Hub and, in fact, HoloLens runs universal applications.
No one else provides that kind of a unified marketplace for developers.
And especially the changes we have made to the desktop user interface means these universal applications are, in fact, very naturally discoverable right where we have high usage, which is the desktop.
So that's the combination of things that we think are going to play out effectively.
And of course we are in beta right now, or previews right now, and getting daily feedback across all the length and breadth of Windows 10.
But overall I'm pretty optimistic of what it means, both as a platform as well as a set of end user features.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Rick.
Operator, we'll take the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Thanks, guys.
I've just got a question on the Commercial Other line.
Obviously that continues to show strong growth.
You've been calling out the cloud business, whether it be Azure or Office 365, but I just wanted to double click on the Azure side.
I was wondering if you could help us parse through sort of the Infrastructure as a Service and the Platform as a Service side, and the trends there, and any sort of joint benefit, I guess, that you're seeing of being able to offer both those two?
And also, Satya, as this business does scale and, Amy, I'd love you to chime in here, too  how do you think about the gross margin and just operating margin characteristics, once again, as the revenue just continues to grow here?
SATYA NADELLA:  Thanks, Phil.
So let me start.
Overall, what we are seeing is clearly there's increased usage of Infrastructure as a Service, because a lot of people will move an existing workload into the cloud.
So the interesting thing that happens once you move your initial workload is you build around it, especially, for example, if you move a VM with some data into the cloud, you may want to use the same data to build a mobile front-end.
And that's when you're starting to use some of our Platform-as-a-Service components, like our Azure Mobile Services, Azure Media Services.
So we see the combination, and they're not all happening coincident, but there is time lag in it.
Therefore, that's one of the reasons why we want to be very aggressive in getting the workloads onto Azure, both storage and compute, and even in the storage and compute we now have premium offerings for higher SLA, for higher performance, higher VM sizes.
And then, on top of that, we have these managed services, which have a different margin profile, so Media Services; Mobile Services; Web, which is another place where we actually have a lot of traction.
And then that's all just on Azure.
Once you get beyond Azure, you have things like CRM Online.
You have Enterprise Mobility Suite, and of course the Office 365 lineup.
And when we think about our capital and, in fact, the core infrastructure, we don't have different infrastructure for these different services.
It's one common infrastructure and one common data center footprint between O365, Azure, CRM, Xbox Live, everything.
So that's why utilization of that entire infrastructure is how we think about even total return on invested capital for our cloud business.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Phil.
We'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Great.
Thank you for taking the question.
I just wanted to follow-up, Amy, your Commercial Other Business continues to have fantastic growth, and I'm just wondering when you juxtapose that with the growth in the Commercial Licensing Business, I heard you in terms of the headwinds that you face, but when we think about it more than one quarter out, think about the revenue trends as shown as you guys continue to build market share in the cloud, how do we think about the trends in the Commercial Licensing Business in the next year or so?
AMY HOOD:  Let me start by saying all-up.
So in our Commercial Business, I think we did a very good job of continuing to outpace IT spend on an overall basis and continuing to push customers to our annuity business, whether they're on premise or the cloud.
That is our strategic goal as well as impacts in both segments.
Now let me talk about sort of uniquely Commercial Licensing and how to think about it.
While I won't give specific guidance, I will talk about how to think about the impact in particular from XP.
Our transactional revenue will have a headwind from XP.
That doesn't and shouldn't be interpreted as customers not continuing to be committed, or not committing to move to annuity over the longer-term, which is exactly I think the question that you're asking.
And so while we have a comparability issue that will show itself most directly as weakness in Commercial licensing, and most specifically as weakness in Office transactional licensing, which will be a headwind, the overall goal of continuing to have more customers every quarter move to the cloud, or whether or not they move adding cloud services, even if they have on-prem, because they believe a hybrid model is actually the structural sort of guideposts we have on a multi-year journey.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Heather.
Operator, we'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
RAIMO LENSCHOW, Barclays:  Thanks for taking my question.
Two quick questions, Satya, I wanted to follow up on Phil Winslow's question earlier on Azure and the use cases here.
I mean in theory you have a huge opportunity given your installed base on the server side.
Can you talk a little bit about what you're seeing the SMB customer base doing here?  Are we kind of in mid, people trying out bursting, or where is that huge customer base in terms of adoption on Azure?
SATYA NADELLA:  On Azure itself one of the other elements that I did not actually talk about in response to Phil's question is the hybrid offering.
One of the products that's doing very, very well for us is the store simple product, which is essentially a storage product that cloud tiers virtualization storage from on-premise to the cloud.
We also have built now into Windows Server backup and disaster recovery, same thing with SQL Server.
So the first thing we are seeing is increased usage of our servers with a cloud component.
Bursting is something for sure a lot of people do, but that's more on the high end, because in the SMB segment, the real movement there is more to Office 365.
In fact, one of the things in Office 365 is we are getting people to effectively use servers, which now happens to be in cloud, who never bought servers from us ever before, because they didn't have Exchange, they didn't have Lync, they didn't have any of the core capabilities of Office 365.
So those are the two trends we are seeing.
RAIMO LENSCHOW:  Perfect and a quick follow-up for Amy.
If you look at the changes on the operating side that you talked about, it obviously seems to have a cultural shift towards more if you budget it's more dynamic budgeting, it's very much a return-based culture that you seem to be introducing here.
But, it's something that kind of needs to feed through the organization and it's more cultural change.
Where are you in terms of like innings in terms of having that fully through the organization?
AMY HOOD:  Thanks for that question.
I think we talked about this in prior quarters.
While I think many people want to see it as a finance concept, it's not.
It's a senior leadership team concept and a leadership environment that I think we're making collective decisions faster.
I think we're applying our resources to opportunities when we see them.
I think we have a freedom to make those choices quickly and I feel very good, both about the decisiveness that comes with it, but also the empowerment that we give people within our organizations to make those calls to increase our performance without wading through an annual budget process.
I think some people call it dynamic budgeting.
For us, I think it's more about thinking about opportunities we have and stack ranking those every day to improve both our execution and our returns.
RAIMO LENSCHOW:  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks.
We'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
BRENDAN BARNICLE, Pacific Crest Securities:  Thanks so much.
Amy, when we first started talking about Office 365 I think at that time you were suggesting that the move from an Office CAL to an Office 365 license would increase gross profit by about 50 percent.
Now that you've had a couple of quarters with Office 365 do you think those changes to the model still make sense and more importantly are there other changes that you've seen that are more accurate.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks for the question.
In general I think we're still on the early ends of seeing the opportunity that we have in that segment.
As you point out there's a couple of components that make gross profit dollars per seat, or the lifetime value of a customer, depending on the terms you want to use, improve and increase over the lifecycle.
The very first thing and I think Satya even mentioned it, in its most direct, SMB is moving from buying a copy of Office, which was a very static concept, to the idea where you could buy Office and frankly get all the benefits that those used to deploy servers used to get only with IT departments of their own.
So as you move Office it's simply the first step.
So even though obviously it comes at a lower gross margin percentage our ability to add workloads, add premium services and to increase our overall footprint inside a customer is really where the lifetime value goes up.
And frankly, over time and watching, I think both the creativity and the pace of innovation we've seen coming out of our engineering teams, particularly in Azure and Office 365 and our CRM team online, I actually even have more confidence in our ability to attach and grow that growth profit over time.
We mentioned simply one that didn't exist, I think, Brendan, when we first started having this conversation, which was our EMS Suite.
And I look and say those opportunities, as well as the creativity of our people I think give me more confidence not less in the structural integrity of the lifetime value of a customer argument.
BRENDAN BARNICLE:  Great, thanks so much.
CHRIS SUH:  Operator, we'll have time for one last question, please.
(Operator direction.)
ED MAGUIRE, CLSA:  Yes, thank you.
Over the last several quarters particularly, Satya, you've opened up a number of the products to different products, Office and Android, and with Minecraft and Skype you've got a number of really multi-platform products and services.
Could you quantify so far to what extent you've seen benefit and if this plays into the free upgrade for Windows 10, at least for a limited period, how you expect this to play out benefiting the business case of your products across the portfolio?
SATYA NADELLA:  Yes, so overall at the highest level our strategy here is to make sure that the Microsoft Services, i.e., cloud services, be it Azure, Office 365, CRM Online, or Enterprise Mobility Suite, are covering all the devices out there in the marketplace, so that way we maximize the opportunity we have for each of these subscription and capacity-based services.
So that's sort of the core rationale for why we are doing cross-platform.
Now, the next question is what's the uniqueness of Windows?  And the uniqueness of Windows comes because we don't think of these services and their application end points as apps, but fundamentally core to the Windows experience.
So we're building them natively into Windows.
So, for example, when you login to Windows, you are logging in with Microsoft account or Azure, really.
When you have files, they're synching with OneDrive.
Outlook is the e-mail client for Windows.
So that's how Windows will differentiate, not to mention our gaming and Xbox Live experiences.
So, overall, we will build a differentiated Windows because our application experiences for our cloud end points will be native in Windows and at a the same time will make sure that our services are available on all end points driving more usage, more subscription growth.
So the best way to measure our progress is Office 365 subscription growth, Azure growth and EMS growth.
ED MAGUIRE:  Great.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Great.
Thanks.
That wraps up the Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
We look forward to seeing many of you in the coming months at various investor conferences.
For those unable to attend in person, these events will generally be webcast and you can follow our comments at Microsoft.com/investor.
Please contact us if you need any additional details, and thank you for joining us today.
Satya Nadella, Amy Hood, Chris Suh
Thursday April 23, 2015
CHRIS SUH:  Good afternoon, and thank you for joining us today.
On the call with me are Satya Nadella, chief executive officer, Amy Hood, chief financial officer, Frank Brod, chief accounting officer, and John Seethoff, deputy general counsel.
On our website, Microsoft.com/investor, we have posted our press release and a slide deck that provides a summary of our results this quarter.
Unless otherwise specified, all growth comparisons we make on the call today relate to the corresponding period of last year.
For selected metrics, on the call and in other earnings materials, we have also provided growth rates in constant currency.
We present constant currency information to provide a framework for assessing how our underlying businesses performed excluding the effect of foreign currency rate fluctuations.
Additionally, any mention of operating expense refers to segment operating expenses as defined in the footnotes of our 10-Q, and includes research & development, sales & marketing, and general & administrative, but excludes integration & restructuring charges.
We will post the prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and in any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript on the Microsoft Investor Relations website until April 23, 2016.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements which are predictions, projections, or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Forms 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
And with that, I'll turn the call over to Satya.
SATYA NADELLA: Thank you Chris.
Good afternoon everyone.
Today, I'll focus my remarks on our three business areas   cloud, Windows and devices.
Next week at Build, our developer conference, I will share more about our ambitions and how our next generation platforms will empower every person and organization.
This quarter we delivered $21.7 billion in revenue, an increase of 6 percent year over year or 9 percent in constant currency.
We're seeing the impact of foreign exchange, geopolitical trends in certain geographies and product transitions.
We're taking steps to respond quickly and adjust our plans as needed while we continue to move forward in our transformation.
Overall, I'm pleased with our business performance.
More importantly though, it's clear that we are well on our way to transforming our products and businesses across all of Microsoft.
The early signs are evident in how customers are using our products which I'll share throughout my remarks today.
Our momentum in the cloud is a highlight   increasingly, customers are choosing Microsoft cloud services to transform their own businesses   going beyond just moving existing workloads to the cloud.
These results showcase our ability to transform, and perform simultaneously.
With that in mind, I'd like to walk you through the quarter, starting with our cloud business.
At the core of our results this quarter is incredible growth across a growing portfolio of cloud services.
Our commercial cloud business is a source of strength driven by Office 365, Azure, and Dynamics CRM.
Our commercial cloud annualized run rate now stands at $6.3 billion   marking the seventh consecutive quarter of triple digit revenue growth.
Office 365 is clearly a key growth driver.
Like any cloud service, we track how people are actually using it   and we're proud that Office 365 is a vibrant active service.
Right now, there are nearly 50 million Office 365 monthly active users inside businesses.
Exchange Online alone sees about 60 billion requests per day from all connected clients, about 70 billion transactions or user actions and there are 830 million meetings a month created in Office.
And we're increasing our Office value proposition for businesses with new mobile device management capabilities built into Office 365, and through our continued commitment to customer data compliance and security.
We released new versions of Office Delve for mobile devices, and earlier this month we rolled out Skype for Business to the Office 365 customers worldwide.
Finally, in anticipation of the release of Windows 10, we've announced a preview of the new touch-first Office Universal Apps.
Small and medium size customers are adopting Office 365 at a continued rapid pace, led by our more than 65,000 Office 365 partners.
Thirty telecommunications companies are already offering Office 365 to their Small and medium sized customers, including some of the largest in the world.
In Q3 we announced a new partnership with T-Mobile to bring Office 365 to more customers and enhanced our partnership with GoDaddy.
At Build next week I will talk even more about Office as a platform and how developers can connect into the Office framework to both harness the rich data and have their own app extensions available to ultimately a billion plus Office users.
Azure is also seeing impressive usage momentum.
Right now, more than 5 million organizations are represented in Azure Active Directory with more than 425 million identities.
Storage is also a strong indicator of consumption and we now have 50 trillion objects stored in Azure and 3x growth year over year in storage transactions   more than 5 trillion in March alone.
And, Azure websites are growing with nearly half a million sites hosted.
Beyond strong usage of our existing services, we're excited by the customer response to our expanding portfolio of new cloud offerings.
In particular, Enterprise Mobility Suite is growing and we now have more than 13,000 enterprise customers.
And as customer adoption and usage in the cloud increases, more developers are choosing Azure for their applications.
Nearly 3 million developers are signed up for Visual Studio Online   up 2x year over year.
To foster developer innovation, we launched Azure App Service this quarter.
It offers a powerful set of development tools for creating web and mobile apps back ends for any platform or device while enabling integration with other applications, including Office 365, Dynamics, Salesforce, Facebook, Twitter, SAP, Oracle, Siebel, and many more.
We also delivered new Azure compute instances this quarter with more memory and storage than any other public cloud provider, attracting more mission critical workloads to the cloud.
And, we improved our big data capabilities with support for the latest version of Hadoop and Linux in HDInsight and improved disaster recovery with Azure Site Recovery & Backup.
We are seeing significant customer interest and adoption in Azure Machine Learning and Azure Stream Analytics, in particular for IoT scenarios.
In a world where every company has the opportunity to become a Software-as-a-Service company, a diverse set of companies like ThyssenKrupp, Toyota, Rockwell, Ford, Fujitsu and Miele are engaging with us in their transformations.
Further, our Dynamics business also has traction in the enterprise   and is now nearly a $2 billion business.
Dynamics CRM Online enterprise paid seats more than doubled year over year, and we more than doubled enterprise seats sold this quarter for ERP.
We also announced a wave of innovation in Microsoft Dynamics CRM this quarter with new social, mobile, and analytics capabilities for business process transformation, including seamless integration of Dynamics CRM with Office 365.
While our commercial cloud business is expanding dramatically, we are also seeing strong growth in our consumer cloud services.
Office 365 Consumer added an average of 1 million new customers per month and we now have more than 12 million subscribers, an increase of 35 percent over the prior quarter.
We are clearly taking Office everywhere.
Core to our mobile first strategy is to ensure that our service end points are on every mobile device, and to that end we have seen continued momentum with more than 100 million downloads of Office on iPhones, iPads, and Android tablets.
And, with the release of Outlook on iOS and Android this quarter, updates to our OneDrive applications, and a preview of the forthcoming Office for Mac, we're making Office available to even more users on more devices.
Bing achieved a significant milestone this quarter when U.S.
search share topped 20 percent, and search advertising revenue grew 21 percent.
Search is key to productivity in work and life, and it is a huge opportunity for Microsoft as we continue to innovate with Bing across our applications and platforms.
On top of that, I'm pleased with our renewed partnership with Yahoo! and our combined ability to compete more effectively in the search marketplace.
Our investments in innovation and user experience in Xbox Live are paying off.
Xbox Live users grew 18 percent year over year, helping drive increased Xbox Live usage growth by 30 percent.
When I step back and look at Office 365, Bing Search and Xbox Live collectively, I see real usage growth and monetization of our consumer services all up.
Now let's talk about Windows.
To start, our Windows revenue from business customers is stabilizing post the XP refresh anniversary, coming back inline to historical levels.
We're also transforming the Consumer Windows business to adapt to the changing market dynamics including lower price point devices.
This quarter, while non Pro revenue declined, activations were up.
Importantly, we are now at a place where we can start to see early signs of how usage increases in services like search and gaming can drive new monetization opportunities over the lifetime of a Windows consumer device
Windows is a tremendous asset for Microsoft with more than 1.5 billion users.
This means every day, hundreds of millions of people are using Windows and Windows applications   in fact, more than 16 million unique apps are used on a monthly basis, from PCs running Windows 7 and later.
We are focused on making Windows 10 the most loved version of Windows ever.
Perhaps, most importantly, last quarter I talked about how Windows 10 will be a service across an array of devices and will usher in a new era of more personal computing.
An era where the mobility of the experience, not the device, is paramount.
We look forward to sharing a lot more about Windows 10 at Build next week.
In our device portfolio, Surface adoption continues across enterprise and consumer customers, with 44% revenue growth year over year.
And, 64% of Surface Pro 3 users use OneNote   9 times that of any other touch laptop.
This shows how great hardware innovation influences customer experience and usage.
We are looking forward to Surface 3 availability next month   a device that has received positive reviews for being a superior, versatile device at a lower price point.
We continue to demonstrate momentum in the value smart phone segment of the phone market, driving 18 percent growth in Lumia volume this quarter.
However, we need to take further action to reduce our costs across devices as we execute on our Windows 10 first party hardware plans.
I'm excited that next week I'll be able to talk much more extensively about our ambitions and the opportunity ahead to two important audiences: developers at Build and our investor community at the Financial Analyst Briefing in San Francisco.
Before I turn it over to Amy, I want to close by reflecting on Microsoft's transformation to a company that will thrive   and help our customers thrive   in a mobile-first, cloud-first world.
This is a new world with new growth.
It's a world that requires fundamental transformation in products, business models and delivery models across Microsoft.
In 2008, we started our transformation by taking an iconic franchise, Office, to the cloud.
We took the next big step forward five years ago when we launched Azure, and another step forward with the recent announcement of Windows 10 as a service.
Microsoft's overall transformation isn't about a one for one shift.
It's about delivering new value to more customers and unlocking new growth opportunities.
To do this, we'll continue to push forward with big ambitions and persistence while delivering solid performance.
With that, I'll hand it over to Amy to talk about this quarter's results in greater detail.
I look forward to rejoining you after to answer questions.
Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks,  Satya and good afternoon everyone.
We are pleased with our execution in the third quarter.
In our commercial business, we continued to see healthy underlying fundamentals with strong renewals of volume license annuity contracts, mix shift to cloud offerings and solid bookings.
Importantly, you can see the progress we are making in the execution of our cloud strategy as the percentage of our revenue from annuity contracts in our commercial business continues to rise.
As Satya highlighted, we also saw momentum in strategic businesses we have been investing in such as Bing, Xbox Live and Surface which have a key role in our plans to further monetize Windows devices.
Like most multi-national companies, the strengthening of the US dollar has had a significant impact on our reported results.
Accordingly, when applicable, I will give growth rates in both GAAP and constant currency to help you better understand the underlying business demand.
Revenue was $21.7 billion, up six percent, and nine percent in constant currency.
Gross Margin grew one percent, and four percent in constant currency.
We improved our gross margin percentage year-over-year in each of our segments again this quarter, reflecting our ongoing focus on operational excellence.
Operating income declined five percent.
Adjusting for both integration and restructuring expense of $190 million as well as the negative $87 million impact from FX, operating income declined one percent.
Earnings per share was $0.61 cents, which includes a two cent negative impact from FX, and one cent of integration and restructuring expense.
As a reminder, FX movements first impact our bookings growth and unearned revenue on the balance sheet.
Each quarter, our contracted not billed balance is adjusted to reflect current FX rates.
When FX rates move rapidly as they have in the past 6 months, bookings growth can be significantly impacted.
This was the case again this quarter, as bookings grew two percent, however when measured on a constant currency basis, bookings grew nine percent.
Unearned revenue was up four percent year-over-year to $20.2 billion, and seven percent in constant currency.
Total unearned revenue was slightly below expectations driven primarily by a stronger than expected mix of sales that are recognized in the current period.
From a geographic perspective, the US outperformed our expectations.
This relative strength in the US resulted in roughly one point less of constant currency impact than we expected in our commercial business.
China, Russia and Japan were generally in line with our expectations.
I want to touch briefly on what we are seeing in Japan, given it's our second largest market from a revenue perspective.
Revenue was down $550 million, which is nearly four points of growth for the whole Company.
With high Office attach to PCs, revenue is particularly sensitive to the underlying PC market dynamics.
Q3 was the toughest comparable due to both XP end of support, and the V-A-T increase which went into effect last April 1st.
The impact is most evident in our D&C and Commercial licensing segments.
The macro economic climate remains challenging as well in Japan, and we don't expect this to change in the short term.
With that backdrop, I will now move to a detailed discussion of our results.
Starting with Windows.
Q3 last year was the peak of the XP refresh cycle, evidenced by Windows Pro revenue growth of 19 percent.
This growth significantly outpaced the underlying PC market, driven by higher attach of Pro particularly with large enterprise customers in developed markets.
This quarter Pro revenue declined by 19 percent, and is essentially flat to our Q3 FY13 levels as both business PCs and Pro mix in that segment returned to pre XP refresh levels.
For Windows non-Pro, as we talked about last quarter, inventory in the channel was higher than normal.
This quarter, activations grew, and we exited Q3 with channel inventories at more normal levels.
This channel inventory reduction was the main driver of our Windows non-Pro revenue decline.
We continued to see a mix shift to opening price point PCs, which impacted license mix and aggregate ASP.
However, it was significantly less than the impact in Q2 when holiday sales favor lower price point PCs.
Office Consumer revenue in D&C Licensing was down 41 percent this quarter, due primarily to the shift of purchasing towards Office 365 Consumer where we now have 12.4 million subscribers.
This transition to Office 365 accounted for 27 points of that decline and the impact of Japan's PC market the remaining 14 points.
Excluding Japan, we grew our combined consumer Office licenses by 10 percent.
Revenue in our Devices and Consumer Other segment grew 25 percent, and 28 percent in constant currency, exceeding our expectations.
Many of our growth efforts are represented in this segment and we made terrific progress this quarter across Office 365, Bing and Xbox Live transactions.
Gross margin expanded again, benefiting from the increased scale in our services.
Inclusive of the estimated impact of the Yahoo agreement reached last week, we remain confident in our goal of Bing profitability in FY 16.
Moving to hardware.
Revenue from Xbox consoles declined largely due to a mix shift of Xbox One consoles to lower ASP SKUs as well as the impact of the launch supply from a year ago.
With Surface, we saw 53 percent constant currency revenue growth driven by strong retail sales and attach of accessories.
On phones, we sold 8.6 million Lumia devices, and have gained share in key markets such as the UK and Germany over the course of the year. Gross margin declined sequentially, driven by lower Q3 revenue, and approximately $60 million of negative impact from foreign currency relative to Q2 FX rates.
We have made significant progress in reducing the operating expense base in the Phone business, moving from an annualized rate of $4.5 billion at acquisition to a run rate under $2.5 billion.
That said, the changing mix of our portfolio to the value segment and the significant negative headwind from FX will impact our ability to reach operational break even in FY16. In response, we have in Q3 and will continue in Q4 to aggressively focus on our operating cost base by pursuing efficiencies in both COGS and operating expenses.
We will focus those efforts across our entire first party device portfolio even while expanding into new form factors such as HoloLens and SurfaceHub.
Moving now to our commercial results, where revenue grew five percent, or seven percent in constant currency.
Commercial bookings declined one percent on a reported basis, but grew ten percent in constant currency.
The underlying health of the business remains very strong, despite the negative impact from specific geos and prior year XP comparables.
The transition of our customers to cloud and subscription annuity services is a critical element of our business transformation.
To provide ongoing transparency into our progress, we have added a new KPI, commercial annuity mix.
This quarter 82 percent of our commercial revenue came from annuity revenue streams, which is up five points from last year.
While quarter to quarter the mix can vary with the uneven growth rates we've seen in transactional licensing before and after the XP refresh cycle, the overall trend clearly reflects the meaningful progress that we have made.
Office Commercial products and services declined two percent, but grew one percent in constant currency.
Japan was a three point drag.
We successfully renewed a large volume of annuity contract expirations in Q3, at healthy levels in line with historical rates.
And, we continue to see a strong shift from traditional licensing to Office 365 across our business customers.
In each of the last three quarters, we have added more Office 365 seats than transactional licenses with SMB customers.
Server products and services continue to exhibit strong momentum, with revenue growth of 12 percent, and 16 percent in constant currency.
Our portfolio is well positioned to meet the needs of our customers for their private, public and hybrid cloud solutions.
Adoption of our premium products remains strong, and revenue grew 25 percent across our premium offerings for SQL, System Center and Windows Server.
Overall, revenue from our commercial cloud services more than doubled again this quarter.
Enterprise penetration is accelerating, with over half of all agreements signed during the quarter including cloud services.
Within Office 365, premium workloads now make up more than 50 percent of the installed base and we are seeing strong attach of our enterprise mobility solutions to Office 365.
Azure usage grew rapidly this quarter, and Dynamics CRM Online benefitted from strong customer growth.
Moving now to operating expenses, which were favorable to our guidance, driven by decisions that we made during the quarter to both reduce spending and continue to reallocate resources to accelerate growth in key areas.
For instance, in markets where we are facing challenges, we reduced our sales and marketing spend to reflect the current environment.
And, as I mentioned earlier in my comments on our Phone business, we took further actions to lower our cost base.
Across the company, we continued to prioritize and reallocate our spend to activities with the highest impact.
The result was that operating expenses grew four percent for the company.
Normalizing for the approximately $300 million year-over- year benefit from FX and the addition of $570 million related to Phone, operating expenses grew just one percent.
Our effective tax rate was 24 percent, which is five points higher than last year.
The increase is primarily driven by the inclusion of Phone results and our changing geographic mix.
We returned $7.5 billion to shareholders this quarter, which is an increase of $3 billion from Q2.
This change is consistent with our objective to increase capital return to shareholders with a focus on value.
With that overview of the current quarter, let me now turn to our outlook for the fourth quarter.
I will start with a few overall comments for additional context.
The guidance that we are providing is based on current FX rates, and should actual rates differ, they would be reflected in our financial results.
As a reminder, in our annuity businesses, the FX impact is first reflected in our unearned revenue as it is based on rates when the contract is billed, then into the P&L at that same rate as the revenue is recognized generally over the next year.
In Q4, unearned revenue will reflect three quarters of billings with the stronger US dollar, which will negatively impact year-over-year comparables.
Likewise, we will be recognizing a higher percentage of revenue from periods with the stronger US dollar than both the recently completed Q3 and also the prior year comparison.
In total, we expect that FX will impact revenue growth by approximately four points in Q4, with the majority of impact in our commercial segments.
While XP related comparables remain tough for Q4, we are starting to anniversary the XP benefits from last year.
Finally, from a geographic perspective, we expect the year-over-year declines in Japan to continue.
With that additional context, I will now move to our specific guidance, starting with Devices and Consumer.
In Licensing, in Q4 last year, we recognized $382 million of revenue related to the end of the commercial agreement with Nokia which will impact year-over-year growth trends.
For this Q4 we expect revenue to be $3.2 to $3.4 billion.
This range reflects the anniversary of XP, the impact of the Japanese economy, and an anticipated draw down of inventories in the PC ecosystem ahead of the release of Windows 10 this summer.
Within consumer Office, we expect similar trends to Q3, including the continued transition to Office 365 subscriptions.
In Computing and Gaming Hardware, with the addition of Surface 3, we expect revenue to be $1.5 to $1.6 billion.
In Phone Hardware, we expect revenue to be $1.3 to $1.4 billion, with continued momentum in value smartphones and anticipated declines in non-Lumia phones.
Gross margins will reflect similar dynamics to Q3.
In Devices and Consumer Other, we expect revenue to be $2.1 to $2.2 billion, with continued growth in Bing, Office 365 and Xbox Live transactions.
In Commercial Licensing, we expect revenue of $10.5 to $10.6 billion with a continuing shift to annuity.
This range reflects roughly four points of negative impact from FX in addition to the factors that I discussed earlier.
In Commercial Other, we expect momentum to continue in our Commercial Cloud, and revenue of $3.0 to $3.1 billion.
And, in Corporate, we don't expect any revenue impact.
We expect COGS to be $7.2 to $7.4 billion, with variability being driven by both hardware segments.
We expect operating expenses to be $8.4 to $8.5 billion.
This range implies that our full year operating expenses will be roughly $2 billion below our initial guidance for the year   while still investing in key growth opportunities across R&D and sales.
We have benefited from FX, but the biggest driver has been our ongoing cost discipline and prioritization efforts.
In Q4 we expect to incur $100 million in integration expenses, and separately, another $100 million in restructuring expenses.
As a reminder, other income and expense includes dividend and interest income, offset by interest expense and the net cost of hedging.
Given the current FX environment, we expect our net cost of hedging to increase, and other income and expense to be negative $200 million.
We expect our Q4 tax rate to be 22 to 24 percent.
In Q4, we expect CAPEX to sequentially increase in support of our growing cloud business.
And we expect unearned revenue will grow sequentially in line with historical seasonality excluding the foreign currency impact.
In closing, as you heard from Satya, we are making progress on our strategic goals and are seeing our focused investments land in differentiated products, customer usage and sales results.
Customers are seeing and embracing our innovation, leading to increased usage of our cloud services and a transition towards subscription and multi-year purchasing.
We continue to invest aggressively to capture opportunities where we see competitive advantages, while also becoming more efficient to accelerate our pace of innovation.
We encourage you next week to watch the webcasts of keynotes from our BUILD developer conference.
We will share more of the innovation happening with Windows 10 and our Cloud services.
We will also host our Financial Analyst Briefing, where Satya, Kevin Turner and I will discuss how the company's transformation provides unique growth opportunities that drive increased lifetime customer value across our core businesses.
We look forward to sharing that progress with you.
And with that, let me turn it back over to Chris for Q&A.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Amy.
We'll now move to Q&A.
Operator can you please repeat your instructions.
(Operator direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Good afternoon.
You had great momentum in the cloud.
I was curious if you could just talk about the positioning, both in on-prem and cloud environments and also weave in what you're seeing with Azure.
SATYA NADELLA:  Sure, Brent.
Thanks for the question.
Overall when I think about the Microsoft cloud it's really the combination of Office 365, Dynamics, as well as Azure.
We think about our capital allocation that way, we think about our utilization, product architecture, and customer value in how uniquely we can bring these three assets together to serve our customers well.
And that's the momentum you see and I talked about the run rate, the usage metrics, and there is really increasing intensity of usage amongst organizational customers in our commercial cloud.
One of the other things that also is a huge benefit for us is because our cloud, our public cloud, runs on our software asset our software asset gets packaged up as our servers.
In fact, I think of our servers as the edge of our cloud.
So the unique capability we now have in Windows Server, SQL Server, is becoming that much more competitive, because are running our public cloud in it and that's what anyone deploying their own private cloud expects to have.
And so you see the two sides, or benefits in two sides for us, one is in our cloud momentum, which itself is the combination of SaaS applications, PaaS, and IaaS, which I believe is unique in the marketplace, as well as the software itself is packaged up into our private cloud offerings, be it Windows Server, or SQL Server, and they're becoming increasingly competitive in the enterprise and data center editions.
And so that's what you see in our commercial results, both on the licensing side, as well as on the cloud side.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Brent.
We'll move to the next question please.
(Operator direction.)
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi.
Thanks, guys, and congrats on a great quarter.
I just wanted to focus in on Office 365, because several of those metrics really jumped out to us.
It seemed like overall revenue between commercial and D&C for Office 365 was up over 100 percent and if you look at the consumer, or just user count, it was up pretty huge just quarter-to-quarter there.
So the question is sort of both Satya and Amy.
So, Satya, when you think about sort of the positioning and sort of where we are in the just adoption lifecycle of Office 365 on the consumer side, and then we'll call it the SMB and enterprise, just sort of where are we and some sort of the inflection points there.
And then, Amy, how should we think about just sort of going forward in terms of the guidance that you gave, how we should think about sort of the financial implications of where we are in that transition from on-premise to Office 365.
SATYA NADELLA:  So let me start and, Amy, you can take it from there.
Overall I would say there's this secular movement that's happening in particular with Office 365.
Quite frankly, it's happening across the entire product portfolio of Microsoft, which is more to what I would describe as annuity relationships, as well as subscription relationships, because those are the long-term contracts, or relationships we want to have with all customers, be it consumer, be it small business, or large customers.
In all the years I've been at Microsoft it was always our dream to be able to sell more of the sophisticated capabilities of Office to individual consumers, as well as small businesses.
But it was hard to do in the previous generation, because of the server infrastructure and what I would say is sophistication of IT required.
Whereas, now with the cloud for the first time we now can serve both individuals as well as small businesses with the same kind of sophistication that in the past was exclusively available for the large enterprises.
So that's what you see when we see our subscription growth in consumer, we see subscription growth in small business, these are folks who never bought a server from us.
So that's what we are seeing is increasing what I would call annuity relationships and subscription relationships with all classes of customers and it's new penetration.
So it's not even a one-for-one replacement.
Even for the enterprise customer their consumption is going up.
They may have consumed one or two workloads, but now they can have the opportunity to consume the entirety of the portfolio and not just that.
If you look at the products in Office 365 that we have, take e-discovery, it's a complete new space for us, where we are able to do things in security, e-discovery, enterprise management that we didn't even do for the top end of the enterprise in the server side.
So that's what we are seeing.
AMY HOOD:  And, Phil, on the mass that sits behind that, it's a good timing.
Next week at the financial analyst briefing I'll spend and have a lot more time to explain the actual lifetime value of each of these customer segments, especially in Office 365.
But, I think in consumer it's maybe the easiest one to talk about is that we talked about license growth of 10 percent, when you correct for Japan.
Our ability to quickly I think move our customer base through stronger execution, both direct, through retail, having our channel execute well and partner with us on this transition, I do think we've made a lot of progress.
And maybe more importantly, we continue to innovate in the product and deliver value to the end user, which is really what matters.
So I think we'll be able to show the progress we've made over every quarter and give you some goals going forward.
So I look forward to having the chance to spend more time on that in detail.
And SMB looks very similar in some ways.
They purchase similarly.
It was bought with a PC.
It was bought one time.
It was infrequent with an inability, as Satya said, to add workloads.
So I think those are some of the bigger transitions you've seen for us in terms of being able to increase the value.
So hopefully we'll be able to give you more details on that next week.
PHILLIP WINSLOW:  I've been waiting for those good details for years, so I appreciate that.
Thanks, guys.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Phil.
Next question, please, operator.
(Operator Direction.)
KEITH WEISS, Morgan Stanley:  Excellent.
And I thank you guys for taking the question, and very nice quarter.
I think one of the highlights of the past year has definitely been the expense control, and I guess you could call it like a normalized OPEX growth of just 1 percent of the quarter seems to be very impressive.
How should investors, how should we think about the sustainability of that expense control, or how long can you keep sort of investing for these growth initiatives, like cloud, yet keep the overall OPEX growth rate so low on a go-forward basis?
SATYA NADELLA:  Let me start, and then I'll have Amy add.
Overall, the core of how I want us to approach expenses is to make sure that we are not limited in our ability to invest in categories where we have unique things to contribute.
So we're going to do that, though, with great discipline, and that's what I think you've seen us do over the course of the last year, and we'll continue to exhibit that.
But at the same time, we will not shrink away from our ability to go put investment, be it in sales, marketing, or product R&D, when we clearly have unique things in secular categories of growth and that's something that we have the capability of doing, and we want to be able to do that in a disciplined way.
AMY HOOD:  And I would just add, I generally think about two key items that we've been able to think about across the leadership team.
First, I think we have exhibited an increasing ability over the course of the year to reallocate during the year, both at the organization level and at the team level to make sure our dollars are going to the highest ROI things.
And, secondly, I think it's a general belief held at the highest levels of the company that operating efficiency increases our ability to be responsive, both to the needs of our customers as well as innovate faster inside this place.
I think when you take those two things along with what Satya said, being able to balance disciplines, focus and execution for us, I think we feel very good about the progress we've made.
KEITH WEISS:  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Keith.
Next question, please, operator.
(Operator Direction.)
RICK SHERLUND, Nomura Securities:  Thank you.
Satya, you mentioned a year ago that we're going to see a next generation of personal productivity software.
I wonder if you could update us on what that means and when we might see that?  Is this an extension of Office 365 or how do we monetize those products, and when will we hear more about them?
And, Amy, we didn't see any tech guarantees in the quarter for the upcoming Windows 10 launch, and we also haven't heard anything more about changes in accounting for Windows 10 given that there is going to be a big undelivered element there.
Is that something we should expect to hear more about next week?
SATYA NADELLA:  Sure, let me start.
Thanks, Rick.
When I think about even just my own day-to-day usage of Office, even in the last year it's gone through a drastic amount of change.
Of course I use Word, PowerPoint, Excel, Outlook on a daily basis.
But if I think about all the tools that I'm using, which is all part of Office 365 today on a daily basis, and multiple times a day.
I start my day, as I've talked about in many conferences, with Delve, which is a tool I love, which is in fact something that's uniquely possible because of the shift to Office 365, where we can take organizational data and breakthrough all the boundaries of org and silos inside an organization, and have people discover information.
It's the richest way for me to visualize what's happening at Microsoft in real time.
That newsfeed for me is sort of the life's blood of Microsoft.
I use Power BI, one of the things that we talked a lot about as usage.
In fact, one of the cultural changes inside the company is everyone from the front line engineer to the front line sales person is responsible for usage.
And given that, we want to have these leading indicators showing up in our dashboard, not as static reports.
And Power BI is this rich canvas for us to be able to, one, visualize data as well as ask natural language questions.
I look at my own usage of OneNote in Surface, that's gone through a sea change both because of the hardware innovation, innovation in Windows, innovation in Office.
I look at something like Sway, which I'm pretty excited about, because basically we're taking the concept of what is an interactive document and a website and bringing it all together into these Sway documents, if you will.
And we're excited about what that could mean in customer service, marketing or for school reports.
So we're well into it.
This is not going to be waiting for some future date to release anything that's new, but we're well on our way with all of these tools, and they're available today.
And we'll, of course, be iterating continuously.
AMY HOOD:  And, Rick, on your other two questions specific to the tech guarantee that you would think about this time of year, due to the specific nature of the offer we have on Windows 10, there won't be a tech guarantee as you think about it for this upgrade cycle.
There's disclosure, in fact, in our revenue recognition section in the 10-Q that talks about that specifically.
When we talk about the accounting for Windows 10, I will touch on that next week, but as we get closer to the launch, we'll go into more specifics.
SATYA NADELLA:  And I'm so excited about this space that I don't want to miss this one other scenario, which is Cortana, that's perhaps the thing that's going to change personal productivity the most, and especially with Windows 10 and how Cortana comes to Windows both to the browser as well as to the Start I think can completely change what personal productivity software means from a day-to-day experience as well.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Rick.
Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
MARK MOERDLER, Sanford Bernstein:  Satya, Amy, congrats on the quarter.
Thank you for taking my question.
So if Windows OEM Pro has now stabilized, excluding the bump that we saw from XP refresh, and volume licensing, at least in constant currency, is stable growing, should we figure that we've now started to turn the corner on commercial Windows revenue?
In addition, where do you think we are on the consumer side on the non-OEM Pro?  Is that still going to continue to shrink for a bit?
AMY HOOD:  Let me take that, and Satya you can add at the end, if you want.
No, I think, Mark, you're reading it correctly.
We've actually had our annuity volume licensing business, as you know, has been showing growth and stability for a while.
And as we talked about Pro is back to the pre-XP levels.
And while you could see some fluctuation, I think this has been a very stable business for us for a long period of time when you take out that XP bump from last year.
Talking about consumer, I think frankly Satya and I both reflected a bit on it in our comments.
We do expect to see some additional inventory drawdown in front of a launch.
That's not unusual prior to a launch cycle.
And that will clearly impact our revenue in the quarter.
But I think as I look to '16, I'm excited about the designs we've seen.
I'm excited about products that are possible with Windows 10, and I think we feel good and are looking forward to sharing some of that excitement next week.
SATYA NADELLA:  Yes.
The one thing I would also add is, there is actually a much more fundamental transformation happening even with how we think about Windows and its delivery, and we'll talk more about this even at our Financial Analyst Briefing next week, because I increasingly think about the lifetime value we can deliver to the user of a Windows device, be it in consumer or even in the enterprise.
And if you think about when we say Windows is a service, it's actually a pretty profound construct which involves us being able to not only think about what ships with OEMs, but how do we on a continuous basis, if it's the consumer we have things now in the store, we have subscriptions, we have gaming, and then when it comes to the enterprise there is management, security, servicing, which is all unique value.
So there is going to be an increasing emphasis in the concept of lifetime value that we can deliver to customers.
MARK MOERDLER:  Perfect.
I really do appreciate it, thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Mark.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Mark.
Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
JOHN DIFUCCI, Jeffries:  Thanks.
It sounds like cloud and Azure represents an opportunity to transition existing customers to a cloud model, but also to expand your customer base or penetration into your current customer base, incremental business is what I'm talking about.
I would think that most of Office 365, because most people were already on Office, represents transition from the license model.
But so far, and I know it's still early, but so far what about the rest?  Can you give us an idea of how much of this is new business, and how much of this is transition business?
SATYA NADELLA:  Let me start, and then you can add.
I think you have to sort of look at all the use cases.
In fact, as I said, a lot of the Azure use case, I think you referenced this, has been non-zero sum, because our people started building their mobile backend, web backend, using big data, not workloads we have.
I look at sort of everyday usage growth, even if they're creating a web workload, it's for a very different type of web backend and mobile backend.
And the same thing with advanced analytics, I even look at the growth of virtual machine instances on Azure, we not only see Windows Server obviously, but we see 20-plus percent of Linux growth.
So that's again a non-zero sum.
So there's significant traction we have in terms of moving beyond just one-for-one shift of a workload that traditionally ran on our server to our Azure cloud.
In fact, if anything the majority of what we are seeing is new.
Even in Office 365 it's not just one-for-one shift.
Of course, if you're using as a large enterprise Exchange and you move to Office 365 you move to using Exchange Online, the same thing is true for SharePoint.
But, again, take all the other things I described, Power BI, Delve, and the list goes on, take e-discovery, even for the largest of enterprises these were things that had low penetration, or low-deployment.
And so we are seeing increasing usage of it.
The same thing with our Dynamics business.
EMS, it's completely a new category.
We never had that kind of a management footprint.
We now have the ability to have one control plane for IT for all the devices, identity management, device management, data protection, that's a new workload.
So that's what we are seeing.
We definitely are seeing one-for-one migration, but the opportunity in every one of our offerings, from Office 365 to Dynamics, to Azure, has a non-zero sum component to it.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Thanks, Satya.
I just want to be clear, because you said something.
I mean other than Office 365 did you say the majority of the cloud business is new business?  Again, I know it can't be -- maybe you know exactly what it is.
But, I'm sure some of it is somewhat cloudy, no pun intended, or vague.
But, do you think most of it at this point is new business, is that what I heard you say?
SATYA NADELLA:  Yes, and also it sort of comes in interesting ways, because one of the things IT as you know it's not about sort of replacing what you have it's always augmenting what you have.
A very classic scenario would be I'll take a SQL database, application, bring it to the cloud and then build a new mobile backend using the same data.
So reuse of code, reuse of data, so you will use some amount of IaaS infrastructure and then PaaS consumption.
So that's one of the very typical enterprise solutions you will see.
In fact, our own IT systems take what we have done with HR, and our financial systems, and some of those things, as they move to the cloud we bring some existing and then add to it.
AMY HOOD:  And, John, to your specific question, you're right.
A lot of the Azure is, a good way to think about that is new, and especial your Dynamics business, CRM Online and some of the work we've done across AX, is certainly all new.
And the lower down in the segment of Office you get the more new it is, is the way to think about it.
JOHN DIFUCCI:  Great, thank you very much.
CHRIS SUH:  Next question please.
(Operator direction.)
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi:  Hi, just a follow up to the question that John had on Azure.
You know Amazon released their profitability for the first time on AWS and it was I think higher than most people were expecting.
I'm wondering how we should think about your mix of business in Azure, you're running Linux, you're running a lot of the services based on open source software, you're also running some of your own IP there.
How should we think about where your margins are today and should we think of Amazon's AWS margins as a good benchmark for where you could be at the sort of scale they're at today?
SATYA NADELLA:  First of all, I don't think of the comparison between Azure and AWS as the True North for me.
I think about the Microsoft cloud, because even the way we do capital, the way we measure utilization, is all with the complete unit, which is of course all of Office 365 runs on Azure, Azure AD powers all of our cloud.
So it's really its entirety that we think of as our unique value.
So that means we have SaaS, which is a huge component between O365 and Dynamics, PaaS, which is a huge component of Azure itself.
We see many customers who will use, even, our PaaS services and even AWS.
So for example, you can in fact do single sign-on using EMS and Azure AD in Azure and use your resources on AWS.
And then of course we have our IaaS business.
So that's how we think about it.
And then it's reflected even in our margins.
So when we look at our cloud margins they will have a revenue quality, which is very different that's a combination of PaaS, IaaS, and SaaS.
And that's how we want to make sure we make progress, because that's from both product value, which is unique to us, and also the quality of revenue that's unique to us.
But, the one other thing that -- see, my world view is not that all compute storage networks it just goes to one place, that's why I think of our servers as the edge of our cloud and as I said there's a huge software asset in there, which is becoming increasingly competitive.
Of course, we don't count that in our run rates, or when we talk about our $6-plus billion run rate, that's just pure public cloud number and that's fantastic to see.
And we want to measure it that way.
But, quite frankly, if you sort of looked at what's broadly happening in the cloud transition, we are participating in both the private hybrid cloud, as well as the public cloud.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Walter.
WALTER PRITCHARD:  Amy, on OPEX, you have I guess not necessarily you, but the company generally at this time has given some color into the next fiscal year's OPEX.
Is that something we should expect at the BUILD event with your analyst meeting next week?  I'm, sure you're not going to give it to us today, or right here, but I just wanted to figure out expectations around when we should hear about that.
AMY HOOD:  We'll continue to talk generally about it.
I don't expect to give specific guidance on FY '16 next week.
CHRIS SUH:  Okay, Walter.
WALTER PRITCHARD:  Thank you very much.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks.
We'll go to the next question please.
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Great.
I had two questions.
One was related to the success of the sub-$250 machines that you guys in the market have been seeing.
And just what geos have seen the best uptake for those so far.
And then just if there's a little bit more color you could share about the drivers of the commercial licensing business and I recognize obviously that you guys just gave guidance for Q4.
But, as kind of as we look over the next year or two what are the big puts and takes in particular maybe on the server and tools side that we need to think about?
SATYA NADELLA:  I'll start.
I think as far as the low-cost devices, it's pretty broad.
I think we think of the U.S.
itself being, in fact, a big driver of some of the growth on the consumer side.
We're also obviously stimulated this so that we can be much more effective even in the educational markets worldwide.
And Amy can add to that if we have any more detail on it.
When it comes to our commercial licensing and our servers, it's the same trend, Heather, which is the big shift that's happening is our enterprise and data center products, be it Windows Server, System Center, SQL Server, are more competitive.
It's the same thing that I would say at least in the last couple of years clearly are played out.
There is clearly -- and, in fact, as our products have become competitive, there's been this mix shift.
People who have bought from us previous just standard editions are able to now look at our enterprise editions, and that's what is playing out.
And there's definitely some pricing action we were able to take, but mostly because we were able to deliver this incremental value.
And even with all the pricing action we took, we, from a total cost of ownership, or just raw pricing perspective, are very competitive versus what's available in the market.
So that's what we see.
And so these cycles, some of the pricing actions obviously will anniversary out, but the overall thing that I'm focused on is how can we continue to run our software asset ourselves in public cloud and translate that into our servers, and really paint this vision and make it a reality of hybrid computing, and drive the secular growth of that.
HEATHER BELLINI:  Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks, Heather.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Heather.
We'll have time for one more question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
MARK MURPHY, J.P.
Morgan:  Thank you.
Satya, I'm wondering what inning you think we are in in terms of building out the next generation data centers that you'll need to support the commercial cloud.
For example, do you think you have built out data center capacity to support the commercial cloud business all the way to a $10 billion run rate, or a $20 billion run rate?  So if there's any way you can help us to try to gauge how much overhead you have in the capacity, and perhaps what type of data center footprint you envision a few years down the road?
SATYA NADELLA:  In fact, one of the big changes that has happened, I would say, in the last couple of years, and I'll have Amy even detail out, is the way we are going about everything from the very long lead things like actual data center locations and build outs to the procurement of individual machines and essentially the work in progress inventory of that.
We have driven significant process improvement to essentially make it as efficient as one can make it, and that's a continuous process for us.
So when I think about even the capital allocations per quarter, we very carefully look at what is our current utilization forecast, and what our demand forecast is, and we now have the ability to be much more dynamic.
Surely there are some things which are long lead, like data center location, but you don't need to build out data centers much before they're really being utilized.
So we have a very good process, and that's a place where, quite frankly, a lot of the proprietary advantage of someone who is an at-scale public cloud provider, not just with one application, and this is where the huge distinction is.
After all, we did run large scale consumer services ourselves between Xbox Live and Bing.
But this business of supporting a highly geodistributed enterprise cloud business is very different than just running one at scale public cloud service.
And we have learned a lot with what is our workload diversity as well as our geodiversity.
And our supply chain management is optimized for it.
AMY HOOD:  I would just add, Mark, this is a place, as Satya said, we have made a lot of progress in being data driven.
This is down to a monthly review by workload, by property, by geo.
And this is a place where I feel that we are in a terrific position, frankly, to respond to data sovereignty demands, changes politically, and our ability to execute that to provide what our customers demand in terms of security and manageability and location is something we also care a lot about.
MARK MURPHY:  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Mark.
So that wraps up the Q&A portion of today's call.
We encourage you to tune into BUILD, our annual developer conference, which will be webcast live at www.buildwindows.com.
As well as our Financial Analyst Briefing on Wednesday, April 29th, which will be webcast live on our Investor Relations website.
We look forward to seeing many of you in the coming months at various investor conferences.
Thank you for joining us and talk to you soon.
Bye-bye.
SATYA NADELLA:  Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Thanks.
(Operator Direction.)
END
Satya Nadella, Amy Hood, Chris Suh 
Tuesday July 21, 2015
CHRIS SUH:  Good afternoon, and thank you for joining us today.
On the call with me today are Satya Nadella, chief executive officer, Amy Hood, chief financial officer, Frank Brod, chief accounting officer, and John Seethoff, deputy general counsel.
On our website, Microsoft.com/investor, is our financial summary slide deck, which is intended to follow our prepared remarks, and provide the reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
The non-GAAP measures exclude the impact of impairment, integration and restructuring charges, and are included as additional clarifying items to aid investors in further understanding the Company's fourth-quarter and fiscal year performance and the impact that these items and events had on the financial results.
The non-GAAP financial measures provided above should not be considered as a substitute for, or superior to, the measures of financial performance prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Unless otherwise specified, we will refer to Non-GAAP metrics on the call.
All growth comparisons we make on the call relate to the corresponding period of last year unless otherwise noted.
For selected metrics, on the call and in other earnings materials, we have also provided growth rates in constant currency.
We present constant currency information to provide a framework for assessing how our underlying businesses performed excluding the effect of foreign currency rate fluctuations.
Additionally, any mention of operating expense refers to segment operating expenses as defined in the footnotes of our Form 10-K, and includes research & development, sales & marketing, and general & administrative, but excludes the impact of the impairment and integration & restructuring charges.
We will post the prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and in any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript on the Microsoft Investor Relations website until July 21st, 2016.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements which are predictions, projections, or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Forms 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
And with that, Ill turn the call over to Satya.
SATYA NADELLA:
Thank you Chris.
Good afternoon everyone.
Today, we will share the results of the final quarter of the year and our optimism for the year ahead.
We delivered $22.2 billion in revenue this quarter and $93.6 billion in total revenue for fiscal year 15, an increase of eight percent year over year.
We pushed forward in our transformation by focusing our investments in areas where we have differentiation and significant opportunity for future growth in large addressable markets.
We galvanized around our mission, strategy, and ambitions.
We aligned our structure with our strategy to deliver better products at a more rapid pace.
We focused our advertising business on search.
We focused our mapping efforts on higher level experiences and developer services.
We restructured our phone portfolio so that we can operate more efficiently near-term while driving reinvention long term.
We invested more in new mobile applications like Wunderlist, Accompli and Sunrise.
We also strengthened our enterprise cloud platform by acquiring Revolution Analytics, Datazen, and Bluestripe in this quarter alone.
And, we're at the threshold of the Windows 10 launch.
I'm proud of these steps.
And, I'm proud of the results we delivered in tandem.
In cloud alone, our annualized commercial cloud run rate surpassed $8 billion this quarter, and the revenue grew 88% year over year.
We're on a strong trajectory toward our goal of $20 billion in fiscal year 18.
With that as a backdrop, I want to walk through the progress we're making in each one of our three ambitions.
Let me start with reinventing productivity and business processes including our efforts across Office 365 and Dynamics.
We continue to see strong demand for Office 365 and Dynamics products.
We now have more than 15 million Office 365 consumer subscribers, and customers are signing up at a pace of nearly one million per month.
In addition, we've surpassed 150 million downloads of Office mobile on iOS and Android, and have introduced a new version of Office for Mac.
In the commercial space, the number of Office 365 users continues to climb with seats growing 74% year over year.
Office 365 is now in four out of five Fortune 500 enterprises, and more than 55% of the install base is on premium workloads.
It is clear that we have success moving customers to the cloud given half of all enterprise agreement renewals were for Office 365 this quarter.
Small and medium businesses offer one of our best opportunities for new growth in the cloud.
In fact, for more than a year now we've seen 50,000 new SMB customers adopt Office 365 every month.
Last week at our Worldwide Partner Conference, we announced our new Office 365 premium SKU for businesses, E5.
Now our customers will get rich new voice functionality in Skype for Business with Cloud PBX and PSTN conferencing, deep analytics with Delve Org Analytics and Power BI Pro, and advanced security features such as Lockbox and Advanced Threat Protection.
With E5, we've expanded our market opportunity for Office 365 by more than $50 billion.
This new E5 SKU and the launch of Office 2016 will drive one of the biggest new businesses for us.
Let's now turn to CRM.
This market alone is $20 billion plus and has massive opportunity for reinvention.
Mainstreaming Dynamics into our engineering, sales and marketing efforts gives us the ability to participate in this large and growing market in a more meaningful way.
Last week we announced the acquisition of FieldOne, which helps strengthen our Dynamics CRM customer service offering.
This quarter, total paid seats for Dynamics CRM online increased 140% year over year, and we have more than 8 million paid Dynamics seats across CRM and ERP in total, up 25% year over year.
This creates a great foundation for future growth in our Dynamics business.
Next, I want to share our progress in building the intelligent cloud platform with Azure.
Again this quarter, we're seeing proof that preference for our cloud SaaS services creates a flywheel of growth for our cloud platform services.
In Azure, both revenue and compute usage increased by triple digits year over year.
We tripled our revenue from Azure Premium Services this quarter.
And, with Enterprise Mobility Services, we now have more than 17,000 customers.
Appeal of our Visual Studio tools has grown to include developers beyond our traditional base with some of the decisions we made to embrace open source with .NET and support cross platform development.
Since November, we have seen more than five million downloads of Visual Studio Community, the fastest ever adoption of a Visual Studio product.
Visual Studio Online continues to gain momentum with over 3.1 million registered users.
Business intelligence and analytics is another large, rapidly growing market for us with an opportunity of more than $15 billion.
We are focused on strengthening our offerings in this space; just last week we announced the availability of Cortana Analytics Suite, a fully managed big data and advanced analytics solution.
We're not only building the tools, but are also delivering the insights customers need to transform their businesses.
Security is a key priority for our enterprise customers and another $30 billion market opportunity for us, and we are building capability to meet customers' needs.
For example, we made significant investments in security with Azure Key Vault, enabling our customers to protect data in the cloud with secure key management and encryption customers can control.
We have four new certifications for Azure  bringing our certification and attestation total to 22 globally, more than any other cloud platform today.
Our third bold ambition is to create more personal computing experiences with Windows and our devices.
I'm thrilled that we are just days away from the start of Windows 10.
It's the first step toward our goal of one billion Windows 10 active devices in fiscal year 18.
Our aspiration with Windows 10 is to move people from needing, to choosing, to loving Windows.
Based on feedback from the more than 5 million people who have been using Windows 10, we believe people will love the familiarity of Windows 10 and the innovation.
It's safe, secure, and always up to date.
Windows 10 is more personal and more productive with Cortana, Office, Universal apps and Continuum.
And Windows 10 will deliver innovative new experiences, like inking on Microsoft Edge and gaming across Xbox and PCs, and also opens up entirely new device categories such as HoloLens.
Windows 10 will deliver significant value to enterprise customers as well.
Windows 10 provides advanced security capabilities with additional features for hardware-based security, mobile work, and data protection.
It also provides a single mobile device management platform across all devices from phones, to laptops, to Internet-of-Things devices.
And Windows 10 helps enterprises stay up to date with Windows Update for Business and Windows Store for Business.
While the PC ecosystem has been under pressure recently, I do believe that Windows 10 will broaden our economic opportunity and return Windows to growth.
First, we have an OEM ecosystem that is creating exciting new hardware designs for Windows 10.
In fact, our OEM partners have over 2,000 distinct devices or configurations already in testing for Windows 10 upgrades, as well as hundreds of new hardware designs.
We are delighted that the first of these exciting new devices will start to be available on Windows 10 launch day.
And, by this holiday, we will be selling the widest range of Windows hardware ever available.
Second, we'll generate new growth through gross margin on our own differentiated first-party premium device portfolio.
We'll also significantly reduce our losses on phone by operating more effectively and efficiently with a more focused portfolio.
Third, we'll grow through monetization opportunities across the commercial and consumer spaces.
In the enterprise, customers will continue to value our unparalleled management, security and servicing capabilities.
And for consumers, Windows 10 creates monetization opportunities with Store, search and gaming.
We're confident that these are the right levers to revitalize Windows and restore growth.
The progress we made this quarter and the forward looking guidance that Amy will share shows that the opportunity for renewed growth is real.
In hardware, both Surface and Xbox had an incredible Q4.
We more than doubled Surface revenue to nearly $900 million this quarter, capping off a year in which it delivered more than $3.6 billion in revenue.
Both consumers and enterprise customers love this device.
Surface is clearly a product where we've gotten the formula right; earned fans, and can apply this formula to other parts of our hardware portfolio.
Gaming is an important scenario for Windows 10, and our success with Xbox this quarter gives us a strong starting position heading into launch.
Xbox Live users grew 22% this quarter and logged nearly 3.5 billion hours of game play.
Our growing fan base is excited for the best games line-up in our history.
All of this comes together with Windows 10 when fans can connect with each other, stream all of their Xbox One games to Windows 10 and experience the best virtual reality platform given our new partnerships with Oculus Rift and Valve.
In search, Bing will now power both differentiated experiences on Windows 10 such as Cortana, as well as search and search advertising across the AOL portfolio of sites, in addition to the partnerships we already have with Yahoo!, Amazon and Apple.
With advertising revenue growth of 21% year over year, Bing will transition to profitability in the coming fiscal year.
It's been a strong year of progress.
Above all else, I'm optimistic about our future.
Our cloud services are accelerating fast and Windows is positioned for renewed growth.
With that, I'll hand it over to Amy to talk about this quarter's results in more detail.
I look forward to rejoining you after that to answer questions.
AMY HOOD:
Thanks, and good afternoon everyone.
Our fourth quarter results demonstrate the strong progress that we've made as a company over the past year.
Key strategic initiatives such as cloud, first party hardware and consumer services delivered significant growth as well as improved profitability.
Commercial customer renewals remained healthy, with strong adoption of cloud services and a higher mix of annuity than we expected.
And our disciplined approach to resource allocation has allowed us to increase investment in the growth initiatives Satya mentioned, while reducing the company's operating expenses.
This allows us to better compete in markets with structural growth where we feel we have unique competitive advantages.
With that said, I will start with an overview of our financial performance, before moving into a more detailed discussion of the results.
This quarter we recorded an impairment charge related to our Phone Hardware business, and incurred integration and restructuring expenses.
Additionally, like most multi-national companies, the strengthening of the US dollar continues to have a significant impact on our reported results.
Accordingly, when applicable, I will give results and growth rates adjusting for the impairment, integration and restructuring expenses, and also in constant currency to help you better understand the underlying business fundamentals.
Revenue was $22.2 billion, down five percent, and down two percent in constant currency.
As a reminder, last year included $382 million of revenue that we recognized at the conclusion of our commercial agreement with Nokia.
Significant gross margin improvement across commercial cloud, Surface and our consumer services helped to mitigate the impact on gross margin from the decline in D&C Licensing.
Total gross margin declined seven percent and three percent in constant currency.
Operating income declined three percent and one percent in constant currency.
Earnings per share was $0.62 cents, growth of eleven percent, and growth of eight percent in constant currency.
Unearned revenue grew one percent to $25.3 billion, and seven percent in constant currency.
Commercial unearned revenue was better than expected as we saw a higher mix of annuity in the quarter.
From a geographic perspective, the majority of markets performed in line with our expectations.
The notable exception was Brazil, where inflation and macroeconomic volatility weighed on performance.
Overall, macro conditions remain a challenge in some large opportunity markets like China, Russia, Japan and Brazil.
There was slightly less impact from currency than our expectation.
With that backdrop, I will move to a detailed discussion of our results.
Q4 last year effectively marked the end of the XP refresh cycle.
It impacted our Windows OEM and non-annuity volume licensing, as well as our Office non-annuity volume licensing results.
During that time, OEM revenue exceeded that of the underlying PC market driven by a higher attach of Pro, particularly within developed markets.
This quarter, Pro revenue declined by 21% and similar to last quarter, we saw Pro attach remain at pre-XP levels, even with the underlying softness in the business PC market.
The annuity portion of Windows volume licensing grew again on a constant currency basis, with non-annuity revenue declining due to XP.
Windows non-Pro revenue declined 27% as OEMs tightly managed PC inventory ahead of the Windows 10 launch, particularly in developed markets.
In our view, this is a healthy state for the channel as we head into a transformational launch that starts next week.
Consumer Office 365 had another strong quarter of net subscriber growth.
Overall Consumer Office revenue results reflected the decline in the underlying driver of that business, developed market consumer PC sales.
Within D&C Licensing, the transition to Office 365 accounted for 13 points and the impact of Japan's PC market accounted for another 19 points.
We had another impressive quarter in Search, with revenue growth of 21% and 25% in constant currency, driven by increases in both volume and revenue per search.
As Satya said, revenue from Surface more than doubled this quarter with continued strength of Surface Pro 3 and the launch of Surface 3.
Enterprise sales accelerated this quarter, and sales of Surface 3 were particularly strong to educational customers.
Our differentiated products, as well as improved discipline and execution helped to improve gross margins by over $450 million this quarter, and $1.3 billion in fiscal 15.
Within Xbox, strong growth in consoles, online transactions and 1st party games, helped to drive revenue growth of 27%.
This progress, as well as the excitement that we generated at E3 with Xbox exclusive gaming content and backwards compatibility, demonstrates the building momentum that exists within the Xbox ecosystem.
In phones, we sold 8.4 million Lumias, which is an increase over last year's full quarter sales.
ASPs however have continued to decline.
Gross margin declined this quarter driven by lower per unit margins on Lumia devices as well as reduced volumes in Non-Lumia phones.
As announced on July 8th, we are changing our approach in this business, and are focused on delivering differentiated experiences for our targeted customer segments while improving our operating results.
Moving to our commercial results, total revenue across our two segments grew slightly in USD, and grew four percent in constant currency.
Our contracted not billed balance, which is a key indicator of customer commitment, reached an all-time high of over $24.5 billion, and it reached this level even with the significant appreciation of the US dollar.
Constant currency bookings were flat to the prior year, though as a reminder, last year commercial bookings grew 23 percent on the strength of a larger renewal base as well as the end of XP discussed earlier.
Our Office commercial business continues to transition to Office 365.
We again grew the install seat base of Office, Exchange, SharePoint, and Skype for Business.
Office 365 allows us to have a deeper on-going relationship with all of our customers, which in turn provides us with the opportunity to expand and grow our business over time.
Because of this transition, as well as weakness in Japan and the impact of XP, Office Commercial products and services grew one percent in constant currency, which was similar to Q3.
Dynamics revenue grew 15% on a constant currency basis, driven by the strong CRM results Satya talked about, and our ERP business, which saw 35% growth in customers this quarter.
Server products and services grew four percent, and nine percent in constant currency, continuing to outperform our peers in the enterprise software sector.
SQL server share growth continues as customers value its high performance and lower cost of ownership.
Revenue and licenses of Windows server grew against the backdrop of a declining server hardware market.
And in the public cloud space, we had another quarter of significant Azure usage growth.
Additionally, we significantly grew the gross margin percentage in our Commercial Other segment  increasing 13 points to over 43%.
Moving to operating expenses, which declined nine percent, or four percent in constant currency.
Our continued disciplined approach has allowed us to incrementally fund strategic initiatives without having to increase our expense base.
Other income was favorable to our expectation driven by gains on foreign currency and sales of investments.
Our non-GAAP effective tax rate was 24%, and was at the high end of our guided range due in part to strong performance in our Computing and Gaming Hardware segment in the US.
We returned $6.7 billion to shareholders this quarter, nearly double the amount from last year.
With that overview of the current quarter, let me turn to our outlook, starting with a few overall comments.
As we have communicated over the past couple of months, the accounting for Windows 10 will change.
We will be deferring a portion of Windows 10 revenue, primarily OEM, and recognizing it over time, generally 2 to 4 years.
As shared previously, the initial deferral and subsequent recognition of those deferrals will be netted in Corp and Other in our segment reporting.
Most importantly, underlying billings and cash flow won't change.
Therefore, our commentary in this and subsequent earnings calls, including our guidance, will focus on results prior to the net deferral impact, which we believe is the best reflection of the business health.
With that background, let me share some thoughts on fiscal 16.
The strengthening of the US dollar will continue to have a significant impact on our results over the course of FY16, assuming rates across our largest currencies, the euro,  Japanese yen and the British pound stay in line with current rates, and that the geographic mix of revenue stays as forecasted.
In our non-annuity businesses, the impact is immediate as the revenue is all recognized in quarter.
In our annuity business, revenue is deferred and the impact is delayed as we earn the revenue off the balance sheet.
In total, we expect that FX will negatively impact total revenue growth by five points in each quarter of H1, with seven points of negative impact in our commercial segments.
H1 would be the peak of the FX headwinds, and in H2, we expect FX to have three points of negative impact in total, and roughly four points negative on our commercial revenue.
With Windows 10, we expect momentum to build throughout the year as we and our partners bring new devices, applications and services to market.
We expect this to benefit our business results in the second half of the fiscal year.
With the strength in Xbox and Xbox Live, along with the launch of Halo 5 in October, Xbox will continue to grow both fans and profitability.
With the recently announced changes in Phone, there will be significant revenue declines year-over-year in the phone segment each quarter.
With the proactive measures we've taken to reduce our cost structure, overall losses will also decline for the fiscal year.
We would expect the majority of that improvement in the second half of the year once the restructuring efforts are materially complete.
Bing will be profitable in fiscal 16.
Assuming the macro environment is stable, we expect that our commercial momentum will continue, highlighted by growth in our commercial cloud.
We remain on track to achieve our $20 billion commercial cloud ambition in fiscal 2018.
We now expect operating expenses to be $32.1 to $32.4 billion, which is lower than the guidance we provided in April.
The lowered guidance reflects the savings from our restructuring of the phone business as well as important investments to drive top line growth as we support Windows 10, our first party hardware efforts as well as sales headcount to accelerate our leadership position in Commercial Cloud.
We expect our full year tax rate to be 24% plus or minus one point excluding the net impact from Windows 10 revenue deferrals.
Now to Q1, starting with Devices and Consumer.
In Licensing, we expect revenue to be $3.4 to $3.6 billion.
This range reflects Windows revenue roughly in line with the PC market.
Within consumer Office, we expect the transition to Office 365 subscriptions to continue.
In Computing and Gaming Hardware, we expect revenue to be $2.0 to $2.1 billion.
As a reminder, we launched Surface Pro 3 in late June last year, with launch benefits extending into Q1.
In Phone Hardware, we expect revenue to be approximately $900 million, reflecting our change in approach.
We expect gross margin in Phone to improve sequentially in Q1.
In Devices and Consumer Other, we expect revenue to be $2.2 to $2.3 billion, with continued growth in Bing, consumer Office 365 and Xbox Live transactions.
And in Commercial, as I discussed previously, we expect a significant FX headwind this quarter.
Our constant currency growth is expected to be about seven percent in Q1 which assumes we continue to take share in key markets and build momentum in the new areas we have entered.
With the negative impact of FX we expect revenue to be roughly flat.
In Commercial Licensing, we expect revenue of $9.1 to $9.2 billion with a continued shift to annuity.
And in Commercial Other, with the significant growth in our Commercial Cloud, revenue of $3.1 to $3.2 billion.
We expect COGS to be $7.0 to $7.2 billion, with variability being driven by both hardware segments.
We expect operating expenses to be $7.6 to $7.7 billion.
As a reminder, other income and expense includes dividend and interest income, offset by interest expense and the net cost of hedging.
Given the current FX environment, we expect our net cost of hedging to increase, and other income and expense to be negative $200 million.
Excluding the Windows 10 deferral and impact of foreign currency, we expect the sequential decline in unearned revenue to be slightly better than historic seasonality driven by the growing mix of annuity revenue.
In closing, I am proud of the tremendous amount of progress that our Company has made over this past year.
We've improved how we operate in virtually every sense.
These changes have allowed us to aggressively invest in areas that will drive future growth for the company.
And looking forward, we are better positioned to capitalize on the opportunities ahead of us.
With that, I will turn it back over the Chris, for Q&A.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Amy.
We'll now move to Q&A.
Operator, please repeat your instructions.
(Operator Direction.)
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse:  Hi.
Thanks, guys, and congrats on a great quarter.
I just wanted to double click on Office 365.
You guys showed another huge quarter of growth in terms of consumer seat count, and I think it was 86 percent growth on the Commercial Other side for Office 365.
I wonder if you could just drill into both the consumer and then the enterprise side as the trends you're seeing there, and obviously the guidance you just provided it looks like you expect those trends to continue in Q1.
So any color there would be great.
SATYA NADELLA:  Yes, I'll take that.
Over all, we're very excited about the growth we're seeing in Office 365.
On the consumer side, as you noted, we're growing a million subs a month and that's fantastic growth for us.
The consumer value, especially now that we have even all the endpoints covered with Office, the definition of Office and where all is present has also changed, and that all accrues to consumers being willing to have this subscription relationship with us.
On the enterprise side, the growth remains very exciting for us.
And the growth comes in multiple forms.
It comes in the form of just the EAs renewing more to Office 365.
It also comes in the form of some of the more comprehensive suites, the E3 and the new E5, that's the commitment we're seeing.
And we also see small businesses, I talked about the 50,000 businesses, small and medium sized businesses, each month signing up for Office 365.
That's pretty unprecedented, having been in the server business all my life, I've never seen a lot of the small business customers adopt some of the rich capabilities like it's possible now, and that's great growth as well.
And that cloud revenue number that is the 88 percent is all up cloud revenue.
It's inclusive of Office 365, EMS and Azure.
And it's good to see that kind of growth at that kind of scale now with $8 billion.
AMY HOOD:  And the one thing I would add to that is an important dynamic that we're seeing in Office 365 is as we are having this momentum build, and Satya has talked about some of the new customers we're adding, and the way we see that is the install base growing.
And we were able to see that this quarter across all the core workloads in Office.
And when you think about why that's so critical long-term, it's our ability to sell some of the workloads Satya actually referenced that will be in E5 when it launches.
They have the capability of upgrading on a more consistent basis using more of these premium services.
So when you can both add to your install base and add our overall market opportunity, we do feel good about our line of sight in that business for our long-term goals.
PHILLIP WINSLOW:  Great.
Thanks guys.
Congrats again.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Phil.
We'll take the next question now, please.
(Operator Direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS:  Good afternoon.
Satya, the server business continues a steady top performance, and as Amy pointed out, better growth than your peers.
I guess a couple of questions as it relates to the Windows 2003 retirement, and any impact you're seeing there and then, secondarily, if you could just comment on some of the new product launches.
It seems like there's a stack of new solutions that are coming on the server side that look pretty exciting, and your partners are excited about.
If you could highlight what you see as the most interesting from your perspective over the next several quarters?
Thank you.
SATYA NADELLA:  Yes, overall I start even with the world view that my server business is not some legacy business.
We fundamentally think of our servers as the extension of the cloud.
I even describe it architecturally as the edge of our cloud.
Every server, for example, has things like disaster recovery, backup and tiering with the cloud.
So we will continue to push that differentiation because I think that view architecturally and the delivery of it is what makes us pretty unique.
And you see it in the numbers.
Our servers, even this quarter, grew 9 percent, and compared to the industry peers, we're obviously gaining share in Windows Server, on SQL Server, and pretty much all of our management and security products as well.
And going forward, we have a fantastic lineup of servers, not just the infrastructure but even SharePoint, Exchange, Lync Server continues to have significant on premise deployment.
So as our cloud continues to grow, obviously we are getting where there is more capability in the cloud.
We're incenting customers and our partners to move to the cloud.
But at the same time, we are going to have a great server wave.
I'm excited about our SQL product.
I think it goes into the first preview next -- in fact tomorrow.
And that product I think is a pretty revolutionary product, because for the first time you can take a single table in a database and even tier it with the cloud.
And that kind of capability only we can provide.
And that's something that I'm looking forward to.
AMY HOOD:  And, Brent, to your specific question on Windows Server 2003, we did have a good quarter as we talked about in Windows Server.
But in general that business, unlike the client upgrades that we see, just because so much of the business is already on annuity, you don't see that type of incremental impact in an in-quarter release.
That isn't to say there isn't ample opportunity for us to make sure we upgrade customers to the higher value prop and more secure and more manageable offerings we have in the server business.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Brent.
Operator, we'll take the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
MARK MOERDLER, Bernstein Research:  Thank you.
Nice quarter.
I want to drill in in terms of the move to the cloud.
This quarter the year over year server product and services revenue growth was slower than it was in the past quarter.
How much of that is because you're seeing now some revenue shift to Azure, or is it not yet seeing any revenue shift going; and then I have a follow-up question.
AMY HOOD:  Well, why don't I take that one and we'll see what Mark's follow-up is.
You know, at 9 percent growth and continuing to take share, I feel like our performance in this continues to be sort of a positive outlier to the peer group.
And for me that type of performance and double digits for the year I still feel quite good about.
In general what's interesting, I think, is you're getting to the crux of it is do we have incremental workloads that are unique to the cloud?  We continue to see that.
The very best example frankly Satya mentioned in his comments, which is our EMS performance, the Enterprise Mobility Suite offerings.
It's taking something that's very unique, builds off of our core in the server business, and allows us to both grow and add new perspectives there.
So I don't think of it as reflecting a bigger shift than we've seen in particular this quarter.
Also, if you'll remember, a year ago we had a very big base of expirations in Q4 and had very strong performance a year ago.
So I don't look at it as a direct trend line.
SATYA NADELLA:  Yes.
The only thing I'll add is when I look at the total growth of Azure, the growth that's coming now from some of the premium services, this is -- there are businesses that we actually did not ever participate on premise at all, even EMS, when I think about our management, our management was just about Windows management.
But we now have management, data protection and identity systems that cross all devices in the enterprise, including Internet of Things, and that makes it pretty exciting, and that growth is great to see.
The same thing on the server management, we have a new suite called the Operations Management Suite, which also spans all the cloud units as well as on premise units.
Cortana Analytics, we never participated in any of the advanced analytics workloads at all in spite of all the success we had in the database business.
So I'm excited about building new workloads that in many cases are born in the cloud workloads where we are expanding our market opportunity and continuing to out-perform our peers and grab share when it comes to on premises.
MARK MOERDLER:  That's very helpful.
Switching gears a bit, on Windows obviously you're seeing some amount of delay due to Windows 10 on the OEM side.
Can you give maybe a little more higher color in terms of how you're thinking about that, how big a delay is it, how much we can see that starting to be replaced next quarter and beyond?
SATYA NADELLA:  Yes, I'll take that, and Amy you can add to it.
The way the Windows ecosystem works is there are phases to it.
In fact, if anything this release of Windows 10, just the way we have built it with the Insider program; everything is, of course, speeding up, because in some sense we've taken a very different approach with this Windows as a service, even when it comes to OEM relations and how they're able to co-create the products with us.
But that said there are three distinct phases.
The first phase is what I'll describe as the upgrade phase, that's what starts in a week's time.
And that is more retail execution and upgrades.
Then come the fall you will see the devices from all the OEMs going into the holiday quarter.
And then the enterprise upgrades, in fact, we have a release of enterprise features which I mentioned in my script, which will ship in that timeframe and I expect piloting to start and deployments to start in the second half of the fiscal year.
So that's how I'll think about the OEM, as well as enterprise adoption.
So I would -- my bullishness for Windows 10 is more in the second half of the fiscal year.
And of course it will build.
It will build starting in a week's time in retail and in the upgrades, but I sort of see this in three phases.
AMY HOOD:  And to your specific question, Mark, before every launch we tend to have a tightening in the channel as they prepare and run reasonably lean.
This is a healthy state.
It's been in the range of normal.
So I don't think of it as a delay in the way you're talking about it.
It is pretty standard, as Satya talked about, in terms of the dynamic.
And he mentioned we are feeling I think a lot of excitement from the ecosystem about what's possible with some of the new devices that will come.
So I don't really think of it in that way.
I think about it as an encouragement that they want to fill the channel as quickly as they can over the coming quarters with new machines.
MARK MOERDLER:  Thank you.
I appreciate it.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Mark.
We'll take the next question.
(Operator direction.)
KEITH WEISS, Morgan Stanley:  Excellent.
Nice quarter, guys, and thank you for taking the question.
I wanted to drill into sort of the new strategy around the phone business a little bit.
The revenue expectation for Q1 I think it was below our expectations, I think below what the street was looking for.
Can you give us a sense of how you see that business trending over a longer period of time, because there is a significant restructuring going on?  I think -- I don't think a lot of guys have a good view in their head of what your expectation is for this business on a revenue run rate business, or what do you expect to be selling this year on a going forward basis?
SATYA NADELLA:  Let me start and then, Amy, you can add to it.
The big shift that we are making when it comes to phones is to not think about phones in isolation.
That's perhaps the biggest shift, because I think about Windows 10 in its entirety, the Windows ecosystem in its entirety.
We clearly are going to have a premium first party portfolio.
And you've seen some of the numbers, some of the progress we have made in Surface.
I feel that we have a formula there that I would like to apply more broadly in terms of growing just delivering innovation, growing our own economic return for it, stimulating demand, creating categories, all of that is what I want to do broadly and it applies to phones, it applies to Surface Hub, it applies to HoloLens.
And that's how I view it.
I believe our participation in the phone segment by itself, so Windows phones and Lumia phones being there is important and that's why we picked the three areas where we have differentiation and we're going to focus on it.
We're going to have great flagship phones for Windows fans.
That's actually a segment we don't today have good devices and we hope to change that with Windows 10.
We have, in fact, good traction in the business segment.
So this is business customers who are actually buying phone devices, which is basically a radio with essentially a smart phone to be able to deploy their line of business applications.
That's where we have pretty unparalleled value, which is we have the Visual Studio Online and some of the tools I talked about.
So you can generate these apps at a low cost of ownership, manage them, secure them, and deploy them to our phone endpoints, and then of course management and security.
So that's the place where we want to continue to focus.
And in the value smart phones, that's the place where I want us to be much more efficient.
We clearly have some value to add there, because of the uniqueness of Office and Skype and our services.
But, at the same time I think we want to be smart about how many of these phones do we want to generate, how many -- which price points we want to participate, that's where you will see the most significant operational changes form how we operated last year to the coming year.
AMY HOOD:  And so, Keith, the way I think about that, I tried to outline it in my comments, is that the significant revenue declines, quarter-over-quarter for the year are a reflection of the focused approach we're going to take in phone.
It's an approach that we've executed in other hardware segments that I feel is a proven model for us.
Our profitability will also improve.
More of that comes in the second half of the year, structurally as we complete some of the restructuring efforts and those costs come out of our operating expense run rates.
But, I think that's probably the way to more appropriately think about over time you would expect to see gross margin improvement and operating profit improvement as opposed to focusing on the revenue line.
KEITH WEISS:  If I could sneak one more in, just on the security side of the business.
I think a lot of guys have thought traditionally about security as something that Microsoft does to make their platform more secure and to provide more confidence in users using your platforms and your tools.
On a going forward basis is there more of an opportunity for you guys to sell security as more of a stand-alone opportunity?  I mean it's something that's in very high demand.
CIOs are looking for more secure solutions.
Is that something that could potentially be more of a standalone opportunity for Microsoft on a go-forward basis?
SATYA NADELLA:  In fact, we are adding significant value in security.
It's much better for us, for example, to add capabilities around O365 in security and that's all in, for example, this new suite that we just announced called E5, the secure Lock Box.
That's actually a pretty -- very cool set of features that allows both regulators and businesses to have, for example, audit-ability and control over their movement to the cloud.
Similarly Azure, while we launched a whole set of security offers around how people can encrypt and manage keys, so those are all security features.
We bought a company called Aorato that's essentially a firewall on all your identity management.
So when we talk about enterprise management suite growth a lot of it is just obviously is management growth, but it's also security and data protection growth.
So the approach we're taking is we are essentially creating, to your point, security value around our products, which allows us to participate in essentially a security market that we never did in the ways that we are.
So it's more than just launching one point security product.
It's much more broadly participating in the security market and you've seen some of that in the inorganic move, and the suites we have created.
KEITH WEISS:  Excellent, thank you guys.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Keith.
We'll take the next question, please.
(Operator direction.)
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi:  Hi, Amy, just for you on the annuity, it looks like annuity is about 82 percent of the commercial revenue last two quarters.
How high do you think that goes?  It sounds like you do expect that to continue to go up, although it probably never gets to 100 percent.
AMY HOOD:  I do think over the long term you're right, that is how I think about it, and frankly inherent in the conversation around moving to the cloud with the aggressive targets we've given that is sort of implied, to your point.
And so I think 100 percent is not the logical answer.
There will always be somebody who chooses to purchase on a one-time basis, or there's a logic to it.
But, I do think over time we do expect the trend in that general direction.
WALTER PRITCHARD:  And then, Satya, you mentioned CRM in your comments, your prepared comments, which we haven't really heard you talk that much about as an area of interest in the past.
I'm wondering what changed in your view or how do you look to sort of bring that into it sounds like more of the core productivity scenario that you deliver?
SATYA NADELLA:  I mean overall business process collaborations, communications, these category boundaries are things that I believe are going to change.
I've always felt that in some sense most of the time we even automate business processes, but we spend really getting our business done in our communication and collaboration tools and this impedance is something that I've always dreamt of sort of how do we go solve and CRM has taken our own Dynamics product has taken some pretty unique approaches and quite frankly I also want to open up our communication and collaborations for other CRM vendors.
One of the things that I'm very explicit about is we will have an open platform for other business process applications, because this is a very fragmented market world over, especially if you add SMB.
And so we want to be having a platform play, as well as our own business applications play and both of them should be high growth for us.
And in the last year we've just added more focus, and we've put more selling capacity around it, more marketing capacity, and now of course I've mainstreamed it across Microsoft, because I'm a big believer in this because I think we have something unique to add as opposed to driving our own top line/bottom line growth, I think we can bring real innovation.
And that is what is exciting to see.
And it's not just CRM.
I'm actually excited about our ERP business, some of the numbers that Amy talked about is growth in the seats.
And when I think about data as the new currency, we have lots of managed seats and a lot of data, which all will move to the cloud.
And so things like Power BI and Cortana Analytics can help customers transform.
So in fact that's one of the reasons why I'm even sort of very optimistic about some of our new data capabilities is we have the attach capability to our even install base of Dynamics.
AMY HOOD:  And, Walter, just quickly, this is one of the areas that we invested in actually leading into this past fiscal year, FY '15, and the results have actually been better than we anticipated when we first made the investment.
So I think we both feel very good about the momentum that's built through the year.
WALTER PRITCHARD:  Great.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thank you, Walter.
We'll go to the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
KARL KEIRSTEAD, Deutsche Bank:  Hi, thanks.
Question for Amy on the cost control front.
It looks like you once again came in below your OPEX guide, but I think the COGS number came a little bit above what you had guided to three months ago.
And I'm just wondering if you could talk through that?  Obviously, it affects everybody's gross margin calculations.
Was it the hardware mix shift?  Was it the challenges with the phone business?  Perhaps a little color there might help us.
Thank you.
AMY HOOD:  Sure, Karl.
Because of the performance in Xbox and in Surface, you're right, it is a hardware mix shift a bit.
We out-performed significantly in both those products in Q4, and that does -- took us a little bit outside the COGS range, but not as much as our revenue out-performed.
So actually margins structurally were better than I thought they would be.
And so I actually feel quite good with that out-performance, and our ability to see that out-performance fall to the bottom line though stronger execution on gross margin percentage, particularly in that segment.
KARL KEIRSTEAD:  Okay, good.
That's helpful.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Karl.
Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
RAIMO LENSCHOW, Barclays:  Thanks for taking my question.
I wanted to go back to Azure.
You obviously have strong momentum there.
Can you talk a little bit about the use cases you see from your enterprise and SMB customers?  Is this kind of very much a test and development situation, or are you seeing kind of a broader adoption there besides obviously Office 365, et cetera?  Thank you.
SATYA NADELLA:  At this point I would say it's pretty broad even use cases for even enterprise customers.
There's definitely dev test happening.
There is production IaaS, Infrastructure as a Service, deployment given some of the new high performance SKUs and storage options that we have.
And we're seeing significant adoption of SQL, so this is Azure DB, machine learning as a service.
One of the things that we realized is that every company out there becomes a software company beyond even our traditional reach through IT, everyone has a digital office inside the company.
They are, in fact, doing things in advanced analytics and using machine learning.
And that's a place where we have some very unique capabilities, so that's another place where we're seeing wide adoption.
We are seeing adoption in the building of new front ends or back ends for new front ends.
So essentially using Azure as the cloud back end for their mobile apps across Android, iOS, and Windows as well as their Web.
That's another use case that's high growth for us.
And, of course, Cortana Analytics.
This is the big data side of it.
This is happening in IT.
It's happening in, as I said, these digital offices within each one of the customers.
So we have a pretty broad spectrum of use cases that some of the customers have talked about even in the recent set of conferences from our partner conference to our Ignite Conference.
We've been, in fact, showcasing even our ad campaign showcases some of these use cases.
RAIMO LENSCHOW:  Perfect.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Raimo.
Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs:  Great.
Thank you.
I just had two questions, pretty quick ones.
Just to follow up on Azure, I was wondering if you could share with us what you're seeing the mix between IaaS and PaaS, and kind of how you've seen that shift evolve over the last few quarters; and then, secondly, just to follow-up I think on Walter's question, yes, you've definitely been focusing on the customer relationship management opportunity in the financial market more.
But given the big SaaS incumbents already competing in that area, can you share with us, do you think you have the assets you need internally to execute against your long-term goals?
SATYA NADELLA:  Sure.
On the IaaS with the PaaS, it's an interesting question.
I've not looked at it in isolation, because what happens is at least the use cases, what starts off as IaaS suddenly will start using Azure AD for identity management, will use a little bit of our Media Services for, for example, just doing content encoding.
So there's a mix always.
So there's nothing pure PaaS, nothing pure IaaS.
That's the trend I see.
But it's a split that we should go take a look at and then offline maybe even talk about it.
But overall we've seen a significant amount of IaaS in the last year, because that's probably the place where we had more of a weakness which we have now overcome.
So we are seeing significant growth of IaaS in the enterprise.
But the place where we continue to have significant differentiation is in some of these managed services and PaaS.
And that I think is the mix on it.
And then on the Dynamics side, I absolutely believe we have a huge opportunity.
Having sort of worked in business applications for a long time, first of all, the market is very fragmented.
I think people like to talk about leaders, and there are clearly leaders when you go to the very top of the enterprise customers in segments.
But the way the market splits into verticals and into horizontals, and then the platform effects.
There's plenty of opportunity.
For sure you've got to be one of the players.
It will be three players, four players, whatever.
But in every technology paradigm, you want to be one of them.
We already have a $2-plus billion Dynamics business.
I talked about the total number of seats.
And now we have this triple digit CRM Online growth.
So I feel that we are in a good position, and I feel that things like we'll look at, and even some of the inorganic means to keep growing it.
In fact, the FieldOne Systems acquisition I talked about in my script is an example of that.
So that's my bullishness on our business process prospects.
HEATHER BELLINI:  Thank you very much.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Heather.
We'll go the next question.
(Operator Direction.)
ROSS MCMILLAN, RBC Capital Markets:  Thanks for taking my question.
First on OPEX, the guidance Amy is impressive.
I presume that fully accommodates the restructuring announced two weeks ago and then last year you said core Microsoft ex-NDS would be down slightly in OPEX.
I wondered if you could provide a similar comment for Fiscal '16 for core Microsoft ex-phone.
AMY HOOD:  Sure, I talked a little bit about it.
But let me go into a bit of detail on that.
I think the first half of your question was does the $32.1 to $32.4 full year OPEX guide reflect the timing of the implementation of our restructuring, and it certainly does.
And so what you can then see, as relates to the second half of your question, is that we are taking some of those savings and investing them back into the business in some of these key growth areas we've seen.
I outlined three on the call.
The third one I probably could have expanded more on.
The first one is Windows 10.
The second is the first party hardware where we just had such terrific performance again this Q4.
And then, finally, the third bucket was about accelerating our commercial cloud leads.
And I do feel like in that area we could invest in Office 365 some of the new E5 capabilities.
I look forward to adding sales capacity to take advantage of that.
We'll also add sales capacity across some of the other opportunities we've seen broadly.
And so I look and see that as an opportunity to accelerate top line growth.
SATYA NADELLA:  And one thing I'll just add, because a lot of folks even asked about our business process and business application, I want to build a long-term profitable business.
In other words, one of the keys in biz apps is you can always get into the trap of overspending in sales and marketing and not having long-term leverage at all.
One of the things I feel very good about our position is how do you really build a long-term profitable business.
That's at front and center to me.
So we will not overspend there in sales and marketing, because we do believe the products -- in fact, there's a different way to sell even business process applications, because of the cloud and that's something that we want to take advantage of.
ROSS MCMILLAN:  I had one quick follow up, if I could.
That's helpful.
On analyst day you did talk about I think it was 8 percent unit growth in the Office ecosystem over the last three years.
And it sounds like you continue to see nice unit growth in Office.
How should we think about that going forward?  Are you fully expecting to continue to see unit growth and then also just a clarification, I think your customer lifetime value was based on existing SKUs.
So as you introduce E5 and others does that open up the potential for even higher customer lifetime value?  Thanks.
AMY HOOD:  Great.
You know, I do think the work we showed at the analyst meeting on the importance of increasing the install base across Office and Exchange, it did occur again this quarter.
So I feel good that we're staying on the trajectory that we showed and the projections.
I do continue to expect that to happen as we shared back that last week in April.
And on the second half of your question, I tend to think you're right, generically each of those examples was quite different.
There were people that were upgrading from X to Y.
There were people that were just simply moving to the cloud.
But, one of the things that the cloud, to your point, makes fundamentally possible is the opportunity for us to quickly iterate the opportunities, build value, and deploy it more quickly to customers.
And generally I do think that they will pay us for that, to your specific question.
I also think the importance of it is that it tends to also come with higher margins.
So our improvement and continued improvement in our commercial cloud gross margin portfolio, I think this is a key criterion of that.
So I associate it, yes, with lifetime value and I also associate it with our ability to move our gross margin percentage up.
ROSS MCMILLAN:  That's great.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks, Ross.
We have time for one last question please.
(Operator direction.)
DANIEL IVES, FBR Capital:  Yes, thanks.
Just one last one, just on M&A.
Maybe you could just talk through any change in your strategy, obviously given what's happened with the Nokia write down, the security acquisition, going into a pivotal fiscal year, how you're thinking about M&A in the scheme of everything especially as you guys have been pretty tight on cost controls and everything else.
Thanks.
SATYA NADELLA:  Overall, Dan, the way I look at it is, first of all I'm most focused on obviously our organic growth and in there Amy alluded to this.
We have made significant changes in how we have allocated our own organic dollars, both in R&D, as well as in sales and marketing.
And we'll continue to do that, because I think there are significant new opportunities for us to go after and that will require us to just reallocate aggressively and that to me is core.
But, beyond that we will look at inorganic means.
When I look at all the acquisitions that we have made over the course of the last year and our OPEX guidance for next year, shows how disciplined we are in bringing new talent in, be it in R&D, be it in sales and marketing.
So we are not afraid to bring in new capabilities, but then also questioning what is the allocation we have.
Of course, you know, we have done smaller acquisitions.
But, they add up.
They are pretty significant when you add up all the things that we have done in the Office 365 space, all the things that we have done in the Azure space.
So we'll continue to do that.
And if anything comes up in M&A which allows us to pursue our strategic vision that we will need to even allocate more to on an OPEX basis, post acquisition, we will look at that.
So I won't shy away from it, because what's important to us is growth in areas where we have something unique to contribute and long-term profitability.
DANIEL IVES:  Thank you.
CHRIS SUH:  Thanks.
That wraps up the Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
We look forward to seeing many of you in the coming months at various investor conferences.
For those unable to attend in person these events will generally be webcast and you can follow our comments at the Microsoft.com/investor website.
Please contact us if you need any additional details and thank you for joining us today.
AMY HOOD:  Thank you.
SATYA NADELLA:  Thank you.
END
Microsoft Earnings Conference Call  
Satya Nadella, Amy Hood, Chris Suh  
Thursday October 22, 2015
CHRIS SUH:  Good afternoon, and thank you for joining us today.
On the call with me are Satya Nadella, chief executive officer, Amy Hood, chief financial officer, Frank Brod, chief accounting officer, and John Seethoff, deputy general counsel.
On our website, Microsoft.com/investor, you can find our earnings press release and financial summary slide deck, which is intended to supplement our prepared remarks during today's call, and provide the reconciliation of differences between GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures.
Our website also includes information related to our new financial reporting segments announced in September.
This is also the first quarter that reflects the revenue recognition accounting for Windows 10.
As a reminder, we report Windows revenue prior to any accounting adjustment in our More Personal Computing segment.
The corresponding revenue deferral for Windows 10 sales is then reported in Corp and Other in our segment reporting.
Earnings commentary today, and going forward, will focus on results prior to the net deferral impact as we believe this is the best reflection of business health.
Unless otherwise specified, we will refer to non-GAAP metrics on the call.
The non-GAAP measures exclude the impact of last year's integration and restructuring charges and the current Windows 10 net revenue deferral.
The non-GAAP financial measures provided should not be considered as a substitute for, or superior to, the measures of financial performance prepared in accordance with GAAP.
They are included as additional clarifying items to aid investors in further understanding the Company's first-quarter performance in addition to the impact that these items and events had on the financial results.
Additionally, any mention of operating expense refers to segment operating expenses as defined in the footnotes of our Form 10-Q, and includes research & development, sales & marketing, and general & administrative, but excludes the impact of last year's integration & restructuring charges
All growth comparisons we make on the call relate to the corresponding period of last year unless otherwise noted.
We also provide growth rates in constant currency, when available, as a framework for assessing how our underlying businesses performed, excluding the effect of foreign currency rate fluctuations.
At the segment level, we provide constant currency growth for both revenue and gross margin.
However, due to the recent change to our segment reporting groupings, we aren't able to provide segment level constant currency operating expense growth, and consequently cannot derive constant currency segment operating income either.
We do provide constant currency operating expense and operating income growth at the company-wide level.
We will post our prepared remarks to our website immediately following the call until the complete transcript is available.
Today's call is being webcast live and recorded.
If you ask a question, it will be included in our live transmission, in the transcript, and in any future use of the recording.
You can replay the call and view the transcript on the Microsoft Investor Relations website until October 21st, 2016.
During this call, we will be making forward-looking statements which are predictions, projections, or other statements about future events.
These statements are based on current expectations and assumptions that are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Actual results could materially differ because of factors discussed in today's earnings press release, in the comments made during this conference call, and in the risk factor section of our Form 10-K, Forms 10-Q, and other reports and filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
We do not undertake any duty to update any forward-looking statement.
And with that, I'll turn the call over to Satya.
SATYA NADELLA: Thank you, Chris.
Good afternoon, everyone.
I'm looking forward to today's call.
This quarter we delivered $21.7 billion in revenue and grew profit.
Also, as part of our commitment to balanced capital returns we meaningfully increased our quarterly dividend and continued our stock repurchase plan.
More importantly we are focused and making progress towards the goals for fiscal year 18 that we shared six months ago.
Now more than 110 million active devices are running Windows 10 we're well on our way to reaching 1 billion Windows 10 active devices.
People are moving from needing, to choosing, to loving Windows.
Similarly, we're making great progress towards our goal of $20 billion in annualized commercial cloud revenue run rate, which now exceeds $8.2 billion.
The results speak to our differentiated cloud strategy, expanded market opportunity, and the speed at which customers are adopting our services.
As I reflect on the quarter, it's important to note that we are investing in significant addressable markets where we also have meaningful differentiation.
Today, we'll walk through our financial results for the first quarter and discuss how we're delivering new innovation and growing users and usage across each of our three segments.
Let's start off with Productivity and Businesses Processes.
Clearly, how people work has changed dramatically, but one thing remains true: everyone wants to get more out of every moment of their life.
After all, time is our scarcest commodity.
That's why we set out to reinvent productivity and business processes.
The recent release of Office is a big step forward.
We designed Office 2016 and Office 365 to take the work out of working together.
We want to help change the nature of work within organizations of all sizes by focusing on the mobility of the person's experience, enabling collaboration, and building a rich service that spans all aspects of how people work today.
This approach is resonating with both our consumer and commercial customers.
More and more consumers are using Office across device platforms, which is driving Office 365 growth.
There are now more than 18 million consumer Office 365 subscribers.
We surpassed 200 million downloads of Office mobile.
More than one billion to-do lists have been created so far in Wunderlist.
And more than half a billion people manage their documents and photos in OneDrive.
We continue to see strong adoption in the commercial space as well from our largest customers, such as Kraft, GE and Louis Vuitton to schools and small businesses around the globe.
Of note, commercial Office 365 monthly active users grew to 60 million, with nearly 60 percent of our install base using premium workloads.
And, we added 50 thousand new small business customers in each of the last 19 consecutive months.
As customers move to our cloud it enables us to deliver even more value and push for new growth by entering new categories.
Information protection is a great example where we've done this because of natural synergies with our existing services.
In fact, nearly 20 million people already use our new premium information protection capabilities in Office 365.
That's a tremendous validation of how the cloud accelerates the adoption of new workloads and grows our ability to monetize new value in the $10-billion information protection market.
The new organizational analytics market is another area where we see growth opportunity, so we're investing with our acquisition of VoloMetrix a powerful cloud-based tool for analyzing organizational productivity.
The ability to visualize how people engage with others inside and outside an organization is something the cloud is uniquely suited to do.
It's exciting to be on the forefront of creating a new technology category.
This illustrates how our vision for productivity goes beyond helping individuals to empowering groups of people and entire organizations to accomplish more, together.
Our addressable opportunity will expand further as we launch more advanced security, voice, and analytics workloads in our new premium Office 365 SKU next quarter.
Let's talk about business processes.
With Dynamics, we are making great progress in breaking down the boundaries between business processes, collaboration, and productivity to truly empower organizations.
The companies I talk with every day are under pressure to grow revenue while differentiating themselves on customer experience.
It's one reason usage of CRM is growing.
Dynamics CRM Online enterprise seats more than tripled year-over-year.
Dynamics AX revenue also grew double digits as the operational system for agile business processes.
And we have a new release for Dynamics NAV for small businesses that is tightly integrated with Azure, Office 365, and Dynamics CRM.
Moving to the Intelligent Cloud.
Before I talk about the great progress we're making with our intelligent cloud platform I want to pause and reflect on where we are as an industry.
While many companies are developing commercial cloud offerings, there are really only two driving enterprise cloud platform innovation at massive scale:  Amazon and Microsoft.
We push each other, and we each have a unique approach.
Microsoft has bet on a strategy to build a hyper-scale public cloud as well as reinvent servers as the edge of our cloud.
This approach gives customers a true hybrid distributed computing platform that reflects their real-world needs.
Our unique hybrid approach coupled with high-value services is clearly a structural advantage.
It's great to see our customers like Walmart, Jet.com, and Alaska Airlines seize the benefits of the cloud to transform and push for growth.
Azure revenue and compute usage more than doubled year-over-year, and we're continuing to channel our innovation into high-growth scenarios with new features and services.
In the last quarter alone we made major updates spanning Azure App Services for building enterprise web and mobile apps, Azure Data Lake for near infinite data management and analysis and Advanced Threat Analytics, which helps organizations identify breaches and threats using behavioral analysis.
CIOs are increasingly adopting our Azure premium services for security and manageability.
Enterprise Mobility Services has more than doubled to 20,000 plus customers.
Our install base has increased nearly 6 times year-over-year, making EMS the largest mobility and identity management solution in a new and growing market.
Our acquisition of Adallom, an innovator in cloud security, will bring customers visibility and control over application access and company data stored across popular cloud applications, including Office 365, SalesForce, ServiceNow and many more.
To be a worldwide cloud player, global scale is a must.
With that in mind, we launched new datacenters in India, bringing our global total to over 20 regions more than any other major cloud provider.
We aren't just selling into these countries, we see the cloud as an accelerator of local economies by offering tools that empower emerging businesses, transform public sector services, and create value for new local partners.
Our differentiated hybrid capabilities mean customers get to choose how they adopt the cloud and distribute their workloads.
This in turn is driving the growth of our server business.
Premium versions of Windows Server, SQL Server, and System Center Server all grew double digits.
Lastly, we reached a big milestone with SQL Server - one that has been twenty years in the making.
The database software market is still one of the largest and now we are an unparalleled leader in Gartner's Operational DBMS Magic Quadrant.
That speaks to our differentiated vision in the category and the value we deliver to customers - and we're certainly not done innovating.
This milestone with SQL juxtaposed with our rapid growth in Azure and its position in the cloud magic quadrant shows the overall strength and progress we're making with our Intelligent Cloud Platform.
Now, let's shift to progress in our More Personal Computing segment specifically, how the launch of Windows 10 is sparking new growth opportunities for the entire Windows ecosystem.
As a platform company, we think about bringing the needs of multiple constituencies together developers, IT professionals and users and we're seeing great response from all three.
There are now more than 110 million monthly active devices running Windows 10.
The majority of the upgrades in the first ten weeks were naturally from consumers and are 3 times that of Windows 7 over the same time period after launch.
We are also seeing a fast start to business adoption with more than 8 million business PCs now running Windows 10.
We're adding more enterprise features, and we're making it easier for businesses to buy and support Windows devices.
Our early success in attracting developers, apps and store visits.
Our Store has seen over 1.25 billion visits, and developer revenue per download has grown 4 times since the Windows 10 launch.
Developers are responding to the opportunity, including Facebook, which will release Universal Apps for Facebook, Instagram, and Messenger.
Windows 10 is also driving increased usage of other Microsoft services.
Specifically, Bing share is up to 20.7 percent in the U.S.
and advertising revenue grew 29 percent worldwide, helped by Windows 10 users asking Cortana more than one billion questions.
Further, in gaming, we've also seen an increase in active users as we extend our gaming experiences from the console to Windows 10 PCs.
Xbox Live continues to grow active usage, and every day nearly half of the Xbox One user base is engaged in the service.
It will be a great holiday for all gamers.
The Beta release of Minecraft for Windows 10 is off to a strong start with players having already placed over half a billion blocks.
And next week we are excited to launch one of the most-anticipated new games this holiday with Halo 5: Guardians.
This new Halo includes an epic hunt for Master Chief along with ground-breaking multiplayer matches on Xbox Live.
As a result, I confidently predict that time will become much more scarce for Xbox One owners starting on Tuesday.
We see all of this Windows 10 usage as an early indicator of our ability to drive growth over the life-time of a device.
Two weeks ago, we took the next major step in our journey with the announcement of new Windows 10 premium devices from us and from our OEM partners.
It's an incredible line-up across a broad spectrum of categories, from the new Surface Pro 4 and Surface Book, to the new Lumia 950 and 950 XL, to the Microsoft Band 2 and HoloLens developer edition.
Early reviews are generating excitement with customers, and we're delighted that our pre-order sales are reflecting the positive sentiment in the market.
We are also seeing hundreds of new device designs from our partners the widest range ever for this holiday.
It's clear that by bringing together our applications, operating system, and hardware we will invent new personal computers and new personal computing.
Overall, I'm proud of our results this quarter and I'm optimistic about our growth prospects.
We are poised to seize opportunity in the largest technology shift of our generation with the enterprise cloud.
We are increasing users and engagement in services that cross over every aspect of a person's life from Office at work to Xbox at home.
While at the same time we're positioning Windows for growth.
Our transformation is well underway.
Quarter after quarter.
We build  new capability.
We enter new markets.
Scale our new businesses and new business models.
And we are being disciplined in our execution.
I'll now hand off to Amy to talk about this quarter's results in greater detail, and I look forward to rejoining you after that to answer questions.
AMY HOOD: Thank you Satya, and good afternoon everyone.
Before addressing this quarter's results, I want to briefly comment on the reporting segment change we announced during the quarter.
We believe our new segments, in combination with the supplemental metrics and the profit measure of operating income, provide transparency into our progress against our ambitions.
As Chris mentioned, my commentary today on our results and outlook will reflect the new segments, and excludes the net revenue deferral impact of Windows 10.
Last quarter, we discussed the material impact that foreign exchange movement would have on our financial results through fiscal 16.
In Q1, the FX impact on total revenue was 5 points with most of the impact in the Intelligent Cloud and Productivity and Business Processes segments given their high annuity mix.
This was in line with the expectation we shared in July.
This quarter, revenue was $21.7 billion, down 7 percent, and 2 percent in constant currency, primarily due to the changes we've made in our phone business.
Gross margin declined by 3 percent, but was up 3 percent in constant currency.
We were thoughtful with operating expenses realizing savings but investing as well.
As a result, operating income grew 1 percent or 11 percent in constant currency.
Earnings per share was $0.67, growing 3 percent, and growing 15 percent in constant currency.
We continued to see solid performance across most developed markets while the challenging macro conditions in Brazil, China, Japan and Russia persisted this quarter.
Commercial results are now included in each of the reporting segments.
Therefore, each quarter, I will cover overall commercial results in my commentary.
Our commercial business continues to be healthy, with momentum in cloud services and a higher annuity mix across all our segments.
Commercial bookings were slightly better than we expected and grew 10 percent in constant currency.
We executed well on expirations and commercial unearned revenue came in as expected, growing 3 percent to $21 billion, up 10 percent in constant currency.
Our contracted not billed balance was more than $23.5 billion, in line with seasonality for the quarter.
As Satya remarked, our commercial cloud annualized revenue run rate surpassed $8.2 billion, growing nearly 70 percent year on year, and in line with our expectations.
Consistent with the revenue pattern across our commercial business, we typically drive the largest volume of renewals and new agreements in June, and consequently see a lower sequential growth rate in Q1.
Importantly, our commercial cloud gross margin percentage improved again sequentially from Q4, as we benefitted from increasing scale and efficiencies.
As I will talk about shortly, our leading indicators around usage, new cloud services and customer demand remain healthy and we are clearly on track toward our $20 billion goal in FY18.
Now, let's turn to the detailed results of each segment.
Our Productivity and Business Processes segment, which is made up of commercial and consumer Office including Office 365, as well as Dynamics, delivered $6.3 billion in revenue, declining 3 percent and growing 4 percent in constant currency.
In Office Commercial, revenue grew 5 percent in constant currency, and was slightly better than we expected.
Increased cloud channel sales capacity, higher adoption of premium services and continued install base growth all contributed to our performance.
We saw broad-based Office 365 seat growth across both large enterprise and the SMB customer base.
Office consumer revenue declined 4 percent in constant currency, better than the underlying consumer PC market, and slightly better than we expected.
This quarter, recurring subscription revenue more than offset the impact of customers transitioning to Office 365.
Our Dynamics business grew 12 percent in constant currency, slightly better than we expected.
Growth was driven primarily by Dynamics CRM Online.
We continue to make progress by investing in product innovation organically as well as adding capabilities through acquisitions like FieldOne and Fantasy Sales Team.
Segment gross margin declined 6 percent, but grew 1 percent in constant currency.
Gross margin percentages have been impacted by the mix shift towards our rapidly growing cloud services including our consumer properties like OneDrive.
As Chris mentioned, this year, we can't provide constant currency impact at the segment level for operating expenses and therefore operating income.
That said, FX in general, as at the company level, had a favorable impact on operating expenses which declined 6 percent.
The Intelligent Cloud segment, which includes our portfolio of Server products, Azure cloud services and Enterprise Services, delivered $5.9 billion in revenue, up 8 percent and 14 percent in constant currency, in line with our expectations.
Our differentiated cloud platform offerings and rapid pace of innovation continue to be compelling to both new and existing customers.
Segment gross margin grew 8 percent, or 15 percent in constant currency.
We continue to invest in research and development resources to realize the large and growing addressable market opportunities, and are accelerating our plans to add incremental sales capacity to support growing customer demand for cloud services.
Segment operating income grew 14 percent.
Now to our final segment, More Personal Computing, which includes Windows, Devices, Gaming and Search.
Revenue was $9.4 billion, declining 17 percent and 13 percent in constant currency mainly due to the changes in our phone strategy.
As Satya mentioned, since the launch of Windows 10 in late July, we have seen solid momentum in our ecosystem and with our customers.
And importantly, we saw positive engagement and usage signals across services like search and gaming that provide post-sale monetization opportunities.
Overall, our OEM business declined 6 percent this quarter outperforming the PC market and better than we had anticipated driven primarily by non-Pro OEM.
As we discussed previously, this was a transition quarter as the ecosystem moves to Windows 10 and we believe overall inventory in the channel is at normal levels as we head into holiday.
OEM Non-Pro revenue declined 4 percent, as we saw OEMs focused on premium devices aligned to the Windows 10 launch.
This drove a richer hardware mix to market, leading to improvement in the average revenue per license.
OEM Pro revenue declined 7 percent, slightly ahead of the overall commercial PC market.
Windows volume licensing grew 4 percent in constant currency, with annuity growth in mid-single digits.
Search revenue increased to more than $1 billion this quarter.
And we passed an important milestone as our Search business reached profitability.
In our Devices portfolio, revenue declined 49 percent and 45 percent in constant currency, mainly due to Phone revenue which decreased $1.5 billion.
As expected, Surface revenue slowed with market anticipation of a new Surface Pro device for the holidays.
Surface continues to gain ground with businesses and schools, creating opportunities for our rapidly growing partner channel including Accenture, Dell and HP.
Both the number and size of deals in our commercial segment for Surface have increased double-digits year-on-year.
This quarter in Gaming, revenue grew 6 percent in constant currency.
We saw growth in Xbox Live transactional revenue and our first party game portfolio offset by declines in hardware revenue due to lower volumes of Xbox 360 consoles sold.
Segment gross margin declined 10 percent or 4 percent in constant currency.
Gross margin percentages were flat year-over-year excluding phone.
Segment operating expenses declined 13 percent due primarily to lower phone expenses.
As a result, segment operating income decreased 4 percent.
Back to our overall company results.
As usage of our cloud services grows, we will continue to invest capital into our datacenters and servers globally.
This quarter, we invested $1.5 billion to support demand-driven growth.
Other income was negative $280 million, due in part to foreign currency re-measurements and interest expense.
Our non-GAAP effective tax rate was 21 percent, below our guided range.
This was driven by the change in geographic mix of earnings and lower non-deductible operating losses associated with Phone.
This quarter, we returned $6.9 billion to shareholders, up 51 percent.
This includes our recently announced 16 percent increase in the quarterly dividend to $0.36.
With that overview of the quarter, let's move to our outlook.
I'll start with some overall comments and then move to a discussion by segment.
First, on FX:
Based on current rates and the forecasted geographic mix of revenue, we expect 4 points of negative impact on total revenue in Q2.
By segment, we expect a 7 point drag in Productivity and Business Processes, 6 points in Intelligent Cloud and 3 points in More Personal Computing.
In H2, we expect the impact to lessen to around 3 points in total, weighted towards our segments with the highest percentage of annuity.
Next, to our commercial business which we expect to remain healthy in Q2.
Our annuity mix should trend up, with good execution on contract renewals and continued adoption of our commercial cloud services.
Accordingly, we expect commercial unearned revenue to be within the range of $19.5 to $19.7 billion, benefiting from these positive trends.
With the ongoing increase in cloud demand, we expect to accelerate our investment in datacenters and capital equipment for the remainder of the fiscal year, expanding geographic coverage and capacity.
Now let me share some additional thoughts on each segment.
In Productivity and Business Processes, we expect revenue of $6.6 to $6.7 billion.
Adjusted for 7 points of expected FX impact, the revenue growth reflects continued momentum of Office 365 and our Dynamics portfolio.
And, as Satya discussed, with our new E5 SKU in Q2, we're expanding our opportunity into security, analytics and voice.
For the Intelligent Cloud segment, we expect revenue of $6.2 to $6.3 billion, including a 6 point FX impact.
Our hybrid approach continues to drive growth in our server licensing business, and robust growth in our services.
Gross margin in this segment will reflect the accelerating mix of cloud services.
We expect More Personal Computing revenue to be $12 to $12.4 billion, including the 3 points of FX impact.
Because of the mix of devices and software in this segment, let me provide a bit more context.
* First on Windows.
Overall, in Q2, we expect our OEM business to look similar to Q1 with non-Pro outperforming the underlying PC market.
* As we move deeper through the fiscal year, the device mix should evolve as our OEM partners produce more models at a wider range of price points.
* In Search, we expect Bing's strong trajectory to continue, remaining profitable for the remainder of the year.
* We will continue to see the impact of the phone restructuring.
Revenue declines and gross margin percentages in Q2 should look similar to Q1.
* With the strong Surface holiday line-up, we expect revenue to grow in Q2.
Gross margins will reflect the mix of device life cycles between Surface 3, Surface Pro 3 and a growing mix of Surface Book and Surface Pro 4.
We expect COGS to be $9.7 to $9.9 billion, with variability driven by the device sales.
We expect operating expenses between $8 and $8.1 billion in Q2.
For the full year, we are lowering our guidance to $31.9 to $32.1 billion.
We are and will continue to thoughtfully reinvest operating expense savings to accelerate growth in key areas, expand our addressable market and transform how we work to better deliver products and services to our customers.
We expect other income and expenses to be negative $300 million in Q2, similar to Q1.
This includes the net cost of hedging and interest expense, offset by dividend and interest income.
We expect our Q2 and full year tax rate to be between 19 and 21 percent.
Similar to Q1, this reflects the changing geographic mix of revenue as well as lower non-deductible operating losses associated with Phone.
In closing, during Q1, we exceeded our own expectations across many of our businesses and more importantly, we saw healthy indicators of future growth.
Through business model transitions and strategic shifts, our solid execution paired with a focus on achieving our bold ambitions has enabled us to take share in existing areas while we enter new ones.
And with that, I'll turn it back to Chris for Q&A.
CHRIS SUH: Thanks, Amy.
We'll now move to Q&A.
Operator, can you please repeat your instructions.
(Operator direction.)
KEITH WEISS, Morgan Stanley: Excellent, thank you guys for taking the question and very nice quarter, indeed.
I want to ask about the Azure in particular and the public cloud performance that you saw this quarter.
It again seems like you're seeing an acceleration in that overall business and more broadly it seems like industry-wide, both you guys and AWS are seeing something of an inflection point going on in terms of more and more business accruing to those public cloud environments.
So my question is just that, would you agree with that statement that there's an inflection going on in the business, and if so what do you think is causing that and is there a changing nature in how people are using that cloud?
And then maybe for Amy is there something we should bear in mind in terms of your traditional business, sort of the on-premise business, that maybe impacted as that inflection takes place that we should bear in mind as you go forward?
SATYA NADELLA: Yeah, I'll start, Keith.
Thanks for the question.
Overall what we are seeing is the public cloud, or cloud infrastructure makes it much more possible for businesses of all sizes and developers of all sizes to get at infrastructure with much less friction than ever before.
I grew up in our server business in the past.
We were definitely the ones who democratized servers by bringing servers to small businesses.
But when I think about what's happening, for example, in Office 365, where we are 50,000 small business customers who now get the most sophisticated server technology, but now as a SaaS service, that's what's really happening world over with all application categories and that's where the growth is.
I don't know long-term whether there is a zero sum equation, but right now and in the intermediate timeframe we see in our case growth in both sides.
And in our case the vision also we have for distributed cloud infrastructure is just that.
It is distributed.
So we don't think of our server as a legacy business.
I think of it as the edge of our cloud, if you look at what we are doing with SQL.
We will have the ability for any customer of SQL to stretch even a single table from between their on-premise to the cloud.
Those are the kinds of things that we are excited about, but we clearly are seeing very rapid growth and adoption of our Azure cloud, but in our case there are two unique aspects.
One is this true distributed hybrid and second is we don't think of Azure in isolation.
We think about it in the combination of Office 365, Dynamics, EMS, because really it's one cloud infrastructure, first of all, from a capital perspective that sort of serves all of these.
And there's a virtuous cycle between all of these for our customers, as well.
AMY HOOD: And, Keith, to your second question, the place you'll actually see it will be in the gross margin percentage.
As Satya said, I do expect both to grow, both the on-premise and the cloud, but I expect the mix to increasingly shift toward the cloud, given its sort of robust growth rate, which will impact the gross margin percentage over time.
KEITH WEISS: Excellent, that was very helpful, thank you.
CHRIS SUH: Thanks, Keith.
We'll take the next question please.
(Operator direction.)
MARK MOERDLER, Bernstein Research: Thank you.
Congratulations on the quarter, everyone.
Two questions, but related, let me give you the first one.
The commercial cloud annualized revenue run rate grew slightly from $8 billion to $8.2 billion or more than each of those, yet Office 365, Azure, Dynamics CRM Online; all of them seem to be growing very fast.
How should we think about the difference, should we figure that the run rate reaccelerates next year, next quarter, excuse me.
And then I have a follow-up.
AMY HOOD: The way to really think about that number, just because of some of the seasonality in our business market, is to think about the year-over-year growth rate of 70 percent.
For me that is more symbolic of how you should think about the pace and that is a very fast number on an increasingly growing base.
MARK MOERDLER: That makes perfect sense, thank you.
The second one is the cloud margins improved nicely, given the data that's in here it looks like they've all started to move up, Azure seems to move up.
You said in the FAM the gross margins for '15 should be about 44 percent.
How should we think about cloud gross margins for '16? I know you don't know obviously the mix of all the cloud products, but how should we think about the improvement there?
AMY HOOD: Thanks, Mark.
Looking in the old segments, as I know you all have done, we saw year-over-year improvement in the overall Commercial Other segment that we disclosed this time, too, of about 10 points year-over-year.
We saw sequential improvement from Q4 to Q1.
We're still focused on continuing to have that sequential improvement, especially as some of the things Satya talked about, which is the addition of premium services, the pace of innovation especially on the premium end.
And if you think about our launch of E5, which is a premium SKU in Office 365, it continues to give us the opportunity to both get more efficient in the infrastructure and to add higher margin products, especially at the SaaS end.
SATYA NADELLA: Yeah, just the one thing that structurally I think that we think a lot about and we're very disciplined about is our capital allows us to build all of the cloud services from Office 365, to EMS, to Dynamics, to Azure, and that diversity of workloads long-term is what lead to margin improvement and there will be changes and seasonality from quarter to quarter.
But, structurally those two things, the diversity of what we're doing and how capital is utilized across all of it is, I think, a big structural differentiator for us.
MARK MOERDLER: Beautiful, it's great to see that improvement happening.
Thank you very much.
CHRIS SUH: Thank you, Mark.
We'll go to the next question please.
(Operator direction.)
PHILLIP WINSLOW, Credit Suisse: Hi, thanks guys, congrats on a great quarter, just a question for Satya, then a follow-up to Amy.
Satya, you talked about good adoption of Office 365 on the commercial side, both in SMBs and large enterprise.
I wonder if you could just sort of break that down and sort of where are you seeing the faster adoption as you start to get into the enterprises, especially that might have enterprise agreements with Microsoft, how is that sales motion going and sort of what is the pitch there?
And then to Amy, I thought this was a key point, something that we've been looking for.
You noted that the subscription, the recurring business now has offset the cannibalization of the license.
Is that kind of something that we should think about going forward, or was there something specific about this quarter that would push that out? Thanks.
SATYA NADELLA: Yeah, first as far as the Office 365 usage itself, I talked about some of the numbers of 60 million monthly active users, the fact that our seats grew 66 percent year-over-year, the small business number.
I talked about the 50,000 per month additional customers that we are adding to Office 365.
These are all the growth numbers and the usage growth numbers.
The mix even, that information protection, I mean that's just another very important point, which is amongst the customers who are using Office 365 already 20 million are using some of these premium services like information protection.
And of course we're going to further expand that with new SKUs and new categories that are going to become part of Office 365.
So I see that stretching on both sides, which is to small business on one end and then these premium SKUs on the other end.
And we see nice attach, as far as EAs to the cloud, as well.
And that's definitely a big driver of our growth.
AMY HOOD: And so let me take the second and I'll add something to what Satya said.
One of the important things that's distinct about the small business market is that there tends to not be much of a lag in terms of buying and deployment.
They kind of want to be able to instantaneously use and get value very quickly and that's something we've actually seen and a real testament to our ability to add so many customers in every quarter.
And what you've seen in the consumer side, which it was an important point, you know, once we've built this install base up to 18 million users on the consumer side, that recurring rate does, in fact, offset the deferral from new.
And so it is an important inflection point for us this quarter.
PHILLIP WINSLOW: Great, thanks guys and congrats.
AMY HOOD: Thanks.
CHRIS SUH: Thanks.
Next question please.
(Operator direction.)
HEATHER BELLINI, Goldman Sachs: Great, thank you.
I just had two quick questions.
I was wondering, Satya, if you could give us a sense for just a high level commentary about the split of IaaS versus PaaS in Azure and maybe some color on the growth you see in each of those and how you see them evolving and then the second question would be related to the launch of Windows 10.
You gave the Bing example for the month of September and the solid pull forward there, or pull along there.
I'm just wondering if you could share with us any other areas where you're seeing a similar kind of pull along with Windows 10 adoption.
Thank you.
SATYA NADELLA: Sure, Heather.
On the first one, on the mix between IaaS and PaaS and SaaS, the thing that we are seeing is, quite frankly, all of these are growing, but the most interesting thing for me as a pattern is growth in IaaS leads to growth in other PaaS services or SaaS services.
I mean to put it very concretely, take something like Azure Active Directory, that's probably the best manifestation of the virtuous cycle that we see in any of the cloud adoptions that we have, right.
It could be someone coming from Office 365, it can be someone coming from Azure or Dynamics, EMS, all of those tenants get into Azure Active Directory, which is our largest PaaS service, because it's got even developer APIs.
So that means more developers are using it, more IT professionals are using it as a control plane.
So that's the network effect that we see when it comes to the PaaS services.
And then in terms of infrastructure itself, as again I said, there's people who are tiering even applications, people who build hybrid applications where the storage could be even on-premise in some cases, but the mid-tier and the web and the mobile back ends are in the cloud.
We see a lot of growth there.
We see a lot of growth in our data, both in terms of infrastructure, but in the new services like our Data Lake services, which are PaaS services.
Hadoop is another good example.
We see lots of Hadoop usage inside of IaaS, but we also see HD Insight growth.
So I would say there is a really good mix of those two and then on Windows 10 the -- I mean I'm very, very excited obviously about what's happening with Bing.
I think Amy talked about we have a billion dollar quarter, with 29 percent growth and good share position growth in the United States.
That's fantastic to see.
But gaming is the other place where we talked about Xbox Live now that spans both console and PC.
We see increased engagement, because of that.
We see, in fact, increased engagement with titles like Minecraft.
So we have some high hopes for what we can achieve with engagement around Xbox Live across the console plus PC.
CHRIS SUH: Thank you, Heather.
We'll go to the next question please, operator.
(Operator direction.)
BRENT THILL, UBS: Good afternoon.
Satya, Michael Dell mentioned with you on stage a week ago that he's seeing from his perspective stronger Windows 10 adoption among enterprise customers faster than he had seen I the past.
And I'm curious if you're starting to see a halo impact where those that are looking to move up are saying we want to go with more of the complete infrastructure set and are you seeing different sales motions those enterprise customers as those customers are coming back to you?
SATYA NADELLA: Thanks, Brent.
I mean that is absolutely the case that is we are seeing a much faster adoption cycle, obviously starting with the consumer side, but even the 8 million business PCs that are already running Windows 10, before we have started, in fact, the push on enterprise, we expect the enterprise deployment to start in earnest the beginning of next calendar year or the second half of this fiscal year.
But, to your point, the fact that there is pull already is a very, very good indicator of, and a good sign and it's even better than what we saw with Windows 7.
And so to me that's all positive news, but yet we are very, very focused on delivering I think new value to the enterprise customers, because if you look at Windows 10 we've already talked a lot about all the consumer value, but just take security itself, I think that Windows 10 represents a real breakthrough in terms of security on the end point, as well as in embedded, which we are very excited about in terms of driving the enterprise upgrade cycle.
BRENT THILL: Really quick just for Amy on cash flow.
Is there anything that we should take into account this year versus what happened last year?
AMY HOOD: I don't think anything unique that I would bring up, no.
Thanks, Brent.
BRENT THILL: Thank you.
CHRIS SUH: Thanks, Brent.
Operator next question please.
(Operator Direction.)
RAIMO LENSCHOW, Barclays: Hey, thanks for taking my question.
Besides Azure in the Intelligent Cloud, you obviously have very, very good momentum on the server in the classic server and tools business.
Can you talk a little bit about the volume versus price effect that you see playing out here, and how is it now and how do you expect that to play out going forward?
And one of the things on Azure was usage, and you mentioned how that kind of improved quite significantly.
Satya, can you talk a little bit where you see that current usage standing and where do you think that can go? We obviously didn't get a number, just a growth rate, but where do you see usage? Because that's obviously one of the things that one of your competitors keeps talking trying to knock on you.
Thank you.
SATYA NADELLA: Yeah, I mean I think the usage numbers is the one that, Raimo, that we talked about, which is doubling of compute, doubling of storage.
We talked about the growth in EMS, which is a higher level service.
We talked about the growth in Active Directory.
So we have usage growth in Azure which is very, very healthy.
AMY HOOD: On the server question you asked at the beginning, let me say that we did see, I think, around 9 percent constant currency growth of the core server product.
And a lot of that was premium driven.
Now, I have a distinction between a price question that you sort of asked versus seeing the value of a premium SKU.
And so I do think it was premium driven as opposed to sort of a price driven in particular.
RAIMO LENSCHOW: Perfect.
That's helpful.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH: Thank you, Raimo.
Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
KARL KEIRSTEAD, Deutsche Bank: Thanks very much.
I wouldn't mind going back to Windows 10.
Three months ago on the June quarter call, the messaging was that Windows 10 would not likely lift Microsoft's performance results until the second half of Fiscal '16, yet it feels like as early as this first quarter it's creating a lift, at least to the Windows OEM business.
And I just wanted to understand what's changed in the last three months such that it's having an earlier than expected positive impact on Microsoft? Thank you.
AMY HOOD: Thanks, Karl.
Why don't I take that and then Satya can add.
In particular what we saw this quarter was really as much about the mix of the devices that the OEMs are bringing to market as it was in the absolute unit distinction.
And you saw that in the non-Pro revenue performance.
And so for us I think really the way to think about the early signs of the impact were the strong device mix, some higher price units across a wide variety of OEMs as we build into holiday did provide some slightly better than expected results, as you noted in the non-Pro business.
But really some of the other upside that we saw in the quarter was from things that are the second sort of derivative of that, which was our search results were better than we had thought because of some of these results about where the PCs were upgraded and the pace at which they were upgraded.
And so I do think we are encouraged, as Satya said, but we're a quarter in.
And I think what's exciting for us is really the opportunity we have going forward.
We're excited about Q2 when the devices hit the shelves.
We're excited to have so many first party devices in Q2.
And then the next stage after that, which is really the enterprise deployment, which as Satya mentioned we expect in the second half of the year.
So it's early, but you're right, we did see some incremental improvement over what we expected.
KARL KEIRSTEAD: Thank you, Amy.
CHRIS SUH: Next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
WALTER PRITCHARD, Citi: Hi, thanks.
Amy, I'm wondering if you could talk about on the computing side, the personal computing side, you talked about this quarter seeing growth ahead of the PC market.
You alluded to a diversity of devices coming in the second half.
How do you think about that variable in the model, say, beyond this sort of launch period where you have a little bit of a differing mix going on in devices, and you get to more of a steady state out in kind of years two and three of the Windows 10 launch, do you think you can grow ahead of the PC market or do you think -- I know for the last few years you've grown below the PC market.
I'm just wondering how we should think about that.
AMY HOOD: Thanks, Walter.
Let me talk a little bit about what I said in my outlook.
This quarter, as I just talked about, the non-Pro outperformance versus the market was really due to a higher revenue per license.
I expect that actually to continue in Q2.
I expect our overall Pro business to remain in line with business PCs.
Once we work through sort of the end of XP bump that really should be in line.
And as we talked about, as we move though the year, I do expect things to more normalize overall in terms of our P&L comparisons.
But I do think that's probably the best way to think about the curve over the course of the year.
WALTER PRITCHARD: And then on the commercial licensing part, specifically within productivity I know you sort of had an old breakout and a new breakout where we don't see commercial licensing necessarily within Productivity, but would you expect that piece, the commercial licensing within productivity given the transition going on to be stable or would that decline as you see the transition over to the cloud in productivity specifically?
AMY HOOD: Let me try and if I miss the question or misunderstood it you can help me again.
I think you're asking about our core sort of Office Commercial business, the product side versus the service side.
WALTER PRITCHARD: Correct.
AMY HOOD: And really -- okay, good.
The trend we saw there, we're 5 percent up in a constant currency basis.
That was sort of 70 percent cloud minus 8 percent on prem.
That's a trend that's not new for us.
We've thought about making this transition as quickly as possible, but what we're seeing, what you heard us talk about, was a transition to sort of increasing premium mix, selling more workloads, doing all that while we're growing the install base.
So if you think back to how we've talked about the long-term, the lifetime value equation, it's those components that I really think about proving out over time, and we had lots of encouraging signs about that.
New users, Satya referenced on the small business and midmarket side.
Premium mix we talked about how many premium services we're now selling.
And then in terms of renewals, you know, they're quite good, which we talked about.
And so I think all of those, when you talk about should we expect sort of the traditional business to be in decline, I don't think that's new.
I think what's important is our ability to switch it to the services and add more over time that I really focus on.
WALTER PRITCHARD: Okay.
Thank you.
CHRIS SUH: Great.
We'll move to the next question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
MARK MURPHY, J.P.
Morgan:  Yes, thank you very much.
Amy, I see the commercial bookings numbers in the KPI sheet.
But I do not see the total bookings numbers.
I'm wondering if you could just comment on that so that we can try to maintain a consistent analysis there if it's relevant?
And also, Satya, now that SQL Server has taken over this number one position in the Gartner quadrant for the database market, could you help us understand how the roadmap evolves from here, as we did notice Amazon made its debut also in the leaders quadrant, and I think we're trying to understand how the movement to cloud platforms like Azure could further alter the database landscape and how you could capitalize on that?
AMY HOOD: You go first.
SATYA NADELLA: I'll go first.
I think the data architecture that underlies what's happening in the enterprise underneath the applications is going through a dramatic change.
That said the relational database itself remains still a very strong component, but not the only component anymore, both on premise and off premise.
And what we want to make sure as a company is to cover all of that landscape with a very rich data platform.
So if you look at what we're doing, the length and breadth of our ambition, as well as our delivery today, everything from what SQL itself is doing, we have now all in-memory workloads for OLTP, BI, data warehousing built in.
We have the ability to now tier even the database with the cloud.
This is all the things that are coming in SQL 2016, and we're excited about that.
When it comes to the cloud itself, we have a PaaS service for SQL which is very unique in terms of SQL Azure.
We have now the DataLake service for basic petabytes, exabyte scale data management.
We have higher level data services like Azure ML, which is about advanced analytics, a category we didn't even participate in the past.
So we've entered that category.
Revolution R fits into that.
So we have a very rich story.
And this is not even talking about some of the other end user BI capabilities like Power BI.
So I think we have a very rich vision and execution on what is an expanding data platform opportunity, and it's nice to see us innovate on the new services while we also in what is still the big market, which the relational database market, claim a leadership position.
AMY HOOD: And, Mark, on the total bookings number, the reason we moved to commercial bookings is it's a far more comparable number to look at period to period.
Total bookings, because the volatility, frankly, in consumer businesses in times like the holiday period, it can make it far more volatile than usually what many of you have been asking for, which is sort of the continuity and health of the overall commercial business.
If you want to get to total bookings, you just add back in all the consumer revenue is technically how you would do it.
But I do think the more helpful KPI for us in terms of bookings is the commercial ones.
CHRIS SUH: Great.
Thanks, Mark.
Operator, we'll have time for one final question, please.
(Operator Direction.)
ROSS MCMILLAN, RBC Capital Markets: Thanks so much for squeezing me in, and congrats on the quarter.
Amy, I just had a couple.
The first one, just your comment that the consumer Office business you're seeing basically the subscription revenue now being larger than the offset, if you will, on the license side.
Where do we stand with regard to that on the commercial side of the Office transition?
AMY HOOD: The way to think about that is how I look at -- well, the way I would generally say it is, you look at each of the KPIs we give, so the Office commercial business grew 5 percent, it was negative 8.
There's some transition earning back off the balance sheet, the total cloud is 70.
When we start to get to this point, and the percentage we already have in the cloud, it is really an offset.
And that's probably frankly been true a little bit longer than we talked about, technically, in terms of what goes off and what comes on, given we've now got, as Satya said, 60 million users, and more than that in terms of seats sold.
Now that can technically, Ross, be interesting in certain quarters of the year where we have very heavy expirations.
And so it just depends year-over-year, that's why the commercial is slightly harder to do it on, because there's some volatility in the ins and outs based on seasonality.
ROSS MCMILLAN: Just if I think about the incremental subscription revenues from the commercial side versus the license declines, it sounds like this year, this fiscal year, we're making that pivot like we have made on the consumer side.
Would that be a fair statement?
AMY HOOD: It gets complicated.
I want to make this simple, and unfortunately it's just slightly complicated because so much of our install base was already on an annuity contract, it makes this transition mathematically hard.
I think what you're asking is specifically for our transactional component, when the old transactional component has gone.
But it's a very hard -- but that's a component of the number, not the total.
So it's why it's technically difficult to answer the question you're specifically asking, Ross.
But the way I would think about it is, we are moving such a substantive piece of our EA business and with our annuity mix all up in commercial up to 86 percent, we're feeling very good about our ability to transition people add LTD and grow the business overall at a very high level.
CHRIS SUH: Thank you, Ross.
ROSS MCMILLAN: Thank you very much.
CHRIS SUH: So that wraps up the Q&A portion of today's earnings call.
We look forward to seeing many of you in the coming months at various investor conferences.
For those unable to attend in person, these events will be webcast and you can follow our comments at Microsoft.com/investor.
Please contact us if you need any additional details and thank you for joining today.
AMY HOOD: Thanks, everyone.
SATYA NADELLA: Thank you, everyone.
END
F16Q2: emptyF16Q3: emptyF16Q4: empty